,job_title,job_desc,Unnamed: 0.1.1
0,data+scientist,"Click “Apply on Company Website” and our recruiting assistant Olivia will help you schedule an interview with our team.
TurnPoint Services is a national leading service provider of plumbing, electrical and HVAC. The key to growth of the business is its people. We are dedicated to creating an environment that attracts and retains talented and passionate people. The key outcome to our unprecedented growth is through supporting a healthy and productive relationship with our team and continuing to improve performance by enhancing the career path of each of our team members.
Data scientists utilize their analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large data sets. They then use this information to develop data-driven solutions to difficult business challenges. Data scientists commonly have a bachelor's degree in statistics, math, computer science, or economics. Data scientists have a wide range of technical competencies including: statistics and machine learning, coding languages, databases, machine learning, and reporting technologies.
It is essential that this individual can hit the ground running and be up to speed with our procedures quickly. This individual is responsible for managing & implementing enterprise systems in a fast-paced environment with a heavy emphasis on automation, process improvement, and innovative solutions. This position reports directly to the Senior Director, IT & Business Integration.
Pay Range: $100,000 - $120,000 yrAnnual Bonus Opportunity
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES:
o Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
o Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
o Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
o Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
o Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
o Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
o Ability to understand API Specs, identify relevant API calls, extract/transform data and implement SQL friendly data structures
o Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
o Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
QUALIFICATIONS:

o Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
o Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
o Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
o Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
o Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
o Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
o Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
o Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Additional Compensation and Benefits:Affordable Medical, Dental and Vision plans401K with 3% company matchShort- and Long-Term Disability plansAccident & Critical Illness Insurance available
20K Life Insurance Policy freeAdditional life insurance available
6 Paid Holidays each yearPaid Time Off

TurnPoint Services – Turning Bad Days into Good Ones.
Turnpoint Services is an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",1.0
1,data+scientist,"SUMMARY


The primary purpose of the Data Scientist, Finance position is to design, develop, and manage predictive models, statistical models, and reusable data science solutions for decision making in financial operations and strategic planning. Uses programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced analytics to predict and forecast data. Evaluates data science methods and procedures to ensure validity, applicability, efficiency, and accuracy. Plan data collection methods for projects. Generate and test hypotheses and analyze and interpret the results. Train others in applying data science methods for various data sets and data science software.


JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Data Science Consulting, Collaboration and Reporting

Design, develop, configure, and manage reusable data science solutions and statistical models that can be applied by financial operations, analytics, and planning teams to support decision making. Create reports and presentations for business use cases.
Predict and measure the accuracy of forecasts and predictions to continuously drive operational and financial effectiveness. The resource will deliver both capacity and demand based data science solutions.
Educate business and analytics teams on how to apply data science methods across various data sets. Provide training on data science / statistical software like Python, R, or other relevant platforms.

Adapt data science methods to promote decision quality across finance, planning, business operations, revenue cycle, costing, strategic analytics, and clinical operations.
Evaluate the data science methods and procedures used to obtain data in order to ensure validity, applicability, efficiency, and accuracy. Identify relationships and trends in data, as well as any factors that could affect the results.
Plan data collection methods for specific projects, and determine the types and sizes of sample groups to be used. Process large amounts of data for statistical modeling and graphic analysis.
Report and interpret results of statistical analyses, including information in the form of graphs, charts, and tables.


Oral and Written Communication


Express ideas clearly and concisely in groups and one-to-one conversations; create an environment with open channels of communication.
Convey information clearly and concisely through both formal and informal documents;


Other duties as assigned

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Industrial Engineering, Biostatistics, Bioinformatics, or related field. Four years of experience in data science solutions, data modeling, statistical analysis, application coding or programming, machine learning algorithms, data mining, or data visualization. With preferred degree, two years of experience in data science solutions, data modeling, statistic analysis, application coding or programming, machine learning algorithms, data mining, or data visualization. May substitute require education degree with additional years of equivalent experience on a one to one basis.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information

Requisition ID: 140890
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Work Week: Days
Fund Type: Hard
Pivotal Position: No
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 81,600
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 102,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 122,400
Science Jobs: No",2.0
2,data+scientist,"Company Description
Proximate Technologies Inc is in staffing and consulting since 2004, we are immensely successful in creating a global network of highly adopt intelligent workforce that can help you achieve critical projects and goals. Keeping pace with projects and being on the lookout for the extremely talented individuals has become even more challenging and here is where Proximate comes in to play!
We have been providing top consulting services and we are one of the fastest growing IT Consulting Firm in this complex job market with cutting-edge technologies in project implementing services and client recruitment capabilities. Our vision is to support services needs of our clients and offer them technology-driven business solutions that meet their goals and corporate objectives.

Job Description

Design and analyze experiments to verify product hypothesis and direction
Audit quality of launch experiment results and guarantee correct measurement of product or technical changes' impact
Keep track of core metrics and attribute metrics changes to root causes
Analyze market dynamics, potential gain and cost of new product initiatives, and consult on product strategy
Use data and experiment to verify hypothesis around bottlenecks in product growth, and consult on direction for improvement
Work with engineers and product stakeholders to deliver product insights.

Qualifications

Master degree in Computer Science , Electrical Engineering and Information Technology
Expertise in SQL and programming in Python or R
Knowledge in basic machine learning and deep learning
Strong communication and teamwork skills
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.0
3,data+scientist,"Position Summary:

The Data Scientist – Level I is a skillful team player with a clear track record of transforming data into actionable insights and knowledge. This individual is a deliberate and systematic scientist who can clearly articulate the hypotheses to be tested, practice with rigor and precision, and maintain a balanced/independent point of view to achieve valid and accepted findings. Uses social determinants of health data sets in conjunction with administrative claims and electronic health records to measure the relational impact of these variables when applicable.

It is essential for this person to be a very effective communicator who can guide business and clinical customers to understanding of applied methods, rationale, statistical validity and the appropriate application of insights.
Neurology
Exempt
TMC location
Full Time
Position Key Accountabilities:
1. Supports faculty and clinical, business and research customers with data science services on a variety of projects which may include clinical operations, hospital quality/safety, finance, supply chain, practice management, population health, personalized medicine and translational research.
2. Builds models that incorporate diverse data sets representing administrative, clinical and social health indicators when applicable.
3. Apply a variety of methods such as statistical analysis, data mining, predictive analytics, time series analysis, multivariate regression analysis, statistical process control and optimization solutions.
4. Perform as a results-oriented problem solver to quickly synthesize complex scenarios, connect abstract patterns/information, apply appropriate methods, and implement practical and timely solutions.
5. Demonstrate and embrace a collaborative approach to fully realize the talents of colleagues such as data stewards, IT staff, business analysts, business stakeholders and industry experts.
6. Assess the impact of computer networking and data warehousing on data use and analysis when applicable.
7. Perform other duties as assigned.
Certification/Skills:Proficiency with statistical packages, data bases and programming languages for data preparation, storage, transformation, analysis or visualization. Examples include R, SAS, STATA, SPSS, Matlab, SQL, Python, Hadoop, Pig, Hive, MapReduce, Java Tableau, Excel or other big data frameworks.Ability to work with a wide variety of data formats/sources such as relational databases, XML, JSON, CSV, text, sensors/activity trackers, clickstreams, social media, and geolocationEffective communication skills including written, oral, listening and interpersonal.
Minimum Education:
Master’s degree in health care, management, mathematics, engineering, informatics, or a related field
Minimum Experience:
1 year of enterprise experience as a data scientist, informaticist, statistician, senior analyst or related role
Physical Requirements:
Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to 10 pounds frequently and/or a negligible amount constantly to move objects.
Security Sensitive:
This job class may contain positions that are security sensitive and thereby subject to the provisions of Texas Education Code § 51.215",5.0
4,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Master’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

For employees based in Colorado, this position starts at $114,700 per year. A sign-on bonus and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the position offered.",6.0
5,data+scientist,"At Houston Methodist, the Data Scientist position is responsible for addressing the best uses of data science and informatics development for providing a competitive advantage or addressing pressing clinical or business problems in Houston Methodist Hospital (HMH) and Houston Methodist Academic Institute (HMAI) operations and care, as well as to communicate informed conclusions and recommendations across an organization’s leadership structure. The data scientist will review clinical and research data so as to understand and report on the needs surrounding clinical, financial, operational, population health, social, behavior, and marketing data. Works closely with physicians, care givers, hospital staff, administrators, and other stakeholders to implement projects of clinical and business benefits.
Requirements:
PRIMARY JOB RESPONSIBILITIES
Job responsibilities labeled EF capture those duties that are essential functions of the job.
PEOPLE - 15%
Maintains client relationships as assigned and leads the delivery of innovative strategies and solutions. (EF)
Presents project progress and results to key stakeholders. (EF)
Partners in collaboration with leadership of the service lines/specialty areas to promote staff accountability and effective decision-making. (EF)
SERVICE - 35%
Analyzes health care data using basic and advanced statistical methodologies; interprets results for investigators and prepares reports. (EF)
Drives data analytical insight across the organization. (EF)
Identifies data elements within the clinical/health/research databases for analytics and decision support. (EF)
Maintains database results by setting and enforcing standards and controls. Makes revisions to data entry screens and data checks; reviewes and resolves data discrepencies. (EF)
Translates finding into implementable informatic solutions with the clinicians, hospital and research administration or other key stakeholders. (EF)
QUALITY/SAFETY - 20%
Responsible for accuracy and timeliness of data input into reports and decisions. (EF)
Identifies and correct flaws in interpretation of results, inconsistency in presentation or inference. (EF)
FINANCE - 10%
Uses department resources/equipment/supplies properly and efficiently. (EF)
Manages the continuous improvement of clinical, research, and operational data and analytics. (EF)
GROWTH/INNOVATION - 20%
Seeks opportunities to expand learning beyond baseline competencies with a focus on continual process improvements. (EF)
Assumes responsibility for self-growth and development by participating in in-service programs and continuing education. (EF)
Consults with hospital and research staff regarding process improvement, delivery of best outcomes, decision supports, data insights, and recommendations. (EF)
This job description is not intended to be all inclusive; the employee will also perform other reasonably related business/job duties as assigned. Houston Methodist reserves the right to revise job duties and responsibilities as the need arises.
Qualifications:
EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS
o Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Clinical Informatics, Public Health Administration, Business Administration, or Engineering or MD with experience in Computing, Informatics, and Statistics
EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS
o Four years of experience in data analytics and/or database management in a healthcare organization

CERTIFICATIONS, LICENSES AND REGISTRATIONS REQUIRED
o None

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED
o Demonstrates the skills and competencies necessary to safely perform the assigned job, determined through on-going skills, competency assessments, and performance evaluations
o Sufficient proficiency in speaking, reading, and writing the English language necessary to perform the essential functions of this job, especially with regard to activities impacting patient or employee safety or security
o Ability to effectively communicate with patients, physicians, family members and co-workers in a manner consistent with a customer service focus and application of positive language principles
o Experience in clinical, research, and or healthcare administration
o Skilled in statistical, database, and algorithm modeling preferred
o Skilled with implementing and managing Health IT software, prototyping and applications
o Knowledge of process mapping and analytics
o Knowledge of clinical/health data integration in a health care IT environment
o Ability to perform exploratory data analysis
o Ability to communicate complicated, technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
SUPPLEMENTAL REQUIREMENTS
Work Attire Yes/No
Uniform No
Scrubs No
Business professional Yes
Other (dept approved) No
On-Call* No
Note that employees may be required to be on-call during emergencies (ie. Disaster, Severe Weather Event, etc) regardless of selection above.
Travel**
May require travel within No
Houston Metropolitan area
May require travel outside No
of Houston Metropolitan area
**Travel specifications may vary by department.
Please note any other special considerations to this job: __________________________
Company Profile:
Houston Methodist Specialty Physician Group is comprised of more than 500 doctors committed to delivering personalized, patient-focused care to the Houston community and beyond. Our priority is to make sure every patient is heard and supported throughout his or her experience with us. Patients who choose the specialty physician group also benefit from our coordinated-care approach, which places a wealth of highly qualified specialists and resources at their service, all committed to the high standard of care patients have come to expect from Houston Methodist.
APPLY",7.0
6,data+scientist,"Recognized authority internally and externally on leading-edge technologies, theories, or techniques. Provides innovative solutions to complex and critically sensitive issues affecting multiple disciplines and work groups. Determines and pursues courses of action essential in accomplishing objectives. Integrates advanced technology, theories or techniques that have a significant continued impact across disciplines and business units. Serves as organization spokesperson on specialized projects or programs. Champions large projects that affect the company’s long-range goals and objectives. Provides mentoring and guidance to lower level employees.
Responsibilities
Develops data science strategy and technology roadmaps for system design and development across multiple platforms and products in the Global Business Unit and company at large.
Communicates strategy and technology roadmaps to executive staff, industry partners and customers; leverages recognized technical and business expertise to influence, guide, and shape business strategy and decision- making at the highest organizational levels.
Provides consultation, design input, and feedback for data science solution development and design reviews across multiple organizations and architectures.
Guides and mentors less- experienced staff members to set an example of software systems design and development innovation and excellence.
Participates in and provides input on process for selection of future technical leaders.
Knowledge & Skills
Industry expert regarding development of data science solutions and technologies.
History of innovation with multiple patents or deployed solutions in the field of data science.
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills.
Experience in overall architecture of software and data management systems, data transformation methodologies and big data solutions.
Exceptional ability to define and create complex models to pull valuable insights, predictions and innovation from data and effectively visualize and tell stories that communicate data insights.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Ability to effectively communicate product architectures, design proposals and negotiate options at the most senior organizational levels.
Scope & Impact
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, technicians and external design partners.
Serves on Industry Standard Forums
Typically interacts with high-level Individual Contributors, Managers, Directors, EXEC2s and EXEC3s.
Drives future technology roadmap and influences company direction across multiple business units
Education & Experience
Bachelor's, Master's or PHD degree in Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, or equivalent.
Typically 15+ years’ experience including graduate or postgraduate research..
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",9.0
7,data+scientist,"Job Description
Data Scientist
Technology | Digital
Mission
The Data Scientist is responsible for conducting both directed and undirected research that involve tackling open-ended data science problems and questions in various segments primarily of the oil and gas industry. Drawing on an advanced degree in a quantitative field such as data science, engineering, computer science, statistics or applied mathematics, the Data Scientist demonstrates the knowledge to invent new models and algorithms to solve data problems. A preferred candidate would have research and industry experience in petroleum engineering and statistical modeling to automate workflows.
Qualifications
Master’s or PhD in a quantitative field such as data science, engineering, computer science, statistics, or applied mathematics.
Strong knowledge of statistical and computational platforms (Python, R, C++, C#, HTML, SQL, Angular, Matlab, etc).
Experience with BI tools a plus.
Background in a variety of data-driven models including linear and logistic regression, decision trees, and neural networks.
A preferred candidate would have research and industry experience in petroleum engineering and statistical modeling to automate oil and gas workflows.
A preferred candidate would have experience with operationalizing Machine Learning solutions at scale in the cloud or within automation and control systems
Responsibilities
Research and assess next-generation technologies for machinery diagnostics and prognostics, and digitalization of the equipment and processes.
Apply engineering knowledge in developing data-driven algorithms for anomaly detection, failure prediction, and model predictive optimization and control by exercising an optimal balance between domain understanding of oil and gas industry and machine learning.
Process large multivariate and temporal data sets collected from equipment operations, manufacturing tests and diagnostic routines.
Collaborate with field and product engineers to identify key health monitoring parameters of a system.
Maintain mastery of state-of-the-art relevant tools such as in data acquisition, machine learning and software engineering, that are necessary to operationalize and scale solutions.
Conduct internal and external technical reviews and contribute as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) for engineers and projects that involve data science and machine learning.
Communicate ideas, plans, and results effectively via oral and written reports.
Publish work in relevant journals and conferences to increase visibility for the company.
Generate new IP such as patents or trade secrets for R&D activities that will provide the company a competitive advantage.
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer including disability and veterans.
If you are an individual with a disability and you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation during the application process, please contact our services team at +1 (844) 404-7427.",10.0
8,data+scientist,"Company Description
Wood Mackenzie is the global leader in data, analysis and consulting across the energy, chemicals, metals, mining, power and renewables sectors.
Founded in 1973, our success has always been underpinned by the simple principle of providing trusted research and advice that makes a difference to our customers. Today we have over 2,000 customers ranging from the largest global energy companies and financial institutions to governments as well as smaller market specialists.
Our teams are located around the world. This enables us to stay closely connected with customers and the markets and sectors we cover. Collectively this allows us to offer a compelling combination of global commodity analysis with detailed local market knowledge.
We are committed to supporting our people to grow and thrive. We value different perspectives and aspire to create an inclusive environment that encourages diversity and fosters a sense of belonging. We are committed to creating a workplace that works for you and encourage everyone to get involved in our Wellness, Diversity and Inclusion, and Community Engagement initiatives. We actively support flexible working and are happy to consider alternative work patterns, taking into account your needs and the needs of the team or division that you are looking to join.
Hear what our team has to say about working with us:
https://www.woodmac.com/careers/our-people/
We are proud to be a part of the Verisk family of companies!
At the heart of what we do is help clients manage risk. Verisk (Nasdaq: VRSK) provides data and insights to our customers in insurance, energy and the financial services markets so they can make faster and more informed decisions.
Our global team uses AI, machine learning, automation, and other emerging technologies to collect and analyze billions of records. We provide advanced decision-support to prevent credit, lending, and cyber risks. In addition, we monitor and advise companies on complex global matters such as climate change, catastrophes, and geopolitical issues.
But why we do our work is what sets us apart. It stems from a commitment to making the world better, safer and stronger.
It’s the reason Verisk is part of the UN Global Compact sustainability initiative. It’s why we made a commitment to balancing 100 percent of our carbon emissions. It’s the aim of our “returnship” program for experienced professionals rejoining the workforce after time away. And, it’s what drives our annual Innovation Day, where we identify our next first-to-market innovations to solve our customers’ problems.
At its core, Verisk uses data to minimize risk and maximize value. But far bigger, is why we do what we do.
At Verisk you can build an exciting career with meaningful work; create positive and lasting impact on business; and find the support, coaching, and training you need to advance your career. We have received the Great Place to Work® Certification for the fifth consecutive year. We’ve been recognized by Forbes as a World’s Best Employer and a Best Employer for Women, testaments to our culture of engagement and the value we place on an inclusive and diverse workforce. Verisk’s Statement on Racial Equity and Diversity supports our commitment to these values and affecting positive and lasting change in the communities where we live and work.

Job Description
Do you have a passion for data? Are you a problem-solver with an ability to quickly understand complex processes? Do you continually seek and find meaningful patterns in data? Then this role could be for you. We are looking for a Data Scientist - someone with a data focus, mathematical mindset, and collaborative project experience. This role will be key to delivering advanced analytics projects within both new and existing business workflows, working alongside expert data professionals and business unit SMEs to deliver new insight and analytics to our clients. The candidate should be able to commute to one of our offices in Either Edinburgh or London.
About the role
This role will form part of the Innovation and Analytics Lab and will work closely with a variety of other functions and teams throughout Wood Mackenzie. The successful candidate will spend the majority of their time performing data exploration / visualization and developing machine learning models. The success of this role will require collaborative development & problem solving. Our team has consciously developed a supportive and inclusive culture, guided by five principles:
Fixate on Business Outcome
Sustain an Innovation Mindset
Cultivate Constructive Discord
Encourage Curiosity and a Growth Mindset
Maintain Collaborative Habits
Key Unique Selling Points
we work on a wide variety of interesting and challenging problems in various domains
we believe in supporting personal development, and allocate time during work hours for it
we work on projects that are expected to have a quantifiable meaningful impact on the business
Key Responsibilities
Develop and / or use various algorithms to build predictive models within a variety of business domains.
Collaborate with business units to understand their problems and goals, specify hypotheses, and identify appropriate modeling approaches / statistical tests.
Collaboratively perform analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple complex business problems using advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
Use strong knowledge in algorithms and predictive models to investigate problems, detect patterns, and recommend solutions.
Use strong programming & data engineering skills to explore, examine, prepare, and interpret large volumes of data in various forms.
Design, prototype, and productize data sets that are used for advanced analytics.
Read and ingest academic-oriented literature, and collaborate with subject matter experts to build better predictive models.

Qualifications
About you and how you can excel in this role
The person that fills this role must be a self-starter who is energized by a challenge, passionate about using analytics to extract strategic value from data, and thrives on innovation.
Knowledge and Experience
Required Data Science / Machine Learning stack:
Languages / packages: Python, SQL, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, PyTorch / TensorFlow / Keras, Plotly / Matplotlib, Jupyter
Algorithms: Classification, Regression, Clustering, Neural Networks, Time Series, Ensemble Models, Feature Selection & Extraction, Mathematical Optimization
Visualization: Spotfire / Power BI / Tableau / similar
Version control: Git
We are looking for someone with:
advanced degree in statistics, computer science, applied mathematics, or a related field
strong knowledge of advanced applied data science: mathematical, computational, statistical modeling techniques, neural networks, data analysis and visualization
professional experience as a data scientist or machine learning engineer
professional experience working with big data and relational databases
extensive experience with data manipulation, analysis, and visualization
hands-on modeling experience building machine learning models
familiarity with collaborative development using agile-like methodology
Nice-to-have:
cluster computing with Apache Spark
orchestration tools such as Apache Airflow
non-relational databases such as MongoDB, Apache Cassandra, etc.
network graph analysis & graph databases such as Neo4j
DEVOPS – CI/CD
cloud computing environments – AWS / GCP / Azure / etc.
Additional Information
Verisk Analytics is an equal opportunity employer.
All members of the Verisk Analytics family of companies are equal opportunity employers. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, citizenship, sex, gender identity and/or expression, sexual orientation, veteran's status, age or disability.
http://www.verisk.com/careers.html
Unsolicited resumes sent to Verisk, including unsolicited resumes sent to a Verisk business mailing address, fax machine or email address, or directly to Verisk employees, will be considered Verisk property. Verisk will NOT pay a fee for any placement resulting from the receipt of an unsolicited resume.
Consumer Privacy Notice",11.0
9,data+scientist,"Senior Data Scientist
Do you enjoy working with cutting-edge technology that can impact the world?
Would you like the opportunity to develop your career with a global energy technology company?
Partner with the best
You will help in developing commercially viable failure prediction and signature detection models that can help to predict and prevent failures in Electrical Submersible Pumps (ESP), Surface Pumping Units and other forms of artificial lift systems. This role includes research, prototyping and will require working closely with customers to ensure the models and analytics are delivered in a commercially viable form.
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be responsible for:Working with customers to capture accurate data and analytics requirements.Developing, verifying, and validating analytics to address customer needs and opportunities.
Advising the Technical Product Manager with regards to data science capabilities and ensure that research is correctly focused to add value to Artificial Lift specific problems.Working alongside software developers and software engineers to translate algorithms into commercially viable products and services.
Performing exploratory and targeted data analyses using failure prediction models using supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques. Communicate methods, findings, and hypotheses with stakeholders.Working with data engineers on data quality assessment, data cleansing and data analytics.Generating reports, annotating code, and other projects artifacts to document, archive, and communicate your work and outcomes.
Fuel your passion
To be successful in this role you will have:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related Data Analytics subject, Master’s or Ph.D strongly preferred
5+ years of time series data processing using machine learning techniques
3+ years of practical work using real-world data to solve real-world problems
3+ years of Tensor Flow, Azure ML or other machine learning platform
3+ years querying relational databases using SQL
3+ years Python coding experience
Desired Characteristics:
Past experience building time series models for industrial equipment
C# coding experience
Experience with ML.NET
Strong customer facing skills both oral and written
Oilfield experience
Working with us
Our people are at the heart of what we do at Baker Hughes. We know we are better when all of our people are developed, engaged and able to bring their whole authentic selves to work. We invest in the health and well-being of our workforce, train and reward talent and develop leaders at all levels to bring out the best in each other.
Working for you
Our inventions have revolutionized energy for over a century. But to keep going forward tomorrow, we know we have to push the boundaries today. We prioritize rewarding those who embrace change with a package that reflects how much we value their input. Join us, and you can expect:
Contemporary work-life balance policies and wellbeing activities
Comprehensive private medical care options
Safety net of life insurance and disability programs
Tailored financial programs
Additional elected or voluntary benefits
About Us
With operations in over 120 countries, we provide better solutions for our customers and richer opportunities for our people. As a leading partner to the energy industry, we're committed to achieving net-zero carbon emissions by 2050 and we're always looking for the right people to help us get there. People who are as passionate as we are about making energy safer, cleaner and more efficient.
Join Us
Are you seeking an opportunity to make a real difference in a company with a global reach and exciting services and clients? Come join us and grow with a team of people who will energize and inspire you!
About Us:
With operations in over 120 countries, we provide better solutions for our customers and richer opportunities for our people. As a leading partner to the energy industry, we’re committed to achieving net-zero carbon emissions by 2050 and we’re always looking for the right people to help us get there. People who are as passionate as we are about making energy safer, cleaner and more efficient.

Join Us:
Are you seeking an opportunity to make a real difference in a company that values innovation and progress? Join us and become part of a team of people who will challenge and inspire you! Let’s come together and take energy forward.

Baker Hughes Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",12.0
10,data+scientist,"We Are:
Being part of Accenture Strategy & Consulting means becoming an expert at making the New happen Now. To us, the New is all about the wise pivot that turns constant disruption to continuous reinvention. We are an innovation led company that works at the heart of our clients’ organizations so that no matter how complex the business challenge, we face the future with confidence.
If you love solving challenges and not just studying them, then Accenture Consulting is the right place for you. Join us to develop your ideas into provocative points of view and transformative insights that help shape industries. You’ll work with an amazing and diverse mix of world-class experts with access to one of the most robust portfolios of capabilities and ecosystem relationships in the industry. Together, you’ll do so much more than consult.
Coming here means future-proofing your career and going as far as your ambition takes you. Becoming a tech-savvy, well-rounded, multi-disciplined and market-relevant advisor doesn’t happen by chance. We invest in training and development in a big way, so you can build your future along with ours, creating an impactful career unique to you. Ultimately, we believe we is greater than me and that diverse perspectives lead to the best solutions. Joining Accenture Consulting means you will learn, innovate and lead, and together we will improve the way the world works and lives.
Accenture Strategy & Consulting, Utility Industry, Retail Energy and Customer Service Practice helps energy providers around the world to reimagine, transform and grow their business and create new value propositions, revenue streams, commercial models and ecosystems. We are powering the progress to a safe, connected and sustainable planet. Every day, we work with the largest electric, gas and water utilities to deliver innovative solutions and help them become more efficient, reliable, environmentally friendly and safer places to work. We co-create the future with our clients at Accenture Innovation Hubs around the world and work alongside our clients to bring the future to life in the core of our client's operations. We are the marketplace leader in modernizing the Customer Experience network, delivering next level of connectivity between marketing, operations and technology that goes beyond the commodity. Our utility clients are looking for bold solutions in the era of rapidly changing technology, policy and workforce innovations. Are you the leader who wants to reinvent the Utilities' Customer Experience and empower our clients to create a clean, sustainable and connected world? Join a team of industry practitioners with global footprint and local camaraderie. Visit our site to learn more about Accenture Strategy & Consulting Utilities Practice.
You Are:
A skilled utility industry practitioner who knows how to reinvent Customer Experience in the new digital world. You have experience designing and implementing digital transformation in a functional and/or technical capacity with CRM / Customer Care focus on business process improvement and/or supporting technical solutions (e.g. in the contact center, back office and strategic departments of a retail utility). You identify, target, and organize for intelligent customer and retail growth with new connected energy experiences. In fact, every day you are looking for opportunities to challenge the status quo and you are not satisfied with step change. You are a relentless storyteller, inspiring teams with your vision and new way of thinking. You have a proven track record of assembling diverse, high performing teams that harness people's strength and deliver radical insight. You understand that co-location with clients and teams is critical to innovation and you are ready to partner at client sites.
The Work:
Data scientist delivering analytics solutions tied to utility customer programs.
Understand client challenges and articulate the value of transformation in terms of business outcomes
Bring thought leadership on most critical issues Utilities face today, and in the future
Constantly learn and bring new technologies and innovative solutions to our clients
Be a role model and a coach for the next generation of Accenture analysts and consultants
Champion people on your team to succeed professionally and personally
Foster trusted advisor relationships with clients from strategy to technology; from the C-Suite to the front line; for business and IT
Integrate business data to discover new insight and enable evidence-based business decisions
Earn air miles and hotel points with weekly travel to client sites for recharging on epic personal adventures
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Here's What You Need:
Minimum 3 years of experience in the Utility Industry required
Minimum 3 years of experience managing or implementing analytics solutions for utilities in a data scientist role
Minimum 3 years of experience building machine learning solutions
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent
Our Commitment to You:
Your entrepreneurial spirit and vision will be rewarded, and your success will fuel opportunities for career advancement. You’ll make a difference for some pretty impressive clients. Accenture serves many of the Fortune Global 100 on high-profile projects. Opportunities to learn daily through training, assignments, and collaborating with experts across the company. Access to leading-edge technology.
Along with a competitive salary, Accenture offers a comprehensive package including generous paid time off, an employee healthcare plan and a competitive 401K program. Learn more about our extensive rewards and benefits: Your Future Rewards & Benefits
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $119,000 - $129,999 and information on benefits offered is here.


What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",13.0
11,data+scientist,"Job Description
The Artificial Intelligence (AI) Engineer is responsible for combining science and engineering to build machines capable of intelligent behavior.
Conduct directed and undirected research and tackle open-ended artificial intelligence (AI) problems and questions. Contribute expertise to push the envelope towards increasingly self-driving, autonomous remote operations
Develop software and computers that ""think and orchestrate"" like a human brain and supersede it
Work on systems that not only gather data and information but formulate decisions and act on that information automatically
Analyze domain problems and identify, adapt and develop technologies from the field of AI
Evaluate and develop state estimation techniques that are relevant and applicable to decision-making automated systems
Create proofs of concepts, and work with development teams to commercialize and deploy in production environments
Maintain mastery of state-of-the-art relevant tools such as in data acquisition and management, machine learning and software engineering, that are necessary to operationalize and scale solutions
Conduct internal and external technical reviews and contribute as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) for engineers and projects that involve data science, machine learning and AI
Communicate ideas, plans, and results effectively via oral and written reports
Publish work in relevant journals and conferences to increase visibility for the company
Generate new IP such as patents or trade secrets for R&D activities that will provide the company a competitive advantage
Basic Qualifications:
Master’s Degree
Legal authorization to work in the US is required. We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job opening
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s or PhD in a quantitative field such as data science, engineering, computer science, statistics, or applied mathematics
This role requires combined expertise in software development, programming, data science and data engineering
Strong knowledge of statistical and computational platforms (Python, R, C++, Matlab, etc.)
Background in the development of optimization techniques, machine learning algorithms and other logic-based AI techniques
Background in a variety of data-driven models including linear and logistic regression, decision trees, and neural networks
A preferred candidate would have experience with operationalizing AI solutions at scale in the cloud or within automation and control systems (Reinforcement Learning, Model Predictive Control, MIMO Control, Process Control, etc.)
Experience with Declarative Programming would be a plus
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer including disability and veterans.
If you are an individual with a disability and you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation during the application process, please contact our services team at +1 (844) 404-7427.",14.0
12,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
A data expert with serious analytical and statistical chops. You know how to take massive amounts of data and find the insights our clients need to help their companies do more. You have a strong understanding of applied behavioral insights from fields including behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development. You take a data-driven approach to designing experiments and analyzing data, with an excellent ability to communicate results to a diverse stakeholder group.
The work:
Develop custom models based on in-depth understanding of underlying data, data structures, and business problems to ensure analytics deliverables meet client needs
Develop standard models, solutions and assets that can be used as accelerators for similar problems across clients
Define and assess the behaviors required to enable the success of a client’s data strategy and enable the adoption of data analytics tools and solutions
Define the challenges clients face in utilizing data and insights, while understanding and identifying explanations for the underlying patterns of behaviors that contribute and can be changed
Apply human-centered design principles to understand challenges, designing and prototyping behavior change initiatives
Design and implement experiments focused on behavioral change, with the potential to scale and embed solutions and processes if successful
Design and test new experiences which trigger behavioral change in the context of work
Identify the emergence of new patterns of behavior within the organization over-time
Use your judgment to craft solutions to complex problems or seek guidance as needed
Report on your progress regularly in writing and face-to-face
Stay up-to-date on new products that clients could use
Work with peers and senior colleagues in Accenture and at client companies

Here’s what you need:
Minimum of 2 years expertise in statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, unstructured data analytics in corporate and/or academic research environments
Minimum of 2 years of developing machine learning methods, including familiarity with techniques in clustering, regression, optimization, recommendation, neural networks, and other
Minimum of 2 years in the application of analytics, behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development in sophisticated and complex environments including the use of simulation and modeling tools
Minimum of 2 years of experience with strong quantitative and analytical skills with with data science tools, including Python, R, Scala, Julia, or SAS
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree in quantitative field, Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or related fields or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
Bonus points if:
You can technically lead data science projects
You have client-facing experience and working with C-level executives
You have experience with cloud platforms / services, big data tools, and deploying analytics as a service
You have a graduate degree
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $84,300 - $185,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",15.0
13,data+scientist,"Overview:
Celanese is a Fortune 500 global chemical innovation company that engineers and manufactures chemicals used in products essential to everyday living. Headquartered in Dallas, TX, we employ over 7,700 dedicated people working between 40 facilities across 18 countries. We are committed to employee growth and creating shareholder value to ensure continued opportunities make a difference. Our company focuses on the safety of its employees, provides competitive compensation, and emphasizes giving back to the community. For more information about Celanese and our products please visit www.celanese.com

Responsibilities:
The position is for a reliability engineer working in the Core Technology Group based out of the Clear Lake, Texas facility. The engineer in this role will be supporting multiple disciplines and multiple reliability efforts. A primary focus will be to advance reliability tools and strategies, with a digital transformation emphasis. Helping rapidly advance our use of tools like OSI-PI (data historian) to digitize key equipment assets. This role will also be a resource for development of data analytics, using tools like Tableau and other platforms available within or outside of Celanese. This resource will assist all disciplines such as mechanical, electrical and instrumentation, as they seek to transform using digital solutions. This reliability engineer is expected to be a resource for the DMC (digital manufacturing council) reliability work stream. Helping advance projects that deliver value such as asset condition monitoring, real-time equipment calculations and wireless solutions.

As a global role, the expectation is this reliability engineer will also partner with Celanese plant locations, on specific reliability initiatives. Special projects that need technical expertise to advance and support digitization efforts. Emphasis will be around solutions that help us migrate away from legacy tools such as Excel and Access type spreadsheets and databases. These special projects will ultimately reduce unplanned events, improve efficiency and drive availability improvement across the fleet.

Qualifications:
Must have a bachelors in Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or Material Science Engineering with experience in Data Analytics. 0-3 years of experience.

Able to work in the U.S. with no restrictions.

Must have written and verbal communication skills to work with various stakeholders globally

Must have experience or education in Data Science/Analytics",16.0
14,data+scientist,"Department: Baseball Operations, Research and Development
Supervisor: Director, Research and Development
Classification: Full-time (Exempt)
Location: Houston, TX

The Houston Astros Baseball Club is accepting applications for a Bayesian Statistician to join our growing Research & Development team within Baseball Operations. We are seeking an applicant with a strong knowledge of Bayesian statistics to plan, design, and build new models, visualizations, and tools to support (and collaborate with) all facets of Baseball Operations: scouting; player development; player acquisition; video; and more. This position will work closely with a cross-functional agile team to use Bayesian methods and tools that support effective understanding of baseball data and decision making to help the Astros stay ahead of the competition.
Role Responsibilities
Develop Bayesian models to support Baseball Operations’ research in all areas of decision making including player evaluation, roster construction, in-game tactics, and more
Implement Bayesian methods to improve the organization’s understanding of baseball data
Design Bayesian frameworks for new research methodologies and experimentation
Communicate closely with front office, coaching staff, and scouting personnel in the gathering and application of baseball information
Role Requirements
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in quantitative science such as statistics, mathematics, machine learning, quantitative social sciences, computer science, operations research, engineering, physics, or similar field with a primary focus on Bayesian methods; advanced degree or equivalent experience is preferred
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with demonstrated experience using Bayesian methods
Proficiency with statistical programming language; R or Python preferred
Proficiency with Bayesian or probabilistic programming language; Stan preferred
Proficiency with relational databases such as SQL Server, Postgres, Oracle
Self-motivated with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong interpersonal and communication skills (written and verbal)
Additional Preferred Skills
Strong understanding of spatial statistics
Ability to communicate technical ideas to non-technical audiences using data visualizations
Demonstrated work ethic, passion for baseball, and strong baseball knowledge, including familiarity with current baseball research and analysis
Strong interpersonal and communication skills (written and verbal)
Experience with agile software development
Work Environment
This job operates in an office setting. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones and photocopiers. The noise level is usually moderate but can be loud within the stadium environment.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit (for long periods of time); use hands to handle or feel objects, tools or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; talk or hear. The employee may occasionally lift or move equipment, up to 20 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close and focused vision.
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work
Ability to work a flexible schedule, including; extended hours, evenings, weekends, and holidays.
Travel
Rare travel may be expected in this role.
Other Duties
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
EOE/M/F/Vet/Disability",17.0
15,data+scientist,"Compiles, maintains and reports various ADT information to PAS and other departments. Is responsible for Quality Assurance checks on registrations as it relates to reimbursement. Monitors and corrects information on various IT reports to ensure compliance. Assists in education of new hires and incumbent staff.


Requirements:
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Compiles, maintains and reports various ADT information as it relates to Quality Assurance. EF
Reviews registrations for accuracy and completeness as it relates to hospital reimbursement utilizing online tools for research to assist in securing patient accounts. EF
Works with Case Management to facilitate correct level of care for patient. EF
Monitors and corrects information on various IT reports to ensure compliance. EF
Responsible for research of accounts as requested by Patient Accounting as they relate to scheduling and registration issues. EF
Works with IT to test HIS enhancements. EF
Sends out Educational material to new hires and incumbent staff
Demonstrates the components of the ICARE values statement
Follows all safety rules while on the job. Reports accidents promptly and correct minor safety hazards.
Performs other job related duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS

Associates Degree Preferred
EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS

Minimum three years of public contact/customer services experience. Minimum five years of Admitting/Registration experience preferred.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES AND REGISTRATIONS REQUIRED

None

SPECIAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED

Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Must have excellent customer service skills.
Must have knowledge of ADT system for Health quest.
Must have good working knowledge of various types of software used.

Company Profile:
Based in the Texas Medical Center, Houston Methodist Hospital is delivering on a mission started in 1919, which continues today – bringing quality, integrity, compassion and innovation into everything we do. As the flagship hospital of Houston Methodist, Houston Methodist Hospital is a nationally recognized medical center with a history of health care innovation. Houston Methodist Hospital was awarded Magnet recognition for nursing excellence for a fourth consecutive time by the ANCC. In addition, Houston Methodist Hospital was recently named by U.S. News & World Report as one of the country’s top 20 hospitals and was also ranked the No. 1 hospital in Texas for the fifth consecutive year.",19.0
16,data+scientist,"Specific Team Context
We are the global Finance analytics team, located in Houston, TX and Bangalore, India. We design, develop, and deploy solutions to facilitate various Finance, Accounting, Planning, and Business Operations inside of HP. Our team has a mixture of disciplines ranging from Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering, Front-end development, Back-end development, and visualization. Our applications range from classification, regression, optimization, and forecasting, with a heavy emphasis on forecasting. HP is currently undergoing enterprise-wide transformation that heavily relies upon a data-driven culture. Our team is a catalyst for HP’s transformation and future-state. Our team is flexible, dynamic, hungry, and humble; we are excited to find like-minded individuals!
General Role Description
Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert in the Data Science Project/Application Lifecycle. Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods. Works on ambiguous problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors. Leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives. Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies. Frequently represents the organization to internal customers/clients. Exercises significant independent judgment within broadly defined practices to determine the best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives. Heavily contributes to the growing and maturing structure and engineering practices of the Finance Data Science team.
Responsibilities
Identify, acquire, and mine data using modern tools and programming languages
Design, execute, and track experiments to model patterns in data to bring business-value
Innovates with creative and critical thinking in solving problems
Manages relationships with business partners to encourage and foster data driven culture
Effectively visualize insights and persuasively communicates business impact
Creatively form narratives and to describe and translate findings
Contributes and/or Leads projects with data science professionals, reviewing plans, designs, models, and accuracy
Applies statistical rigor and thoughtfulness in model development, evaluation, and overall solution quality.
Represents the data science team in all phases of larger and more-complex projects.
Provides guidance, training and mentoring to less experienced staff members.
Maintains proficiency within the data science domain by keeping up with technology and trend shifts.
Knowledge & Skills
Extensive experience with applied statistics and ML algorithms for solution development
Proficient in Python or R
Experience with core ML foundations (Supervised/Unsupervised, Classification, Regression, Distributions, etc)
Forecasting experience is especially relevant (ARIMA, Exponential Smoothing, Prophet, NN, etc)
Experience writing Production-quality code
Enterprise Github for version control and collaboration
Cloud and on-prem mixture for train/test/deploy
Databricks and/or AzureML for pipeline dev/prod is a plus
Familiarity with orchestration tools like Airflow is a plus
Parallel processing and distributed computing (enterprise-scale applications) is a plus
OOP and Functional Programming concepts
Data structures
Tabular data (data frames, data tables, transactional, temporal data)
Lists, dictionaries, hierarchies, vectors, matrices, json, yaml, etc (as it relates to creating model and execution pipelines – clean coding!)
Ability to define and create complex models that can be pushed to production
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English.
Ability to effectively communicate data insights and negotiate options at senior management levels.
Experience with Project Management, as you will be responsible for a portion of this
Scope & Impact
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, data scientists and project team.
Typically interacts with high-level Individual Contributors, Managers, Directors, Senior Directors, VPs, and Program Core Teams (High-Exposure Team).
Involved in multiple projects requiring data engineering and data science solution development.
Drives design innovation across HP.
This is a team that has growth opportunity and we are very interested in long-term people to grow at HP.
Education & Experience
Bachelor's, Master's, or higher degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, Quantitative Finance, or equivalent.
Typically 4-6 years relevant experience
Experience designing, developing, deploying, and maintaining production solutions
#LI-POST

About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",21.0
17,data+scientist,"
Professional",23.0
18,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree, or equivalent experience, in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or a related field
5+ years’ experience of Data platform implementation, including 3+ years of hands-on experience in implementation and performance tuning Kinesis/Kafka/Spark/Storm implementations.
Experience with analytic solutions applied to the Marketing or Risk needs of enterprises
Basic understanding of machine learning fundamentals.
Ability to take Machine Learning models and implement them as part of data pipeline
5+ years of IT platform implementation experience.
Experience with one or more relevant tools ( Flink, Spark, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Amazon Kinesis ).
Experience developing software code in one or more programming languages (Java, JavaScript, Python, etc).
Current hands-on implementation experience required

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we’re hiring highly technical cloud computing architects and engineers to collaborate with our customers and partners on key engagements. Our consultants will develop and deliver proof-of-concept projects, technical workshops, and support implementation projects. These professional services engagements will focus on customer solutions such as Machine Learning, Data and Analytics, HPC and more.

In this role, you will work with our partners, customers and focus on our AWS Analytics and ML service offerings such Amazon Kinesis, AWS Glue, Amazon Redshift, Amazon EMR, Amazon Athena, Amazon SageMaker and more. You will help our customers and partners to remove the constraints that prevent them from leveraging their data to develop business insights.

AWS Professional Services engage in a wide variety of projects for customers and partners, providing collective experience from across the AWS customer base and are obsessed about customer success. Our team collaborates across the entire AWS organization to bring access to product and service teams, to get the right solution delivered and drive feature innovation based upon customer needs.

In our Global Specialist Practice, you will also have the opportunity to create white papers, writing blogs, build demos and other reusable collateral that can be used by our customers, and, most importantly, you will work closely with our Solution Architects, Data Scientists and Service Engineering teams.

The ideal candidate will have extensive experience with design, development and operations that leverages deep knowledge in the use of services like Amazon Kinesis, Apache Kafka, Apache Spark, Amazon Sagemaker, Amazon EMR, NoSQL technologies and other 3rd parties.

Excellent business and communication skills are a must to develop and define key business questions and to build data sets that answer those questions. You should be able to work with business customers in understanding the business requirements and implementing solutions.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer facing role. You will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services when needed.


Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Engineering or Math.
Hands on experience working on large-scale data science/data analytics projects.
Ability to lead effectively across organizations.
Hands-on experience with Data Analytics technologies such as AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Spark SQL, MLib or Storm/Samza.
Implementing AWS services in a variety of distributed computing, enterprise environments.
Proficiency with at least one the languages such as C++, Java, Scala or Python.
Experience with at least one of the modern distributed Machine Learning and Deep Learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, MxNet Caffe, and Keras.
Experience building large-scale machine-learning infrastructure that have been successfully delivered to customers.
Experience defining system architectures and exploring technical feasibility trade-offs.
3+ years experiences developing cloud software services and an understanding of design for scalability, performance and reliability.
Experience working on a code base with many contributors.
Ability to prototype and evaluate applications and interaction methodologies.
Experience with AWS technology stack.
Written and verbal technical communication skills with an ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",26.0
19,data+scientist,"This role is for a senior data scientist working in HP's Personal Systems (PC) business on the Customer Experience team. You will be responsible for delivering and coordinating detailed data analytics on customer experience data (usually Net Promotor Score and related data) plus device telemetry data and other data sources to derive unique, actionable insights for our business. Our team partners closely with each of the primary business units delivering HP's PC products, services, and accessories, and we help drive improvements in the overall experience customers have across the entire Personal Systems portfolio. This team is in high demand and has significant visibility with HP leadership!
Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert. Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods. Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors. Leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives. Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies. Frequently represents the organization to external customers/clients. Exercises significant independent judgment within broadly defined policies and practices to determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives. May provide mentoring and guidance to lower level employees.
Responsibilities
Mines data using modern tools and programming languages.
Defines and implements models to uncover patterns and predictions creating business value and innovation.
Manages relationships with business partners to evaluate and foster data driven innovation, provide domain-specific expertise in cross-organization projects/initiatives.
Ties insights into effective visualizations communicating business value and innovation potential.
Maintains proficiency within the data science domain by keeping up with technology and trend shifts. Contributes to industry data science domain initiatives.
Leads project team(s) of data science professionals, assuring insights are communicated regularly and effectively, reviewing designs, models and accuracy and data compliance.
Collaborates and communicates with project team regarding project progress and issue resolution.
Communicates and drives data insights/innovation into the business.
Represents the data science team for all phases of larger and more-complex development projects.
Provides guidance, training and mentoring to less experienced staff members.
Knowledge & Skills
Extensive experience using statistics, mathematics, algorithms and programming languages to solve big data challenges.
Fluent in structured and unstructured data, its management, and modern data transformation methodologies.
Ability to define and create complex models to pull valuable insights, predictions and innovation from data.
Effectively and creatively tell stories and create visualizations to describe and communicate data insights.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Ability to effectively communicate data insights and negotiate options at senior management levels.
Scope & Impact
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, data scientists and project team.
Typically interacts with high- level Individual Contributors, Managers, Directors and Program Core Teams.
Leads multiple projects requiring data engineering solutions development.
Drives design innovation.
Education & Experience
Bachelor's, Master's or PHD degree in Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, or equivalent.
Typically 6-10 years’ experience including graduate or postgraduate research.
HP offers a comprehensive benefits package, including:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
The estimated range of compensation for this job at the time of this posting is $119,000 - $161,000. This position may be eligible for incentive pay, for openings where this is applicable.
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",27.0
20,data+scientist,"This role is for a senior data scientist working in HP's Personal Systems (PC) business on the Customer Experience team. You will be responsible for delivering and coordinating detailed data analytics on customer experience data (usually Net Promotor Score and related data) plus device telemetry data and other data sources to derive unique, actionable insights for our business. Our team partners closely with each of the primary business units delivering HP's PC products, services, and accessories, and we help drive improvements in the overall experience customers have across the entire Personal Systems portfolio. This team is in high demand and has significant visibility with HP leadership!
Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert. Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods. Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors. Leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives. Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies. Frequently represents the organization to external customers/clients. Exercises significant independent judgment within broadly defined policies and practices to determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives. May provide mentoring and guidance to lower level employees.
Responsibilities
Mines data using modern tools and programming languages.
Defines and implements models to uncover patterns and predictions creating business value and innovation.
Manages relationships with business partners to evaluate and foster data driven innovation, provide domain-specific expertise in cross-organization projects/initiatives.
Ties insights into effective visualizations communicating business value and innovation potential.
Maintains proficiency within the data science domain by keeping up with technology and trend shifts. Contributes to industry data science domain initiatives.
Leads project team(s) of data science professionals, assuring insights are communicated regularly and effectively, reviewing designs, models and accuracy and data compliance.
Collaborates and communicates with project team regarding project progress and issue resolution.
Communicates and drives data insights/innovation into the business.
Represents the data science team for all phases of larger and more-complex development projects.
Provides guidance, training and mentoring to less experienced staff members.
Knowledge & Skills
Extensive experience using statistics, mathematics, algorithms and programming languages to solve big data challenges.
Fluent in structured and unstructured data, its management, and modern data transformation methodologies.
Ability to define and create complex models to pull valuable insights, predictions and innovation from data.
Effectively and creatively tell stories and create visualizations to describe and communicate data insights.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Ability to effectively communicate data insights and negotiate options at senior management levels.
Scope & Impact
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, data scientists and project team.
Typically interacts with high- level Individual Contributors, Managers, Directors and Program Core Teams.
Leads multiple projects requiring data engineering solutions development.
Drives design innovation.
Education & Experience
Bachelor's, Master's or PHD degree in Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, or equivalent.
Typically 6-10 years’ experience including graduate or postgraduate research.
HP offers a comprehensive benefits package, including:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
The estimated range of compensation for this job at the time of this posting is $119,000 - $161,000. This position may be eligible for incentive pay, for openings where this is applicable.
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",29.0
21,data+scientist,"The primary purpose of the Coordinator, Research Data position is to perform basic level-specific activities related to research projects and studies, requiring judgment, initiative, and independent decision making. The Coordinator, Research Data is responsible for activities associated with cancer prevention and smoking cessation projects, which impact behavioral science research protocols.


The ideal candidate will be comfortable with blood, saliva and urine collection.


JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES


Data Collection/Data Entry/Chart Review:


* Administer phone screening questionnaires, both over the phone and in person. Verify participant-provided information. Enter data collected during phone screening and study visits into the appropriate databases per protocol specific timelines (i.e., Meeting Room Manager and access databases) and monitor participants study participation and attendance. Documents study specific information appropriately on source documents following institutional policy and in the study database. Enters protocol-specific data points into the appropriate database in an appropriate timeframe as established by study management. Reviews data forms for completeness and updates as needed. Addresses missing data in timeframe outlined by study management. Creates, prints, and distributes forms using computer and printer. Utilizes computer for word processing, spread sheets and retrieve patient data.
Participate in self audits as well as checking charts of others to ensure accuracy and integrity of data collection, and resolve discrepancies from monitoring visits.

Biological sample collection, processing, storage:


* Obtain physiological measurements, including blood pressure, heart rate, height, weight, expired carbon monoxide levels, and blood alcohol levels when applicable, ECG when applicable, as well as blood, urine, and saliva specimen collection and processing. Store samples according to study guidelines. Perform QA on samples as requested.


Communication/Planning:


* Answer questions and correspond with study participants via phone, mail, or e-mail. Mail or email reminder letters and other participant-related correspondence. Communicate with PI, Research Manager, Medical team, Study Coordinator(s, supervisor, data team, and space providers through oral and written communication regarding project related issues and/or patient care issues. Follow up with participants as required and coordinate contact with medical team or counselors when necessary. Attend and participate in biweekly project meetings aimed at discussing recruitment goals/status, protocol and/or procedural changes.

Interacts with members of interdisciplinary team inter and intra-departmentally to request information and verify the status of ongoing projects. Communicates clearly and professionally in telephone and email communications and face-to-face encounters with institutional and other personnel and study participants. Receives, places, and transfers calls using appropriate etiquette; responds to information requests with courtesy, accuracy, and respect for confidentiality. Faxes documents to other institutional departments and outside organizations/physician offices as requested. Utilizes and accesses departmental/institutional e-mail to send and receive documents and messages via computer.

Other: Other duties as assigned.

EDUCATION:
Required: High school diploma or equivalent.


Preferred: Bachelor's degree.


EXPERIENCE:
Required: Two years of related experience. With preferred degree, no experience required.


Preferred: Comfortable with blood, saliva and urine collection. Research experience is a plus.


It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information

Requisition ID: 141306
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
FLSA: non-exempt, eligible for overtime, and is subject to the provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA)
Work Week: Days
Fund Type: Soft
Pivotal Position: No
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 33,200
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 41,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 49,800
Science Jobs: No",30.0
22,data+scientist,"The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying, analyzing, and documenting the business needs. Helping the business to find the right answer to solve their business problems, to determine feasible solutions contributing, to develop new business models. Equally, this role is about providing support to the business to further professionalize their MI / Analytic reporting platform, using the ESSA approach (Automate, Standardize, Simplify & Automate).
Job Description
The Data Analyst gathers, analyses, and models data and key performance indicators to develop quantitative and qualitative business insights in an agile fashion, identifies opportunities for improved data analysis. Develops processes and design reports to boost the business intelligence within the organization and is good at effectively processing large amounts of data into meaningful information. Collects past and present data to create fit-for-purpose MI reports. Has in-depth knowledge of the Analytical tools available within the organization and in the market
Accountabilities
Precisely capture business problems, value drivers, and functional/non-functional requirements, including health, safety, security, usability, data, and supportability considerations.
Translate business requirements into functionality and assess the risks, feasibility, opportunities, and business impacts of various solution options.
Assess and model processes, data flows, and technology to understand the bottlenecks and identify opportunities for improvement.
Create clear documentation to communicate requirements and related information; keep updated to align with the solution over the project lifecycle.
Ensure traceability of requirements from business needs and requirements, through testing and scope changes, to the final solution.
Interact with software suppliers, designers, and developers to understand software limitations, deliver elements of system and database design, and ensure that business requirements and use cases are handled.
Create acceptance criteria and validate that solutions meet business needs through defining and coordinating testing.
Create and present compelling business cases to justify solution value and establish approval, funding, and prioritization.
Execute Data Analysis activities on projects within agreed parameters of cost, time, and quality.
Understand and stay abreast of relevant architectures and technologies related to a business area.
Support stakeholder management activities including facilitation of large design sessions.
Required
Power BI
Report creation
DAX
Modeling
Data analysis
Data modeling
Process design
Optional
Exploration/Production subject area knowledge
Economics/Excel",31.0
23,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Mater’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",33.0
24,data+scientist,"About IHS Markit
At the heart of IHS Markit, we are an information company. With expertise across the world’s largest industries, we leverage technology and data science to provide the insights, software, and data to help our customers make better informed decisions, driving growth, performance, and efficiency.
About the Department: ENR Upstream
IHS Markit’s Cost estimation software provides industry leading software solutions for the Oil & Gas market to enable engineers, cost estimators, and others to create cost estimates core to decision making. Our software platforms are used by over 2500 people in over 50 countries globally to estimate and analyze the costs necessary to develop the infrastructure that powers the world whether considering onshore, offshore, or exploring deep water environments.
Starting your Career with Us - Opportunities for Graduates
We hire into a wide variety of exciting roles across our business and as you begin your career with us, we’re here to support your transition into the professional world. In addition to working with our industry experts in your full-time role, you’ll be part of a global development program, designed to create the space for you to invest in your personal and professional development.
As part of the development program, you’ll gain insight into our diverse business, interact with our leaders, build vital skills and become an integral part of the IHS Markit community and culture - all designed to enhance the exciting work you do with the team you’re hired into! You’ll be part of a global community, building an invaluable network of knowledge and support from your mentors, peer group and wider teams.
Eligibility
We’re now hiring for 2021 full-time roles. We're looking for final year students who are working towards a Bachelor's or Master's degree (or equivalent), and due to complete their studies and be available for a full time role commencing in 2021.
The role
The QUE$TOR team is looking for a Junior Data Scientist to support our initiatives to develop new offerings to the market, streamline our internal data collection and management, and support our future business. The ideal candidate should have critical thinking skills, a quantitative background, and experience to developing projects from the ground up. They must be able to work as part of an integrated multi-disciplinary team but also be self-driven and able to independently delivery projects.
With depth of knowledge key to providing industry leading advice, it can be advantageous to have a study background in a field relevant to your team/role.
Responsibilities
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to develop plans, build concepts, and support development for new business solutions.
Help to understand the need, the limitations, and develop a solution plan.
Efficiently explore new data sources and assess and implement data gathering techniques.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement and productionize models while monitoring the performance.
Help conceptually frame and refine relevant business questions.
Develop custom machine learning models and algorithms.
Communicate solutions and findings to different stakeholders.
What we're looking for
We seek candidates with diverse backgrounds and ideas with a desire to learn and thrive. The Graduate Program will provide a variety of experiences to help you identify your strengths, develop highly transferable skills, and align you to a successful career path for a bright future at IHS Markit. To be an ideal fit for the role, you should have:
A bachelor or master degree (or equivalent) completed no later than May 2021
0-6 months relevant work experience
Demonstrated passion or interest in one or more of our key industries
Excellent communication skills
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills
An aptitude to learn and adapt quickly in a rapidly changing environment
The ability to build strong working relationships in a collaborative setting
Be legally eligible to work for the duration of the program in the country for which you apply
For Data Scientist applicants, we recommend the following:
Degree in data science or related field
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Experience building and working with databases (e.g. SQL)
Experience working with unstructured data and Excel.
Curiosity and research attitude to learn new ideas and techniques.
Aptitude and experience with PowerBI, Spotfire, or other advanced visualization tools
Experience using statistical computer languages (e.g. Python or R) to manipulate data and draw insights from data sets.
Exposure or interest in learning machine learning techniques (clustering, classification, regression, deep learning) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Able to focus on a detailed issue but also able to step back to view the larger picture.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Application and assessment process
The assessment process that follows is designed to ensure you can learn more about us, showcase your skills, and find a role that is right for you.
Stage 1: Submit online application
Stage 2: Complete online pymetrics assessment
Stage 3: Initial screening process
Stage 4: Final stage assessment
Our commitment to diversity
Our business and our customers are diverse, and we believe that embracing a diverse and inclusive environment is key to defining who we are. Our people are what makes us unique and you will get the opportunity to work with some of the brightest minds from across the world who continuously find the best viable solutions, adding value and driving change for our customers.
-
Inclusion and diversity are critical to the success of IHS Markit, and we actively encourage applications from people of all backgrounds. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other protected category. For more information on the many ways in which we enthusiastically support inclusion and diversity efforts for both candidates and employees, please access our Inclusion & Diversity Statement here.
We are proud to provide reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with IHS Markit and need special assistance or an accommodation to use our website or to apply for a position, please contact or call +1 212 849 0399. Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are considered on a case-by-case basis. This contact information (email and phone) is intended for application assistance and accommodation requests only. We are unable to accept resumes or provide information about application status through the phone number or email address above. Resumes are only accepted through the online application process, and only qualified candidates will receive consideration and follow-up.
IHS Markit maintains a substance-free workplace; employees may be asked to submit to a drug test (where permitted by law). In addition, as a federal contractor in the United States, the company participates in the E-Verify Program to confirm eligibility to work.
For information please click on the following links:
IHS Markit Business Code of Conduct
Right to Work
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Pay Transparency
-
Current Colleagues
If you are currently employed by IHS Markit, please apply internally via the Workday internal careers site.",34.0
25,data+scientist,"Job Description
The Artificial Intelligence (AI) Engineer is responsible for combining science and engineering to build machines capable of intelligent behavior.
Conduct directed and undirected research and tackle open-ended artificial intelligence (AI) problems and questions. Contribute expertise to push the envelope towards increasingly self-driving, autonomous remote operations
Develop software and computers that ""think and orchestrate"" like a human brain and supersede it
Work on systems that not only gather data and information but formulate decisions and act on that information automatically
Analyze domain problems and identify, adapt and develop technologies from the field of AI
Evaluate and develop state estimation techniques that are relevant and applicable to decision-making automated systems
Create proofs of concepts, and work with development teams to commercialize and deploy in production environments
Maintain mastery of state-of-the-art relevant tools such as in data acquisition and management, machine learning and software engineering, that are necessary to operationalize and scale solutions
Conduct internal and external technical reviews and contribute as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) for engineers and projects that involve data science, machine learning and AI
Communicate ideas, plans, and results effectively via oral and written reports
Publish work in relevant journals and conferences to increase visibility for the company
Generate new IP such as patents or trade secrets for R&D activities that will provide the company a competitive advantage
Basic Qualifications:
Master’s Degree
Legal authorization to work in the US is required. We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job opening
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s or PhD in a quantitative field such as data science, engineering, computer science, statistics, or applied mathematics
This role requires combined expertise in software development, programming, data science and data engineering
Strong knowledge of statistical and computational platforms (Python, R, C++, Matlab, etc.)
Background in the development of optimization techniques, machine learning algorithms and other logic-based AI techniques
Background in a variety of data-driven models including linear and logistic regression, decision trees, and neural networks
A preferred candidate would have experience with operationalizing AI solutions at scale in the cloud or within automation and control systems (Reinforcement Learning, Model Predictive Control, MIMO Control, Process Control, etc.)
Experience with Declarative Programming would be a plus
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer including disability and veterans.
If you are an individual with a disability and you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation during the application process, please contact our services team at +1 (844) 404-7427.",35.0
26,data+scientist,"Basic Function
Aramco Americas’ Houston Research Center has a Data Scientist opening in the Artificial Intelligence Technology Team. The Data Scientist will conduct independent research and development in formulating and applying AI/ML models and algorithms to various geosciences, petroleum engineering and geophysics applications, collaborate with subject matter teams and provide periodic updates through presentations, reports and prototype demonstrations, and finally contribute to technology delivery and deployment with algorithms, codes and software prototypes. In addition to that, this position is expected to publish their work in conferences and journals as well as patents.
Duties & Responsibilities
Research and develop machine learning algorithms/models/prototypes for upstream applications in exploration, development and production, such as classification, regression, anomaly detection, failure prediction, and optimization
Work with subject matter research and business teams to develop, implement, and deliver robust, scalable and accurate machine learning solutions from end-to-end
Collaboratively develop innovative ideas, initiate new research directions, and effectively lead and execute on several technical projects
Maintain and grow state-of-the-art technical knowledge, via actively publishing and patenting, and establish as an expert in related areas of responsibility
Communicate ideas, technical approaches, project plans and results effectively via oral and written reports; work effectively with peers, management, operations groups, and outside organizations
Education and Experience
Master’s degree preferred (Ph.D. highly preferred) in computer science, mathematics, physics, applied science, engineering or similar disciplines with demonstrated research capability with 3+ years of relevant experience
Demonstrated experience in developing core machine learning algorithms in professional research and development settings, in building and applying machine learning / predictive modelling in real-world use cases, extensive working knowledge of developing deep learning models using tools such as TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, etc
Strong background in some of these listed areas: machine learning, time series analysis / sensor processing, deep learning, optimization/operations research, text analytics/NLP, computer vision
Extensive hands-on coding ability, proficient with machine learning models, frameworks and stacks, python, react and flask development and GPU based platforms
Past experience or knowledge of Oil and Gas domain is a plus
Track records of past publications in relevant topics
Excellent communication, verbal and written skills, capable of communicating complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner to both technical and non-technical audiences
NO THIRD PARTY CANDIDATES ACCEPTED
TQjV09CAVI",36.0
27,data+scientist,"Great Lakes Dredge & Dock Corporation (NASDAQ: GLDD) is the largest provider of dredging, land reclamation and beach nourishment services in the United States, and the only U.S. dredging company with significant international operations. With the largest and most diverse dredging fleet in the U.S., Great Lakes serves a wide range of customers including the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers; state, local and foreign governments; and private companies both internationally and domestically. Headquartered in Houston, Texas, GLDD has U.S. and foreign subsidiaries and operations and more than 200 pieces of dredging equipment located strategically throughout North America and in various locations throughout the world.
We are currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our team.
 You will work closely with internal and external experts from across GLDD and the industry to identify the best value case for data science-based products. You will be responsible for delivering models and algorithms that can operate in a scalable manner to improve industrial efficiency and precision. You will work closely with all prioritized areas such as estimation, projects, engineering, operations, and other teams to help configure and implement the best digital technology application to support our company's processes to bring the most value to the company.
Duties and Responsibilities:
 As a Data Scientist in GLDD you'll be part of a small informal but impactful transformation team as you help us build the data platform required to evolve the next generation of dredging. In your role, you'll analyze historical and real time process data, identify patterns and use physics-, statistics, and data science-based approaches to build AI based intelligent systems for the entire value chain, including digitization of heavy industrial machinery. You will work closely with the experts in all areas of our business to identify the best value case for data science-based products searching for the optimal balance of people, processes, and technology.
You will also be responsible for delivering projects in the data science area and delivering reporting on performance models and algorithms that operate in a scalable manner to improve industrial cost, control, and efficiency. You will build data pipelines and AI/machine learning models that streamline/automate decision-making and processes and provide valuable insights for optimization and predictive analytics. You will be a change agent that will help the organization maximize the benefit we see from our data, allowing us to make smarter, more data-driven decisions to leapfrog competitors.
 You'll fit right into this position if...You love data and the insights that can be harvested from combinations of large data sets.You thrive in a technical environment that consists of a blend of old and new technology.You are a self-starter, enjoy driving your project from start to finish, and capture value.You are excited about improving traditional operational efficiency by applying data science.You are comfortable setting ambitious targets and work in a structured way to reach them.You are comfortable being part of a tightly-knit team that has a change agenda.You are at ease when interfacing with people with a broad spectrum of technology backgrounds.You enjoy solving complex and urgent business problemsYou have a constructive and collaborative approach when challenging established truths.You build strong relationships with the business by helping them become more efficient by bridging technology, organization and processes together
Requirements:PhD/M.Sc./B.Sc. (in relevant science, math, statistics, computer science, or engineering), and/or > 5-10 years of work experience in data analysis or intensive quantitative areas.Mastery of new scientific methodologies and tools.Must be a fluent programmer using modern data scientists' tools like Python, R, SQL, Java, C++,MatlabMust be comfortable in using or learning to use data visualization tools and data scientist platforms like Azure data analytics, Snowflake, Power BI, Spotfire, TableauSolid understanding of the challenges and best practices in dataset management.Demonstrated understanding of data cleaning and data analysis methodology.Good understanding of techniques for mathematical modeling of physical systems.Experience with classical optimization methods is a plus.Strong collaboration skillsDetail-oriented work habits
Benefits:
Competitive salary and bonus program
401(k) program that includes 100% company matching of the first 6% of employee contributions with immediate vesting
Discretionary profit-sharing contributions by the company to participants’ 401(k) accounts based on company’s annual performance
Medical, Dental, Prescription, Life and Disability insurance plans
Great Lakes Dredge & Dock Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of and will not be discriminated against on the basis of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, age, veteran status, disability status, genetic information or any other protected category",37.0
28,data+scientist,"Athena is a cross-asset platform transforming technology at JP Morgan. It delivers innovative and efficient applications to a wide range of the firm's businesses, including sales, trading, operations, risk and research. Athena combined the best of open source technologies with innovative components developed internally, which gives you the ability to contribute to a wide range of exciting projects. Our developers enjoy working with front office, quants and other technology teams.
We are looking for premier Software Engineers to join our newly formed Athena Quant Engineering team. In this team you will work with Quantitative Researchers to accelerate the adoption of machine learning and cloud technologies. This includes working with the firm-wide standard for Machine Learning (OmniAI) within the Athena platform. Our work is focused on business use-cases and collaboration across multiple teams and lines of businesses. The ideal candidate will be adept at working across a globally disperse and fast paced organization.
Required skills to be considered for this role:

3-5 years experience in Python software development or other object oriented languages
Experience designing cloud applications and successfully deploying them to production

Preferred skills:

Development skills in Python or other object oriented languages
Experience working with and developing APIs
Experience building high performance, highly available and scalable systems
Database technologies including both relational and NoSQL
Strong SDLC mindset and familiarity with agile paradigms
Excellent problem solving skills
Comfortable working across different platforms and languages
Some experience with ML libraries such as Tensorflow, Keras and PyTorch
Experience working in Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working with ML models in AWS SageMaker

Cloud & ML/AI strategy:
J.P. Morgan Chase has made a strategic decision to fundamentally transform its operations through the adoption of artificial intelligence and machine learning at scale. At J.P. Morgan, adopting cloud technologies helps us become more agile, more secure and more efficient. Please see here a recording of Lori Beer, CIO of J.P. Morgan Chase, speaking during the AWS re:Invent 2020 keynote on using AWS to modernize and innovate: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3eEQJ9fg0y0 . J.P. Morgan Chase is leveraging many of the capabilities available in AWS including advanced AI and analytics functions. For example, we are using AWS Elastic Kubernetes Services (EKS) for risk calculations. Rapid innovation in machine learning is facilitated through our J.P. Morgan developed platform OmniAI which uses AWS SageMaker to build machine learning models.
About J.P. Morgan's Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world's important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions for a bank entrusted with holding $18 trillion of assets and $393 billion in deposits. CIB provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk, and extends liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 20 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $10B+ annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will are transforming the financial services industry.
At JPMorgan Chase & Co. we value the unique skills of every employee, and we're building a technology organization that thrives on diversity. We encourage professional growth and career development and offer competitive benefits and compensation. If you're looking to build your career as part of a global technology team tackling big challenges that impact the lives of people and companies all around the world, we want to meet you.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/VeteransJPMorgan Chase & Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans",38.0
29,data+scientist,"HP is the world’s leading personal systems and printing company, we create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere. Our innovation springs from a team of individuals, each collaborating and contributing their own perspectives, knowledge, and experience to advance the way the world works and lives.
We are looking for Visionaries with an Entrepreneurial spirit to join our PC Supply Chain Data Science team. Make an impact as you pioneer and shape innovation into our global supply chain helping to drive data-based decisions and working cross functionally to solve business and technology problems.
Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert. Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods. Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors. Leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives. Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies. Frequently represents the organization to external customers/clients. Exercises significant independent judgment within broadly defined policies and practices to determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives. May provide mentoring and guidance to lower level employees.
Responsibilities
Mines data using modern tools and programming languages.
Defines and implements models to uncover patterns and predictions creating business value and innovation.
Manages relationships with business partners to evaluate and foster data driven innovation, provide domain-specific expertise in cross-organization projects/initiatives.
Ties insights into effective visualizations communicating business value and innovation potential.
Maintains proficiency within the data science domain by keeping up with technology and trend shifts. Contributes to industry data science domain initiatives.
Leads project team(s) of data science professionals, assuring insights are communicated regularly and effectively, reviewing designs, models and accuracy and data compliance.
Collaborates and communicates with project team regarding project progress and issue resolution.
Communicates and drives data insights/innovation into the business.
Represents the data science team for all phases of larger and more-complex development projects.
Provides guidance, training and mentoring to less experienced staff members.
Knowledge & Skills
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Extensive experience using statistics, mathematics, algorithms and programming languages to solve big data challenges.
Fluent in structured and unstructured data, its management, and modern data transformation methodologies.
Ability to define and create complex models to pull valuable insights, predictions and innovation from data.
Effectively and creatively tell stories and create visualizations to describe and communicate data insights.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Ability to effectively communicate data insights and negotiate options at senior management levels.
3+ years of experience with data scripting languages (e.g SQL, Python, R etc.) or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, or Matlab)
Experience with apps/bots preferred
Scope & Impact
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, data scientists and project team.
Typically interacts with high- level Individual Contributors, Managers, Directors and Program Core Teams.
Leads multiple projects requiring data engineering solutions development.
Drives design innovation.
Education & Experience
Bachelor's, Master's or PHD degree in Mathematics, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, or equivalent.
Typically 6-10 years’ experience including graduate or postgraduate research.
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",41.0
30,data+scientist,"The Company
HP is a Fortune 100 technology company with $58+ Billion in revenue, with over 50,000 employees operating in more than 170 countries around the world. We provide technology and services that help people and companies address their problems and challenges, and realize their possibilities, aspirations, and dreams. We apply new thinking and ideas to create simpler, more valuable, and trusted experiences with technology, continuously improving the way our customers live and work
As Data Scientist in the Pricing Analytics team you will shape HP’s future of how we set prices. We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of data scientists, economists, statisticians, computer scientists and engineers, who are pushing the innovation frontier in the way HP sets prices for its products. Working with us you will combine your modelling skills, economic/business thinking, experimentation and optimization methods to build complex pricing algorithms for most popular Printers and PCs in the market.
About you:
You have deep interests in customer and market behavior and methods to measure and anticipate itYou are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and modelsYou feel accomplished seeing your pricing recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourselfYou can’t stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people

Key responsibilities:
Develop and apply data science and statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performanceCollaborate with internal stakeholders to design and deploy pricing initiatives based upon analytical findingsPresent results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
Requirements:
Must-haves:
At least 5 years’ working experience in data scienceTheoretical and applied skills in Machine Learning and Statistics/EconometricsExperience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB testsAbility to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challengesProficiency with Python or RMaster's or PhD degree in Economics, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or related disciplines
Bonus points for:
Interest in pricing, economics, and consumer behaviorExperience in deploying ML and data science solutionsKnowledge of price optimization approaches, price discrimination models and a general knowledge of main concepts from the industrial organization literatureBasic understanding of finance and product economics
Who We Are:
At HP, we believe in the power of ideas. We use ideas to put technology to work for everyone. And we believe that ideas thrive best in a culture of teamwork. That is why everyone – at every level in every function, is encouraged to think big, have original ideas and express and share them. We trust anything can be achieved if you really believe in it, and we will invest in your ideas to change lives and the way people work. This vision is what sets us apart as a company. At HP, we work across borders and without limits. Global virtual teams share resources, pool their big ideas to solve our biggest business opportunities. Everyone is valued for the unique skills, experiences and perspective they bring. That’s how we work at HP. And this is how ideas and people grow.
#LI-post
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",43.0
31,data+scientist,"We Are:
As part of our Data & AI, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. You will build better software better! There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a highly collaborative and growing network of technology and data experts, who are taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges using the latest data and analytics technologies. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have an opportunity to work in roles such as Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Chief Data Officer covering all aspects of Data including Data Management, Data Governance, Data Intelligence, Knowledge Graphs, and IoT. Come grow your career in Technology at Accenture!
You Are:
A Business Intelligence pro with a talent for blending creativity, critical thinking, and strategy to help clients visualize their data. You build and deliver solutions that collect, transform, analyze, and report data, and you provide key knowledge and value at different levels—strategic and tactical as well as operational. You’re in your element in a team setting where you can use your formidable creative and analytical powers to crush problems. Communication and people skills You have both in spades, along with strong leadership chops. Working in an information systems environment makes you more than happy.
The Work:
Answer client’s business questions by dissecting their data, using measurement techniques, drafting KPIs, and building reports and dashboards.Collaborate with clients and team members on data visualizations using tools such as Tableau, Qlik, IBM Cognos, Plotly, and Kibana, per clients’ needs.Generate requirements for application designs while pinpointing the best type of visualization to meet your client’s needs.Build and test functional prototypes for BI, data discovery, and analytics solutions.Run data and dashboard quality assurance throughout the design phase in collaboration with your team.Build dashboard automation processes and pull together and deliver presentations based on your findings.Work together with IT Architects, BI analysts, database developers, application developers, and functional practitioners, as well as with clients/partners.

What You Need:
Minimum of 2 years of combined data, analytics and strategic consulting experience
Minimum of 2 years of analytical delivery platform implementation experience
Minimum of 2 years of experience one or more of the following areas:
Minimum of two years of experience one or more of the following areas:
Business Translator (identifying business problem, initiative, analytics intervention, data scientist management, data science interpretation, storytelling)
Analytics led Performance models (spanning multi-functions with direct/ indirect causality, used to inform strategic and operational planning and decision making)
Data & Analytics Transformation (current state assessment, strategy development, value case, roadmap, and blueprint)
Process Automation, Machine Learning, and Artificial Intelligence practices (knowledge of how advancing digital tools and techniques are applied in enterprise data and analytics strategies and roadmaps)
A Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience (12 years) or an Associate’s Degree with 6 years of work experience
Bonus points if you have:
Experience with any cloud (AWS, Azure, GCP) is a strong plus
Create a value chain to help address the challenges of acquiring data, evaluating its value, distilling & analyzing.
Lead data modeling activities to capture and model data requirements, business rules, and logical and physical models
Examine data from multiple sources, and share insights which provide competitive advantage
We will not accept external applications from applicants located in Colorado, unless the role can only be performed in Colorado. As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $61,600 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",44.0
32,data+scientist,"Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
We are:
A leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities across data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with a deep industry expertise to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. To accelerate our customers transformation leveraging cloud, we combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
As part of our Accenture Google Business Group in Cloud First, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. You will build better software better! There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a growing network of technology experts who are highly collaborative taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. Come grow your career in technology at Accenture!
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualification
Bachelor's degree or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience. If Associate Degree, must have an additional minimum 6 years work experience.Possess Google Professional Data Engineer Certification.Minimum 3 years direct experience in Enterprise Data Warehouse technologiesMinimum 3 years in a customer facing role working with enterprise clientsHands on GCP Cloud data implementation projects experience (Dataflow, Cloud Composer, Big Query, Cloud Storage etc.)Experience with developing software code in one or more languages such as Java, Python and SQL.Experience designing and deploying large scale distributed data processing systems with few technologies such as Oracle, MS SQL Server, MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Redis, Hadoop, Spark, HBase, Netezza, Teradata, Tableau, Qlik or MicroStrategy.
Preferred Skills
Data migration and data processing experience on the Google Cloud stack, specifically:
o BigQuery
o Cloud DataFlow
o Cloud DataProc
o Cloud Storage
o Cloud DataPrep
o Cloud PubSub
o Cloud Composer
o Cloud BigTable
o DEV Ops
o Github

Previous Consulting or client service delivery experience on Google Cloud Platform (GCP).Experience in and understanding of data and information management, especially in Big Data trends.Familiarity with the Technology stack available in the industry for data cataloging, data ingestion, capture, processing and curation: Kafka, StreamSets, Attunity, Collibra, Map Reduce, Hadoop, Spark, Flume, Hive, Impala, SparkSQL
Professional Skill Requirement
All of our professionals receive comprehensive training covering business acumen, technical and professional skills development. You'll also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Unless expressly indicated, this role is not open in the state of Colorado. As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $43,200 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",45.0
33,data+scientist,"Great Lakes Dredge & Dock Corporation (NASDAQ: GLDD) is the largest provider of dredging, land reclamation and beach nourishment services in the United States, and the only U.S. dredging company with significant international operations. With the largest and most diverse dredging fleet in the U.S., Great Lakes serves a wide range of customers including the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers; state, local and foreign governments; and private companies both internationally and domestically. Headquartered in Houston, Texas, GLDD has U.S. and foreign subsidiaries and operations and more than 200 pieces of dredging equipment located strategically throughout North America and in various locations throughout the world.
We are currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our team.
 You will work closely with internal and external experts from across GLDD and the industry to identify the best value case for data science-based products. You will be responsible for delivering models and algorithms that can operate in a scalable manner to improve industrial efficiency and precision. You will work closely with all prioritized areas such as estimation, projects, engineering, operations, and other teams to help configure and implement the best digital technology application to support our company's processes to bring the most value to the company.
Duties and Responsibilities:
 As a Data Scientist in GLDD you'll be part of a small informal but impactful transformation team as you help us build the data platform required to evolve the next generation of dredging. In your role, you'll analyze historical and real time process data, identify patterns and use physics-, statistics, and data science-based approaches to build AI based intelligent systems for the entire value chain, including digitization of heavy industrial machinery. You will work closely with the experts in all areas of our business to identify the best value case for data science-based products searching for the optimal balance of people, processes, and technology.
You will also be responsible for delivering projects in the data science area and delivering reporting on performance models and algorithms that operate in a scalable manner to improve industrial cost, control, and efficiency. You will build data pipelines and AI/machine learning models that streamline/automate decision-making and processes and provide valuable insights for optimization and predictive analytics. You will be a change agent that will help the organization maximize the benefit we see from our data, allowing us to make smarter, more data-driven decisions to leapfrog competitors.
 You'll fit right into this position if...You love data and the insights that can be harvested from combinations of large data sets.You thrive in a technical environment that consists of a blend of old and new technology.You are a self-starter, enjoy driving your project from start to finish, and capture value.You are excited about improving traditional operational efficiency by applying data science.You are comfortable setting ambitious targets and work in a structured way to reach them.You are comfortable being part of a tightly-knit team that has a change agenda.You are at ease when interfacing with people with a broad spectrum of technology backgrounds.You enjoy solving complex and urgent business problemsYou have a constructive and collaborative approach when challenging established truths.You build strong relationships with the business by helping them become more efficient by bridging technology, organization and processes together
Requirements:PhD/M.Sc./B.Sc. (in relevant science, math, statistics, computer science, or engineering), and/or > 5-10 years of work experience in data analysis or intensive quantitative areas.Mastery of new scientific methodologies and tools.Must be a fluent programmer using modern data scientists' tools like Python, R, SQL, Java, C++,MatlabMust be comfortable in using or learning to use data visualization tools and data scientist platforms like Azure data analytics, Snowflake, Power BI, Spotfire, TableauSolid understanding of the challenges and best practices in dataset management.Demonstrated understanding of data cleaning and data analysis methodology.Good understanding of techniques for mathematical modeling of physical systems.Experience with classical optimization methods is a plus.Strong collaboration skillsDetail-oriented work habits
Benefits:
Competitive salary and bonus program
401(k) program that includes 100% company matching of the first 6% of employee contributions with immediate vesting
Discretionary profit-sharing contributions by the company to participants’ 401(k) accounts based on company’s annual performance
Medical, Dental, Prescription, Life and Disability insurance plans
Great Lakes Dredge & Dock Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of and will not be discriminated against on the basis of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, age, veteran status, disability status, genetic information or any other protected category",46.0
34,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Mater’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",47.0
35,data+scientist,"Who we are:
We are Accenture, a global professional services company and a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. Our longstanding involvement with cloud technology (we have 34,000 completed cloud projects under our belt) was emphasized recently when we consolidated our multiple cloud teams into a single business practice called Accenture Cloud First. The organization is backed by a $3 billion investment over three years.
As part of our Data & AI group, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a highly collaborative and growing network of technology and data experts, who are taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges using the latest data and analytics technologies. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have an opportunity to work in roles such as Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Chief Data Officer covering all aspects of Data including Data Management, Data Governance, Data Intelligence, Knowledge Graphs, and IoT. Come grow your career in Technology at Accenture!

What you need:
10+ years of engineering, technology architecture and delivery experience
10+ years of experience developing the strategy for and building data and analytics solutions
5+ years of experience in leading data strategy engagements involving the architecture of modern data platforms with technologies such as Big Data and Cloud
5+ years of management consulting experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience (minimum of 12 years), or an Associate degree with a minimum of 6 years of equivalent work experience.
Bonus points if you have:
Hands-on engineer with the ability to manage complex engineering projects with a “lean-in” leadership style
Can speak with authority on the capabilities, strengths & weaknesses of the leading cloud platforms (Amazon Web Services, Azure, and Google Cloud).
Extensive experience with enterprise data architecture for transactional systems, analytical platforms, master data management, data governance framework, data integration and large-scale data migration.
Experience in DevOps
Experience migrating applications and data to cloud platforms.
Experience with relational and non-relational data platforms
Experience with machine learning, artificial intelligence applications and Data Science development languages (R, Python, etc.).
Understanding of data modeling principles, and Data Warehouse concepts (e.g., Kimball methodology for developing dimensional data models).
Familiarity with data visualization and self-service BI/data warehousing/ advanced analytics tools.
Methodologies for integration, data security, data governance and data sciences.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is ($99,900-$168,499) and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",48.0
36,data+scientist,"Description:

Position Overview
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for providing technical support including designing, implementing, and optimizing algorithms for unsupervised and supervised learning on unstructured and structured data. This position will be based out of Houston and will report to the Data & Analytics Director.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with other data scientists and cross-functional teams to identify innovation opportunities and possible solutions.
Work closely with key stakeholders to understand their needs to develop new or improve existing workflows.
Plan and execute the complete analytics life-cycle for problem solving, including requirements gathering, problem formulation, data grooming, data exploration, model prototyping, model validation, and algorithm productization.
Provide expertise on statistical and mathematical concepts.
Review and refine existing data models to continuously deliver state-of-the-art insights in existing products.
Instrumental in helping the business continue its evolution into an analytical and data-driven culture.
Maintain academic and industry relationships for the purposes of research; maintain expertise and awareness of cutting edge techniques, technologies and potential business solutions.
Must be able to work in a highly interactive, cross functional, team-oriented, agile/fast paced environment.
. Requirements:

Qualifications
Experience with and deep understanding of various machine learning and data processing techniques.
Advanced programming skills in Python and R using Machine Learning libraries like sckit-learn, MLLib, TensorFlow etc.
Expertise with leveraging visualization BI tools, such as Spotfire/Power BI, to build out dynamic dashboards.
Proficiency with relational databases (SQL scripting) and understanding of NoSQL databases (e.g., MongoDB).
Capable of quickly adapting to changing priorities and generating innovative solutions in an extremely fast-paced environment.
Ability to handle multiple simultaneous projects and act as a technical lead for some of them.
Taking actions in a self-directed manner to identify issues and make recommendations to department leadership.
Ability to translate high level requests, questions, concerns or ideas into successful data and analytics implementations.
Strong written and verbal communication skills, comfortable in engaging conversation with all levels.
Attention to detail and passion for quality with result-oriented approach.
Self-motivated and proactive needing minimal supervision.
Education
Preferred PhD or Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistiscs, Computational Mathematics or related STEM field.
5+ years relevant work experience as a Data Scientist or Engineer demonstrating advanced programming skills.
Working knowledge of the oil and gas industry and terminology is a must.
Classification
Full-Time, Exempt, Salaried
Relocation
This position is not eligible for domestic relocation.
Work Environment
This job is predominately located in a professional office environment with occasional travel to the field operations.
Work Schedule
This is a full-time position. Encino has a compressed work week with a “4/9/4” Work Schedule. Employees have the option to work four nine hour days with the addition of four hours each Friday. Some flexibility in hours is allowed.
The Company
Encino Energy is an independent oil and natural gas exploration and production company based in Houston. The company is committed to accumulating high potential assets in multiple U.S. basins and to enhancing returns with active discipline and technologically-driven development programs.
Encino Energy is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity in recruiting, hiring, developing, compensating, and promoting applicants and its employees. All employment decisions are made without regard to sex, race, color, religion, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, age, disability, marital or veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other legally protected categories. This includes providing reasonable accommodation for employee’s and applicant’s disabilities or religious beliefs and practices.
Encino Energy does not offer sponsorship of employment-based non-immigrant visa petitions for this role.",49.0
37,data+scientist,"Job ID: 2111186
Location: HOUSTON , TX , US
Date Posted: 2021-07-27
Category: Engineering and Sciences
Subcategory: Statistician
Schedule: Full-time
Shift: Day Job
Travel: No
Minimum Clearance Required: None
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain: Public Trust
Potential for Remote Work: No
Description
SAIC is seeking to hire a Senior System Safety & Reliability Engineer to support NASA’s human spaceflight programs at the Johnson Space Center in Houston, TX.

Provide expertise in the application of system safety and reliability analyses in support of NASA’s human spaceflight programs including, but not limited to, the Commercial Crew, Orion Multipurpose Crewed Vehicle, and Gateway Programs
Develop and utilize system safety and reliability analysis such as hazard analysis, FMEA, RBDA, FTA, HRA and PRA to assess ground support and spaceflight hardware, software, pre-launch, in-flight and post landing recovery operations to identify hazards and quantify risk of designated operations, conditions or events related to planned human spaceflight missions
Perform reliability data analysis, including the collection, classification and validation of data used to model and predict the reliability of complex spaceflight systems and crew operations under extreme environmental conditions
Provide system modeling and data analysis expertise to develop reliability and probabilistic risk assessment models, and the reduction and application of probability data, including development of early flight adjustment factors
Coordinate with spaceflight hardware/software developers and operators to collect failure and operations related data necessary to model spaceflight systems
Provide modeling and data analysis for design and operational trade studies to support risk informed decision making
Document assessment/analysis results in formal reports and present findings and recommendations to senior management
Provide technical assessments of System Safety, Reliability, Availability, and Maintainability (RAM) products and processes developed/used by NASA contractors and hardware providers

Qualifications
Required Education and Experience:
Bachelors in Engineering, Science (Physics), Mathematics, or Statistics, and 15 years or more experience.
Knowledgeable on various statistical analysis methodologies, tools and techniques including their proper application and limitations
US citizen able to obtain a Public Trust clearance
Ability to pass a NASA background check to get access to NASA facilities and IT systems

REQUIRED SKILLS:
Excellent interpersonal, written, and verbal communications skills


SAIC is a premier technology integrator solving our nation's modernization and readiness challenges. Our offerings across defense, space, civilian, and intelligence markets include high-end solutions in engineering, IT, and mission outcomes. We integrate the best components from our portfolio with our partner's ecosystem to deliver innovative and effective solutions. We are 25,500 strong; driven by mission, united by purpose, and inspired by opportunities. Headquartered in Reston, VA, SAIC has annual revenues of nearly $7.1 billion. For information, visit saic.com or Working at SAIC for benefits details. SAIC is an Equal Opportunity Employer empowering people no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status. We strive to create a diverse, inclusive and respectful work culture that values all.",50.0
38,data+scientist,"Athena is a cross-asset platform transforming technology at JP Morgan. It delivers innovative and efficient applications to a wide range of the firm's businesses, including sales, trading, operations, risk and research. Athena combined the best of open source technologies with innovative components developed internally, which gives you the ability to contribute to a wide range of exciting projects. Our developers enjoy working with front office, quants and other technology teams.
We are looking for premier Software Engineers to join our newly formed Athena Quant Engineering team. In this team you will work with Quantitative Researchers to accelerate the adoption of machine learning and cloud technologies. This includes working with the firm-wide standard for Machine Learning (OmniAI) within the Athena platform. Our work is focused on business use-cases and collaboration across multiple teams and lines of businesses. The ideal candidate will be adept at working across a globally disperse and fast paced organization.
Required skills to be considered for this role:

3-5 years experience in Python software development or other object oriented languages
Experience designing cloud applications and successfully deploying them to production

Preferred skills:

Development skills in Python or other object oriented languages
Experience working with and developing APIs
Experience building high performance, highly available and scalable systems
Database technologies including both relational and NoSQL
Strong SDLC mindset and familiarity with agile paradigms
Excellent problem solving skills
Comfortable working across different platforms and languages
Some experience with ML libraries such as Tensorflow, Keras and PyTorch
Experience working in Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working with ML models in AWS SageMaker

Cloud & ML/AI strategy:
J.P. Morgan Chase has made a strategic decision to fundamentally transform its operations through the adoption of artificial intelligence and machine learning at scale. At J.P. Morgan, adopting cloud technologies helps us become more agile, more secure and more efficient. Please see here a recording of Lori Beer, CIO of J.P. Morgan Chase, speaking during the AWS re:Invent 2020 keynote on using AWS to modernize and innovate: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3eEQJ9fg0y0 . J.P. Morgan Chase is leveraging many of the capabilities available in AWS including advanced AI and analytics functions. For example, we are using AWS Elastic Kubernetes Services (EKS) for risk calculations. Rapid innovation in machine learning is facilitated through our J.P. Morgan developed platform OmniAI which uses AWS SageMaker to build machine learning models.
About J.P. Morgan's Corporate & Investment Bank (CIB)
Our Corporate & Investment Bank relies on innovators like you to build and maintain the technology that helps us safely service the world's important corporations, governments and institutions. You'll develop solutions for a bank entrusted with holding $18 trillion of assets and $393 billion in deposits. CIB provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk, and extends liquidity in markets spanning over 100 countries around the world
Working as a Technologist in JPMorgan Chase & Co.
When you work at JPMorgan Chase & Co., you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 20 technology centers worldwide, our team of 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning, and cloud development. Our $10B+ annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will are transforming the financial services industry.
At JPMorgan Chase & Co. we value the unique skills of every employee, and we're building a technology organization that thrives on diversity. We encourage professional growth and career development and offer competitive benefits and compensation. If you're looking to build your career as part of a global technology team tackling big challenges that impact the lives of people and companies all around the world, we want to meet you.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/VeteransJPMorgan Chase & Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans",52.0
39,data+scientist,"SUMMARY


The Executive Director, Campaign Decision Science and Analytics (Executive Director) will build an end-to-end analytics solution to provide business insights, improve decision-making and provide empirical assessments of performance at the institutional, divisional, and team levels with respect to constituent engagement and philanthropy. This executive-level staff position serves as an integral member of the Senior Leadership Team (""SLT"") for the Development Division and works in close collaboration with leaders in Development, Institutional Affairs and the Office of the Senior Vice President and Chief Technology and Digital Officer. The Executive Director will oversee the day-to-day project management of the campaign, tracking various teams' progress towards milestones and communicating objective and rigorous assessment reports to institutional leadership.


The ideal candidate will be an experienced and transformational leader capable of navigating the institution through change in order to enhance the advancement analytics and operations infrastructure to greater levels of efficiency; facilitate analytics integration and adoption and foster a culture of decision science and data- informed decision making.


FUNCTIONS

Serves on the divisional Senior Leadership Team (""SLT"") and upholds MD Anderson's core values of Caring, Integrity, Discovery, Safety and Stewardship. Exhibits servant leadership at all times.
Participates fully in Senior Leadership Team meetings and huddles and engages with SLT colleagues collectively and individually.
Provides the SVP-CDO and the SLT with timely reports, analyses and recommendations on campaign, divisional and team-level operations and performance. Builds and communicates performance dashboards, highlighting areas requiring performance improvement, as well as areas of campaign priority and strategic opportunity.
Working with the SLT, serves as the ""project director"" by overseeing the tracking of major tasks and deliverables and ensuring the campaign's various work streams are meeting deadlines and budget constraints. Responsible for maintaining and communicating campaign project readiness reports of various sorts as needed.
Oversees all campaign reporting including, but not limited to, the campaign gift table, cash flow analysis, fundraising projections and fundraising totals.
Provides necessary campaign updates and numerical analyses to SVP-CDO, SLT, senior institutional leadership, and the Board of Visitors / Campaign Steering Committee.
Maintains a comprehensive campaign project timeline.
In coordination with Divisional teams and Analytics staff, develops insight and analysis into fundraising processes and performance, communicates these analyses effectively to relevant audiences, and drives positive change through collaboration.
Provides leadership and direction to prospect development and creates vision for leveraging tools and analyses to aid in prospecting efforts. This could include, though not limited to, the development of predictive models and other scoring methodologies utilized to create greater precision and efficiency in prospecting and prospect management, thereby impacting fundraising growth and performance.

REQUIREMENTS

10 years of direct experience working in business intelligence, advancement/development services, or related technical fields of development.
Experience in academic healthcare, higher education, or a research institute in a comprehensive, multi-year campaign.
Experience in a comprehensive, multi-year fund raising campaign.
Bachelor's degree in statistics, computer science, data science, information management, business or related field.
Excellent project management skills with strong familiarity with one or more project management software packages.

Preferred:

Master's degree in statistics, computer science, data science, information management, business or related field
Certification or training in project management or change management.
Certification or training in data or business analytics.
Professional certification in CFRE or FAHP.

SUPERVISION GIVEN


The Executive Director will be expected to manage the following work products and teams: Analytics team, Prospect Management & Research


TOBACCO-FREE HIRING


MD Anderson Cancer Center is committed to encouraging good health and staying true to our mission to end cancer. As part of its efforts to achieve these goals of a tobacco-free hiring process, if you are offered a position at MD Anderson Cancer Center, you will be subject to a Pre-Employment Drug Screen for tobacco compounds in compliance with applicable state laws.


DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION


MD Anderson's workforce diversity is one of its greatest strengths and keys to success in our mission to cure cancer. Our institution's leaders recognize that d iversity and inclusion are not just important; they are essential. We take an expansive view of diversity, considering differences in race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender and religious beliefs, as well as communication styles, thought, skill and ambition.

Additional Information

Requisition ID: 138743
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Work Week: Days
Fund Type: Hard
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 0
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 0
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 0",54.0
40,data+scientist,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",55.0
41,data+scientist,"Data Science (Senior - Advisor)
Date: Aug 5, 2021
Location:
Houston, TX, US, 77032
We are looking for the right people — people who want to innovate, achieve, grow and lead. We attract and retain the best talent by investing in our employees and empowering them to develop themselves and their careers. Experience the challenges, rewards and opportunity of working for one of the world’s largest providers of products and services to the global energy industry.


Responsibilities
Senior Data Scientist leads project tasks or small projects to perform data engineering, data modeling or model deployment.
This role works independently with subject matter experts to obtain data from different sources, complete data clean up and build a data dictionary independently.
This role is able to build models independently and implement the model deployment process using off-the-shelf solutions or with assistance from a developer.
This role starts to contribute to and shape the group strategy and identifies opportunities for process improvement. This role co-authors publications and patents and starts to participate in industry events.

Qualifications
Industry experience in predictive modeling, data science and analysis.
Knowledge of Machine Learning frameworks and packages, including Keras, TensorFlow, Scikit-Learn and cloud computing platforms like Azure.
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns and using data visualization tools.
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala and distributed computing technologies like Spark.
Demonstrated teamwork, strong communication skills, and collaborative in complex engineering projects.
Completion of an undergraduate degree in STEM and 4+ years of related experience is required. Master's degree in STEM is preferred.
Candidates having qualifications that exceed the minimum job requirements will receive consideration for higher level roles given (1) their experience, (2) additional job requirements, and/or (3) business needs. Depending on education, experience, and skill level, a variety of job opportunities might be available, including Tech Prof-Data Science, Sr, Tech Prof-Data Science, Principal, Tech Prof-Data Science, Advisor.

Halliburton is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, citizenship, marital status, sex/gender, sexual preference/ orientation, gender identity, age, veteran status, national origin, or any other status protected by law or regulation.

Location
3000 N. Sam Houston Parkway E., Houston, Texas, 77032, United States

Job Details
Requisition Number: 92384
Experience Level: Experienced Hire
Job Family: Engineering/Science/Technology
Product Service Line: Global R&D
Full Time / Part Time: Full Time
Additional Locations for this position:

Nearest Major Market: Houston

Job Segment: Database, Cloud, Data Modeler, Business Process, Technology, Data, Management",58.0
42,data+scientist,"Join our high caliber team as a Machine Learning Engineer!
By using leading-edge technology, KONGSBERG DIGITAL is a provider of the next generation software and creator of complex digital solutions that are changing the fields within maritime, renewables & utilities and oil & gas.
By being a part of Kongsberg Digital, you will work in a highly competent team with other qualified and competent engineers and developers, shaping and developing our market-leading software.
Want to be part of our Analytics team?
The Analytics team in KONGSBERG Digital is the Centre of Excellence in machine learning and related methodology for the whole KONGSBERG group. As a member of this team, you therefore work with world class technology from many areas. Among other things, you will be able to work with two of Kongsberg Digital's products;
Kognitwin® - Using our Digital Twin technologies to digitalize the Oil & Energy sector.
https://www.kongsberg.com/digital/solutions/kognitwin-energy
Vessel Insight ™ - Digital vessel to cloud data, digitalizing the global maritime industry.
https://www.kongsberg.com/digital/solutions/vessel-insight/this-is-vessel-insight/
As we continue to grow, we are looking for a Machine Learning Engineer to join our team in Houston.
In this role, you will be responsible for running analytical experiments in a methodical manner, evaluating alternate models via theoretical approaches, and communicating results to internal and external stake holders. The ideal candidate is also a capable software developer.
What's in it for you:
You will be working together with highly skilled colleagues, with strong domain knowledge and all of the necessary infrastructure, tools and data to deliver value to our customers. This includes:
Propose and develop innovative machine learning-based solutions
Build and implement algorithms and code to support KDI’s product portfolio, customer projects and business opportunities
Partner with business leads to provide guidance and best practice on how customer data can be transformed into actionable items and return value
Closely interact with various product teams to support data and machine learning projects, bridging business and engineering efforts
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Deploy machine learning models and data processing applications together with product teams
Keep up-to-date with latest technology trends in machine learning and A.I.
What do we expect:
Masters/PhD degree in Applied Math, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science or Engineering.
Experience level: 2-5 years of relevant experience.
Proficient knowledge of machine learning techniques, data analytics, statistics and numerical methods.
Strong coding skills in Python and the ability and interest to learn new languages and technologies.
Familiar with machine learning toolkits such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, Scikit-learn etc.
Experience working with Docker/containers and Cloud technology, such as Azure, to deliver ML projects.
Ability to interpret high-level business objectives into a strategy.
Self-initiated learner, positive attitude, flexible and willing to adapt to changing situations.
What do we offer:
An interesting position within a dynamic and innovative high-tech company.
Opportunity to work on ML/DL based solutions for important problems in the oil & gas and maritime industry.
Career opportunities and personal development.
Competitive compensation package.
Great corporate culture within Kongsberg.
An exciting journey.
Supporting documents for your application:
Optional: Link to GitHub account, relevant Python notebook or Kaggle competition, blog etc.
If you're interested, please email your resume and cover letter to debbie.suchoff@kdi.kongsberg.com",60.0
43,data+scientist,"About IHS Markit
At the heart of IHS Markit, we are an information company. With expertise across the world’s largest industries, we leverage technology and data science to provide the insights, software, and data to help our customers make better informed decisions, driving growth, performance, and efficiency.
About the Department: ENR Upstream
IHS Markit’s Cost estimation software provides industry leading software solutions for the Oil & Gas market to enable engineers, cost estimators, and others to create cost estimates core to decision making. Our software platforms are used by over 2500 people in over 50 countries globally to estimate and analyze the costs necessary to develop the infrastructure that powers the world whether considering onshore, offshore, or exploring deep water environments.
Starting your Career with Us - Opportunities for Graduates
We hire into a wide variety of exciting roles across our business and as you begin your career with us, we’re here to support your transition into the professional world. In addition to working with our industry experts in your full-time role, you’ll be part of a global development program, designed to create the space for you to invest in your personal and professional development.
As part of the development program, you’ll gain insight into our diverse business, interact with our leaders, build vital skills and become an integral part of the IHS Markit community and culture - all designed to enhance the exciting work you do with the team you’re hired into! You’ll be part of a global community, building an invaluable network of knowledge and support from your mentors, peer group and wider teams.
Eligibility
We’re now hiring for 2021 full-time roles. We're looking for final year students who are working towards a Bachelor's or Master's degree (or equivalent), and due to complete their studies and be available for a full time role commencing in 2021.
The role
The QUE$TOR team is looking for a Junior Data Scientist to support our initiatives to develop new offerings to the market, streamline our internal data collection and management, and support our future business. The ideal candidate should have critical thinking skills, a quantitative background, and experience to developing projects from the ground up. They must be able to work as part of an integrated multi-disciplinary team but also be self-driven and able to independently delivery projects.
With depth of knowledge key to providing industry leading advice, it can be advantageous to have a study background in a field relevant to your team/role.
Responsibilities
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to develop plans, build concepts, and support development for new business solutions.
Help to understand the need, the limitations, and develop a solution plan.
Efficiently explore new data sources and assess and implement data gathering techniques.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement and productionize models while monitoring the performance.
Help conceptually frame and refine relevant business questions.
Develop custom machine learning models and algorithms.
Communicate solutions and findings to different stakeholders.
What we're looking for
We seek candidates with diverse backgrounds and ideas with a desire to learn and thrive. The Graduate Program will provide a variety of experiences to help you identify your strengths, develop highly transferable skills, and align you to a successful career path for a bright future at IHS Markit. To be an ideal fit for the role, you should have:
A bachelor or master degree (or equivalent) completed no later than May 2021
0-6 months relevant work experience
Demonstrated passion or interest in one or more of our key industries
Excellent communication skills
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills
An aptitude to learn and adapt quickly in a rapidly changing environment
The ability to build strong working relationships in a collaborative setting
Be legally eligible to work for the duration of the program in the country for which you apply
For Data Scientist applicants, we recommend the following:
Degree in data science or related field
Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Experience building and working with databases (e.g. SQL)
Experience working with unstructured data and Excel.
Curiosity and research attitude to learn new ideas and techniques.
Aptitude and experience with PowerBI, Spotfire, or other advanced visualization tools
Experience using statistical computer languages (e.g. Python or R) to manipulate data and draw insights from data sets.
Exposure or interest in learning machine learning techniques (clustering, classification, regression, deep learning) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Able to focus on a detailed issue but also able to step back to view the larger picture.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Application and assessment process
The assessment process that follows is designed to ensure you can learn more about us, showcase your skills, and find a role that is right for you.
Stage 1: Submit online application
Stage 2: Complete online pymetrics assessment
Stage 3: Initial screening process
Stage 4: Final stage assessment
Our commitment to diversity
Our business and our customers are diverse, and we believe that embracing a diverse and inclusive environment is key to defining who we are. Our people are what makes us unique and you will get the opportunity to work with some of the brightest minds from across the world who continuously find the best viable solutions, adding value and driving change for our customers.
-
Inclusion and diversity are critical to the success of IHS Markit, and we actively encourage applications from people of all backgrounds. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other protected category. For more information on the many ways in which we enthusiastically support inclusion and diversity efforts for both candidates and employees, please access our Inclusion & Diversity Statement here.
We are proud to provide reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with IHS Markit and need special assistance or an accommodation to use our website or to apply for a position, please contact or call +1 212 849 0399. Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are considered on a case-by-case basis. This contact information (email and phone) is intended for application assistance and accommodation requests only. We are unable to accept resumes or provide information about application status through the phone number or email address above. Resumes are only accepted through the online application process, and only qualified candidates will receive consideration and follow-up.
IHS Markit maintains a substance-free workplace; employees may be asked to submit to a drug test (where permitted by law). In addition, as a federal contractor in the United States, the company participates in the E-Verify Program to confirm eligibility to work.
For information please click on the following links:
IHS Markit Business Code of Conduct
Right to Work
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Pay Transparency
-
Current Colleagues
If you are currently employed by IHS Markit, please apply internally via the Workday internal careers site.",62.0
44,data+scientist,"Huntsman’s Performance Products Division is now searching for a new Data Scientist who will be responsible for supporting the Global Performance Products with the creation of business and functional dashboards. You will be focused on the creation of visualization of financial and functional performance metrics in support of business decisions. You will also work in close collaboration with the global Finance, Supply Chain, Marketing, Commercial and global S&OP teams. This role is an active, full member in our Performance Products division at our corporate office in The Woodlands, Texas.
As the Data Scientist, you will:
Working closely with Finance Team by providing data visualization around business and functional performance.
Ensuring up to date dashboard information highlighting critical areas for decision making.
Provide training to functions on the use of the dashboards.
Provide monthly / quarterly reports on KPI’s using various software (Excel, Power BI, SQL, R, Python, etc.). Translate these findings into clear guidelines for corrective action plans and performance dialogues
Experience with statistical programming software like SAS, R, Python equivalents and SQL is a plus
Work in close cooperation with the Global Reporting Team to leverage on best practices and sharing of developments.
Executing refresh routines and updates to existing dashboards and reporting tools.
Develop new dashboards in line with evolving functional needs.
Skills and experiences required:
Bachelor’s degree required with 2+ years related experience
Ideally experience as a data analyst and deep understanding of data visualization tools and database interfaces.
Acumen in modern IT numerical software packages
Knowledge of Power BI and Planning Analytics is a preferred
Very strong analytical and numerical skills
Experienced creator of data visualization
Team player
Very good knowledge of MS Office
Critical view on data accuracy
Good stress resistant
Required languages: English
Huntsman is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all qualified applicants for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, gender identification, sexual orientation and/or expression or any other characteristic protected by law in every location in which we have facilities national or local.

P lease refer to https://www.huntsman.com/privacy/online-privacy-notice for Company’s Data Privacy and Protection information.
All unsolicited resumes presented by recruitment agencies are treated as pro bono information or service.
Huntsman is aware of a scam involving fraudulent job offers . Huntsman does not make job offers until after a candidate has submitted a job application and has participated in a face-to-face interview. Please be advised that emails from Huntsman always end in “@huntsman.com” and that any job offer that requires payment or requires you to deposit a check is likely a scam. If you have questions about any open positions at Huntsman, please visit our Careers website at http://www.huntsman.com/corporate/a/Careers .",63.0
45,data+scientist,"(Must be willing to Travel)
 Detailed Description
Set-up and calibrate all equipment, interpret, evaluate, and document results using standardized report templates
Inspect and interpret readings as required in real time, to determine areas of interest
Apply testing criteria in accordance with applicable codes, specifications, and standards
Responsible for all paperwork to be turn in a timely manner including safety forms, company required forms, customer forms, and time-sheets
Assists in overseeing the quality assurance/quality control of the crews on same work assignment or location, and may provide customer interface for crews on same work assignment or locations
Demonstrate excellent communication skills, professionalism, and promote a positive customer service attitude internally and externally
Enforce and abide the requirements of safe operation and personal safety using required Personal Protective Equipment and safe work practices
Mentor and train coworkers assigned to you through on the job training in safe work practices, technical skills and compliance with company policy
Perform other job-related tasks as assigned by management
Identify and/or escalate sales opportunities as they arise
Gather and escalate client concerns to leadership when needed
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities (Required):
Minimum of 5 years’ experience as a Level II Senior Data Analyst
A sense of urgency, good attention to detail, and follow-through
Ability to be certified in accordance with Versa Integrity written practice in the following methods: Eddy Current, Remote Field Testing, Visual Testing, and IRIS
Ability to perform a wide variety of tasks and respond to short notice work assignments
Be thoroughly familiar with the scope and limitations of the techniques and method in which are to be employed
Ability to set up and standardize equipment, conducts tests, interpret and evaluate findings in compliance with required specifications, standards and or customer specifications
Knowledge of Industry Codes (ASME, AWS, API, ASNT, ASTM)
Firmly adheres to the values and ethics of Versa Integrity
Exhibits honesty, discretion, and sound judgment
Knowledge of NDT equipment and ability to effectively perform assigned NDT inspections
Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service. This includes customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction
Maintains a positive outlook, rebounds quickly from frustrations and unpleasantness, and maintains composure and friendly demeanor while dealing with stressful situations
Must have working knowledge of MS Office Suite of products
Willing to work with others, collaborating and compromising where necessary; promptly share relevant information with others
Education
Preferred
High School or better
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
TWIC Card",64.0
46,data+scientist,"The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying, analyzing, and documenting the business needs. Helping the business to find the right answer to solve their business problems, to determine feasible solutions contributing, to develop new business models. Equally, this role is about providing support to the business to further professionalize their MI / Analytic reporting platform, using the ESSA approach (Automate, Standardize, Simplify & Automate).
Job Description
The Data Analyst gathers, analyses, and models data and key performance indicators to develop quantitative and qualitative business insights in an agile fashion, identifies opportunities for improved data analysis. Develops processes and design reports to boost the business intelligence within the organization and is good at effectively processing large amounts of data into meaningful information. Collects past and present data to create fit-for-purpose MI reports. Has in-depth knowledge of the Analytical tools available within the organization and in the market
Accountabilities
Precisely capture business problems, value drivers, and functional/non-functional requirements, including health, safety, security, usability, data, and supportability considerations.
Translate business requirements into functionality and assess the risks, feasibility, opportunities, and business impacts of various solution options.
Assess and model processes, data flows, and technology to understand the bottlenecks and identify opportunities for improvement.
Create clear documentation to communicate requirements and related information; keep updated to align with the solution over the project lifecycle.
Ensure traceability of requirements from business needs and requirements, through testing and scope changes, to the final solution.
Interact with software suppliers, designers, and developers to understand software limitations, deliver elements of system and database design, and ensure that business requirements and use cases are handled.
Create acceptance criteria and validate that solutions meet business needs through defining and coordinating testing.
Create and present compelling business cases to justify solution value and establish approval, funding, and prioritization.
Execute Data Analysis activities on projects within agreed parameters of cost, time, and quality.
Understand and stay abreast of relevant architectures and technologies related to a business area.
Support stakeholder management activities including facilitation of large design sessions.
Required
Power BI
Report creation
DAX
Modeling
Data analysis
Data modeling
Process design
Optional
Exploration/Production subject area knowledge
Economics/Excel",66.0
47,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

What you need:
Minimum of 10+ years of experience in ability to relate and connect complex business issues and articulate solution using curated and/or raw data
Minimum of 10+ years of experience with Data warehousing methodologies and modelling techniquesMinimum of 3 years of - In-depth understanding of the Snowflake architecture, and differentiation. Need to have the understanding and the know how in using features such as Zero Copy Clone, Time Travel, User defined functions, etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in Managing security in Snowflake. This includes creation of custom Roles to control access to Data, Databases, Warehouses etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in designing Compute Clusters (Warehouse) in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Snowpipe for handling Streaming dataMinimum of 5 years of experience in Migration, methods to cloud data solutionsMinimum of 2 years of experience in handling semi-structured data (JSON, XML) using the VARIANT attribute in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Re-clustering of the data in Snowflake with good understanding on how Micro-Partition works inside SnowflakeMinimum of 5 years of experience in creating master data datasets. Experience with a MDM tool is preferredMinimum of 8 years of experience in working with Batch and Stream dataExpert in SQLMinimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in Cloud technologies such as
o AWS - S3, Glacier, EC2, Lambda, SQS, Redshift
o Azure - Blob Storage, Cool Blob Storage, Virtual Machine, Functions, SQL Datawarehouse
o GCP - Cloud Storage, Coldline Cloud Storage, Compute Engine, Cloud Functions, Big Query
Minimum of 5 years of experience with ELT concepts with design experience of architecting data flows into a Massively Parallel Processing (MPP) Analytical DatastoresMinimum of 5 years of experience with ETL tools such as Informatica, Talend, MatillionExperience in Hadoop, Hive, HBASE, Spark is a plus

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $207,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",71.0
48,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualifications
- At least 3- 5 years of Consulting or client service delivery experience on Amazon AWS (AWS)
- At least 3- 5 years of experience in developing data ingestion, data processing and analytical pipelines for big data, relational databases, NoSQL and data warehouse solutions
Extensive experience providing practical direction within the AWS Native and HadoopExperience with private and public cloud architectures, pros/cons, and migration considerations.Minimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in AWS and Big Data technologies such as Java, Node.js, C##, Python, SQL, EC2, S3, Lambda, Spark/SparkSQL, Hive/MR, Pig, Oozie and streaming technologies such as Kafka, Kinesis, NiFI etc.3-5+ years of hands on experience in programming languages such as Java, c#, node.js, python, pyspark, spark, SQL, Unix shell/Perl scripting etc.Experience working with DevOps tools such as GitLabs, Jenkins, CodeBuild, CoePipeline CodeDeploy, etc.Bachelors or higher degree in Computer Science or a related discipline.
Must have at least one AWS Certification
§ Certified AWS Developer - Associate
§ Certified AWS DevOps – Professional
§ Certified AWS Big Data Specialty

Nice-to-Have Skills/Qualifications:
DevOps on an AWS platform. Multi-cloud experience a plus.Experience developing and deploying ETL solutions on AWS using tools like Talend, Informatica, MatillionStrong in Java, C##, Spark, PySpark, Unix shell/Perl scriptingIoT, event-driven, microservices, containers/Kubernetes in the cloud

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $43,200 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",72.0
49,data+scientist,"Company Description
Proximate Technologies Inc is in staffing and consulting since 2004, we are immensely successful in creating a global network of highly adopt intelligent workforce that can help you achieve critical projects and goals. Keeping pace with projects and being on the lookout for the extremely talented individuals has become even more challenging and here is where Proximate comes in to play!
We have been providing top consulting services and we are one of the fastest growing IT Consulting Firm in this complex job market with cutting-edge technologies in project implementing services and client recruitment capabilities. Our vision is to support services needs of our clients and offer them technology-driven business solutions that meet their goals and corporate objectives.

Job Description

Design and analyze experiments to verify product hypothesis and direction
Audit quality of launch experiment results and guarantee correct measurement of product or technical changes' impact
Keep track of core metrics and attribute metrics changes to root causes
Analyze market dynamics, potential gain and cost of new product initiatives, and consult on product strategy
Use data and experiment to verify hypothesis around bottlenecks in product growth, and consult on direction for improvement
Work with engineers and product stakeholders to deliver product insights.

Qualifications

Master degree in Computer Science , Electrical Engineering and Information Technology
Expertise in SQL and programming in Python or R
Knowledge in basic machine learning and deep learning
Strong communication and teamwork skills
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",74.0
50,data+scientist,"Basic Function
Aramco Americas’ Houston Research Center has a Data Scientist opening in the Artificial Intelligence Technology Team. The Data Scientist will conduct independent research and development in formulating and applying AI/ML models and algorithms to various geosciences, petroleum engineering and geophysics applications, collaborate with subject matter teams and provide periodic updates through presentations, reports and prototype demonstrations, and finally contribute to technology delivery and deployment with algorithms, codes and software prototypes. In addition to that, this position is expected to publish their work in conferences and journals as well as patents.
Duties & Responsibilities
Research and develop machine learning algorithms/models/prototypes for upstream applications in exploration, development and production, such as classification, regression, anomaly detection, failure prediction, and optimization
Work with subject matter research and business teams to develop, implement, and deliver robust, scalable and accurate machine learning solutions from end-to-end
Collaboratively develop innovative ideas, initiate new research directions, and effectively lead and execute on several technical projects
Maintain and grow state-of-the-art technical knowledge, via actively publishing and patenting, and establish as an expert in related areas of responsibility
Communicate ideas, technical approaches, project plans and results effectively via oral and written reports; work effectively with peers, management, operations groups, and outside organizations
Education and Experience
Master’s degree preferred (Ph.D. highly preferred) in computer science, mathematics, physics, applied science, engineering or similar disciplines with demonstrated research capability with 3+ years of relevant experience
Demonstrated experience in developing core machine learning algorithms in professional research and development settings, in building and applying machine learning / predictive modelling in real-world use cases, extensive working knowledge of developing deep learning models using tools such as TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, etc
Strong background in some of these listed areas: machine learning, time series analysis / sensor processing, deep learning, optimization/operations research, text analytics/NLP, computer vision
Extensive hands-on coding ability, proficient with machine learning models, frameworks and stacks, python, react and flask development and GPU based platforms
Past experience or knowledge of Oil and Gas domain is a plus
Track records of past publications in relevant topics
Excellent communication, verbal and written skills, capable of communicating complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner to both technical and non-technical audiences
NO THIRD PARTY CANDIDATES ACCEPTED",77.0
51,data+scientist,"Xecta Digital Labs is where physics intersects artificial intelligence to create the next-gen, cognitive digital solutions for the energy industry.
As a data engineer working within our Platform and Infrastructure team, the candidate will bring value to the organization by engineering customer-specific data ingestion solutions. The candidate will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross-functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts, and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems, and products. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
The solutions will typically be based on commonly used ETL/Ingestion tools such as Apache Airflow and Kafka. The candidate will use their skills to engineer data pipelines that provide batch, scheduled, and in specific cases, push-based data pipelines for relational data, unstructured files, REST, and Socket-based sources. The candidate with use their programming skills (e.g. python) and knowledge of the Data Engineering landscape to apply the best solution to meet our customer(s) requirements. You will work closely with our Lead Data Engineers to design a solution, articulate that solution to leadership, and implement the solution working with both Xecta Engineers and the Customer data teams.
Compensation:
$100,000 - $150,000 yearly
Responsibilities:
Design data engineering pipelines that ingest data from customer hosted systems to Xecta Cloud Platform
Code python scripts as needed to apply logic and replace missing/bad data on a per-pipeline basis
Setup triggers, ingestion schedules for batch loading on a per-pipeline basis
Deploy, test and refine data engineering solution
Work with customer data teams to ensure the robustness and security of data pipeline solution
Qualifications:
Good working experience with Python and Scripting
Prior experience with one or more of Apache Airflow, Kafka, Apache NiFi, Databricks or similar
Broad experience working with SQL Server, Oracle, AWS Redshift, MongoDB
Good understanding of data cleansing concept
Experience consuming REST/Web APIs data using python
About Company
Xecta Digital Labs is where oil and gas physics intersects artificial intelligence to create the next-gen cognitive digital oilfield. Our software products and digital solutions provide oil and gas companies with practical and robust workflows for upstream, midstream, and downstream engineering.",78.0
52,data+scientist,"Basic Function
Aramco Americas’ Houston Research Center has a Data Scientist opening in the Artificial Intelligence Technology Team. The Data Scientist will conduct independent research and development in formulating and applying AI/ML models and algorithms to various geosciences, petroleum engineering and geophysics applications, collaborate with subject matter teams and provide periodic updates through presentations, reports and prototype demonstrations, and finally contribute to technology delivery and deployment with algorithms, codes and software prototypes. In addition to that, this position is expected to publish their work in conferences and journals as well as patents.
Duties & Responsibilities
Research and develop machine learning algorithms/models/prototypes for upstream applications in exploration, development and production, such as classification, regression, anomaly detection, failure prediction, and optimization
Work with subject matter research and business teams to develop, implement, and deliver robust, scalable and accurate machine learning solutions from end-to-end
Collaboratively develop innovative ideas, initiate new research directions, and effectively lead and execute on several technical projects
Maintain and grow state-of-the-art technical knowledge, via actively publishing and patenting, and establish as an expert in related areas of responsibility
Communicate ideas, technical approaches, project plans and results effectively via oral and written reports; work effectively with peers, management, operations groups, and outside organizations
Education and Experience
Master’s degree preferred (Ph.D. highly preferred) in computer science, mathematics, physics, applied science, engineering or similar disciplines with demonstrated research capability with 3+ years of relevant experience
Demonstrated experience in developing core machine learning algorithms in professional research and development settings, in building and applying machine learning / predictive modelling in real-world use cases, extensive working knowledge of developing deep learning models using tools such as TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, etc
Strong background in some of these listed areas: machine learning, time series analysis / sensor processing, deep learning, optimization/operations research, text analytics/NLP, computer vision
Extensive hands-on coding ability, proficient with machine learning models, frameworks and stacks, python, react and flask development and GPU based platforms
Past experience or knowledge of Oil and Gas domain is a plus
Track records of past publications in relevant topics
Excellent communication, verbal and written skills, capable of communicating complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner to both technical and non-technical audiences
NO THIRD PARTY CANDIDATES ACCEPTED
TQjV09CAVI",79.0
53,data+scientist,"Who We Are
A leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most and offers huge growth opportunities for you!
Our Cloud First group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities across data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with a deep industry expertise to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. To accelerate our customers transformation leveraging cloud, we combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
We are excited about the opportunities in the Cloud – and hope you are too! Learn more about why Accenture’s Google Cloud Business Group was named the 2019 Apigee Global SI Partner of the Year.
What’s In It For You
You will always be learning in this role through:
On the job learning: opportunity to be immersed in the design and implementation of human-centric solutions to help solve client’s largest and most complex challenges, powered by the latest Google technologies and industry’s best practices such event-driven architectures and domain driven design. Collaborate on internal assets and contribute to open source community projects.
Being part of Accenture Google Business Group’s close-knit, vibrant community; client teams pushing the boundaries of new business capabilities and emerging Google technologies sharing their experiences and lessons learned with each other. Opportunity to learn and work with Accenture’s certified Google Fellows and certified Google Cloud practitioners.
As part of our Data & AI group, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. You will build better software better! There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a highly collaborative and growing network of technology and data experts, who are taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges using the latest data and analytics technologies. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have an opportunity to work in roles such as Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Chief Data Officer covering all aspects of Data including Data Management, Data Governance, Data Intelligence, Knowledge Graphs, and IoT. Come grow your career in Technology at Accenture!
Job Responsibilities:
Entrepreneurial and motivated individual interested in building a book of business around a set of Partner-Accenture offerings, capabilities, solutions in the market place.Responsible for establishing the Data in the Cloud practice focused on the Google GCP Data stack.Own and maintain partner and alliance relationships.Develop operating model for staffing, delivery and growthDrive capability growth subject to business goals such as talent plans, chargeability and recoverabilitySupport sales and Go to Market functions by evangelizing the platform and providing thought leadership
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.

Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualifications
Minimum of 5 years planning, estimating and sizing cloud based data opportunities in a global delivery modelMinimum of 6 years of technical sales, architecture design, evaluation, and investigation in a cloud environment.Minimum of 6 years of Client Management and/or Project Management experience.Technical understanding of Data in the cloud.Ability to define and demonstrate expertise in both the business outcomes and technology aspects of the play.Experience in working with various go to market & Sales channels support sales and drive business.Experience with define and demonstrate expertise in both the business outcomes and technology aspects of cloud dataAbility to work with partners and drive joint business for Accenture and Google.
Education Requirement
Bachelor's degree or equivalent (minimum 12 years work experience). If Associate’s Degree, must have equivalent minimum 6 year work experience.
Preferred Skills
Google Cloud Platform (GCP) certification (or comparable experience),AWS, or Azure certification
- Data migration and data processing experience on the Amazon AWS stack, specifically:- BigQuery
Cloud DataFlowCloud DataProcCloud DataPrepCloud PubSubCloud ComposerCloud BigTable
Previous Consulting or client service delivery experience on Google Cloud Platform (GCP).Experience with private and public cloud architectures, pros/cons, and migration considerations.Experience in and understanding of data and information management, esp in Big Data trends.Familiarity with the Technology stack available in the industry for data cataloging, data ingestion, capture, processing and curation: Kafka, StreamSets, Attunity, Collibra, Map Reduce, Hadoop, Spark, Flume, Hive, Impala, SparkSQLTechnical/Team Leadership Experience.Personnel Development Experience (hiring, resource planning, performance feedback, etc.).
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $168,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",81.0
54,data+scientist,"Company:
US6469 Sysco Payroll, Division of Sysco Resources Services, LLC
Zip Code:
77077
Minimum Level of Education:
Bachelor’s Degree
Minimum Years of Experience:
3 Years
Employment Type:
Full Time
Travel Percentage:
0
Job Summary:
This role will be responsible for price management of $1-2B revenue product portfolio. This role will provide analytical thought leadership to develop pricing strategy recommendations, work cross-functionally to gather required inputs to support price setting decisions, and own performance analytics and insights to drive profitability improvements. This role will require ability to synthesize and communicate results, recommend a course of actions, as well as implement the solutions.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Perform weekly pricing review and determine recommended pricing overrides for managed product portfolio
Identify pricing lever changes and analyze impacts to profitability, volume forecast, and customer basket
Work with cross-functional team to collect inputs and design requirements to problem solve or develop pricing recommendations
Conduct performance analytics and generate insights to identify improvement opportunities
Ensure data integrity and configuration accuracy in pricing system
Education Required:
Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Economics, Statistics, engineering or another analytical field of study
Experience Required:
3-5 years of analytical experience with knowledge in SQL
Experience Preferred:
Experience in price modeling and model configurations
Experience with scientific scripting language (e.g. R), python and statistical methods
Advanced SQL skills
Technical Skills and Abilities:
Expert in Microsoft Excel
Python proficiency- being able to read, understand and develop models, and experience with experimental design a plus
Demonstrates strong communications skills in describing complex analytics and models to non-technical audience
Ability to take a business question or problem and develop structured data analytics to answer or solve problem with minimum instructions
Able to perform quantitative analysis of large data sets using appropriate analytical tools while navigating multiple, complex data environments
Possesses a strong general business acumen
Demonstrates strong communication skills
Ability to participate in multiple workstreams/projects in a fast-paced environment, adapting to shifting priorities and meeting deadlines
Collaborative team player who can synthesize feedback and direction from multiple stakeholders
Expert in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
Candidates hired in positions eligible for Sysco Benefits who start work in the months of May and June 2021 may be eligible for medical and prescriptions drug plan coverage. Effective on their date of hire*. This special medical and presanction drug plan eligibility period supersedes the standard benefits information on below regarding Sysco’s benefits eligibility period. Standard eligibility rules (below) still apply to all other Sysco Benefits. *exclusions/exceptions may apply.
Physical Demands:
Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit, stand, walk and use hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and telephone to talk and hear.
Travel Requirements:
0%
Work Environment:
Corporate office
BENEFITS INFORMATION:
Candidates who start work in the months of May and June 2021 may be eligible for medical and prescription drug plan coverage effective on their date of hire*. Standard eligibility rules and timelines apply to all other Sysco benefits, including additional healthcare benefits options, retirement benefits, vacation, and paid sick leave. Please visit https://syscobenefits.com/careers to view additional benefits information. *Exceptions/exclusions may apply
HOW WE PROTECT OUR ASSOCIATES
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Personal protective equipment and masks provided
Temperature screenings
Social distancing guidelines in place
Sanitizing, disinfecting, and cleaning procedures in place
OVERVIEW:
Sysco is the global leader in foodservice distribution. With over 57,000 associates and a fleet of over 13,000 vehicles, Sysco operates approximately 326 distribution facilities worldwide and serves more than 625,000 customer locations.
We offer our associates the opportunity to grow personally and professionally, to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization, and to serve others in a manner that exceeds their expectations. We’re looking for talented, hard-working individuals to join our team. Come grow with us and let us show you why Sysco is at the heart of food and service.
AFFIRMATIVE ACTION STATEMENT:
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States.
We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer, and consider qualified applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status or any other protected factor under federal, state or local law.
This opportunity is available through Sysco Corporation, its subsidiaries and affiliates.",82.0
55,data+scientist,"The School of Biomedical Informatics (SBMI), at the University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston (UTHealth) has a non-tenure track position at the research assistant professor level in the area of Electronic Health Records (EHR)-based predictive modeling.

UTHealth is in the world-renowned Texas Medical Center (TMC) located in cosmopolitan Houston, Texas, the fourth largest city in the United States. SBMI currently offers Master's and Ph.D. Degrees, along with a certificate program in biomedical and health informatics.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
The successful candidate will be expected to plan, supervise, and direct research in EHR based predictive modeling under the direction of Dr. Degui Zhi. The candidate will provide technical expertise to facilitate the study design, sample or data collection, pipeline development, data analysis, results implementation, manuscript writing, and grant proposal preparation. Collaborative research with other faculty within SBMI and across UTHealth and TMC (e.g., MD Anderson Cancer Center and Baylor College of Medicine) is also encouraged.

QUALIFICATIONS:
The individual should possess a doctoral degree in one of the following areas: bioinformatics, genomics, genetics, computational biology, biomedical informatics, computer science, medicine, biostatistics, or related disciplines. A record of verifiable and published EHR predictive modeling and potential for obtaining extramural funding are preferred. Excellent teamwork and communication skills are required.

APPLICATION:
As part of the application process, the applicant should provide a current curriculum vitae, a research statement, contact information for three references, and a cover letter describing qualifications and career goals. Note that all application materials must be submitted through UTHealth's online system.

APPOINTMENTS/BENEFITS:
 This position is a full time appointment on the non-tenure track, renewable on a yearly basis.

SALARY:
 Competitive and dependent upon qualifications and experience.",83.0
56,data+scientist,"Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
We are:
A leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities across data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with a deep industry expertise to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. To accelerate our customers transformation leveraging cloud, we combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
As part of our Accenture Google Business Group in Cloud First, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. You will build better software better! There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a growing network of technology experts who are highly collaborative taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. Come grow your career in technology at Accenture!
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualification
Bachelor's degree or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience. If Associate Degree, must have an additional minimum 6 years work experience.Possess Google Professional Data Engineer Certification.Minimum 3 years direct experience in Enterprise Data Warehouse technologiesMinimum 3 years in a customer facing role working with enterprise clientsHands on GCP Cloud data implementation projects experience (Dataflow, Cloud Composer, Big Query, Cloud Storage etc.)Experience with developing software code in one or more languages such as Java, Python and SQL.Experience designing and deploying large scale distributed data processing systems with few technologies such as Oracle, MS SQL Server, MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Redis, Hadoop, Spark, HBase, Netezza, Teradata, Tableau, Qlik or MicroStrategy.
Preferred Skills
Data migration and data processing experience on the Google Cloud stack, specifically:
o BigQuery
o Cloud DataFlow
o Cloud DataProc
o Cloud Storage
o Cloud DataPrep
o Cloud PubSub
o Cloud Composer
o Cloud BigTable
o DEV Ops
o Github

Previous Consulting or client service delivery experience on Google Cloud Platform (GCP).Experience in and understanding of data and information management, especially in Big Data trends.Familiarity with the Technology stack available in the industry for data cataloging, data ingestion, capture, processing and curation: Kafka, StreamSets, Attunity, Collibra, Map Reduce, Hadoop, Spark, Flume, Hive, Impala, SparkSQL
Professional Skill Requirement
All of our professionals receive comprehensive training covering business acumen, technical and professional skills development. You'll also have opportunities to hone your functional skills and expertise in an area of specialization. We offer a variety of formal and informal training programs at every level to help you acquire and build specialized skills faster. Learning takes place both on the job and through formal training conducted online, in the classroom, or in collaboration with teammates. The sheer variety of work we do, and the experience it offers, provide an unbeatable platform from which to build a career.

Unless expressly indicated, this role is not open in the state of Colorado. As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $43,200 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",84.0
57,data+scientist,"Duration:3+Months
Responsibilities:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and at least five (5) years progressively experience in a data engineering role within a large and complex organization
Deep understanding of modern data warehousing and big data analytics technologies, including data management trends, statistical data analysis, data mining, machine learning, dashboards and scorecards, advanced visualization, process improvements, optimization and automation
Advanced level knowledge of relational, NoSQL, or New SQL database systems, and data modeling, structured and unstructured
Experience using and designing key data structures, algorithms and techniques relate to systems that support high volume, velocity, or variety datasets including apps that utilize machine learning and artificial intelligence
Understanding of parallel and distributed data processing techniques and platforms (MPI, Map/Reduce, Batch) and systems
Strong algorithm design and programming skills in Python, Scala, Kafka, Hive, JavaScript, JQuery, JSON, REST API, and other related coding languages
Requirements:
Deep understanding of modern data warehousing and big data analytics technologies
Cloud infrastructure tools (e.g. Azure Automation, Kubernetes, Docker, Ansible)
Ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges in an enterprise environment
Technical experience in business intelligence, data warehousing and analytics; including architecting data for modern cloud-based analytical solutions as well as working with data ingestion, data engineering, data provisioning, data visualization, data science teams
Strong interpersonal, oral and written communication and collaboration skills with all levels of management and the ability to motivate teams to apply skills and techniques to solve dynamic and complex problems
Strong analytical and interpretive skills to recognize and comprehend complex issues, policies, regulatory requirements and industry information affecting Schlumbergers environment
Ability to strategically assess and mitigate the impact on Schlumbergers vision when directing the implementation of new or changing policies and processes
Excellent customer service, leadership, communication, problem solving and decision-making skills
Strong knowledge and understanding of business needs and drivers with the ability to establish and maintain a high level of user trust and confidence through service provision
The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",85.0
58,data+scientist,"We are:
Applied Intelligence, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.
You are:
The data and statistics expert. You will bring your expertise and passion to tackle different analytics problems, living between known state of the art technologies/methodologies and production level solutions. And you’re all about helping clients turn data into information they can use.
The work:
Lead and manage a small team of data scientists
Deliver data science insights using statistical, data mining, and machine and deep learning
Facilitate the development of “request for proposals” responses and contract development
Understand client needs and create solutions for them
Provide thought leadership for projects and about leading technologies
Play an active role building a practice including capability development and innovation
Keep up-to-date on AI trends

Here’s what you need:
At least 5 years using statistics and data science
At least 3 years developing Machine Learning, regression, optimization, recommendation, and neural networks, among other techniques
At least 3 years working with data science tools like Python, R, Scala, Julia, or SAS
A Bachelor’s degree in data science and a related discipline like mathematics, statistics, computer science or physics
Bonus points if:
You have a Master’s degree in data science and related disciplines as data science, mathematics, statistics, operational research, computer science, physics, or related fields.
You have worked as a consultant on big data projects
Working knowledge of data querying (e.g. Spark SQL, SQL, Workbench, MS Access) and Ad-hoc Data Analysis, Reporting` Dashboard and Visualization (Tableau, Power BI, Qlikview)
You’re passionate, creative, and forward thinking
You have experience working with cloud services like AWS, Google, and Azure.
You know how to use big data tools like Hadoop, Hive, and Spark
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 -$185,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",88.0
59,data+scientist,"Duration: 6+Months
Responsibilities:
The MDM developer will be in charge of the technical development and integration of master data and the availability of the MDM application. This includes:
Integrate enhancements, bugfixes and features
Participate in the design solutions
Coordinate with business analysts to fulfil specifications
Prepare packages for release
Attend to team meetings
Participate to business meetings as technical resource. Give technical point of view on subjects.
Contact other teams to fulfil integration tests / solve issues
Requirements:
Technical skills in MDM (Tibco EBX / JavaEE)
Web technologies HTML / CSS / Javascript
Flexible Data Mindset (capacity to work on different projects during the same timeframe)
Team Spirit / Communication
Fluent English
Autonomous
Not afraid to learn new technologies and realize POCs
Ability to work a flexible schedule and be available during Houston (CST) morning hours.
Nice to Have:
Prior Experience Upgrading EBX
Industry Experience
Work experience: 5 to 7 years experience
Minimum education level: Bachelors Degree""
Delivery Skills: ""MDM (Tibco EBX / JavaEE)
Web technologies HTML / CSS / Javascript""
The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",89.0
60,data+scientist,"100% REMOTE Big Data Solutions Architect | Defense Systems | Winter Park, FL area (12-18 mos+ to perm)***MUST be a U.S. CITIZEN MUST be a U.S. CITIZEN to qualify for a possible security clearance***W-2 ONLY sorry, NO C2C, 1099, visa transfers, or sponsorship***Big Data Solutions Architect Hadoop MapReduce Hive Hbase MongoDB Cassandra Sqoop Spark Java Python Private Cloud AWS Azure Kafka GovCloud Data Systems Design Department of Defense Aerospace Avionics Federal Government C4ISR EW AF Naval Intelligence***REQUIREMENTS:MUST be a U.S. CITIZEN to qualify for a possible security clearanceMSCS/BSCS in Software or Computer Engineering (or related technical Engineering discipline).8 - 12 years of experience with enterprise Big Data Systems Architecture Design and software development (Java, Python, etc.).This role is NOT for operators of certain tools. This is a Big Data solutions architect position and requires the candidate to be able to design the solutions based on customers’ needsExpertise with major Big Data Solutions: Hadoop Stack, MapReduce, Hive, HBase, MongoDB, Cassandra, Sqoop, etc.3+ years’ experience with design and implementation of private cloud solutions utilizing industry standard stacks (GovCloud, AWS, Azure, GCP, OpenStack, etc.)Scope and design required IT infrastructure and work with Security to ensure the design of secure systems that meet the required classification levelsStrong technical proposal writing skillsIndustry expertise: DoD/Aerospace/Avionics/Federal Government in C4ISR, EW, AF, Naval, or Intelligence and how such domains can leverage enterprise and big data systemsOverall design and deployment of enterprise big data solutions that store, manage,Strong background in software development methodologies (SDLC, Agile/SCRUM methodologies) and the integration / interfacing with legacy systems***Big Data Solutions Architect Hadoop MapReduce Hive Hbase MongoDB Cassandra Sqoop Spark Java Python Private Cloud AWS Azure Kafka GovCloud Data Systems Design Department of Defense Aerospace Avionics Federal Government C4ISR EW AF Naval Intelligence***HIGHLY PREFERRED (but NOT required):Active Secret Clearance is highly desired (NOT required)Proficient with SparkAnalyze multiple sources of structured and unstructured data to propose and design data architecture solutions for scalability, high availability, fault tolerance, and elasticityFamiliarity with (AI) Artificial Intelligence and (ML) Machine Learning/Deep Learning/data science techniques and their application to the analysis of big data.Expertise in one or more of the following platforms is a plus: TensorFlow, Power BI, RapidMiner, KNIMEFamiliarity with Enterprise Architecture standards such as SOA, TOGAF or DODAF is a plusDisseminate various products such as imagery, video, streaming/messaging data (familiar with Kafka), and reportsKey Words: Big Data Solutions Architect Hadoop MapReduce Hive Hbase MongoDB Cassandra Sqoop Spark Java Python Private Cloud AWS Azure Kafka GovCloud Data Systems Design Department of Defense Aerospace Avionics Federal Government C4ISR EW AF Naval IntelligenceBob A. Russ, MBARegional Director of RecruitingM: 818.568.6948Entegeeentegee.comThis message is intended only for the designated recipient(s). It may contain confidential or proprietary information and may be subject to other contractual or confidentiality protection. If you are not a designated recipient, you may not review, copy or distribute this message. If you receive this message in error, please notify the sender by reply email and delete this message.Entegee, part of The Adecco Group North America headquartered at 10151 Deerwood Park Boulevard, Building 200, Suite 400, Jacksonville, Florida, 32256, is committed to data privacy compliance. To learn more about how we collect and process personal information, please read our General Privacy Policy located on the website above.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $65.00 - $80.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceReferral programRetirement planSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayCOVID-19 considerations:100% REMOTEApplication Question(s):Do you have a U.S. Citizenship to qualify for a security clearance?Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Big Data Architecture design: 8 years (Required)Hadoop Stack development (Java/Python): 8 years (Required)big data systems design, development, implementation: 8 years (Required)Private cloud (AWS, Azure, etc.): 3 years (Required)DoD, C4ISR, EW, AF, Naval: 2 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Secret (Preferred)Work Location:Fully Remote",90.0
61,data+scientist,"Role: DQ Tech Lead

Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.). Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 1000, and the Fortune 500 and we are among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world.


Please note, this role is not able to offer visa transfer or sponsorship now or in the future*

Practice - AIA - Artificial Intelligence and Analytics

About AI & Analytics: Artificial intelligence (AI) and the data it collects and analyzes will soon sit at the core of all intelligent, human-centric businesses. By decoding customer needs, preferences, and behaviors, our clients can understand exactly what services, products, and experiences their consumers need. Within AI & Analytics, we work to design the future—a future in which trial-and-error business decisions have been replaced by informed choices and data-supported strategies.

By applying AI and data science, we help leading companies to prototype, refine, validate, and scale their AI and analytics products and delivery models. Cognizant’s AIA practice takes insights that are buried in data, and provides businesses a clear way to transform how they source, interpret and consume their information. Our clients need flexible data structures and a streamlined data architecture that quickly turns data resources into informative, meaningful intelligence.

Responsibilities:

Create and manage a Data Quality Management framework for the organization.
Should have good understanding of Data profiling, Data discovery, Data Cleansing, Data Standardization process.
Should have good data analysis and SQL experience.
Facilitate the development and implementation of data quality standards.
Work closely with data owners, data users and data custodians (IT) to ensure the root cause of reported data issues is understood and underlying problems as well as associated symptoms are resolved.
Establish & maintain Data Quality Scorecards to pro-actively monitor and report on data quality across the group.
Identify, compare, and resolve data quality problems.
Evaluate large dataset for quality and accuracy.
Determine business impact level for data quality issues.
Design and Develop code to find and correct data quality errors.
Determine root cause for data quality errors and make recommendations for long-term solutions.
Research and determine scope and complexity of issue to identify steps to fix issue.
Develop process improvements to enhance overall data quality.
Develop and execute data cleanup measures.
Ensure adherence to data quality standards.
Resolve all internal data exceptions in timely and accurate manner.
Identify areas of improvement to achieve data quality.
Analyze, query, and manipulate data according to defined business rules and procedures.
Educate data stakeholders on key data concepts and the value of data quality process.

Qualifications:
1. Data Quality project experience

2. Have performed in a data analyst role

3. Used any one of the Data quality tools in the industry

Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment.

Cognizant is recognized as a Military Friendly Employer and is a coalition member of the Veteran Jobs Mission. Our Cognizant Veterans Network assists Veterans in building and growing a career at Cognizant that allows them to leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence instilled in them through participation in military service.

#LI-AV1 #CB

Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Jun 29 2021

About Cognizant Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @USJobsCognizant.

Cognizant is recognized as a Military Friendly Employer and is a coalition member of the Veteran Jobs Mission. Our Cognizant Veterans Network assists Veterans in building and growing a career at Cognizant that allows them to leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence instilled in them through participation in military service.
Cognizant is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you have a disability that requires a reasonable accommodation to search for a job opening or submit an application, please email CareersNA2@cognizant.com with your request and contact information.",91.0
62,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
A data expert with serious analytical and statistical chops. You know how to take massive amounts of data and find the insights our clients need to help their companies do more. You have a deep understanding of applied behavioral insights from fields including behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development. You take a data-driven approach to designing experiments and analyzing data, with an excellent ability to communicate results to a diverse stakeholder group.
The work:
Develop custom models based on in-depth understanding of underlying data, data structures, and business problems to ensure analytics deliverables meet client needs
Develop standard models, solutions and assets that can be used as accelerators for similar problems across clients
Define and assess the behaviors required to enable the success of a client’s data strategy and enable the adoption of data analytics tools and solutions
Define the challenges clients face in utilizing data and insights, while understanding and identifying explanations for the underlying patterns of behaviors that contribute and can be changed
Apply human-centered design principles to understand challenges, designing and prototyping behavior change initiatives
Lead the co-design and implementation of experiments focused on behavioral change, with the potential to scale and embed solutions and processes if successful
Design and test new experiences which trigger behavioral change in the context of work
Identify the emergence of new patterns of behavior within the organization over-time
Use your judgment to craft solutions to complex problems or seek guidance as needed
Report on your progress regularly in writing and face-to-face
Stay up-to-date on new products that clients could use
Work with peers and senior colleagues in Accenture and at client companies

Here’s what you need:
Minimum 5 years demonstrated experience in the application of analytics, behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development in sophisticated and complex environments including the use of simulation and modeling tools
Minimum 2 years experiences in identifying key business use cases and developing solutions/assets to drive quick pilot/implementation
Minimum 3 years experience leading teams and performing data analytics and modeling with advanced languages like Python
Bachelor's Degree (advanced degree preferred) or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
Bonus points if:
You can technically lead data science projects
You have client-facing experience and working with C-level executives
You have experience with cloud platforms / services, big data tools, and deploying analytics as a service
You have a graduate degree
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",95.0
63,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.
The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.
Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.
Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page
You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.
The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease expert

Basic Qualifications
At least 3 years of Consulting or client service delivery experience on Amazon AWS (AWS)At least 3 years of experience working on data driven projects including data ingestion, data processing, data curation and data warehousingMinimum of 3 years of hands-on experience in AWS and Big Data technologies such as S3, Lambda, CloudFormation, LakeFormation, DMS, Kinesis, Kafka, Redshift, RDS, Aurora, Neptune, DynamoDB, ECS, Glue, SageMaker, API GW, Spark/SparkSQL, Hive/MR, Pig, Oozie, etc.3+ years of hands-on experience in programming languages such as Java, C#, Node.js, Python, PySpark, Spark, SQL, Unix shell/Perl scripting etc.Experience working with DevOps tools such as Git, Jenkins, CodeBuild, CodePipeline, CodeDeploy, etc.
Certifications
Certified AWS Developer – AssociateCertified AWS Solutions Architect – Professional (Nice to have)Certified AWS DevOps – Professional (Nice to have)Certified AWS Big Data Specialty (Nice to have)
Nice-to-Have Skills/Qualifications:
Bachelors or higher degree in Computer Science or a related discipline.DevOps experience with AWS. Multi-cloud experience a plus.Experience developing and deploying ETL solutions on AWS using tools like Talend, Informatica, MatillionExperience in using Hadoop File Formats and compression techniquesIoT, event-driven, microservices, containers/Kubernetes in the cloud
Unless expressly indicated, this role is not open in the state of Colorado. As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $83,200 - $134,999 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",96.0
64,data+scientist,"The Data Science & AI group in Personal System Software is responsible for delivering a broad range of software capabilities, including generating actionable insights from business data, increasing operational efficiency with automation, and building breakthrough experiences for HP products and services.
We have an exciting opportunity for a Machine Learning Engineer to collaborate with our Software Engineers and product teams to solve difficult technical problems and develop new machine learning capabilities that will impact upcoming HP products.
If you have deep technical skills, are intensely curious, and like to attack the hardest and the most challenging problems, want to make a difference in the lives of others, and want to work in a highly supportive environment, then we invite you to apply to join our team.
In this highly visible role, you will:
Work in all phases of building, deploying, and evaluating machine learning applications
Lay the foundation for new products and services by developing new technical solutions to difficult problems.
Work in a cross-functional team environment.
Communicate your results internally within Personal System software.
Some of our areas of interest include:
(1) Segmentation, Recommendation systems, including content customization and customer engagement improvement
(2) Predictive Analytics, including failure prediction, time-series forecasting, anomaly detection, and root cause analysis
(3) Natural Language Processing, including sentiment analysis, text summarization, and conversational interfaces
(4) MLOps, along with integration with software development lifecycles and continuous integration/continuous delivery
Responsibilities:
Mines data using modern tools and programming languages.
Defines and implements models to uncover patterns and predictions creating business value and innovation.
Works with the business to understand the business domain perspective.
Effectively tells stories with the data using visualization tools/methods to demonstrate insight impact and business value.
Assures accuracy, integrity, and compliance of cleansed data.
Maintains proficiency within the data science domain by keeping up with technology and trend shifts.
Leads a project team of data science professionals, assuring insights are communicated regularly and effectively, reviewing designs, models, accuracy and data compliance.
Collaborates and communicates with the project team regarding project progress and issue resolution.
Represents the data science team for all phases of larger and more-complex development projects.
Provides guidance, training, and mentoring to less experienced staff members.
Knowledge & Skills :
Extensive experience using statistics, mathematics, algorithms, and programming languages.
Possess a background in linear algebra, statistics, or multivariate calculus.
Strong understanding of classical ML techniques and time-series forecasting.
Understands data management principles along with model evaluation and training techniques for neural networks.
Proficient in Python, Spark and one or more programming languages such as Golang, Java, or Scala
In-depth knowledge of clustering, segmentation techniques and cluster-based recommendation
Experience in building, deploying, and evaluating machine learning applications
Enjoys working in a geographically distributed environment
Ability to create models to pull valuable insights from data.
Create stories and visualizations to describe and communicate data insights.
Ability to use creativity to spot trends and tease out patterns in large datasets.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Experience in one or more deep learning frameworks such as Tensorflow/Keras, or PyTorch.
History of contributions to open source projects such as projects hosted on GitHub, SourceForge, or OSDN is a plus
Prior participation in data science competitions such as Kaggle, DrivenData, or CodaLab is a plus
Scope & Impact :
Collaborates with peers, junior engineers, data scientists, and project team.
Typically interacts with high-level Individual Contributors, Managers, and Program Teams.
Leads a project requiring data engineering solutions development.
Education & Experience :
Master's or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Economics, Physics, or equivalent.
Typically 6+ years’ experience.
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",102.0
65,data+scientist,"The Marine Data Engineer analyzes time-series and unstructured data to help with data-driven decision-making powered by My Digital Fleet. This role uses knowledge of maritime data and applies analytics to solve real-world problems for our customers. The Data Engineer will work with customers and/or internal stakeholders to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop, and integrate applications.
Job Duties/Roles
Utilize your knowledge of modern data driven methods and domain understanding to support the creation of new products, services and insights using predictive models
You have a demonstratable ability to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality improvement
Are comfortable in machine learning, artificial intelligence, classification, regression, nlp, etc.
Use your experience and are hands-on in Python, Database Systems (such as SQL) and Azure cloud tools to contribute towards solving data analytics problems
You are ‘Database-Centric’ and perform data wrangling and processing from multiple databases (structured or un-structured data) with a keen eye for data quality all along
You think in a ‘Pipeline-Centric’ manner and are comfortable with using DevOps Repo and can build, manage and optimize data pipelines and deploy these pipelines into production
Collaborate with customers and internal stakeholders such as engineers, product managers, and data scientists to understand data needs, identify data quality issues and represent key data insights.
You will design, build, and launch data models and visualizations that support multiple use cases across different products.
Solve data integration problems, utilizing optimal ETL patterns, frameworks, query techniques, sourcing from structured and unstructured data sources.
Optimize pipelines, dashboards, and frameworks to facilitate more efficient development of data artifacts.
Utilize knowledge of data driven methods and maritime domain understanding to support the creation of new products, services and insights.
Write independent source code, validate, and test for model quality improvement.
You have exposure in developing and used tools like Python libraries and visualization
Be able to think independently and work as part of a cross-functional team to achieve common goals
Comfortable working independently on data modelling/engineering tasks and are eager to learn
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies

Qualifications
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Experience analyzing maritime operational data.
Experience in using Machine Learning, Ai and other data science technologies
Strong and demonstrable experience with programming languages such as Python (used numpy, pandas, etc.)
Strong knowledge of data architectures and systems – SQL and others for ETL purposes
Strong knowledge of DevOps, in particular, using the Repo and pushing and pulling source code with versioning
Ability to work with MS Azure cloud tools
Intermediate C# and Power Shell scripting skills
Good skills in using Web APIs and XML
Experienced in using tools such as MS Power BI, Tableau or other visualization tools is a big plus
Knowledge of object-oriented programming and building RestFul APIs for data science modelling is a plus
Display an entrepreneurial mind set and think practical, ‘out of box’ solutions
Ability to work efficiently and deliver timely in a fast-paced environment
Minimum years of Experience
Minimum 3-4 years of relevant experience in data analyst as a data engineer in the maritime domain
Required/Preferred Education Requirements
 BS degree required; MS preferred in Data Engineering, Data Science Computer Science, Naval Architecture or Marine Engineering.
Required/Preferred Professional Requirements
None
Country Requirements
None
Reporting Relationships
 Reports directly to the Chief Data Scientist
Direct Reports
 May have individual contributor direct reports.
Disclaimer Clause
This job description is not intended, and should not be construed, to be an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, skills, efforts or working conditions associated with the job of the incumbent. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the principal job elements essential for making a fair decision regarding the pay structure of the job.
Working Conditions
Work is primarily sedentary; exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally and/or a negligible amount of force frequently or constantly to lift, carry, push, pull or otherwise move object
FLSA Status
 Exempt
#L1-AHV
The American Bureau of Shipping is committed to the equal employment opportunity of its employees and prohibits discrimination against any employee or qualified applicant on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship status or veteran status, or other non-work-related characteristics that may be protected under the law of the Federal Government or specific state employment laws.",103.0
66,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

What you need:
Minimum of 10+ years of experience in ability to relate and connect complex business issues and articulate solution using curated and/or raw data
Minimum of 10+ years of experience with Data warehousing methodologies and modelling techniquesMinimum of 3 years of - In-depth understanding of the Snowflake architecture, and differentiation. Need to have the understanding and the know how in using features such as Zero Copy Clone, Time Travel, User defined functions, etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in Managing security in Snowflake. This includes creation of custom Roles to control access to Data, Databases, Warehouses etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in designing Compute Clusters (Warehouse) in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Snowpipe for handling Streaming dataMinimum of 5 years of experience in Migration, methods to cloud data solutionsMinimum of 2 years of experience in handling semi-structured data (JSON, XML) using the VARIANT attribute in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Re-clustering of the data in Snowflake with good understanding on how Micro-Partition works inside SnowflakeMinimum of 5 years of experience in creating master data datasets. Experience with a MDM tool is preferredMinimum of 8 years of experience in working with Batch and Stream dataExpert in SQLMinimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in Cloud technologies such as
o AWS - S3, Glacier, EC2, Lambda, SQS, Redshift
o Azure - Blob Storage, Cool Blob Storage, Virtual Machine, Functions, SQL Datawarehouse
o GCP - Cloud Storage, Coldline Cloud Storage, Compute Engine, Cloud Functions, Big Query
Minimum of 5 years of experience with ELT concepts with design experience of architecting data flows into a Massively Parallel Processing (MPP) Analytical DatastoresMinimum of 5 years of experience with ETL tools such as Informatica, Talend, MatillionExperience in Hadoop, Hive, HBASE, Spark is a plus

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $207,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",104.0
67,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
A data expert with serious analytical and statistical chops. As a Manager with Accenture you will lead and grow a business leveraging and growing a data science team working with diverse clients and industries. You know how to take massive amounts of data and find the insights our clients need to help their companies do more. You have a deep understanding of applied behavioral insights from fields including behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development. You take a data-driven approach to designing experiments and analyzing data, with an excellent ability to communicate results to a diverse stakeholder group.
The work:
Lead and grow a data science business across our North American market
Develop custom models based on in-depth understanding of underlying data, data structures, and business problems to ensure analytics deliverables meet client needs
Develop standard models, solutions and assets that can be used as accelerators for similar problems across clients
Define and assess the behaviors required to enable the success of a client’s data strategy and enable the adoption of data analytics tools and solutions
Define the challenges clients face in utilizing data and insights, while understanding and identifying explanations for the underlying patterns of behaviors that contribute and can be changed
Apply human-centered design principles to understand challenges, designing and prototyping behavior change initiatives
Lead the co-design and implementation of experiments focused on behavioral change, with the potential to scale and embed solutions and processes if successful
Design and test new experiences which trigger behavioral change in the context of work
Identify the emergence of new patterns of behavior within the organization over-time
Use your judgment to craft solutions to complex problems or seek guidance as needed
Report on your progress regularly in writing and face-to-face
Stay up to date on new products that clients could use
Work with peers and senior colleagues in Accenture and at client companies

Here’s what you need:
At least 7 years of demonstrated experience in the application of analytics, behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development in sophisticated and complex environments including the use of simulation and modeling tools
At least 7 years of experiences in identifying key business use cases and developing solutions/assets to drive quick pilot/implementation
At least 5 years of leading teams and performing data analytics and modeling with advanced languages like Python
Bachelor's Degree (advanced degree preferred) or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
Bonus points if:
You can technically lead data science projects
You have client-facing experience and working with C-level executives
You have experience with cloud platforms / services, big data tools, and deploying analytics as a service
You have a graduate degree
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $141,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",105.0
68,data+scientist,"Who We Are
A leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most and offers huge growth opportunities for you!
Our Cloud First group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities across data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with a deep industry expertise to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. To accelerate our customers transformation leveraging cloud, we combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
We are excited about the opportunities in the Cloud – and hope you are too! Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page
The Work
Design cloud architectures to migrate on-prem data warehouses/marts to AWSConduct full technical discovery, identifying pain points, business, and technical requirements, “as is” and “to be” scenariosDevelop and prioritize use cases as it relates to Clients’ data migration Journey to AWSProvide prescriptive guidance across network, storage, Big Data, serverless architectures, Hadoop ecosystem, vendor products, RDBMS & NoSQL databases, and securityManage small teams of delivery engineers successfully delivering work efforts

What you need
Certification as an active AWS cloud Solution Architect.At least 5 years of designing, building and operationalizing large-scale enterprise data solutions using one or more third-party resources such as Pyspark, Talend, Matellion, Informatica or native utilities as EC2, S3, DMS, Kinesis, Kafka Redshift, RDS, Aurora, Lambda, Spark, Glue etc.Minimum 5 years of experience with databases as Teradata, Snowflake, Oracle, Netezza etc.Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience, or an Associate degree with a minimum of 6 years of equivalent work experience.
Bonus points if you have
Implementing DevOps on AWS platformExperience in data governance fields as lineage, quality, catalog etc.Multi-cloud experience
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: All Accenture business travel is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only. The safety and well-being of our people continues to be our top priority, and Accenture’s decisions around business travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $207,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",106.0
69,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualifications
- At least 3- 5 years of Consulting or client service delivery experience on Amazon AWS (AWS)
- At least 3- 5 years of experience in developing data ingestion, data processing and analytical pipelines for big data, relational databases, NoSQL and data warehouse solutions
Extensive experience providing practical direction within the AWS Native and HadoopExperience with private and public cloud architectures, pros/cons, and migration considerations.Minimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in AWS and Big Data technologies such as Java, Node.js, C##, Python, SQL, EC2, S3, Lambda, Spark/SparkSQL, Hive/MR, Pig, Oozie and streaming technologies such as Kafka, Kinesis, NiFI etc.3-5+ years of hands on experience in programming languages such as Java, c#, node.js, python, pyspark, spark, SQL, Unix shell/Perl scripting etc.Experience working with DevOps tools such as GitLabs, Jenkins, CodeBuild, CoePipeline CodeDeploy, etc.Bachelors or higher degree in Computer Science or a related discipline.
Must have at least one AWS Certification
§ Certified AWS Developer - Associate
§ Certified AWS DevOps – Professional
§ Certified AWS Big Data Specialty

Nice-to-Have Skills/Qualifications:
DevOps on an AWS platform. Multi-cloud experience a plus.Experience developing and deploying ETL solutions on AWS using tools like Talend, Informatica, MatillionStrong in Java, C##, Spark, PySpark, Unix shell/Perl scriptingIoT, event-driven, microservices, containers/Kubernetes in the cloud

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $43,200 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",108.0
70,data+scientist,"Applications Consultant 2 - SAP Advanced Analytics Developer (AI/ML)052915

SAP Advanced Analytics Developer (AI/ML)
8+ years of overall experience and at least 3 years with various AI/ML concepts in SAP Technology is essential
Must have hands-on experience in various analytics tools (both SAP and non SAP preferred such as - SAC Analytics Cloud, Tableau, Power BI etc.) and advanced analytics such as predictive analytics
Solid knowledge of advanced statistical concepts is essential
Experience in Python/SQL/R is essential
Experience in working on SAP Cloud Platform/SAP Business Technology Platform is essential
Must have experience working with SAP data
Ability to mine data using state-of-the-art methods and present to the IT and business stakeholders in a meaningful way
Experienced working closely with client technical leads, business leads, and business analysts to understand and document business and technical requirements and constraints
Strong problem-solving skills with a Product development mindset is necessary
Ability to work on multiple tasks/opportunities concurrently in an onshore-offshore model is required

Capgemini's SAP-Insights & Data CoE is focused on bringing excellence in our solution engineering, bringing innovative solutions, supporting the global go-to-market team, and help us keeping relevance within and in front of customer challenges. This global team works closely with internal and external partners, global service lines, and market units while bringing innovation and thought leadership. We are looking for smart, solution innovators for this team in North America, Mexico, Europe, and India.
The group focuses on 5 key product lines - Data Modernization & Monetization, Platform Modernization & Cloud Computing, Enterprise & Strategic performance management, Analytics, and AI-Innovation. You will be providing excellence in solution development, offerings incubation, provide an edge in sales and partner alliance process, and establish commanding respect in the market while remaining the catalyst for innovation.

Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Applicants for employment in the US must have valid work authorization that does not now and/or will not in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the US by Capgemini.
Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.

This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.


Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
About Capgemini

Capgemini is a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services. The Group is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year+ heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company of 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of €17billion.
Visit us at www.capgemini.com. People matter, results count.

Job Programmer/Analyst
Schedule Full-time
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Organization I&D",109.0
71,data+scientist,"Senior Applications Consultant - SAP Artificial Intelligence, RPA, Programming052919

SAP Artificial Intelligence, RPA, Programming
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Applicants for employment in the US must have valid work authorization that does not now and/or will not in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the US by Capgemini.
Applications Consultants have expertise in a specific technology environment. They are responsible for software-specific design and realization, as well as testing, deployment and release management, or technical and functional application management of client-specific package based solutions (e.g. SAP, ORACLE). These roles also require functional and methodological capabilities in testing and training.

Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.

This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.

Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
About Capgemini

Capgemini is a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services. The Group is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year+ heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company of 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of €17billion.
Visit us at www.capgemini.com. People matter, results count.

Job Developer
Schedule Full-time
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Organization I&D",110.0
72,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

What you need:
Minimum of 10+ years of experience in ability to relate and connect complex business issues and articulate solution using curated and/or raw data
Minimum of 10+ years of experience with Data warehousing methodologies and modelling techniquesMinimum of 3 years of - In-depth understanding of the Snowflake architecture, and differentiation. Need to have the understanding and the know how in using features such as Zero Copy Clone, Time Travel, User defined functions, etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in Managing security in Snowflake. This includes creation of custom Roles to control access to Data, Databases, Warehouses etcMinimum of 3 years of experience in designing Compute Clusters (Warehouse) in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Snowpipe for handling Streaming dataMinimum of 5 years of experience in Migration, methods to cloud data solutionsMinimum of 2 years of experience in handling semi-structured data (JSON, XML) using the VARIANT attribute in SnowflakeMinimum of 2 years of experience in Re-clustering of the data in Snowflake with good understanding on how Micro-Partition works inside SnowflakeMinimum of 5 years of experience in creating master data datasets. Experience with a MDM tool is preferredMinimum of 8 years of experience in working with Batch and Stream dataExpert in SQLMinimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in Cloud technologies such as
o AWS - S3, Glacier, EC2, Lambda, SQS, Redshift
o Azure - Blob Storage, Cool Blob Storage, Virtual Machine, Functions, SQL Datawarehouse
o GCP - Cloud Storage, Coldline Cloud Storage, Compute Engine, Cloud Functions, Big Query
Minimum of 5 years of experience with ELT concepts with design experience of architecting data flows into a Massively Parallel Processing (MPP) Analytical DatastoresMinimum of 5 years of experience with ETL tools such as Informatica, Talend, MatillionExperience in Hadoop, Hive, HBASE, Spark is a plus

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $207,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",114.0
73,data+scientist,"Company:
US6469 Sysco Payroll, Division of Sysco Resources Services, LLC
Zip Code:
77077
Minimum Level of Education:
Bachelor’s Degree
Minimum Years of Experience:
3 Years
Employment Type:
Full Time
Travel Percentage:
0
Job Summary:
This role will be responsible for price management of $1-2B revenue product portfolio. This role will provide analytical thought leadership to develop pricing strategy recommendations, work cross-functionally to gather required inputs to support price setting decisions, and own performance analytics and insights to drive profitability improvements. This role will require ability to synthesize and communicate results, recommend a course of actions, as well as implement the solutions.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Perform weekly pricing review and determine recommended pricing overrides for managed product portfolio
Identify pricing lever changes and analyze impacts to profitability, volume forecast, and customer basket
Work with cross-functional team to collect inputs and design requirements to problem solve or develop pricing recommendations
Conduct performance analytics and generate insights to identify improvement opportunities
Ensure data integrity and configuration accuracy in pricing system
Education Required:
Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Economics, Statistics, engineering or another analytical field of study
Experience Required:
3-5 years of analytical experience with knowledge in SQL
Experience Preferred:
Experience in price modeling and model configurations
Experience with scientific scripting language (e.g. R), python and statistical methods
Advanced SQL skills
Technical Skills and Abilities:
Expert in Microsoft Excel
Python proficiency- being able to read, understand and develop models, and experience with experimental design a plus
Demonstrates strong communications skills in describing complex analytics and models to non-technical audience
Ability to take a business question or problem and develop structured data analytics to answer or solve problem with minimum instructions
Able to perform quantitative analysis of large data sets using appropriate analytical tools while navigating multiple, complex data environments
Possesses a strong general business acumen
Demonstrates strong communication skills
Ability to participate in multiple workstreams/projects in a fast-paced environment, adapting to shifting priorities and meeting deadlines
Collaborative team player who can synthesize feedback and direction from multiple stakeholders
Expert in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
Candidates hired in positions eligible for Sysco Benefits who start work in the months of May and June 2021 may be eligible for medical and prescriptions drug plan coverage. Effective on their date of hire*. This special medical and presanction drug plan eligibility period supersedes the standard benefits information on below regarding Sysco’s benefits eligibility period. Standard eligibility rules (below) still apply to all other Sysco Benefits. *exclusions/exceptions may apply.
Physical Demands:
Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit, stand, walk and use hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and telephone to talk and hear.
Travel Requirements:
0%
Work Environment:
Corporate office
BENEFITS INFORMATION:
Candidates who start work in the months of May and June 2021 may be eligible for medical and prescription drug plan coverage effective on their date of hire*. Standard eligibility rules and timelines apply to all other Sysco benefits, including additional healthcare benefits options, retirement benefits, vacation, and paid sick leave. Please visit https://syscobenefits.com/careers to view additional benefits information. *Exceptions/exclusions may apply
HOW WE PROTECT OUR ASSOCIATES
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Personal protective equipment and masks provided
Temperature screenings
Social distancing guidelines in place
Sanitizing, disinfecting, and cleaning procedures in place
OVERVIEW:
Sysco is the global leader in foodservice distribution. With over 57,000 associates and a fleet of over 13,000 vehicles, Sysco operates approximately 326 distribution facilities worldwide and serves more than 625,000 customer locations.
We offer our associates the opportunity to grow personally and professionally, to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization, and to serve others in a manner that exceeds their expectations. We’re looking for talented, hard-working individuals to join our team. Come grow with us and let us show you why Sysco is at the heart of food and service.
AFFIRMATIVE ACTION STATEMENT:
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States.
We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer, and consider qualified applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status or any other protected factor under federal, state or local law.
This opportunity is available through Sysco Corporation, its subsidiaries and affiliates.",115.0
74,data+scientist,"Ayata is developing its Prescriptive Analytics® software by integrating the latest Artificial Intelligence (AI) and related technologies. We are looking for people with multi-disciplinary skills, especially in software design and artificial intelligence, who can write solid clean code and who are excited about applying those skills to build industrial strength software. You will be part of a multi-disciplinary team working to design, develop and implement our unique software. Your contributions will directly impact the success of the company.
Job Responsibilities and Duties
Ayata is looking for AI Scientist who will develop AI techniques for business applications in various industries and build cloud-based AI software for predictive analytics business solutions.
Responsibilities:
AI technique development, providing methodology, strategy, ideas, architect, and solutions for real-word, industrial-scale and mission-critical business operations
Build and integrate AI technique components into a full-functioning AI business software
Interact with business clients, understand business requirements, propose AI software solutions to meet the business requirements, deliver and present AI software to clients
Understand the data set used for the modeling, prepare and preprocess data sets, train and test models and perform model feature engineering
Document data dictionary, data understanding, modeling strategy and approaches, and build company’s knowledge base of data and models
Communicate effectively with team members, management, and clients
Requirements
Ph.D. degree in computer science, or mathematics/statistics/physics or engineering
1-5 years of experience in machine learning/AI technology and software development
Natural Language Processing (NLP) Information retrieval and information extraction
Digital Image Processing experience including OpenCV, OCR experience to convert images to text
Excellent hands-on code development skills in Python
Proven ability as a quick learner
Additional Qualifications
Expertise in ETL is a plus (Spark, Hadoop, SQL) in big data environments
Front-end software development experience is a plus
The candidate must be able to work out of the Houston Texas office
Relocation reimbursement is available for the right candidate
You must have a PHD to be considered for this position.
Benefits
Compensation package (base salary + performance bonus + stock options) commensurate with experience.
Industry (tech/software industry) standard benefits package - medical, dental, vision, 401(k) plan, work-from-home (if applicable), flexible holidays, and more.",116.0
75,data+scientist,"The Marine Data Engineer analyzes time-series and unstructured data to help with data-driven decision-making powered by My Digital Fleet. This role uses knowledge of maritime data and applies analytics to solve real-world problems for our customers. The Data Engineer will work with customers and/or internal stakeholders to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop, and integrate applications.
Job Duties/Roles
Utilize your knowledge of modern data driven methods and domain understanding to support the creation of new products, services and insights using predictive models
You have a demonstratable ability to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality improvement
Are comfortable in machine learning, artificial intelligence, classification, regression, nlp, etc.
Use your experience and are hands-on in Python, Database Systems (such as SQL) and Azure cloud tools to contribute towards solving data analytics problems
You are ‘Database-Centric’ and perform data wrangling and processing from multiple databases (structured or un-structured data) with a keen eye for data quality all along
You think in a ‘Pipeline-Centric’ manner and are comfortable with using DevOps Repo and can build, manage and optimize data pipelines and deploy these pipelines into production
Collaborate with customers and internal stakeholders such as engineers, product managers, and data scientists to understand data needs, identify data quality issues and represent key data insights.
You will design, build, and launch data models and visualizations that support multiple use cases across different products.
Solve data integration problems, utilizing optimal ETL patterns, frameworks, query techniques, sourcing from structured and unstructured data sources.
Optimize pipelines, dashboards, and frameworks to facilitate more efficient development of data artifacts.
Utilize knowledge of data driven methods and maritime domain understanding to support the creation of new products, services and insights.
Write independent source code, validate, and test for model quality improvement.
You have exposure in developing and used tools like Python libraries and visualization
Be able to think independently and work as part of a cross-functional team to achieve common goals
Comfortable working independently on data modelling/engineering tasks and are eager to learn
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies

Qualifications
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Experience analyzing maritime operational data.
Experience in using Machine Learning, Ai and other data science technologies
Strong and demonstrable experience with programming languages such as Python (used numpy, pandas, etc.)
Strong knowledge of data architectures and systems – SQL and others for ETL purposes
Strong knowledge of DevOps, in particular, using the Repo and pushing and pulling source code with versioning
Ability to work with MS Azure cloud tools
Intermediate C# and Power Shell scripting skills
Good skills in using Web APIs and XML
Experienced in using tools such as MS Power BI, Tableau or other visualization tools is a big plus
Knowledge of object-oriented programming and building RestFul APIs for data science modelling is a plus
Display an entrepreneurial mind set and think practical, ‘out of box’ solutions
Ability to work efficiently and deliver timely in a fast-paced environment
Minimum years of Experience
Minimum 3-4 years of relevant experience in data analyst as a data engineer in the maritime domain
Required/Preferred Education Requirements
 BS degree required; MS preferred in Data Engineering, Data Science Computer Science, Naval Architecture or Marine Engineering.
Required/Preferred Professional Requirements
None
Country Requirements
None
Reporting Relationships
 Reports directly to the Chief Data Scientist
Direct Reports
 May have individual contributor direct reports.
Disclaimer Clause
This job description is not intended, and should not be construed, to be an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, skills, efforts or working conditions associated with the job of the incumbent. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the principal job elements essential for making a fair decision regarding the pay structure of the job.
Working Conditions
Work is primarily sedentary; exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally and/or a negligible amount of force frequently or constantly to lift, carry, push, pull or otherwise move object
FLSA Status
 Exempt
#L1-AHV
The American Bureau of Shipping is committed to the equal employment opportunity of its employees and prohibits discrimination against any employee or qualified applicant on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship status or veteran status, or other non-work-related characteristics that may be protected under the law of the Federal Government or specific state employment laws.",117.0
76,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
A data expert with serious analytical and statistical chops. As a Manager with Accenture you will lead and grow a business leveraging and growing a data science team working with diverse clients and industries. You know how to take massive amounts of data and find the insights our clients need to help their companies do more. You have a deep understanding of applied behavioral insights from fields including behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development. You take a data-driven approach to designing experiments and analyzing data, with an excellent ability to communicate results to a diverse stakeholder group.
The work:
Lead and grow a data science business across our North American market
Develop custom models based on in-depth understanding of underlying data, data structures, and business problems to ensure analytics deliverables meet client needs
Develop standard models, solutions and assets that can be used as accelerators for similar problems across clients
Define and assess the behaviors required to enable the success of a client’s data strategy and enable the adoption of data analytics tools and solutions
Define the challenges clients face in utilizing data and insights, while understanding and identifying explanations for the underlying patterns of behaviors that contribute and can be changed
Apply human-centered design principles to understand challenges, designing and prototyping behavior change initiatives
Lead the co-design and implementation of experiments focused on behavioral change, with the potential to scale and embed solutions and processes if successful
Design and test new experiences which trigger behavioral change in the context of work
Identify the emergence of new patterns of behavior within the organization over-time
Use your judgment to craft solutions to complex problems or seek guidance as needed
Report on your progress regularly in writing and face-to-face
Stay up to date on new products that clients could use
Work with peers and senior colleagues in Accenture and at client companies

Here’s what you need:
At least 7 years of demonstrated experience in the application of analytics, behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development in sophisticated and complex environments including the use of simulation and modeling tools
At least 7 years of experiences in identifying key business use cases and developing solutions/assets to drive quick pilot/implementation
At least 5 years of leading teams and performing data analytics and modeling with advanced languages like Python
Bachelor's Degree (advanced degree preferred) or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
Bonus points if:
You can technically lead data science projects
You have client-facing experience and working with C-level executives
You have experience with cloud platforms / services, big data tools, and deploying analytics as a service
You have a graduate degree
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $141,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",118.0
77,data+scientist,"Applications Consultant 2 - SAP Advanced Analytics Developer (AI/ML)052915

SAP Advanced Analytics Developer (AI/ML)
8+ years of overall experience and at least 3 years with various AI/ML concepts in SAP Technology is essential
Must have hands-on experience in various analytics tools (both SAP and non SAP preferred such as - SAC Analytics Cloud, Tableau, Power BI etc.) and advanced analytics such as predictive analytics
Solid knowledge of advanced statistical concepts is essential
Experience in Python/SQL/R is essential
Experience in working on SAP Cloud Platform/SAP Business Technology Platform is essential
Must have experience working with SAP data
Ability to mine data using state-of-the-art methods and present to the IT and business stakeholders in a meaningful way
Experienced working closely with client technical leads, business leads, and business analysts to understand and document business and technical requirements and constraints
Strong problem-solving skills with a Product development mindset is necessary
Ability to work on multiple tasks/opportunities concurrently in an onshore-offshore model is required

Capgemini's SAP-Insights & Data CoE is focused on bringing excellence in our solution engineering, bringing innovative solutions, supporting the global go-to-market team, and help us keeping relevance within and in front of customer challenges. This global team works closely with internal and external partners, global service lines, and market units while bringing innovation and thought leadership. We are looking for smart, solution innovators for this team in North America, Mexico, Europe, and India.
The group focuses on 5 key product lines - Data Modernization & Monetization, Platform Modernization & Cloud Computing, Enterprise & Strategic performance management, Analytics, and AI-Innovation. You will be providing excellence in solution development, offerings incubation, provide an edge in sales and partner alliance process, and establish commanding respect in the market while remaining the catalyst for innovation.

Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Applicants for employment in the US must have valid work authorization that does not now and/or will not in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the US by Capgemini.
Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.

This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.


Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
About Capgemini

Capgemini is a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services. The Group is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year+ heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company of 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of €17billion.
Visit us at www.capgemini.com. People matter, results count.

Job Programmer/Analyst
Schedule Full-time
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Organization I&D",119.0
78,data+scientist,"We are a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most. Our Cloud First multi-service group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities like data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with pre-configured industry solutions to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. We combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.

Are you ready to step up to the New and take your technology expertise to the next level
Accenture is looking for passionate and customer obsessed AWS cloud full stack developers to join our AWS Practice. You will help drive innovation, build differentiated solutions, and define new customer experiences for our customers (and customers, customers). You’ll work with smart people across our industry specialist organizations, and technology groups to help our customers get the most out of AWS in their cloud journey.

The AWS Practice within is home to our deepest AWS experts and supports Accenture’s more than 1,500 certified AWS architects across the company. Join our team and be among Accenture’s most talented AWS practitioners, our AWS SWAT team. The group is responsible for Accenture’s most complex AWS projects and provides our delivery capability for the Accenture AWS Business Group (AABG). AABG is the deepest relationship Amazon Web Services has with any partner in the ecosystem. Choosing Accenture and the AWS Practice will take your AWS experience and skills to the next level and allow you to work in an innovative and collaborative environment. At Accenture, you can lead the world’s largest enterprises on the path to native cloud transformation and serverless, on the leading edge of cloud.

Join Accenture and help transform leading organizations and communities around the world. The sheer scale of our capabilities and client engagements and the way we collaborate, operate and deliver value provides an unparalleled opportunity to grow and advance. Choose Accenture and make delivering innovative work part of your extraordinary career.

Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page

You are:
A motivated, inquisitive developer. You enjoy using your development skills to deliver innovative solutions that help our clients improve the services they provide. Driven by curiosity, you explore how new technologies can be applied to solve challenging business problems. You thrive in a collaborative, creative and productive team environment where ideas are freely exchanged, and innovative concepts evolve into practical solutions.

The work:
Design and Implement AWS architectures and environments
Design Native Cloud Application Architectures or optimize applications for AWS
Collaborating within a project team to solve complex problems

Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Basic Qualifications
- At least 3- 5 years of Consulting or client service delivery experience on Amazon AWS (AWS)
- At least 3- 5 years of experience in developing data ingestion, data processing and analytical pipelines for big data, relational databases, NoSQL and data warehouse solutions
Extensive experience providing practical direction within the AWS Native and HadoopExperience with private and public cloud architectures, pros/cons, and migration considerations.Minimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in AWS and Big Data technologies such as Java, Node.js, C##, Python, SQL, EC2, S3, Lambda, Spark/SparkSQL, Hive/MR, Pig, Oozie and streaming technologies such as Kafka, Kinesis, NiFI etc.3-5+ years of hands on experience in programming languages such as Java, c#, node.js, python, pyspark, spark, SQL, Unix shell/Perl scripting etc.Experience working with DevOps tools such as GitLabs, Jenkins, CodeBuild, CoePipeline CodeDeploy, etc.Bachelors or higher degree in Computer Science or a related discipline.
Must have at least one AWS Certification
§ Certified AWS Developer - Associate
§ Certified AWS DevOps – Professional
§ Certified AWS Big Data Specialty

Nice-to-Have Skills/Qualifications:
DevOps on an AWS platform. Multi-cloud experience a plus.Experience developing and deploying ETL solutions on AWS using tools like Talend, Informatica, MatillionStrong in Java, C##, Spark, PySpark, Unix shell/Perl scriptingIoT, event-driven, microservices, containers/Kubernetes in the cloud

As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $43,200 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",121.0
79,data+scientist,"Who We Are
A leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. The formation of Accenture Cloud First, with a $3 billion investment over three years, demonstrates our commitment to deliver greater value to our clients when they need it most and offers huge growth opportunities for you!
Our Cloud First group of more than 70,000 cloud professionals delivers a full stack of integrated cloud capabilities across data, edge, integrated infrastructure and applications, deep ecosystem skills, culture of change along with a deep industry expertise to shape, move, build and operate our clients’ businesses in the cloud. To accelerate our customers transformation leveraging cloud, we combine world-class learning and talent development expertise; deep experience in cloud change management; and cloud-ready operating models with a commitment to responsible business by design — with security, data privacy, responsible use of artificial intelligence, sustainability and ethics and compliance built into the fundamental changes Accenture helps companies achieve.
We are excited about the opportunities in the Cloud – and hope you are too! Learn more about our AWS careers here: AWS cloud careers page
The Work
Design cloud architectures to migrate on-prem data warehouses/marts to AWSConduct full technical discovery, identifying pain points, business, and technical requirements, “as is” and “to be” scenariosDevelop and prioritize use cases as it relates to Clients’ data migration Journey to AWSProvide prescriptive guidance across network, storage, Big Data, serverless architectures, Hadoop ecosystem, vendor products, RDBMS & NoSQL databases, and securityManage small teams of delivery engineers successfully delivering work efforts

What you need
Certification as an active AWS cloud Solution Architect.At least 5 years of designing, building and operationalizing large-scale enterprise data solutions using one or more third-party resources such as Pyspark, Talend, Matellion, Informatica or native utilities as EC2, S3, DMS, Kinesis, Kafka Redshift, RDS, Aurora, Lambda, Spark, Glue etc.Minimum 5 years of experience with databases as Teradata, Snowflake, Oracle, Netezza etc.Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience, or an Associate degree with a minimum of 6 years of equivalent work experience.
Bonus points if you have
Implementing DevOps on AWS platformExperience in data governance fields as lineage, quality, catalog etc.Multi-cloud experience
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: All Accenture business travel is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only. The safety and well-being of our people continues to be our top priority, and Accenture’s decisions around business travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $99,900 - $207,399 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",123.0
80,data+scientist,"Senior Applications Consultant - SAP Artificial Intelligence, RPA, Programming052919

SAP Artificial Intelligence, RPA, Programming
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Applicants for employment in the US must have valid work authorization that does not now and/or will not in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the US by Capgemini.
Applications Consultants have expertise in a specific technology environment. They are responsible for software-specific design and realization, as well as testing, deployment and release management, or technical and functional application management of client-specific package based solutions (e.g. SAP, ORACLE). These roles also require functional and methodological capabilities in testing and training.

Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.

This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.

Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
About Capgemini

Capgemini is a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services. The Group is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year+ heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company of 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of €17billion.
Visit us at www.capgemini.com. People matter, results count.

Job Developer
Schedule Full-time
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Organization I&D",124.0
81,data+scientist,"At Reveal, we believe that data matters. Help us use the power of data to innovate the field of pathology and improve global healthcare. Our proprietary deep learning-based platform, ImageDx™, delivers scientists and pathologists a novel class of actionable, quantitative data to accelerate research and enhance patient care.We are seeking an enthusiastic and talented image data scientist to join our computational pathology team. The successful candidate will be a key member of the team developing new technical approaches for our computer-assisted diagnosis digital pathology products. This is an excellent opportunity to work on challenging, interesting projects with great potential for significant societal impact.The successful candidate will enjoy working in a highly collaborative environment developing, cutting-edge products. Excellent communication and creative problem-solving skills are required. Previous experience in digital pathology, high content screening, or large biomedical image sets is a plus.Qualifications: MS or PhD in computer science or related field, preferably in machine learning/computer vision5 years of hands-on development experience of complex machine learning and deep learning systems for image analysis, segmentation, classification and object detection using modern frameworks and tools such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, etc.Demonstrated expertise in large scale analytics development and deploymentEngineering experience with CI/CD, Docker, K8, HPC a strong advantageExperienced in writing peer-reviewed scientific manuscriptsReveal offers a competitive salary, equity and benefits package: An open, collaborative and engaged team focused on making a differenceFlexible work schedule with the ability to work remotely4 weeks paid leave per year with extended holidays and team-approved leaveTeam Building events including company lunches and outingsHealthcare plans including medical (HMO & PPO), vision, and dentalEmployer-paid life insuranceJob Type: Full-timeBenefits:Dental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Master's (Preferred)Work Location:Fully RemoteCompany's website:revealbio.comBenefit Conditions:Only full-time employees eligibleCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview processVirtual meetings",125.0
82,data+scientist,"The Junior Data Scientist job will analyze data for actionable insights. Specific tasks include: Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data, analyzing the data to identify patterns and trends, and interpreting the data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Major Responsibilities:
Apply data science techniques
Work with stakeholders in understanding business requirements.
Manipulate structured and unstructured datasets from disparate data sources. Perform data preprocessing, integration, cleansing, descriptive analysis and visualization.
Gain confidence in applying data analysis and modeling techniques to in order to make informed business decisions
Identify and test hypotheses, ensuring statistical significance, as part of building predictive models for business application
Gain experience in presenting information to non-technical audience by working on ROI, trade-off analysis, and visualizations.
Be responsible for smaller components (low to moderate complexity) of complex projects
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities Required:
Fluency in programming languages such as R, Python, SQL.
Understanding of supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms
Proficiency in working with SQL databases.
Strong programming practices utilizing version control systems (e.g. Git)
Demonstrated machine learning experience.
Attention to detail.
Strong communication skills across technical and non-technical audience.",128.0
83,data+scientist,"This role works within the organization and within our software to determine the questions that need answers, and then identifies new and novel solutions to solve the problem. The Data Scientist is responsible for applying data mining techniques, performing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems that integrate into Measurabl’s products.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities


The essential functions and responsibilities for this position include, but are not limited to, the following. Other duties may be assigned as needed.

Data Analysis & Validation

Apply various quantitative methods to analyze and interpret the company’s data
Clean, transform, and organize data for analysis and ensure its quality
Interpret trends and patterns in data
Work with key stakeholders and team members to gather and understand how data is used and identify best practices
Assemble large, complex sets of data that meet non-functional and functional business requirements, conduct complex data analysis and report on results
Combine raw information from different sources and prepare data for prescriptive and predictive modeling


Communication and Education

Communicate complex analyses in a clear and actionable manner to stakeholders across the organization
Serve as a science liaison within the organization and externally through customer engagements
Compile technical and high level supporting documentation to ensure understanding across teams and consistency of practices
Support and influence conversations and decisions regarding product defining, planning and design
Identify new business questions where the data science team can add value


Statistical Learning Models

Design, test, verify and implement production ready data pipelines and machine learning models
Identify the appropriate data and methodologies to use based on the need
Work with development teams to implement data science models as services


Knowledge, Skills and Abilities


Competencies and Associated Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Ability to work and communicate effectively with others in a diverse, multiethnic and multicultural work environment

Ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced, decentralized environment.

Ability and desire to focus on continuous improvement and learning and development to ensure we are best positioned to deliver a world-class product to our customers

Proficiency and practical experience in Python and database programming

Intermediate business acumen

Ability to build and optimize data sets, data pipelines, and architectures

Strong analytical skills

Initiative:
Action Oriented
Self-Starter
Resourceful

Technical Aptitude:
Technical Ingenuity
Application of Technology
Innovative Thinking

Project Management:
Plan & Organize
Prioritize
Implement Plan

Innovation and Creativity:
Problem Solving
Brainstorming
Conceptualizing

Critical Thinking & Problem Solving:
Research & Analysis
Decision Making
Communication

Quantitative Reasoning:
Computational Fluency
Quantitative Literacy
Data Interpretation

Teamwork & Collaboration:
Establish Relations
Share Ideas
Build Trust

Professionalism & Work Ethnic:
Manage Time
Focus on Customer
Be Accountable


Education & Experience


We have identified the following programs, experience, and knowledge that have helped others find success in this role at Measurabl. We understand though that knowledge comes from many forms of learning and experiences. Above all, we consider a person’s potential impact in the role and value their unique path to this point in their career.

Graduate degree in STEM or Economics
1-3 years experience working in applied math, computer science, statistics, or related quantitative field
Professional experience in Python and database programming
A combination of professional or educational experience (whether formal or informal) that affords you with the knowledge, skills, and abilities above

Supervisory Responsibility


This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY

Measurabl, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants in all company facilities without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, pregnancy, childbirth, physical disability, mental and/or intellectual disability, age, military status or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran, marital status, registered domestic partner or civil union status, gender (including sex stereotyping and gender identity or expression), medical condition (including, but not limited to, cancer related or HIV/AIDS related), genetic information, or sexual orientation in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",129.0
84,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Master’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

For employees based in Colorado, this position starts at $114,700 per year. A sign-on bonus and restricted stock units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the position offered.",131.0
85,data+scientist,"Company Description
About us, but we’ll be brief
We are thrilled to share that FORTUNE has named Experian one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For. In addition, for the last five years we’ve been name in the top 100 “World’s Most Innovative Companies” by Forbes Magazine.
Experian DataLabs is a R&D unit at Experian formed with the desire to work in collaboration with Experian’s business units to enhance relationships with clients and acquire strategic datasets. Experian® is a global leader in providing information, analytical tools and marketing services to organizations and consumers to help manage the risk and reward of commercial and financial decisions. Using our comprehensive understanding of individuals, markets and economies, we help organizations find, develop and manage customer relationships to make their businesses more profitable.

Job Description
What you’ll be doing
You will be part of Experian North America R&D DataLabs concentrating on research and development of novel analytical solutions, new product prototyping, as well as new data asset evaluation and acquisition. This position requires extensive background and knowledge in deep learning and machine learning. The key job functions include:
Develop complex machine learning-based analytical solutions extracting insights from large amount of structured and unstructured data from diverse data sources
Identify/develop appropriate machine learning/deep learning/natural language understanding/natural language processing techniques to uncover the value of the data
Designing data structure and data storage schemes for efficient data manipulation and information retrieval
Developing tools for data processing and information retrieval
Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets
Applying, developing and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems
Validating score performance and conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting model process and model performance

Qualifications
What your background looks like
Advanced degree in Machine Learning, Data Science, AI, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math or other quantitative fields
0-6 years of working experience in data science, and/or predictive modeling
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish
Ability to independently support existing products
Proven track record in modifying and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems
Experience in deep learning (CNN, RNN, LSTM, attention models, etc.), machine learning (SVM, GLM, boosting, random forest, etc.), graph models, and/or, reinforcement learning.
Experience with generative modeling techniques such as GAN
Experience with open source tools for deep learning and machine learning technology such as pytorch, Keras, tensorflow, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.
Proven ability to work independently on development of complex models with extremely large and complex data structures
Proficient in more than one of Python, R, Java, C++, or C
Experience in large data analysis using Spark (pySpark preferred)
Robust knowledge and experience with statistical methods
Plusses:
Experience with Natural Language Processing, Natural Language Understanding, and the relevant open-source tools
Experience in developing, modifying and experimenting advanced language models
Experience in developing/applying/evaluating conversational AI technology
Extensive knowledge of SQL
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as Map Reduce, Hive, HBase, mongoDB, Cassandra, etc.
Experience with online, mobile marketing analytics
Experience with GPU programming
Solid knowledge of Bayesian statistical inference and related machine learning methods.
Experience with Agile methods for software development
Perks
During this pandemic, all Experian employees are working remotely. Once it’s safe to do so, we’ll slowly return to our offices however we are in no rush to do this. The safety of our employees is of utmost importance.
Four weeks of vacation to start, five sick days and two volunteer days (plus eleven paid holidays)
Competitive pay and comprehensive benefits package, with a bonus target of 20%
Flexible work schedule and relaxed dress code
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
Experian is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. Our goal is to create a thriving, inclusive and diverse team where people love their work and love working together. We believe that diversity, equity and inclusion is essential to our purpose of creating a better tomorrow. We value the uniqueness of every individual and want you to bring your whole, authentic self to work. For us, this is The Power of YOU and it ensures that we live what we believe.",132.0
86,data+scientist,"Knowesis is looking for personnel to support the United States Special Operations Command Preservation of the Force and Family (USSOCOM POTFF) program in identifying and implementing innovative, valuable solutions across the Special Operations Forces (SOF) enterprise aimed at improving the short and long-term well-being of SOF warriors and their families. This work will be performed at the client’s location on NAB, Coronado (San Diego, CA).
U.S. Citizenship Required (applicants without proof of US citizenship will not be considered due to the position’s security clearance requirement).
Duties and responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Enter, clean, and conduct basic data manipulation and analysis.
Enter and analyze data within government systems.
Build and disseminate databases and spreadsheets designed to record POTFF-related programmatic data.
Provide consultation and assistance to supported units and POTFF staff to identify opportunities and methods for capturing data relating to POTFF programs and initiatives.
Work in consultation with the POTFF program staff and the Government’s POTFF biostatistician.
Prepare reports and presentations that accurately convey data trends and associated analysis.
Skills:
Possess excellent communication skills, presentation skills, and shall be highly detail-oriented
Skilled in using statistics and data visualization techniques to provide an accessible way to see and understand trends, outliers, and patterns in data
Able to read, write, and speak English fluently and clearly in order to effectively communicate with all personnel with whom they interact
Possess sufficient initiative, interpersonal relationship skills, and social sensitivity such that they can relate constructively to a variety of contacts from a diverse background
Experience
Required
Tableau experience or certification
Proficient with the suite of Microsoft Office programs, including Word, Excel, and Access.
Prior experience using statistical software applications such as SPSS, SAS, and R.
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Social Science or related field
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",133.0
87,data+scientist,"
In this role, you’ll",134.0
88,data+scientist,"For nearly 50 years, Family Health Centers of San Diego (FHCSD) has provided affordable, high-quality health care and supportive services to all San Diegans. With more than 1,800 employees spread throughout 40 sites around the county, FHCSD is proud of the diversity of its staff as a reflection of the communities it serves.
The reward of working at FHCSD is more than a paycheck and excellent benefits; it is the impact and contribution to the San Diego community that employees value most. If you are passionate about improving the overall health and livelihood of your community, FHCSD is looking for people like you.
Responsible for designing relational databases and interfaces of the analytic infrastructure that supports COVID-19 prevention, screening, vaccination, and treatment efforts; and leading complex data management and analysis for multiple COVID-19 related projects. Need for enhanced data analytics has increased significantly with patients missing or deferring their patient visits due to the negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the uninsured, low income and medically underserved communities serviced by FHCSD.
Job Roles
Responsible for designing relational databases and interfaces of the analytic infrastructure that supports COVID-19 prevention, screening, vaccination, and treatment efforts.
Need for enhanced data analytics has increased significantly with patients missing or deferring their patient visits due to the negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the uninsured, low income and medically underserved communities serviced by FHCSD.
Lead complex data management and analyses for multiple COVID-19 related projects spanning multiple FHCSD departments.
Work closely with internal and external researchers engaged in a broad range of COVID-19 research studies.
Develop robust statistical analysis plans to include a broad range literature, by adapting statistical methods and innovative approaches in meeting the challenges data analysis presents.
In a consultant role, advise principal investigators, senior leadership, and other researchers on the planning and implementation of major COVID-19 projects in providing complex study designs.
Document all statistical software-coding and systematically archive results from analyses.
Collaborate with Scientific Director, senior leadership, and other researchers on developing the most effective graphical and tabular presentation of data for presentations and internal consideration for strategic planning in addressing COVID-19 issues.
Grant funded program. This position is funded through 03/31/2023; continuation of employment is dependent upon availability of and/or renewed funding.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Education/Certifications/Licenses/Registrations
Bachelor’s degree in science, math, biostatistics, or related field required.
Master’s degree preferred.
Experience/Specialized skills (including Language)
Minimum 4 years of experience functioning as a statistician in an academic or medical research environment.
Experience understanding and rapidly absorbing different research content areas and assimilating statistical and biological/medical hypotheses.
Broad knowledge of public health and clinical practice.
Demonstrated experience in health research.
Strong background in computer science related to statistical modeling in conducting analyses.
Advanced knowledge of statistical packages including R, SAS, or STATA.
Demonstrated experience in solving complex problems related to research modeling of data and statistics.
Demonstrated experience designing, implementing, maintaining, and using large and complex databases.
Demonstrated experience working at a sophisticated level with complex statistical methods and models incorporating a broad range of variable types.
Demonstrated experience analyzing longitudinal data with repeated measures using generalized estimating equations, mixed effect models, trajectory analyses, etc.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to interact effectively with a diverse group of people from principal investigators and other researchers to support staff throughout the institution.",135.0
89,data+scientist,"We Are:
Being part of Accenture Strategy & Consulting means becoming an expert at making the New happen Now. To us, the New is all about the wise pivot that turns constant disruption to continuous reinvention. We are an innovation led company that works at the heart of our clients’ organizations so that no matter how complex the business challenge, we face the future with confidence.
If you love solving challenges and not just studying them, then Accenture Consulting is the right place for you. Join us to develop your ideas into provocative points of view and transformative insights that help shape industries. You’ll work with an amazing and diverse mix of world-class experts with access to one of the most robust portfolios of capabilities and ecosystem relationships in the industry. Together, you’ll do so much more than consult.
Coming here means future-proofing your career and going as far as your ambition takes you. Becoming a tech-savvy, well-rounded, multi-disciplined and market-relevant advisor doesn’t happen by chance. We invest in training and development in a big way, so you can build your future along with ours, creating an impactful career unique to you. Ultimately, we believe we is greater than me and that diverse perspectives lead to the best solutions. Joining Accenture Consulting means you will learn, innovate and lead, and together we will improve the way the world works and lives.
Accenture Strategy & Consulting, Utility Industry, Retail Energy and Customer Service Practice helps energy providers around the world to reimagine, transform and grow their business and create new value propositions, revenue streams, commercial models and ecosystems. We are powering the progress to a safe, connected and sustainable planet. Every day, we work with the largest electric, gas and water utilities to deliver innovative solutions and help them become more efficient, reliable, environmentally friendly and safer places to work. We co-create the future with our clients at Accenture Innovation Hubs around the world and work alongside our clients to bring the future to life in the core of our client's operations. We are the marketplace leader in modernizing the Customer Experience network, delivering next level of connectivity between marketing, operations and technology that goes beyond the commodity. Our utility clients are looking for bold solutions in the era of rapidly changing technology, policy and workforce innovations. Are you the leader who wants to reinvent the Utilities' Customer Experience and empower our clients to create a clean, sustainable and connected world? Join a team of industry practitioners with global footprint and local camaraderie. Visit our site to learn more about Accenture Strategy & Consulting Utilities Practice.
You Are:
A skilled utility industry practitioner who knows how to reinvent Customer Experience in the new digital world. You have experience designing and implementing digital transformation in a functional and/or technical capacity with CRM / Customer Care focus on business process improvement and/or supporting technical solutions (e.g. in the contact center, back office and strategic departments of a retail utility). You identify, target, and organize for intelligent customer and retail growth with new connected energy experiences. In fact, every day you are looking for opportunities to challenge the status quo and you are not satisfied with step change. You are a relentless storyteller, inspiring teams with your vision and new way of thinking. You have a proven track record of assembling diverse, high performing teams that harness people's strength and deliver radical insight. You understand that co-location with clients and teams is critical to innovation and you are ready to partner at client sites.
The Work:
Data scientist delivering analytics solutions tied to utility customer programs.
Understand client challenges and articulate the value of transformation in terms of business outcomes
Bring thought leadership on most critical issues Utilities face today, and in the future
Constantly learn and bring new technologies and innovative solutions to our clients
Be a role model and a coach for the next generation of Accenture analysts and consultants
Champion people on your team to succeed professionally and personally
Foster trusted advisor relationships with clients from strategy to technology; from the C-Suite to the front line; for business and IT
Integrate business data to discover new insight and enable evidence-based business decisions
Earn air miles and hotel points with weekly travel to client sites for recharging on epic personal adventures
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.

Here's What You Need:
Minimum 3 years of experience in the Utility Industry required
Minimum 3 years of experience managing or implementing analytics solutions for utilities in a data scientist role
Minimum 3 years of experience building machine learning solutions
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent
Our Commitment to You:
Your entrepreneurial spirit and vision will be rewarded, and your success will fuel opportunities for career advancement. You’ll make a difference for some pretty impressive clients. Accenture serves many of the Fortune Global 100 on high-profile projects. Opportunities to learn daily through training, assignments, and collaborating with experts across the company. Access to leading-edge technology.
Along with a competitive salary, Accenture offers a comprehensive package including generous paid time off, an employee healthcare plan and a competitive 401K program. Learn more about our extensive rewards and benefits: Your Future Rewards & Benefits
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $119,000 - $129,999 and information on benefits offered is here.


What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",137.0
90,data+scientist,"POSITION DETAILS:
Schedule: Days, 8-hour shifts
FTE: Full-Time, 80 hours per 2 week pay period
Location: Main Campus

JOB SUMMARY:
At Rady Children's Institute for Genomic Medicine, our mission is: To prevent, diagnose, treat, and cure childhood diseases through genomic and systems medicine research. We are a global leader in the implementation of Rapid Precision Medicine® utilizing whole genome sequencing in pediatric intensive care settings. Rady Children's Institute for Genomic Medicine is searching for a data scientist, with expertise in statistical genetics or bioinformatics, to be located in San Diego, California. The role of this doctoral-trained individual will be to implement state of the art approaches to analyze next generation genomic sequencing and other ""omics"", and clinical data to support diagnostic, therapeutic and outcome research studies. Primary responsibilities include providing expertise on study design and executing data analyses for multiple research studies across a broad range of pediatric health conditions. Candidates will have strong training and experience in the analysis and interpretation of next generation genomic sequencing data to advance precision medicine. The ability to use machine learning and other artificial intelligence methods is required. Previous experience documenting collaborations with physician scientists,
bioinformaticists, and other members of multidisciplinary team members is required. Successful candidates will need to demonstrate their ability to contribute and participate in internal and external presentations, peer-reviewed manuscripts, conference proceedings, and applications for extramural funding. The successful candidate will report directly to the Vice-President of Research and ClinicalManagement of the Genomics Institute.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:
Master's Degree
4 Years of Experience
Expert level familiarity with statistical analysis software (e.g., SPSS, SAS and or equivalent analytical software)
Word, Excel and data entry (REDCap, Access, FoxPro, FileMaker)
Proficient in internet use and able to conduct literature searches using search engines such as Pub Med
Advanced understanding of computer software and hardware and familiarity with PC and/or MacIntosh platforms

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:
Doctorate Degree (non MD)
6 Years of Experience",139.0
91,data+scientist,"We are seeking a talented Statistician at either junior or senior levels to join the dynamic bioinformatics/biostatistics team at Epic sciences. The candidates will be providing statistical and data analysis support and guidance to the translational research, development and clinical studies at Epic Sciences. Working closely with bench scientists and clinicians, you will lead end-to-end studies from hypotheses and experimental design, to analysis plans, implementation, and pipelining, to methods assessment and result reporting or publication. You will be working with a variety of data types generated by Epic’s comprehensive cancer profiling platforms and technologies (eg, circulating tumor cell (CTC) IF analysis, single cell genomics, proteomics, and others). Expertise and knowledge of state-of-the art sequencing tools/platforms, analysis methods and annotation methods are highly desirable. We accommodate a flexible working schedule to facilitate work-life balance.
ELEMENTS:
Education/Experience: Requires a minimum of master’s degree in (bio)statistics, public health or other relevant quantitative fields. Successful applicants are likely to have these skill sets: experience in clinical trial design and clinical trial data analysis; experience with data analysis using R, Python, or MATLAB software); experience in diagnostic/prognostic product development; experience in analysis of omics data (desired); experience with regulatory agency interactions (a plus); and experience using optimal experimental design techniques (a plus).
Communication Skill: Works effectively with both internal and external audiences to analyze, interpret, and summarize data both orally and in writing; ability to write material suitable for publication, ability to write documentation.
 Interpersonal Skill: Works effectively both as an individual and part of a team; can manage relationships with external customers effectively. Participate in authoring work for professional publications/journals, collaborate with KOL's and documentation of novel IP as appropriate.
Judgment: Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously; ability to integrate new data into existing predictive models, deep understanding of various data analysis techniques Able to work with significant independence and help set strategic research direction.
 Execution: Works effectively with other disciplines to identify ways to improve/create existing data models.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Knowledge of computer systems and technologies
Knowledge of clinical trial design
Effective verbal, written and presentation skills, both technical and non-technical
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Good interpersonal skills
Ability to work in a team environment across multiple disciplines (internal and external)
Ability to multi-task, manage time and meet deadlines.
Ability to monitor work to ensure quality, completeness, and accuracy.
Ability to stay current with advances in the field.
ADDITIONAL DUTIES:
May perform additional duties as assigned or directed by management from time to time.
REQUIRED COMPETENCIES:
Performance Orientation – Is driven by personal performance; achieves all objectives detailed in scorecards and comfortable with quantifiable assessments.
Impact Orientation – Performs to stated objectives and driven to make an impact on company goals and patients’ lives.
Competitive – Dedicated to a competitive spirit that supports the Epic Sciences’ goal to be the premier CTC technology in the industry.
Sense of Urgency – Has the speed and agility dedicated to the company’s goals and performance.
Ability to Handle Pressure and Ambiguity – Comfortable with the pressure to be the best and the ability maintain composure and focus in situations of ambiguity and uncertainty.
Confidence - Confident in one’s skills and abilities; pursues everything with energy; demonstrates the drive and a need to finish especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
4ZJJKdBKdk",140.0
92,data+scientist,"Duration: 6+Months
Responsibilities:
Minimum: Google Professional Data Engineer
3+ years direct experience working in IT Infrastructure
2+ years in a customer facing role working with enterprise clients
Experience with implementing and/or maintaining technical solutions in virtualized environments.
Experience in design, architecture and implementation of Data warehouses, data pipelines and flows.
Experience with reading software code in one or more languages such as Java, Python and SQL.
Experience designing and deploying large scale distributed data processing systems with one or more technologies such as Oracle, MS SQL Server, MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Redis, Hadoop, Spark, HBase, Vertica, Netezza, Teradata, Tableau, Qlik or MicroStrategy.
Customer facing migration experience, including service discovery, assessment, planning, execution, and operations.
Demonstrated excellent communication, presentation, and problem-solving skills.
Willingness to travel around
The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",141.0
93,data+scientist,"
Master's in Computer Science, Mathematics, Machine Learning, or related quantitative field
3+ years of hands on experience with ML tools such as R, Python, Spark, SageMaker, TensorFlow, or similar
Experience in machine learning and statistical techniques such as classification, clustering, regression, statistical inference, collaborative filtering, and natural language processing, experimental design, social networking analysis, feature engineering etc.
Demonstrate understanding and experience with relational data sets, data warehouses, data mining and data analysis techniques
Ability to think creatively and solve problems

Amazon.com’s Buyer Risk Prevention's (BRP) mission is to make Amazon the safest and most trusted place worldwide to transact online. BRP safeguards every financial transaction across all Amazon sites. As such, BRP designs and builds the software systems, risk models, and operational processes that minimize risk and maximize trust in Amazon.com. The BRP organization is looking for an Applied Scientist for the Buyer Abuse team, whose mission is to combine advanced analytics with investigator insight to create mechanisms to proactively and reactively reduce the impact of abuse across Amazon.

As an Applied Scientist, you will be responsible for modeling complex problems, discovering insights, and building cutting edge risk algorithms that identify opportunities through statistical models, machine learning, and visualization techniques to improve operational efficiency and reduce monetary losses and improve customer trust.

You will need to collaborate effectively with business and product leaders within BRP and cross-functional teams to build scalable solutions against high organizational standards. The candidate should be able to apply a breadth of tools, data sources, and ML techniques to answer a wide range of high-impact business questions and proactively present new insights in concise and effective manner.

The candidate should be an effective communicator capable of independently driving issues to resolution and communicating insights to non-technical audiences. This is a high impact role with goals that directly impacts the bottom line of the business.

Responsibilities:

Invent, implement, and deploy state of the art machine learning algorithms and systems
Build prototypes and explore conceptually new solutions
Define and conduct experiments to validate/reject hypotheses, and communicate insights and recommendations to Product and Tech teams
Take ownership of how ML solutions impact Amazon resources and Customer experience
Develop efficient data querying infrastructure for both offline and online use cases
Collaborate with cross-functional teams from multidisciplinary science, engineering and business backgrounds to enhance current automation processes
Learn and understand a broad range of Amazon’s data resources and know when, how, and which to use and which not to use.
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Maintain technical document and communicate results to diverse audiences with effective writing, visualizations, and presentations

Please visit https://www.amazon.science for more information


A PhD in CS, Machine Learning, Statistics, Operations Research, or relevant field
4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling and analysis
Compelling communication and influencing skills
Experience in e-commerce / on-line companies in fraud / risk control functions

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us",142.0
94,data+scientist,"CueHealth Inc. is seeking to hire a full-time Statistician with expertise in the medical diagnostic industry with a focus on analysis of manufacturing data. The Statistician will report into the Director of Technical Operations.
Responsibilities:
Provide statistical guidance to technical teams, including designing experiments and analyzing/interpreting data
Analyze manufacturing data to help inform quality control or in process testing procedures
Facilitate in the tracking, trending, and/or analysis of cartridge or manufacturing data
Drive or influence changes in to manufacturing processes based on data analysis
Effectively communicate statistical analysis to a broad audience
Train other members of the team on statistical techniques
Write test reports and present findings
Other duties as assigned
Requirements:
MS degree or higher in Statistics
1+ years of relative work
Ability to work in fast paced environment
Demonstrated ability to change tasks as needed in support of business
Proficient in analytical and critical thinking
Proficient in Microsoft ,Google, and Statistical software applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Self-motivated to lead projects while working effectively in a team
Must understand sampling methods and criteria used for quality control testing
Recommended but not Required:
IVD experience is a plus
Previous history of working as part of an Operators or Quality department is a plaus
Physical Requirements:
Adjusting, moving or lifting objects up to 50 pounds
Repeating motions that may include the wrists, hands and/or fingers",144.0
95,data+scientist,"Axos:

Born digital, Axos Bank has reinvented the banking model and grown to over $14 billion in assets since our founding in 2000. With a broad and ever-growing range of financial products, Axos Bank is rated among the top 5 digital banks in the country! Axos Financial is our holding company and publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol ""AX (NYSE: AX).
We bring together human insight and digital expertise to anticipate the needs of our customers. Our team members are innovative, technologically sophisticated, and motivated to achieve.
Learn more about working here!
The Opportunity:

You will be providing support to a fast-paced analytics department with deep problem-solving and broad knowledge of quantitative modeling for banking/financial services.
The Role:
Analyze and identify business challenges and opportunities
Apply modeling/statistics to make strategic and tactical recommendations

Consult with business partners to develop strategy to address and influence business problems

Analyze data, build BI tools, and develop financial models

Communicate results and recommendation to senior management and business partners

Identify opportunities to apply quantitative methods to improve business performance

Communicate technical subject matter clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Research AI and financial services market conditions and assist in conducting feasibility studies to determine market demand for existing and new AI products or services
Are You A Fit? :
3+ years' data analytics
5+ years' problem solving/analytical role in a fast-paced organization
Experience in regulated financial services (FDIC, OCC, FINRA, FRB) or another highly regulated environment
Expertise in one or more of the following:
Statistical Modeling
Probabilistic programming
ML/AI, knowledge presentation
Cognitive modeling
Natural language processing
SQL knowledge and expert in Python or R
Excellent communication skills (verbal and written)
Build, maintain and develop software infrastructure to or cloud infrastructure to handle enterprise projects along with data integration mechanisms for interfacing between machine learning and artificial intelligence applications
Built machine learning applications, broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools, and open source libraries
Support customer acquisition strategies by vetting information from public sources and lead providers then aggregating content from data provider to stimulate development of telemarketing and email marketing campaigns
Consolidate publicly available information to develop an achievable picture of a perspective customer
Exploration that leverages more information pertaining to a specific area in a market or product that stimulates development for product offerings while also discovering strategic opportunities within specific markets or demographics
Track record of fact-based communication to support senior decision-making
Preferred:
Management experience
Apply directly for consideration as we are not using any outside agencies for any of our openings:

Pre-Employment Drug Test:
All offers are contingent upon the candidate successfully passing a credit check, criminal background check, and pre-employment drug screening, which includes screening for marijuana. Axos Bank is a federally regulated banking institution. At the federal level, marijuana is an illegal schedule 1 drug; therefore, we will not employ any person who tests positive for marijuana, regardless of state legalization.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Axos Bank is an Equal Opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religious creed, color, sex (including pregnancy, breast feeding and related medical conditions), gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military and veteran status, marital status, age, protected medical condition, genetic information, physical disability, mental disability, or any other protected status in accordance with all applicable federal, state and local laws.
Job Functions and Work Environment:
While performing the duties of this position, the employee is required to sit for extended periods of time. Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.",145.0
96,data+scientist,"
Knowledge of service-oriented architecture, software development, test and operation

At AWS AI, we want to make it easy for our customers to deploy machine learning models on any endpoint in the cloud or at the edge. Just as SageMaker provides a complete set of services to simplify the task of building and training a model, Neo provides an inference engine that is designed to run any machine learning model on any hardware.

Neo optimizes machine learning models to perform at up to twice the speed of the original framework with no loss in accuracy. Upload a pre-trained model built with MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, or XGBoost to your S3 bucket, choose your target hardware platform from Intel, NVIDIA, or ARM, and with a single API call, SageMaker Neo optimizes the model, converts it into an executable module, and returns it to your S3 bucket. The free open source Neo runtime uses less than 100th of the space of the framework to run the model on the target hardware.

Amazon SageMaker Edge Manager provides a software agent that runs on edge devices for model inference and a separate cloud service for managing models on edge devices.

This role focuses on the cloud services for both of these two strategic AWS AI SageMaker services. Developers will have the opportunity to work on both areas.

The SageMaker Neo and Edge Manager team is growing rapidly to keep up with growth in customers and their requests. We are hiring well-rounded software developers with backgrounds in machine learning, systems, AI accelerators, and embedded systems.
Join us to help AWS customers deploy machine learning models in the cloud and on edge devices at scale in production. Work on an open source industry-standard compiler and runtime for machine learning that is already deployed on over 20 million devices. You will have a passion for operational excellence, scale, and performance.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life balance. It isn’t about how many hours you spend at home or at work; it’s about the flow you establish that brings energy to both parts of your life. We believe striking the right balance between your personal and professional life is critical to life-long happiness and fulfillment. We offer flexibility in working hours and encourage you to find your own balance between your work and personal lives.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior members enjoy one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.


Familiarity with ML operations services such as SageMaker or other industry standards, and/or AWS technologies
Experience with Machine learning libraries like TensorFlow, MxNet and PyTorch
Experience building large scale, high-performance systems in a complex, multi-tiered, distributed environment
MS in Computer Science

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",146.0
97,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.
We are:
Applied Intelligence, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us? Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds? Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.
You are:
Both a data maven and a strategist with serious analytical and statistical chops who can architect and lead business transformation projects from start to finish. You know how to interrogate data to get insights to inform strategy and drive business optimization. Clients listen to you because you are a strong communicator and passionate problem-solver - and have the skill depth and moxie to back it up
The work:
Manage strategy development and functional insight operating model skills to influence client digital agenda.
Partner with clients to make bold decisions intersecting business and digital technology operations.
Understand client industry landscape in the context of economic social trends.
Adapt and implement digital transformation solutions and driver value led work.
Map clients state of digital maturity, leveraging and embedding data science in digital strategy development and implementation.

Here’s what you need:
 Bachelor degree or Master degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, econometrics, mathematics, marketing, or operations analysis. Double bonus if you have a PhD.
 4+ years using AI and data science to achieve business goals in large orgs
 4+ years working in Healthcare, Technology, Software, Products, or Resources industry; strong familiarity with common industry use cases
4+ years working in a consulting capacity helping clients make their companies work better
Bonus points if:
 3+ years heading up teams, juggling multiple projects from multiple locations
 3+ years of strategy experience
You are a gifted communicator and presenter
You know your way around ML and AI technical architecture
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $185,999 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",147.0
98,data+scientist,"Position Description:

If you love high profile and challenging projects supporting the US Navy - Serco has a great opportunity for you! The Data Scientist will support US Navy in sunny San Diego, CA. Bring your data science, process analysis expertise and collaborative skills and make an impact towards our country’s military defense and the capabilities of our Sailors.
You will be part of a team that works closely with the customer and other Serco team members to deliver high technology Naval systems. You will provide technical support for our customer as part of a team on-site in San Diego, CA.
The successful candidate will help lead manpower and training support efforts for US Navy C5ISR-related programs and systems.
In this role, you will:
Develop Front End Analysis (FEA) and/or Training Estimates of manpower, personnel, training, management, and acquisition requirements for assigned programs/capabilities
Document analyses in the Job Task Analysis (JTA), Training Situation Analysis (TSA), Training Systems Requirements Analysis (TSRA) and/or Training Situation Document (TSD), Manpower and Training Requirements Planning (MTRP), Training Device Coordinating Paper (TDDCP), Military Characteristic (MC), and Training Effectiveness Evaluation Plan (TEEP) documentation
Conduct Manpower and Training Requirements Planning (MTRP) , examining alternative system concepts early in the acquisition process to determine the best possible Manpower Training (MPT) profile for assigned programs/capabilities
Capture Training Requirements Planning (TRP) data through entry into the Human Analysis and Requirements Planning (HARPS) tool
Draft and update Navy Training System Plans (NTSP) for assigned programs/capabilities
Review, coordinate, and track the approval of the Training Installation and Transfer Agreement (TITA) phases for the installation and transfer of training responsibility for installed Technical Training Equipment (TTE) and Training Devices at designated training facilities
Provide annual review recommendation letters for all supported NTSPs
Qualifications:

To be successful in this role, you will have:
Bachelor’s degree or an Associate's Degree plus (4) years of specialized Navy Training assessment expertise; or six (6) years of specialized Navy Training assessment expertise and a U.S. Navy Master Training Specialist (MTS) qualification
 Active Secret clearance required
If you are interested in supporting with our military and working with a passionate Serco team then submit your application now for immediate consideration. It only takes a few minutes and could change your career!
Company Overview:

Serco Inc. (Serco) is the Americas division of Serco Group, plc. Serco serves every branch of the U.S. military, numerous U.S. Federal civilian agencies, the Intelligence Community, the Canadian government, state and local governments, and commercial clients. We help our clients deliver vital services more efficiently while increasing the satisfaction of their end customers. Headquartered in Herndon, Virginia, Serco Americas has over 9,000 employees and is part of a $4 billion global business that helps transform government and public services around the world. At Serco, our employees are our most valuable asset - we listen, respect and support them throughout their career at Serco. We invite you to become part of our dynamic team. Serco is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversifying our workforce (Race/ Color/ Sex/ Sexual Orientation/ Gender Identity/ Religion/ National Origin/ Disability/ Vets).
To review Serco benefits please visit: https://www.serco.com/na/careers/benefits-of-choosing-serco.
If you require an accommodation with the application process please email: careers@serco-na.com or call the HR Service Desk at 800-628-6458, option 1. Please note, due to EEOC/OFCCP compliance, Serco is unable to accept resumes by email.
Serco does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies without being a contracted approved vendor. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Serco and will not be obligated to pay a placement or contract fee. If you are interested in becoming an approved vendor at Serco, please email Agencies@serco-na.com.",149.0
99,data+scientist,"
Intuit is hiring a Principal Data Scientist to join our Intuit AI team in Mountain View, CA.",152.0
100,data+scientist,"Lead Data Scientist


About the Role. . .
Our Advanced Analytics team is looking for a seasoned Lead Data Scientist to solve impactful real-world problems across industries with the power of machine learning. If you are passionate about applied computer vision, NLP, forecasting, or simulation, we have great opportunities. We use cutting-edge techniques and infrastructure, including PyTorch, Tensorflow, Spark, Dask, Kubernetes, and Kafka, to create innovative solutions. Logic20/20's Global Delivery Model creates a connected experience for Logicians across geographies. As a lead data scientist, you will have the opportunity to design and implement models that save lives, reduce climate risks, and make a difference in the world. You'll have access to projects in different locations, the technology to support Connected Teams, and in-person and online culture in our Connected Hub cities.
You like to. . .
Build robust machine learning models with neural network frameworks
Work with enterprise-scale systems in the cloud
Collaborate with other data scientists and stakeholders on projects
You’re Good At . . .
Researching and designing statistical models to answer target questions, optimizing processes and outcomes, and informed decision-making
Developing production grade solutions in Python
Working in a CI/CD lifecycle
Translating business and product questions into analytics projects
Communicating clearly over written and oral channels while translating complex methodologies and analytical results into high-level insights
Qualifications. . .
Deep knowledge of statistics and machine learning techniques
3+ years building statistical models/evaluating/feature selection in a high impact role
Knowledge of Python (3+ years)
Experience building production pipelines
Experience with Tensorflow and/or PyTorch
Experience leading development teams
Knowledge of cloud deployment tools in AWS, Azure, or GCP
About Logic20/20. . .

The Logic20/20 Advanced Analytics team is where rock stars in data engineering, data science, and visual analytics join forces to build simple solutions for complex data problems. We make it look like magic, but for us, it’s all in a day’s work. As part of our team, you’ll collaborate on projects that help clients spin their data into a high-performance asset, all while enjoying the company of kindred spirits who are as committed to your success as you are. And when you’re ready to level up in your career, you’ll have access to the training, the project opportunities, and the mentorship to get you where you want to go.
“We build an environment where we really operate as one team, building up each other’s careers and capabilities.” – Adam Cornille, Director, Advanced Analytics",153.0
101,data+scientist,"Since 2007, Genalyte has been guided by the vision of performing panels of tests and receiving results within a few minutes. As we look to the future, Genalyte’s technology will transform health care- moving lab testing from the lab into the physician’s office.

We are well funded with outstanding growth potential. We are looking for individuals inspired by our technology and vision, who are eager to be at the ground level of this collaborative and entrepreneurial company.
We want to hire individuals who are interested in creating an innovative, fast-paced and dynamic work setting. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package to attract, motivate, and retain the highest caliber of employee.

About the Role
We are seeking a Sr. Data Scientist who will be responsible designing, modeling and developing algorithms for Genalyte’s analytics platform. This position supports, gathers, creates and maintains data and workflows for data analysis, handling and management. We need an individual ready to develop scripts to analyze data from multiple data sources and recommends enhancements to data workflow processes, designs, builds, implements, improves and maintains high performance and highly scalable automated data pipelines.

Role is responsible for:
 Design, develop, and maintain algorithms and models used in the health analytics platform that reflect the functional needs of the business.
Gather and maintain appropriate data required for the models.
Perform analysis of data for evaluation, validation and optimization.
Present analysis and results using charts, tables, and reports to functional technical and non-technical leaders.

About You
This role requires you to be a proficient technical expert with at least 7 years of working experience in a Data Scientist role. This role also requires a PhD or Master’s degree in Biostatistics, Statistics, Mathematics or a related field. Beyond education and years of experience, you should be experienced with multiple statistical programming languages such as Python, R or Matlab.

The most successful candidates will be those who are self-motivated and enthusiastic for working in fast-paced and collaborative environment.

4PXNTyQXDC",154.0
102,data+scientist,"Who we are:
We are Accenture, a global professional services company and a leading partner to the world’s major cloud providers, including AWS, Azure, and Google. Our longstanding involvement with cloud technology (we have 34,000 completed cloud projects under our belt) was emphasized recently when we consolidated our multiple cloud teams into a single business practice called Accenture Cloud First. The organization is backed by a $3 billion investment over three years.
As part of our Data & AI group, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a highly collaborative and growing network of technology and data experts, who are taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges using the latest data and analytics technologies. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have an opportunity to work in roles such as Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Chief Data Officer covering all aspects of Data including Data Management, Data Governance, Data Intelligence, Knowledge Graphs, and IoT. Come grow your career in Technology at Accenture!

What you need:
10+ years of engineering, technology architecture and delivery experience
10+ years of experience developing the strategy for and building data and analytics solutions
5+ years of experience in leading data strategy engagements involving the architecture of modern data platforms with technologies such as Big Data and Cloud
5+ years of management consulting experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience (minimum of 12 years), or an Associate degree with a minimum of 6 years of equivalent work experience.
Bonus points if you have:
Hands-on engineer with the ability to manage complex engineering projects with a “lean-in” leadership style
Can speak with authority on the capabilities, strengths & weaknesses of the leading cloud platforms (Amazon Web Services, Azure, and Google Cloud).
Extensive experience with enterprise data architecture for transactional systems, analytical platforms, master data management, data governance framework, data integration and large-scale data migration.
Experience in DevOps
Experience migrating applications and data to cloud platforms.
Experience with relational and non-relational data platforms
Experience with machine learning, artificial intelligence applications and Data Science development languages (R, Python, etc.).
Understanding of data modeling principles, and Data Warehouse concepts (e.g., Kimball methodology for developing dimensional data models).
Familiarity with data visualization and self-service BI/data warehousing/ advanced analytics tools.
Methodologies for integration, data security, data governance and data sciences.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is ($99,900-$168,499) and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",155.0
103,data+scientist,"Summary
Posted: Apr 30, 2021
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200233728
Imagine what you could do here. At Apple, new ideas have a way of becoming extraordinary products, services, and customer experiences very quickly. The people here at Apple don’t just craft products - they build the kind of wonder thatʼs revolutionized entire industries. It’s the diversity of those people and their ideas that inspires the innovation that runs through everything we do, from amazing technology to industry-leading environmental efforts. Join Apple, and help us leave the world better than we found it.
Are you interested in being part of a team that continues to innovate the way people and machines interact? The launch of Siri was a defining moment in the history of Artificial Intelligence. Siri offers a faster, easier way to get things done on your Apple devices, even before you ask. Millions of people now use Siri to send messages, play their favorite song or even take a selfie. The AI/ML team is passionate about technology with a focus on enriching the customer experience. We are looking for a motivated Annotation Analyst that demonstrates active listening, integrity, acute attention to detail, and is passionate about impacting our customer's experience.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.
This position will be based out of the corporate campus in San Diego, CA.
Key Qualifications
Fluency in the Chilean Spanish language with excellent comprehension, grammar and proofreading skills
Excellent English reading comprehension and writing skills
Highly organized with strong attention to detail
Excellent active listening skills with the ability to understand verbal nuances
Understanding of the regions and cultural variations where Chilean Spanish is spoken
Demonstrates attention to detail and critical thinking skills in evaluation of Siri’s language usage and dialect
Ability to independently navigate systems and tools
Demonstrates integrity and focuses on customer privacy
Experience in content review or a similar environment, prior testing experience preferred
Demonstrates flexibility and adaptability to changing work-flows and responsibilities
Grows with a team where expertise is shared and feedback is welcomed
Excels at working independently to make timely decisions and take appropriate actions
Experience as an end user of Siri, similar Intelligent Personal Assistants, or other AI
Successfully meets or exceeds targets, working within tight deadlines
Ability to identify business process solutions that increase efficiencies
Ability to maintain focus and aim for high results through large volumes of tasks
Description
Our team is comprised of very talented individuals, who are passionate about AI/ML and ensuring Apple services are at their best.
As part of the Annotation Team you'll play a central role in enhancing the user experience. We work in a fast paced, dynamic, technology focused environment. As an Annotation Analyst, you'll listen and transcribe audio files and evaluate Siri’s response and language usage, from customers who have opted in to the grading program. You'll use your language and cultural knowledge, along with analytical skills, to evaluate responses against guidelines. Your flexibility and the ability to prioritize tasks is essential. We focus on the user experience, thinking creatively on how customers use Siri and use this knowledge for improvements.
Because we believe our individual backgrounds, perspectives, and passions help us build the ideas that move all of us forward. We'll train you to be an expert in understanding, supporting and improving the customer experience. This position comes with competitive pay, great benefits, eligibility to participate in our company stock plan, time off, and employee discount.
We are seeking applicants with fluency in the Chilean Spanish language.
Education & Experience
Bachelors degree or equivalent work experience preferred
Additional Requirements
Ability to work Monday- Friday from 9:00am-6:00pm local time; with scheduling and work flexibility based on business needs
Positions with language skills require strong grammar and cultural awareness
Successful completion of a pre-employment assessment and background check
Successful completion of initial training and certification testing",157.0
104,data+scientist,"Role
The Data Scientist will be collaborating with others at Resilience with experimentation in new and emerging data science technologies such as Machine/Deep Learning and Artificial Intelligence, exploiting established statistical tools such as multivariate regression analysis, and utilizing data modeling and optimization tools.
Resilience is looking for a smart, motivated scientist who enjoys taking on complex challenges, work well in an agile, dynamic environment, and care about high-quality engineering best practices
Job Responsibilities
Design and implement data preprocessing, integration, and analysis solutions
Will design and develop robust, modular, and reliable data monitoring and visualization tools in collaboration with our Research team to understand and interpret data
Partner with our Software Engineering team to build and deploy production analysis tools
Provides data science subject matter expertise in the planning and execution of cell and gene therapy projects that require advanced analytics methods, ensuring the maximum value is realized for data generated.
Working with multi-disciplinary teams to ensure that models are translated into data solutions.
Provide in-depth statistical and data analytical expertise across the organization by collaborating with Research, Development, Quality, Manufacturing, and Sciences Teams.
Qualifications
Demonstrated machine learning experience
Python fluency; strong programming practices utilizing version control systems (e.g., Git)
Facility with scientific computing tools: NumPy, SciPy, TensorFlow/PyTorch, or equivalents
Ability to deal well with ambiguity and work independently and as a multidisciplinary analytical research team member in a fast-paced environment.
Have the initiative, curiosity, a bias for action, and a problem-solving attitude, and desire to bring innovative, simplified solutions to complex problems
High personal standards of reliability and a track record of working on challenging biological problems and manipulating biological data sets (e.g., microscopy, gene expression, genomics)
Some background knowledge in computational biology, immunology, wet-lab experimental procedures, and data analysis is a plus.
Familiarity with AWS or similar cloud PaaS & IaaS services
Preferred Experience
Up to 2 years experience with an MS or Ph.D., or equivalent, in a quantitative field, e.g., data science, physics, math, computer science, theoretical neuroscience
Hands-on work experience with large complex data sets, programming languages such as R, Python, SQL, and Big Data technology, statistical modeling, and translation of results to a non-technical audience preferred.
Experience with deep learning, Bayesian modeling, computer vision, supervised and unsupervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization and statistical data analysis tools.
Experience in a fast-paced startup environment preferred",158.0
105,data+scientist,"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!
Works independently to develop sophisticated statistical models to analyze and predict complex business outcomes. Manages projects, and provides training and guidance and assigns tasks to less experienced staff members. Focused on deployment of inventory to store and purchasing of inventory into distribution centers from vendors.
Principle Duties and Responsibilities:

Builds data structures and tools using advanced statistical modeling techniques and produces innovative, exploratory data analyses from complex and high-dimensional datasets. Designs, develops, and evaluates mathematical predictive models and advanced algorithms using tools such as R. Python, SQL, SAS, etc. Generates and tests hypotheses and analyzes and interprets results of experiments. Recognizes patters, identifies opportunities, poses business questions, and makes discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. Reports results and prepares recommendations in written, verbal and presentation form. Provides leadership to less experienced staff: includes activities such as guiding and training.
Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
Category: Corporate
Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127
Schedule: Full_time",159.0
106,data+scientist,"Duration:1+Month
Responsibilities:
We are looking for a partner who has done CloudSQL(PostgreSQL) upgrades. One of our customer needs to upgrade all their Cloud SQL instances from PostgreSQL 9.6 to 11. We need a couple strong hands-on partner engineers to help here.
We are also trying to find a SCE with experience to help oversee this. Please let us know if you have this experience within your delivery team.
The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",162.0
107,data+scientist,"Data Scientist
Corporate Office, 15445 Innovation Dr, San Diego, California, United States of America Req #1209
 Thursday, June 10, 2021
EDF Renewables North America, a subsidiary of EDF Renewables, is a leading North American independent power producer boasting over 30 years of experience across a broad spectrum of services. Our mission is to deliver renewable solutions to lead the transition to a sustainable energy future.
The Data Scientist will lead and participate in the development, validation and delivery of algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools in the context of EDFR’s Wind Energy Team. The employee will solve complex analytical problems and develop automated tools to streamline established wind assessment methodologies. This position will interact with internal customers and stakeholders to ensure project success while ensuring deadlines are met. The incumbent must be comfortable with project management as well as designing, creating, and deploying the data architecture to deliver solutions.

Ideal candidates will possess a combination of business knowledge, technical skills, and people skills to define and guide data strategy for the Resource Assessment team and maximize user adoption of any new tools or models put forth.
Responsibilities:
60% Data Science Activities:

Contribute to R&D efforts in the energy assessment field using pre-construction and operational data.
Collaborates with business partners to understand their problems and goals, develop predictive modeling, statistical analysis, data reports and performance metrics.
Use programming skills to explore, examine and interpret large volumes of data in various forms.
Develops and uses algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple complex business problems utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses and broad knowledge of the organization and industry.
Interacts with internal and external peers and managers to exchange complex information related to areas of specialization.
Conducts data analysis and research, designs algorithm, recommends ongoing improvements to existing applications to help find new information for business decisions.
25% Resource Assessment Efficiency, Methodology, and Research Initiatives:
Maintain ownership of EDFR’s automated Wind Resource Assessment Methodology code library
Collaborates with team members to ensure such a tool continually meets the group's needs.
Optimize performance of tools where appropriate for efficiency gains and increased robustness.
Bring data science techniques and machine learning algorithms to bear in both pre-construction development analyses and post-construction operational analyses.
Integrates analysis tools to leverage existing databases and application that store turbine data, met data, wind farm production data, and energy estimate results.
Develops innovative and effective data-driven algorithms and applications for energy assessment using advanced statistical and predictive modelling techniques.
Provides training/maintenance/bug-fixes/updates for in-house proprietary software packages and develops new modules to meet ongoing increasing needs from the energy assessment team.
10% Resource Assessment Project Work:

Estimates energy production for wind projects under development
Designs turbine layouts to optimize energy production and minimize construction costs
Analyzes and solves resource assessment and development challenges
Analyzes data to identify and evaluate new sites for future projects
Communicates site characteristics, energy production potential, and risks to members of the Senior Management Team and Regional Developers
Supports the key project development functions for all projects, including financial feasibility analysis, permitting, engineering, due diligence, project legal review, etc.
5% Other duties as assigned
Supervision of Others: 0
Qualifications: (Degree/Certifications/License/Experience/Specialized Knowledge/Skills)
Education/Experience
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science, engineering, or related field required.
Master’s Degree or PhD, a plus.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience providing advanced analytics within a business setting preferred.
1 year of data science implementation.
2 or more years supporting progressively complex projects in predictive modeling, data analytics, machine learning, and big data technologies.
Minimum 2 years’ experience in SAS or SQL or other programming languages such as Python, Fortran or other MVC languages.
Skills/Knowledge/Abilities
Strong interest in Renewable Energy and the environment
Able to facilitate discussions between small groups of technical leaders, recognize issues of conflict and inconsistency between data requirements, and pursue a resolution of these issues
Ability to work with large data sets from multiple data sources.
Strong knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Anticipates and prevents problems and roadblocks before they occur.
Demonstrates the ability to communicate technical ideas and results to non-technical clients in written and verbal form.
Ability to work cooperatively as part of a team, as well as independently under own initiative
Effective communications skills that enable successful advocacy and alignment with a long-term vision
Self-starter, motivated, able to manage multiple priorities and tasks in a dynamic environment with a good understanding of software development standards and best practices
Working Conditions:
Approximately 95% of time is spent in the office environment, utilizing computers, servers, peripheral equipment, phones, and general office equipment. Approximately 5% of the time is spent traveling outside of the office to other EDF Renewables locations or vendor locations located in the US, Canada and Mexico, for the purpose of project related work, and to attend conferences, trade shows, and professional development events.
We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.
Other details
Pay Type Salary",163.0
108,data+scientist,"Physical Requirements

Monitors and utilizes computers and test equipment for more than 6 hours a day.
Continuous communication (e.g., on conference calls) which includes the comprehension of information with colleagues, customers, and vendors both in person and remotely.
Works in the lab, can use hazardous chemicals (e.g., glue, machinery).
",165.0
109,data+scientist,"Physical Requirements

Monitors and utilizes computers and test equipment for more than 6 hours a day.
Continuous communication (e.g., on conference calls) which includes the comprehension of information with colleagues, customers, and vendors both in person and remotely.
Works in the lab, can use hazardous chemicals (e.g., glue, machinery).
",168.0
110,data+scientist,"Position Description:
If you love high profile and challenging projects supporting the US Navy - Serco has a great opportunity for you! The Data Scientist will support US Navy in sunny San Diego, CA. Bring your data science, process analysis expertise and collaborative skills and make an impact towards our country’s military defense and the capabilities of our Sailors.
You will be part of a team that works closely with the customer and other Serco team members to deliver high technology Naval systems. You will provide technical support for our customer as part of a team on-site in San Diego, CA
The successful candidate will help lead manpower and training support efforts for US Navy C5ISR-related programs and systems, be able to imagine, identify and develop new ways of providing training to U.S. Navy Sailors.
In this role, you will:
Design / Develop Training Estimates of manpower, personnel, training, management, and acquisition requirements for assigned programs/capabilities
Design / Test analyses for the Job Task Analysis (JTA), Training Situation Analysis (TSA), Training Systems Requirements Analysis (TSRA) and/or Training Situation Document (TSD), Manpower and Training Requirements Planning (MTRP), Training Device Coordinating Paper (TDDCP), Military Characteristic (MC), and Training Effectiveness Evaluation Plan (TEEP) documentation
Analyze / Conduct Manpower and Training Requirements Planning (MTRP) , examining alternative system concepts early in the acquisition process to determine the best possible Manpower Training (MPT) profile for assigned programs/capabilities
Qualifications:

To be successful in this role, you will have:
Masters Degree or ten (10) years related relevant experience; or a Bachelor’s degree plus four (5) years related relevant experience
 Active Secret clearance required
If you are interested in supporting with our military and working with a passionate Serco team then submit your application now for immediate consideration. It only takes a few minutes and could change your career!

Company Overview:

Serco Inc. (Serco) is the Americas division of Serco Group, plc. Serco serves every branch of the U.S. military, numerous U.S. Federal civilian agencies, the Intelligence Community, the Canadian government, state and local governments, and commercial clients. We help our clients deliver vital services more efficiently while increasing the satisfaction of their end customers. Headquartered in Herndon, Virginia, Serco Americas has over 9,000 employees and is part of a $4 billion global business that helps transform government and public services around the world. At Serco, our employees are our most valuable asset - we listen, respect and support them throughout their career at Serco. We invite you to become part of our dynamic team. Serco is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversifying our workforce (Race/ Color/ Sex/ Sexual Orientation/ Gender Identity/ Religion/ National Origin/ Disability/ Vets).
To review Serco benefits please visit: https://www.serco.com/na/careers/benefits-of-choosing-serco.
If you require an accommodation with the application process please email: careers@serco-na.com or call the HR Service Desk at 800-628-6458, option 1. Please note, due to EEOC/OFCCP compliance, Serco is unable to accept resumes by email.
Serco does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies without being a contracted approved vendor. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Serco and will not be obligated to pay a placement or contract fee. If you are interested in becoming an approved vendor at Serco, please email Agencies@serco-na.com.",169.0
111,data+scientist,"At Rockstar Games, we create world-class entertainment experiences.

A career at Rockstar Games is about being part of a team working on some of the most creatively rewarding and ambitious projects to be found in any entertainment medium. You would be welcomed to a dedicated and inclusive environment where you can learn, and collaborate with some of the most talented people in the industry.

Rockstar Games is on the lookout for talented Data Scientists who possess a passion for both games, and big data. This is a full-time permanent position based out of Rockstar's unique game development studio in the heart of Manhattan or our studio in San Diego, CA.

WHAT WE DO
The Rockstar Analytics team provides insights and actionable results to a wide variety of stakeholders across the organization in support of their decision making.
We collaborate as a global team to develop cutting-edge data products, data models, reports, analyses, and machine learning applications.
We are currently adding team members to multiple verticals, including; Platform and Business Intellegence.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Assure Rockstar's ongoing competitive advantage through best-in-class Machine Learning initiatives that have a high potential of applicability in industry.
Identify and contribute to analytical experiments aligned with long-term strategic initiatives.
Develop and contribute to machine learning enabled solutions to address critical live ops questions.
Design, build, and participate in validation tests to assess the efficiency of the model (or algorithm) in place and provide strategic insights to stakeholders who work in varying aspects of the business such as Game Security and Customer Experience.
Conduct proactive in-depth analysis and predictive modeling to respond to emerging live ops situations.
Partner with data analysts, data engineers, data scientists, and stakeholders to better understand requirements, find bottlenecks, and implement resolutions.
Collaborate with the Analytics Tech lead to establish best practices for repeated application.
Work within a team of data analysts and engineers.
QUALIFICATIONS
5+ years in data science or similar role in the gaming, marketing, finance, or technology fields required.
5+ years of experience in machine learning / statistical languages and systems such as Python, R.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field, with a strong quantitative background.
Passion for Rockstar Games and our titles.
SKILLS
Knowledge of machine learning techniques such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Data Mining, Clustering, and Classification.
Experience in pushing models to production and iterating on models in production.
Proficiency in statistics such as distributions, predictive modeling, data validation, statistical testing, and regression.
Ability to develop and maintain good relations and communicate with people at all hierarchical levels.
Strong problem-solving skills.
Ability to reconcile technical and business perspectives.
Autonomy and entrepreneurship.
Strong team spirit.
DESIRED

Please note that these are desirable skills and are not required to apply for the position.

2+ years using SQL (or a SQL-like language) required, other programming experience highly preferred.
Experience with Hadoop and PySpark.
Experience with Azure ML.
Graduate degree (MBA, MSc or Master's, PHD), an asset.
Game industry experience strongly desired.
HOW TO APPLY

Please apply with a resume and cover-letter demonstrating how you meet the skills above. If we would like to move forward with your application, a Rockstar recruiter will reach out to you to explain next steps and guide you through the process.

Rockstar is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and we are committed to hiring, promoting, and compensating employees based on their qualifications and demonstrated ability to perform job responsibilities.

If you've got the right skills for the job, we want to hear from you. We encourage applications from all suitable candidates regardless of age, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, religion, belief, or race.",170.0
112,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Mater’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",171.0
113,data+scientist,"
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Business; or equivalent professional experience
5+ years of relevant experience as a Business Analyst, Data Analyst, or another related occupation
Strong communication skills - both written and verbal
Experience with Microsoft Excel in terms of Pivot Tables, Decks, Automation, ODBC Data sources
3 – 4 Years of experience with SQL and relational databases
Dashboard experience with such Quicksight, Tableau, or other BI reporting tools

Amazon’s Small Business Empowerment program is looking for a talented Business Analyst to join the team and assist with deriving insights through data in support of small businesses. This person will be instrumental in measuring our progress and identifying opportunities to deliver value for small businesses. Our mission is to better understand the needs of Small Businesses WW, ensure that Amazon is aware of these needs, and share externally what Amazon is doing for Small Businesses. The ideal candidate will be comfortable working with large and complex datasets and generating insights to help small businesses thrive on Amazon. They will be comfortable working across a wide range of stakeholders and translating business requirements into meaningful data insights. As we invent new ways to measure our performance, we will need a talented Business Analyst to:

Automate weekly, monthly, and quarterly reporting with a combination of SQL, Excel and BI tools such that can scale globally
Partner with Business, Legal, and Tech stakeholders to understand challenges and provide data/analysis to help drive projects
Uncover trends and correlations through data mining and analysis to develop insights that can help our stakeholders to make effective decisions
Build dashboards and tools that will allow our team and cross-functional partners to self-service their data needs whenever possible
Understand the tools used within the Small Business Empowerment Insights team and drive product and tech solutions with data
Perform ad-hoc queries to support data pulls for stakeholders

This role requires strong attention to detail, excellent analytical abilities, deep knowledge of business intelligence solutions, solid work ethic and drive, the ability to work independently and with primary stakeholders to solve complex medium and large scale issues, the ability to recommend solutions to various problems, and the skill to manage both with and without authority. The successful candidate will be a motivated self-starter, comfortable with ambiguity, and will be comfortable accessing and working with data from multiple sources.


Understanding of data warehousing, data modeling concepts, and building new data tables
Experience with Python, PostgreSQL, and/or R is a plus
Ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions and develop business cases
Ability to demonstrate sound judgment even in ambiguous situations.
Experience working cross-functionally with technical and non-technical individuals
Detail oriented, yet able to look at a wide array of choices and identify what truly matters.
A proven track record of delivering initiatives from conception through completion on time, within budget and on or beyond scope

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",172.0
114,data+scientist,"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!
Position Summary:
As a Sr. Data Scientist in the, Advanced Analytics group at Petco eCommerce, you'll discover insights that drive operational and product strategy for Petco customers. You will lead projects end to end and have the opportunity to work with huge, diverse and rapidly growing data sets to understand our customers pain points and optimize their experience
Essential Job Functions:
Retrieve, synthesize, and present critical data in a format that is immediately useful to answering specific questions or improving system performance.
Analyze historical data to identify trends and support decision making.
Improve upon existing methodologies by developing new data sources, testing model enhancements, and fine-tuning model parameters.
Provide requirements to develop analytic capabilities, platforms, and pipelines. Apply statistical or machine learning knowledge to specific business problems and data.
Build decision-making models and propose solution for the business problem you defined Conduct written and verbal presentation to share insights and recommendations to audiences of varying levels of technical sophistication.
Utilize code (Python/R/SQL) for data analyzing and modeling algorithms
Designs, develops, and presents strategic recommendations that directly address key business questions
Conducts tracking and measurement of KPIs related to recommendations and socializes to the broader teams
Perform predictive modeling and business analysis by leveraging consumer insights to develop, and recommend product/pricing strategies for promotions, seasonal opportunities, forecasting inventories, etc.
Other Duties and Responsibilities
Interact professionally and effectively through verbal and written communication with all professional contacts with emphasis on company interests.
Independently prioritize and accomplish multiple tasks within established timeframes.
Perform other related duties, tasks and responsibilities as required, assigned and directed.
Education and Experience
MS in computer science, artificial intelligence, statistics, physics or related quantitative field. PhD in these fields is a plus.
2+years of experience applying data science/machine learning/deep learning methodologies to real-world problems. Experience with recommendation algorithm, reinforcement learning, deep learning, or NLP is a plus
Expertise in analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional data sets with a variety of tools, including Python, SQ. Experience with big data technologies, disturbed data query and computing engine.
Must be self-driven and passionate about retail and must be customer centric.
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
2+years of experience applying data science/machine learning/deep learning methodologies to real-world problems. Experience with recommendation algorithm, reinforcement/deep learning.
Expertise in analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional data sets with a variety of tools, including Python, SQL. Experience with big data technologies, disturbed data query and computing engine.
Experience deploying machine learning systems using AWS, GCP or Docker. Experience developing customizable, modular, and scalable deep learning algorithms in Tensor-flow/Keras/Pytorch
Have good understanding of statistical theory, distribution, experimental design, multivariable calculus, linear algebra, and how computational algorithms work
Hands on experience with BI tools; Tableau /R shiny/Looker
Ability to explain/present complicated/advanced analytical methodology and results to non-technical audiences
Excellent communication skills
Excellent quantitative modeling, statistical analysis skills and problem-solving skills.
Sophisticated user of statistical tools
Related experience in a retail organization is a strong plus, however strategic consulting and analytics capabilities are the core requirements.

Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
Category: Corporate
Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127
Schedule: Full_time",175.0
115,data+scientist,"Job Type: Full Time
Compensation is commensurate with relevant experience.

Streamlyne is a dynamic, fast-growing enterprise SaaS company that partners with university research departments and independent research institutions. Our aim is to help the research sector become more efficient with their processes so that they can focus on groundbreaking research.

Beyond our research administration software, for the research sector, we have software platforms that leverage Machine Learning (ML) and data analytics. Streamlyne is looking to augment its ML team with a dynamic individual who will help develop amazing products.

The ML Engineer at Streamlyne is a customer-facing member of Streamlyne’s ML project team, plays many important roles, and has a significant impact on the growth of the company and improvement of its ML-based product line.



Please send your resume and cover letter to careers@streamlyne.com along with the title of the position that you are applying for.
The ML Engineer is expected to contribute as follows:

Duties
Work on both new and existing machine learning models. Perform model tuning, data preprocessing, text parsing and normalization.
Proficient in general Python programming, including web services.
Implement and assess various Python packages, modules, and libraries for functionality, including NumPy or other data analytics tools.
Develop and optimize NLP models for rapid iteration of our AI SaaS products.
Diligently document all developed models, packages, and libraries.
Lead or assist in training other team members.
Stay abreast of current trends in the ML/Artificial Intelligence (AI) world and validate/apply relevant practices internally.
Proactively participate in the product meetings and provide demos to executives and other internal/external teams.
Perform other duties as assigned.
This Position Requires You To:
Be able to work at a pace required by a rapidly growing, profit-driven Ed Tech business.
Be driven to acquire and internalize new information quickly.
Possess a natural aptitude for software-supported business processes and design, to include an appreciation for formal logic and a genuine love of problem-solving.
Feel comfortable speaking in front of small and large groups of people.
Coordinate assigned work with other team members and follow up on delegated items.
Possess an intrinsic passion to pursue assigned work to the highest personal ability and integrity.
Be kind, flexible, proactive, and able to maintain productivity in the face of ambiguity.
Appreciate a fast-paced environment in which no two days are the same.
Fit into a group of highly integrated, highly communicative, fundamentally unpolitical and tightly knit but geographically dispersed team.
Proactively analyze personal progress, project progress, potential risk areas, and proactively communicate that analysis to management.
Be effective at working remotely with flexible hours, generally from home, serving Coast-to-Coast time zones and supporting team members in different geographic locations.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree and/or 2-3 years of experience in development, training and optimization of machine learning models.
2 + years of experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP), text preprocessing and cleaning using Python libraries. Exposure to NLTK, Genism and SciPy. Familiar with at least one of the deep learning toolkits, such as PyTorch, TensorFlow and MxNet.
2 + years of experience working on database integration and SQL commands.
1 + years of working experience on implementing transfer learning mechanism and productionizing, optimizing trained Machine Learning model using Flask/Django.
1 + years of experience working with CI/CD pipeline and Git repository is a plus.
1 + years of cloud experience with AWS, Azure or GCP. Working experience with cloud storage systems (e.g., Azure Blob Storage, Azure Web App), and cloud tools used for ML services (e.g., Redis cache) is required.
Experience in Java programming is a huge plus.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Please send your resume and cover letter to careers@streamlyne.com along with the title of the position that you are applying for.",176.0
116,data+scientist,"Applicants : If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.
",179.0
117,data+scientist,"
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Business or equivalent professional experience
5+ years of relevant experience working in an Analytics / Business Intelligence environment
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel, SQL, Python, and relational databases
Experience in working with databases and SQL in a business environment
Demonstrated use of analytical packages and query languages such as SAS, SPSS and SQL
Prior experience in design and execution of analytical projects
Worked extensively in large scale data bases and data warehouses
Previous experience deploying Machine Learning-based algorithms
Understanding of data warehousing, data modeling concepts, and building new data tables
Experience in building automation for reporting
Ability to apply analytical, computer, statistical and quantitative problem solving skills
Ability to demonstrate sound judgment even in ambiguous situations
Strong oral, written and presentation skills combined with the ability to lead group discussions and explain complex solutions

Amazon’s Small Business Empowerment program is looking for a Data Engineer to join the team and assist with deriving insights through data in support of small businesses. Our mission is to better understand the needs of Small Businesses WW, ensure that Amazon is supporting these needs, and share externally what Amazon is doing for Small Businesses.

This role will be responsible for developing robust, scalable data model and framework to support decision making that will empower small businesses on Amazon. You’ll be challenged to innovate using a variety of technologies and data sources, and you will work with top-notch technical and non-technical professionals across multiple organizations and regions in order to develop and deliver complex solutions that will sustain operational excellence. We are looking for someone who is motivated by thinking big, moving fast, and inventing new ways to create and use data and available technologies at Amazon. As a contributor to the Small Business Empowerment Insights team, you will (1) take on projects and make enhancements that improve data processes (e.g., data auditing solutions, management of manually maintained tables, automating, ad-hoc or manual operation steps). (2) build data pipelines to feed data warehousing and modeling solutions for real-time and large-scale offline use cases, (3) perform data modeling to support machine learning model training and offline, batch inference workflows, (4) work closely with Business Analysts and BI Engineers to scale Business Intelligence and explore new data sources and model features, and (5) work closely with Software Development Engineers to support offline data needs.

You will work on project ideas with customers (e.g., analysts, scientists), stakeholders, and engineer peers. You help balance customer requirements with team requirements and help your team evolve by actively participating in the code review process, design discussions, team planning, and ticket/metric reviews. You focus on operational excellence, constructively identifying problems and proposing solutions and you are able to train new peers about how team data solutions are constructed, how they operate, how secure they are, and how they fit into the bigger picture.

This role requires strong attention to detail, excellent analytical abilities, deep knowledge of business intelligence solutions, solid work ethic and drive, the ability to work independently and with primary stakeholders to solve complex medium and large scale issues, the ability to recommend solutions to unstructured problems, and the skill to manage both with and without authority. The successful candidate will be a motivated self-starter, comfortable with ambiguity, and will be comfortable extracting data from various sources to design/construct/execute complex data architectures that help to solve business problems.

Responsibilities include:

Design, implement, and support analytical infrastructure
Interface with other technology teams to extract, transform, and load data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL, Python, and AWS big data technologies.
Explore and learn the latest technologies to provide new capabilities and increase efficiency.
Collaborate with Business Analysts and Business Intelligence Engineers (BIEs) to recognize and help adopt best practices in reporting and analysis: data integrity, test design, analysis, validation, and documentation.
Collaborate with other tech teams to implement advanced analytics algorithms that exploit our rich datasets for statistical analysis, prediction, clustering and machine learning.
Help continually improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, automating or simplifying self-service support for customers
Provide wing-to-wing data engineering support for project lifecycle execution (project planning, execution, risk assessment and system availability)
Participate in developing strategy recommendations
Experience in e-commerce
Exposure to software development lifecycle
Ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions and develop business cases
Experience working cross-functionally with technical and non-technical individuals
Analytical mindset and ability to see the big picture and influence others
Ability to work effectively in a multi-task, high volume environment
Ability to be adaptable and flexible in responding to deadlines and workflow fluctuations
A proven track record of delivering initiatives from conception through completion on time, within budget and on or beyond scope

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",180.0
118,data+scientist,"Applicants : If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.
",181.0
119,data+scientist,"GROW WITH US:
Tandem Diabetes Care is dedicated to making the lives of people with diabetes better and better through relentless innovation. “In Tandem” means together, and we strive to embody that in every aspect of our business.
DIABETES IS ALL WE DO:
At Tandem, Diabetes is all we do. We are the makers of the only color, touch-screen insulin pump that is capable of remote feature updates and compatibility with continuous glucose monitoring. Read more about our company and check out our latest product features and capabilities here: t:slim X2™ Insulin Pump with Control-IQ™ Technology
In addition to innovative technology, we have a culture that fosters the idea that the happiest people are the most productive people. We treat our fellow employees like friends and family, and the company like our own home. This universal respect allows us the freedom to be ourselves and to be effective at our jobs, knowing at the end of the day that we can trust everyone to do the right thing, for each other and for the company. You can learn more about our culture and life at tandem here: https://www.tandemdiabetes.com/careers/life-at-tandem and See what our customers are saying here: #tsliminthewild
A DAY IN THE LIFE:
The Sr. Workforce Data Analyst is responsible for aligning the company’s staffing needs with customer demand while reducing labor costs by finding efficiencies in how we leverage our resources. This role is responsible for forecasting, intraday staffing analysis, scheduling, service level management and ensuring business continuity for multiple call center functions and locations. This role supports multiple functional areas with long-range planning, short-term scheduling, and real-time service level management. The Sr. Workforce Data Analyst will support the Workforce Management Supervisor as a primary point of contact for strategic data analysis and recommendations to the Technical Support department leaders, as well as other company stakeholders.
YOU’RE AWESOME AT:
6 years of call center experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent (business, math, statistics, or comparable analytic field)
5 years of WFM experience in a multi-channel call center environment. with at least 300 employees and utilizing multiple service channels (phone/email/text/chat) and multiple languages.
Two years of experience in trend analysis.
Experience with WFM Tools, including Reporting and Analysis systems, such as InContact, IEX, Power BI, Calabrio, Genesys, and Avaya.
Must be highly proficient on computers, excellent knowledge and use of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Comfortable reporting and presenting data to call-center staff and company management
Strong knowledge of workforce management calculations and contact center key performance indicators in a multi-time zone, multi-lingual, omnichannel (phone/email/text/chat) service environment.
Strong data analysis experience; experience compiling data metrics.
Mathematical or statistical course work.
Superior quantitative and critical thinking skills.
EXTRA AWESOME:
Develops and maintains hiring forecasts, incorporating complex factors such as customer demand, expected employee turnover, planned efficiency gains, new product launches and other marketing initiatives.
Creates and maintains metrics related to workforce management, to include forecasting, call center statistics, capacity planning and scheduling.
Accountable for meeting call center service level goals.
Performs analysis on metrics to make scheduling recommendations to management that are appropriate to call volume projections in order to achieve service level goals and maximize efficiency.
Maintains accurate measures of forecasts, capacity plans and schedule plans by individual team members, by specific phone queues, and by the department in order to optimize staffing requirements.
Proactively forecasts and builds mitigation plans for staffing gaps and challenges; Simulates different scenarios and develops contingency plans for unexpected events.
Oversees root-cause analysis to determine and quantify reasons for forecast variance and recommends changes to enhance forecast accuracy and effectiveness.
Generates ideas for performance-based incentives aimed at motivating employees.
Monitors call and other service queues and makes necessary adjustments based on seasonal variations, agent vacations, holidays, product launches, or other cyclical patterns that impact call volume.
Identifies areas of opportunity for quality or productivity improvements for call center staff and reports the impact of these process improvements.
Recommends the best times for meetings, training, new hire classes, etc. based upon predicted service levels.
Ensures that forecasts, capacity plans and schedules are generated in a timely and precise fashion.
WHAT’S IN IT FOR YOU?
At Tandem, our employees are just as important as our customers! Not only do we hire the best, we reward, develop, and retain them too. At Tandem we offer competitive compensation packages, superb medical, dental and vision, a discounted stock purchasing plan, fitness discounts, generous PTO, casual work attire and more! For a full list of benefits please review our perks page at https://www.tandemdiabetes.com/careers/benefits.
BE YOU, WITH US!
We’re always looking for awesome, forward-thinking achievers to join our workforce. We are committed to making sure our company fully reflects the diverse consumers who use our product. We are making strides towards this goal and are firmly committed to being an equal opportunity employer and maintaining a diverse and inclusive environment.
REFERRALS:
We love a good referral! If you know someone that would be a great fit for this position, please share!
If you are applying for this job and live in California, please read Tandem’s CCPA Notice:
https://www.tandemdiabetes.com/careers/california-consumer-privacy-act-notice-for-job-applicants",182.0
120,data+scientist,"
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent combination of technical education and experience
7+ years of software development experience with at least 3 years in a Software Development Manager role.
3+ years experience building distributed systems
1+ years working directly with customers and 3rd party partners
A strong track record of project delivery for large, cross-functional projects
Experience with modern programming languages (Java, C#, Python) and open-source technologies.

At AWS AI, we strive to make it easy for our customers to deploy machine learning models on any endpoint in the cloud or at the edge. Just as SageMaker provides a complete set of services to simplify the task of building and training a Machine Learning model, Neo compiles any machine learning model on any hardware for the best performance. Edge Manager enables running those models efficiently on Edge devices. This role owns the cloud services for both of these two strategic AWS AI SageMaker services. https://aws.amazon.com/sagemaker/edge-manager/ https://aws.amazon.com/sagemaker/neo/
Neo optimizes machine learning models to perform at up to twice the speed of the original framework with no loss in accuracy. Neo can optimize a pre-trained model built with MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, or XGBoost or multiple other frameworks, to a chosen target hardware platform. The Neo runtime uses less than 100th of the space of the framework to run the model on the target hardware. Amazon SageMaker Edge Manager provides a software agent that runs on edge devices for model inference and a separate cloud service for managing models on edge devices.
You will manage and grow a team of software developers with backgrounds in machine learning, distributed systems, AI accelerators, and 24/7 production operations. You will have a passion for operational excellence, scale, fault tolerance, and performance. This role has a significant and direct impact to the business.

Key Responsibilities:

Responsible for the overall software development and deployment life cycle
Execution against project plans and delivery commitments;
Manage the day-to-day activities of the engineering team within an Agile/Scrum environment
Manage departmental resources, staffing, mentoring, and enhancing and maintaining a best-of-class engineering team
Work closely with the engineers to architect and develop the best technical design and approach
Work with customers and PMs on product road map definition
Translate requirements into technical specifications for robust, scalable, supportable solutions that work well within the overall system architecture.

Join us to help AWS customers deploy machine learning models in the cloud and on edge devices at scale in production.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life balance. It isn’t about how many hours you spend at home or at work; it’s about the flow you establish that brings energy to both parts of your life. We believe striking the right balance between your personal and professional life is critical to life-long happiness and fulfillment. We offer flexibility in working hours and encourage you to find your own balance between your work and personal lives.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior members enjoy one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.


Experience with large scale distributed systems
Experience building and operating mission critical, highly available (24x7) systems
Experience with Machine Learning
Experience building tools for data scientists or developers
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audience
Exceptional customer relationship skills including the ability to discover the true requirements underlying feature requests, recommend alternative technical and business approaches, and lead engineering efforts to meet aggressive timelines with optimal solutions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",183.0
121,data+scientist,"Minimum Qualifications
",185.0
122,data+scientist,"100% REMOTE Sr. Jupyter Machine Learning SWE (Keras TensorFlow Java)***MUST be a U.S. CITIZEN to qualify for a possible future DoD Security Clearance******Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***SUMMARY:Develop highly complex Machine Learning (ML) Deep Learning data analytics and scientific software applications for a U.S. Army***Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***REQUIREMENTS:Ph.D./MSCS/BSCS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related fieldMust be capable of obtaining and holding a U.S. government security clearance5+ years modelling data analysis using Jupyter Notebook (from Java coding)5+ years using Jupyter software as a software engineer5+ years Machine Learning (ML) experience5+ years Feed the conditioned data into Keras or TensorFlow ML deep learning modelsAgile environment expertiseGreat communication skillsAbility to work very autonomously***Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***HIGHLY PREFERRED (but NOT required):Ability to learn how to use Jupyter backend.Our Engine would be configured with a Jupyter notebook that would read in data, perform data conditioning with NumpyGet resulting models and notebook results then display the graphical output from the notebook, etc.Good experience with PythonPreferred industries: DoD, Aerospace, Avionics, Federal Government, etc.Any active or former DoD security clearanceKey Words: Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data ModelingBob A. Russ, MBARegional Director of RecruitingM: 818.568.6948Entegeeentegee.comThis message is intended only for the designated recipient(s). It may contain confidential or proprietary information and may be subject to other contractual or confidentiality protection. If you are not a designated recipient, you may not review, copy or distribute this message. If you receive this message in error, please notify the sender by reply email and delete this message.Entegee, part of The Adecco Group North America headquartered at 10151 Deerwood Park Boulevard, Building 200, Suite 400, Jacksonville, Florida, 32256, is committed to data privacy compliance. To learn more about how we collect and process personal information, please read our General Privacy Policy located on the website above.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $65.00 - $95.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceLife insuranceReferral programRetirement planSchedule:8 hour shiftDay shiftMonday to FridayOvertimeCOVID-19 considerations:100% REMOTEApplication Question(s):Do you have a U.S. Citizenship to qualify for a DoD security clearance?Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Jupyter and Machine Learning (ML): 5 years (Required)Deep Learning (Keras TensorFlow): 5 years (Required)Data Science, Data Analytics, Data Modeling: 5 years (Required)Python or NumPy: 3 years (Preferred)Jupyter data extraction from Java coding: 3 years (Required)Department of Defense, Aerospace, etc.: 2 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Confidential (Preferred)Work Location:Fully Remote",186.0
123,data+scientist,"SUMMARY
Arcticom, a subsidiary of Bering Straits Native Corporation is currently seeking a Statistician for Naval Special Warfare Preparatory Course Training and Support Services. The Statistician will collect and interpret data regarding the training course and test results of students.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
The Essential Duties and Responsibilities are intended to present a descriptive list of the range of duties performed for this position, and are not intended to reflect all duties performed within the job. Other duties may be assigned.
Execute responsibilities that require professional knowledge of statistics to include, but not limited to, collecting and interpreting data, data analysis, forecasting, trends, and predictions.
Apply statistical theories, techniques, and methods to program results and data. Prepare data for tracking.
Gather and interpret quantified information to include, but not limited to, run, swim, and academic and physical test results.
Provide analysis through mathematical modeling.
Communicate through point papers or power point presentations about any changes, strengths, or weaknesses derived through statistical findings. Coordinate guidance, feedback, and program evaluation prior to implementation.
Submit statistical reports, determined to be necessary, in order to document program effectiveness.
Enter course related information into Naval Special Warfare Center databases.
Monitor trends in attrition and performance and communicate these trends through electronic media
Provide a statistical analysis of student success/failure rates and PST trends in a per class report, semi-annually

QUALIFICATIONS - EXPERIENCE, EDUCATION AND CERTIFICATION
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to satisfactorily perform each essential duty. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Required (Minimum) Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics or Computer Science, or related degree.
Minimum of three (3) years’ recent experience conducting statistical analysis and related duties in a training environment.
Ability to pass an extensive background check
Security+ or ability to pass certification

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Other Characteristics
Must have the ability to communicate statistical methods, findings, limitations & suggestions to a non-technical audience.
Must have strong business writing and oral communication skills, fluent in English (reading, writing, speaking and comprehension).
Must have the ability to organize, prioritize and perform multiple tasks with little or no supervision.
Must have advanced abilities in current versions of MS Office (Word, Excel, Adobe and Outlook).
Execute responsibilities that require professional knowledge of statistics to include, but not limited to, collecting and interpreting data, data analysis, forecasting, trends, and predictions.
Apply statistical theories, techniques, and methods to program results and data. Prepare data for tracking.
Gather and interpret quantified information to include, but not limited to, run, swim, and academic and physical test results.
Provide analysis through mathematical modeling.
Communicate with the COR and the Chain of Command through point papers or power point presentations about any changes, strengths, or weaknesses derived through statistical findings. Coordinate guidance, feedback, and program evaluation with the COR and NSWO OIC prior to implementation.
Submit statistical reports, determined to be necessary by the COR, in order to document program effectiveness.
Enter course related information into Naval Special Warfare Center databases.
Monitor trends in attrition and performance and communicate these trends through electronic media to the COR.
Provide a statistical analysis of student success/failure rates and PST trends in a per class report, semi-annually to the COR

Preferred
Practical experience with data cleaning and geospatial datasets.
Experience with ggplot and language R.
Experience with statistical programming language (R, Python)
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with SQL

PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Must maintain a constant state of mental alertness at all times. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential and marginal functions may require maintaining physical condition necessary for bending, stooping, sitting, walking or standing for prolonged periods of time; most of time is spent sitting in a comfortable position with frequent opportunity to move about.

WORK ENVIRONMENT
Work Environment characteristics described here are representative of those that must be borne by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Job is performed in an office setting with exposure to computer screens and requires extensive use of a computer, keyboard, mouse and multi-line telephone system. The work described herein is primarily a modern office setting. Occasional travel may be required.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
No supervisory responsibilities.

ADDITIONAL QUALIFYING FACTORS
As a condition of employment, may be required to pass a pre-employment drug screening, as well as have acceptable reference and background check results to obtain access to military base. Must have reliable transportation to/from work a necessity and must be able to obtain access to military installations.

Shareholder Preference. BSNC gives hiring, promotion, training and retention preference to BSNC shareholders, shareholder descendants and shareholder spouses who meet the minimum qualifications for the job.

Bering Straits Native Corporation is an Equal Opportunity/ AA/ Male/ Female/ Disability/ Vets employer.
We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program. We are a drug free workplace.",187.0
124,data+scientist,"About Us
SOCi is an award-winning all-in-one local marketing platform built specifically for ""next-level"" multi-location marketers. Our customers include top brands and influencers like Ace Hardware, Sport Clips, and Anytime Fitness who have the impossible challenge of managing their digital presence across hundreds and thousands of locations. The SOCi platform empowers local management of the entire customer journey across multiple mediums including local business listings, social, reviews, listening, ads, bots, and more. As the central command for multi-location marketers, SOCi makes the impossible possible by enabling top brands and their locations to strengthen and scale their digital presence across limitless local search and social pages while protecting what matters most, their reputation.
Our accolades include:
Recently closed a Series D investment round of $80 million, led by JMI Equity
Inc. 5000 honoree three years in a row for Fastest Growing Companies in America
Entrepreneur magazine’s #1 Marketing Provider for Franchises, and top provider three years in a row
Front Runner for Gartner’s SoftwareAdvice.com in Reputation Management & Brand Management
Top 200 rank on Financial Times The Americas’ Fastest Growing Companies two years in a row
Forbes America’s Best Startup Employers
We’re looking for a Sr. Data Analyst Business Intelligence and Analytics who will support driving the strategic and day-to-day efforts to capture business intelligence and to provide meaningful analytics and actionable insights to progress SOCi business goals.This role will provide actionable insights and visibility to business trends processing several different types of data. The focus of this work will be organized into daily, weekly, and monthly reporting deliverables, and often require additional deep dives into certain KPI’s where executives may have additional questions or need further insights. You will play a critical role in delivering world class GTM reporting to Sales, Marketing, Customer Success, and other GTM functions.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with stakeholders to identify critical business objectives, brainstorming solutions enabled by analytics, scoping analytics projects and deliverables
Assist in building out processes and tools focused on data preparations, data integration, data exploration, data visualization, ETL development, data warehousing and modelling techniques.
Find trends and patterns within the data to help answer “What’s working, what’s not?”
Manage internal and external data sources for information and enhance data integrity and quality to provide actionable analytical insights into core business decisions such as prioritization of growth opportunities.
Perform reporting and analysis on core go-to-market KPI’s providing key insights for driving our go-to-market strategy
Lead projects and work streams end-to-end, from project management, research, analysis and recommendations. This includes projects focused on territory planning, target account selection, pipeline forecast accuracy, customer health, customer churn rates, deal velocity, funnel analytics
Identify trends across our marketing and sales pipeline generation, marketing channel metrics, sales cycles, close rates, activity ratios, renewals, and churn rates, reviewing for insights with deep understanding of Marketing, Sales, and Customer Success best practices and benchmarks
Experience building models for Annual Operating Planning: Bookings, Capacity, Quota, Compensation, Pipeline, Forecast, etc.
Solid understanding of CRM systems, quote to cash management infrastructures and analytics around sales pipeline modeling.
Define and socialize universal KPIs and dashboards to track performance and success of efforts linked to business outcomes
Required Skills + Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Intelligence, Analytics ,Computer Information Systems, Mathematics or related field required
At least 4+ years experience in a Data Analytics, Business Intelligence, Reporting, or similar role, preferably in a high-growth B2B Enterprise SaaS environment.
Strong expertise with Excel, BI tools and ERP systems (i.e. Tableau, Alteryx, Netsuite)
Outstanding SQL data architecting/engineering (relational and dimensional data modeling) a plus
Experience with Python/R for data manipulation/modelling a plus
Experience with statistical modeling a plus
Very experienced with Salesforce
Ability to drive projects from conception through delivery and to translate business needs into actionable results
Understanding of sales methodology and the disciplines necessary to drive efficient sales execution at scale
Self-starter mentality and entrepreneurial spirit with a strong drive for excellence and delivery of results
Ability to operate in a lean, fast-paced organization, and to create a vision and organization that can scale quickly
What's SOCi's culture like?
Led by a team of industry experts, SOCi is leading the pack in Social Media and Reputation Management. Our passionate team of SOCialites work at convenient locations in both San Diego, CA and Austin, TX. We offer flexible PTO, comprehensive health & benefits packages and 401k (amongst many other perks). Every new team member is equipped with a MacBook laptop, tech accessories & SOCi swag. We are a fast-paced, agile environment where thought leadership and input is encouraged. If you are looking for a place where you can come and make a difference in the way enterprise organizations utilize social technology, then SOCi is for you.
SOCi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

K2BuPBFIzq",190.0
125,data+scientist,"Hi, We’re AppFolio.
We’re innovators, changemakers, and collaborators. We’re more than just a software company — we’re a cloud-based powerhouse that creates products to make our customers’ lives easier. We’re revolutionizing the way people do business, and we want your ideas, your enthusiasm, and your passion to help us keep on innovating.
The Senior Data Scientist customer insights will bring together quantitative and qualitative data and be responsible for the ongoing analysis, reporting, and insight identification for key Customer Experience programs and metrics such as but not limited to NPS and VOC. As part of the CX team, build a focused set of CX metrics used across the business as predictive measures that improve the customer experience, and drive business outcomes.
We love where we work, and you can, too.
What You’ll Do
Build & launch predictive CX metrics - partner with segments to drive higher adoption, ARPU & NPS aligned with PAOP for APM real estate.
CX metrics suite - correlation and causation measures with financial | business outcomes (Ideal promoter profile - classification model)
Design, build and launch adoption measures including playbooks for a product, customer success & marketing teams
Design, build and launch time to value and experience metrics for customers
Own CX Metrics & NPS (all) reporting across customer segments, & services
Champion NPS program, insights, and action planning across the Real Estate business to drive a 5 -10 point increase in NPS in targeted customer segments
Establish a regular cadence for reporting out across the business key customer experience insights for strategic advantage and growth.
VOC platform adoption across product segments and customer success
Data mine key moments in the customer’s journey to determine root causes
Conduct analysis to identify opportunities, highlight strengths, and provide recommended corrective actions (DBs, Insights, etc.)
Bring CX quant and qual insights to help redesign user (customer’s) experience using products and services
In partnership with Sr. Service designer, build compelling data-driven user stories to drive redesign resulting in XY metric/impact.
Identify and champion impactful customer experience insights aligned to our key business priorities across APM customer segments, markets, and offerings.
Partnership with CX team to launch a quarterly insights report or research to highlight quant and qual CX insights
Build and contribute to the cx roadmap utilizing the insights.
What We’re Looking For
Strategic Thinking. Ability to create and execute against a clear framework for defining a predictive set of Customer Experience metrics that drive business outcomes. Deep knowledge of CX metrics industry trends, best practices, and technology capabilities.
Tireless Advocate for the Customer. Lead with the customer’s voice in everything you do and instill the customer mindset across the organization.
Analytical Skills. Able to synthesize quantitative and qualitative data across varied customer listening posts to draw impactful insights that inform strategy and prioritization.
Agile & Experimentation Mindset. Unafraid to take innovative approaches to problems and bring other’s creative ideas forward with an agile “progress over perfection” mindset.
Business Acumen. Ability to connect the dots and communicate how customer experience efforts and metrics can impact business priorities and commit to delivering explicit business outcomes.
Communication. Exceptional storyteller with the ability to weave together data, insights, and voice of the customer to inspire an organization to action.
CX Industry Expertise. Develop expertise, knowledge, and connections of CX industry, best practices, and experts to inform the work we do and how we operate.
Must-Haves
Advanced degree or equivalent work experience in Data Science
Minimum of 3-5 years in Customer Success, Customer experience functions within medium to large enterprise software organizations
Our Story
AppFolio (NASDAQ: APPF) was founded in 2006 with the mission to revolutionize vertical industry businesses by providing great software and service. Our easy-to-use, cloud-based software helps our customers more effectively market, manage, and grow their businesses. Our software solutions exist in the real estate vertical, including AppFolio Property Manager and AppFolio Investment Management.
To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.",192.0
126,data+scientist,"Job Description
We are:
Applied Intelligence, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us? Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds? Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.
You are:
As a manager working at Accenture you will work on a team with diverse clients and industries delivering analytics solutions and help clients turn data into actionable insights that drive tangible outcomes, improve performance and help clients lead the market. This position requires in-depth understanding and use of statistical and data analysis tools.
The work:
You must be able to effectively use and lead teams using statistical, data mining, machine learning, and/or deep learning techniques in delivering data science insights
Work closely with internal Accenture teams and clients to understand challenges and create solutions
Stay abreast of technology trends in artificial intelligence
Provide thought leadership within projects and leading technologies
Lead a small team of data scientists

Here’s what you need:
At least 5 years using statistics and data science
At least 5 years developing Machine Learning, regression, optimization, recommendation, and neural networks, among other techniques
At least 5 years working with data science tools like Python, R, Scala, Julia, or SAS
A Bachelor’s degree in data science and a related discipline like mathematics, statistics, computer science or physics
Bonus points if:
You have a Master’s degree in data science and related disciplines as data science, mathematics, statistics, operational research, computer science, physics, or related fields.
You have worked as a consultant on big data projects
Working knowledge of data querying (e.g. Spark SQL, SQL, Workbench, MS Access) and Ad-hoc Data Analysis, Reporting` Dashboard and Visualization (Tableau, Power BI, Qlikview)
You’re passionate, creative, and forward thinking
You have experience working with cloud services like AWS, Google, and Azure.
You know how to use big data tools like Hadoop, Hive, and Spark
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",194.0
127,data+scientist,"Job Description
We are:
Applied Intelligence, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us? Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds? Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.
You are:
As a manager working at Accenture you will work on a team with diverse clients and industries delivering analytics solutions and help clients turn data into actionable insights that drive tangible outcomes, improve performance and help clients lead the market. This position requires in-depth understanding and use of statistical and data analysis tools.
The work:
You must be able to effectively use and lead teams using statistical, data mining, machine learning, and/or deep learning techniques in delivering data science insights
Work closely with internal Accenture teams and clients to understand challenges and create solutions
Stay abreast of technology trends in artificial intelligence
Provide thought leadership within projects and leading technologies
Lead a small team of data scientists

Here’s what you need:
At least 5 years using statistics and data science
At least 5 years developing Machine Learning, regression, optimization, recommendation, and neural networks, among other techniques
At least 5 years working with data science tools like Python, R, Scala, Julia, or SAS
A Bachelor’s degree in data science and a related discipline like mathematics, statistics, computer science or physics
Bonus points if:
You have a Master’s degree in data science and related disciplines as data science, mathematics, statistics, operational research, computer science, physics, or related fields.
You have worked as a consultant on big data projects
Working knowledge of data querying (e.g. Spark SQL, SQL, Workbench, MS Access) and Ad-hoc Data Analysis, Reporting` Dashboard and Visualization (Tableau, Power BI, Qlikview)
You’re passionate, creative, and forward thinking
You have experience working with cloud services like AWS, Google, and Azure.
You know how to use big data tools like Hadoop, Hive, and Spark
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",195.0
128,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com.
We are:
Applied Intelligence, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.
You are:
Both a data maven and a strategist with serious analytical and statistical chops who can architect and lead business transformation projects from start to finish. You know how to interrogate data to get insights to inform strategy and drive business optimization. Clients listen to you because you are a strong communicator and passionate problem-solver - and have the skill depth and moxie to back it up
The work:
Manage strategy development and functional insight operating model skills to influence client digital agenda.Partner with clients to make bold decisions intersecting business and digital technology operations.Understand client industry landscape in the context of economic social trends.Adapt and implement digital transformation solutions and driver value led work.Map clients state of digital maturity, leveraging and embedding data science in digital strategy development and implementation.

Here’s what you need:
Bachelor degree or Master degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, econometrics, mathematics, marketing, or operations analysis. Double bonus if you have a PhD.4+ years using AI and data science to achieve business goals in large orgs4+ years working in Healthcare, Technology, Software, Products, or Resources industry; strong familiarity with common industry use cases4+ years working in a consulting capacity helping clients make their companies work better
Bonus points if:
3+ years heading up teams, juggling multiple projects from multiple locations3+ years of strategy experienceYou are a gifted communicator and presenterYou know your way around ML and AI technical architecture
Racking up those air miles will have to wait, as weekly non-essential travel to client sites Monday through Thursday is currently suspended. For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only. Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $185,399and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",196.0
129,data+scientist,"Applicants : If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.
",197.0
130,data+scientist,"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!
Position Summary:

As a Senior Data Scientist in the newly created Enterprise Analytics and Data Science team at Petco, you'll lead projects to build Petco’s Omnichannel experience by working on machine learning models in the areas of customer, pricing, inventory, space and assortment. These ML models will help discover insights that drive customer, operational and product strategy for Stores, eCommerce and Services. A majority of your time will be spent working on the following:
Data generation: Use customer, operational and interaction data to build datasets that can be consumed by various models and reports in the company.

Analytical modeling: Data modeling, exploratory data analysis, and feature selection using advanced statistical methods and techniques.

Model Validation: Calibrating models to provide interpretable and repeatable outputs by using various metrics like ROC, RMSE, quantile loss, etc.

Deployment: Model output will be consumed by various teams to create a customer experience that is the best in the industry.

Documentation: Clear documentation of the objective, statistical model, and results.
Essential Job Functions: The incumbent must be able to perform all of the following duties and responsibilities with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Build, maintain, optimize, and productionize machine learning frameworks to quantify the impact our actions on Petco’s omni-channel business.
Create new data pipelines using the latest technologies that seamlessly integrate with multiple databases at Petco.
Retrieve, synthesize, and present critical data in a format that is immediately useful to answering specific questions or improving system performance.
Identify scalable opportunities by analyzing historical data and collaborate with business stakeholders to assess their impact.
Improve upon existing methodologies by developing new data sources, testing model enhancements, and fine-tuning model parameters.
Provide requirements to develop analytic capabilities, platforms, and pipelines.
Apply statistical or machine learning knowledge to identify and solve specific business problems and data.
Conduct written and verbal presentation to share insights and recommendations to audiences of varying levels of technical sophistication.
Utilize code (Python/R/SQL) for data analyzing and modeling algorithms.
Conducts tracking and measurement of KPIs related to multiple business areas.

Education and Experience

MS/PhD in Statistics, Math, Engineering, Economics or related field
Previous experience working with Machine Learning/Deep Learning for real world problems in a corporate environment is a must.
Must be self-driven and passionate about retail and must be customer centric.
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
4+ years’ experience in business analytics and data science
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with multiple analytics tools required; Python or R required.
Hands on experience with BI tools; Tableau /R shiny/Looker
Ability to explain/present complicated/advanced analytical methodology and results to non-technical executive audiences
Excellent communication skills
Advanced quantitative modeling, statistical analysis skills, programming and problem-solving skills.
Related experience in a retail organization is a strong plus
Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
Category: Corporate
Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127
Schedule: Full_time",199.0
131,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
A data expert with serious analytical and statistical chops. As a Manager with Accenture you will lead and grow a business leveraging and growing a data science team working with diverse clients and industries. You know how to take massive amounts of data and find the insights our clients need to help their companies do more. You have a deep understanding of applied behavioral insights from fields including behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development. You take a data-driven approach to designing experiments and analyzing data, with an excellent ability to communicate results to a diverse stakeholder group.
The work:
Lead and grow a data science business across our North American market
Develop custom models based on in-depth understanding of underlying data, data structures, and business problems to ensure analytics deliverables meet client needs
Develop standard models, solutions and assets that can be used as accelerators for similar problems across clients
Define and assess the behaviors required to enable the success of a client’s data strategy and enable the adoption of data analytics tools and solutions
Define the challenges clients face in utilizing data and insights, while understanding and identifying explanations for the underlying patterns of behaviors that contribute and can be changed
Apply human-centered design principles to understand challenges, designing and prototyping behavior change initiatives
Lead the co-design and implementation of experiments focused on behavioral change, with the potential to scale and embed solutions and processes if successful
Design and test new experiences which trigger behavioral change in the context of work
Identify the emergence of new patterns of behavior within the organization over-time
Use your judgment to craft solutions to complex problems or seek guidance as needed
Report on your progress regularly in writing and face-to-face
Stay up to date on new products that clients could use
Work with peers and senior colleagues in Accenture and at client companies

Here’s what you need:
At least 7 years of demonstrated experience in the application of analytics, behavioral science, psychology, and organizational development in sophisticated and complex environments including the use of simulation and modeling tools
At least 7 years of experiences in identifying key business use cases and developing solutions/assets to drive quick pilot/implementation
At least 5 years of leading teams and performing data analytics and modeling with advanced languages like Python
Bachelor's Degree (advanced degree preferred) or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
Bonus points if:
You can technically lead data science projects
You have client-facing experience and working with C-level executives
You have experience with cloud platforms / services, big data tools, and deploying analytics as a service
You have a graduate degree
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $141,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",201.0
132,data+scientist,"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!
Position Summary:

As a Principal Data Scientist in the newly created Enterprise Analytics and Data Science team at Petco, you'll lead the design and build of production level machine learning models to optimizing pricing decisions for Stores, eCommerce and Services. You’ll lead the data science roadmap to test various pricing strategies and frameworks. You’ll test hypotheses by combining data observations, and developing innovative mathematical and statistical pricing models. A majority of your time will be spent working on the following:
Hypothesis/Roadmap Formulation: Observe customer behavior to define hypothesis to test in the areas of CRM, Pricing, Promotions, Inventory or Merchandizing
Data generation: Use internal customer interactions and transactions online and in store and external data sources to build datasets that can be consumed by various models and reports for models
Analytical modeling: Data modeling, exploratory data analysis, and feature selection using advanced statistical methods and techniques.
Model Validation: Calibrating models to provide interpretable and repeatable outputs by using various metrics like ROC, RMSE, quantile loss, etc.
Deployment: Model output will be consumed by various teams to create a customer experience that is the best in the industry.
Documentation: Clear documentation of the objective, statistical model, and results.
Essential Job Functions: The incumbent must be able to perform all of the following duties and responsibilities with or without a reasonable accommodation.
Act as company wide SME to Design, Build, maintain, optimize, and productionize machine learning models for the area of assignment
Create new data pipelines using the latest technologies that seamlessly integrate with multiple databases at Petco.
Retrieve, synthesize, and present critical data in a format that is immediately useful to answering specific questions or improving system performance. Identify scalable opportunities to improve our customer lifetime value by driving pricing decisions.
Improve upon existing methodologies by developing new data sources, testing model enhancements, and fine-tuning model parameters.
Provide requirements to develop analytic capabilities, platforms, and pipelines.
Conduct written and verbal presentation to share insights and recommendations to audiences of varying levels of technical sophistication.
Utilize code (Python/R/SQL) for data analyzing and modeling algorithms. Conducts tracking and measurement of KPIs related to multiple business areas. Manage and mentor data scientists to deliver on the roadmap.

Education and Experience

MS/PhD in Statistics, Math, Engineering, Economics or related field
Previous experience working with Machine Learning/Deep Learning for real world problems is a must. Pricing would be a bonus.
You have deep interests in pricing, business strategy, and consumer behavior
Must be self-driven and passionate about retail and must be customer centric.
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
8+ years’ experience in business analytics and data science
Proficient with SQL
Proficiency with multiple analytics tools required; Python or R strongly preferred
Hands on experience with BI tools; Tableau /R shiny/Looker
Ability to explain/present complicated/advanced analytical methodology and results to non-technical audiences
Excellent communication skills
Excellent quantitative modeling, statistical analysis skills and problem-solving skills.
Related experience in a retail organization is a strong plus
Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
Category: Corporate
Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127
Schedule: Full_time",203.0
133,data+scientist,"What drives you? Maybe you want to make the world a better place and tackle new, exciting challenges while disrupting an industry. Maybe you want to solve complex problems in applied machine learning, cloud deployments, or vehicle routing on an unmatched engineering team. Maybe you want to advance your career and work with the brightest minds in freight. If this sounds like you, you've come to the right place!

Interviewing is a two-way street, so let's get to know each other. Here's a little about us:

We're growing fast â€” like, speed-of-light fast. We have 150 new, full-time Flockers and more square feet â€” in Encinitas and Chicago â€” than ever before
We're taking names. Find us on the CNBC Disruptor 50, SDCE 100, SDBJ Diversity & Social Responsibility, and Fast Company World Changing Ideas lists
We've got support. Our investors include SoftBank, Volvo Group Venture Capital, SignalFire, GLP Capital Partners, and GV (formerly Google Ventures)
Efficiency is in our DNA. Our mission is to reinvent North America's $2-trillion freight industry by relentlessly eliminating waste and inefficiency
Algorithms drive our sustainable shared truckload solution. Behind our carbon neutral shared truckload service is world-class tech (and a lot of sweat)
We walk the talk. We make a positive impact in everything we do; our B Corporation certification is proof. We were the first B Corp in our industry
We ask a lot of our people, but take care of them. Our team has a lot to prove and the attitude to do it. Join our high-performance, high-care culture
Pandemics aside, we offer flexible work schedules. Knowing you have a life outside of work, we won't ask you to do your job from the office five days a week

About the role:

We're looking for a quick-learning, motivated senior logistics data analyst to join the team responsible for modeling and assessing key business metrics. Our team is made up of a group of engineers and analysts who are passionate about turning data into actionable insights, developing innovative solutions to key business problems, and continuously improving workflows. As a member of this team, your talent and expertise will help shape the company's strategy.

Responsibilities:

Independently contribute to and champion analytics projects
Serve as our analytics lead for costing and pricing as well as liaison with the data science team
Help drive the evolution of costing, pricing, and market models as both thought leader and executor
Work closely with stakeholders to define requirements, obtain buy-in, and maintain trust in reporting
Build and maintain dashboards, models, and tools to drive decision making and efficiency
Process ad hoc analysis requests and make recommendations to stakeholders
Query and analyze large sets of data from multiple sources and system tools
Engage in multiple projects and initiatives simultaneously
Efficiently manage project queue, develop streamlined workflows, and implement best practices

Qualifications:

BS in a quantitative field
Extensive work experience as a data analyst
Adept at writing SQL/relational database queries
Adept at scripting in Python
Experience with spreadsheeting tools including Excel and Google Sheets
Strong analytical and research skills
Knowledge of statistics and understanding of key business concepts
Experience with economic modeling and market dynamics
Understanding of the freight industry and markets preferred
Exposure to common data science libraries and machine learning techniques preferred
Effective communications skills with demonstrated experience presenting data cross-functionally

A successful candidate will:

Have the desire to join a fast-paced startup
Swiftly adapt to and thrive in a rapidly evolving environment
Proactively find innovative and unique solutions to problems
Exhibit meticulous attention to detail and quality
Be detail-oriented with superior organizational skills.
Learn new tools and techniques quickly

Committed to creating an environment that's fair and inclusive, Flock Freight fills open positions based on qualifications, merit, and business need. We value the skills of people from various backgrounds and are proud to hire, promote, and retain talent from a diverse candidate pool. Diverse perspectives are central to innovation at Flock Freight and make our team better.

Flock Freight has zero tolerance for behavior that negatively impacts marginalized groups, including women, people of color, veterans, immigrants, and members of the LGBTQIA+ community. We invite people of all identities to join the Flock!",205.0
134,data+scientist,"100% REMOTE Sr. Jupyter Machine Learning SWE (Keras TensorFlow Java)***MUST be a U.S. CITIZEN to qualify for a possible future DoD Security Clearance******Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***SUMMARY:Develop highly complex Machine Learning (ML) Deep Learning data analytics and scientific software applications for a U.S. Army***Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***REQUIREMENTS:Ph.D./MSCS/BSCS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or related fieldMust be capable of obtaining and holding a U.S. government security clearance5+ years modelling data analysis using Jupyter Notebook (from Java coding)5+ years using Jupyter software as a software engineer5+ years Machine Learning (ML) experience5+ years Feed the conditioned data into Keras or TensorFlow ML deep learning modelsAgile environment expertiseGreat communication skillsAbility to work very autonomously***Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data Modeling***HIGHLY PREFERRED (but NOT required):Ability to learn how to use Jupyter backend.Our Engine would be configured with a Jupyter notebook that would read in data, perform data conditioning with NumpyGet resulting models and notebook results then display the graphical output from the notebook, etc.Good experience with PythonPreferred industries: DoD, Aerospace, Avionics, Federal Government, etc.Any active or former DoD security clearanceKey Words: Jupyter Notebook Machine Learning Software Engineer ML Deep Learning Keras TensorFlow NumPy Python Java Data Science Data Analytics Data ModelingBob A. Russ, MBARegional Director of RecruitingM: 818.568.6948Entegeeentegee.comThis message is intended only for the designated recipient(s). It may contain confidential or proprietary information and may be subject to other contractual or confidentiality protection. If you are not a designated recipient, you may not review, copy or distribute this message. If you receive this message in error, please notify the sender by reply email and delete this message.Entegee, part of The Adecco Group North America headquartered at 10151 Deerwood Park Boulevard, Building 200, Suite 400, Jacksonville, Florida, 32256, is committed to data privacy compliance. To learn more about how we collect and process personal information, please read our General Privacy Policy located on the website above.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $65.00 - $95.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceLife insuranceReferral programRetirement planSchedule:8 hour shiftDay shiftMonday to FridayOvertimeCOVID-19 considerations:100% REMOTEApplication Question(s):Do you have a U.S. Citizenship to qualify for a DoD security clearance?Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Jupyter and Machine Learning (ML): 5 years (Required)Deep Learning (Keras TensorFlow): 5 years (Required)Data Science, Data Analytics, Data Modeling: 5 years (Required)Python or NumPy: 3 years (Preferred)Jupyter data extraction from Java coding: 3 years (Required)Department of Defense, Aerospace, etc.: 2 years (Preferred)Security Clearance:Confidential (Preferred)Work Location:Fully Remote",207.0
135,data+scientist,"Combine two of the fastest-growing fields on the planet with a culture of performance, collaboration and opportunity and this is what you get. Leading edge technology in an industry that's improving the lives of millions. Here, innovation isn't about another gadget, it's about making health care data available wherever and whenever people need it, safely and reliably. There's no room for error. Join us and start doing your life's best work.(sm)
The Senior NLP Developer is a key contributor in the design and development of state-of-the-art NLP for medical applications. The Sr NLP Developer works closely with other NLP developers, engineers and subject matter experts on current company technologies and forward looking projects.


Primary responsibilities include the enhancement and maintenance of existing company NLP technologies and extension of those systems to new clinical domains and applications. Emphasis is placed on the augmentation of various clinical knowledge resources (lexicons, nomenclatures, hierarchies, ontologies and rule systems) underlying the core NLP and AI modules. Emphasis is also placed on evaluation of the performance of those components on clinical documentation at scale in production environments. Work includes the generation and interpretation of domain/solution analytics, and, in collaboration with engineering, enhancement of the underlying NLP modules and functionality.


The successful candidate will have a background in linguistics and/or natural language processing, demonstrable strength with at least one scripting or programming language, an interest in the medical domain, and a proven aptitude for technology.
You’ll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.
You’ll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.
Required Qualifications:
Degree in Linguistics, Computer Science, or other Computational discipline
2+ years of related professional work experience - significant academic NLP development experience will be considered for strong applicants with advanced degree
Knowledge of algorithms and techniques within a computational domain with emphasis on text processing
Knowledge and experience with natural language processing or formal linguistics: morphology, syntax and semantics
Knwledge and strength with at least one of the following: Java, C#, Python
Experience with SQL

Preferred Qualifications:
Graduate degree
Experience with ontologies
Experience within the medical domain
Solid communication and presentation skills
Ability to work independently and as part of a collaborative team

Technology Careers with Optum. Information and technology have amazing power to transform the health care industry and improve people's lives. This is where it's happening. This is where you'll help solve the problems that have never been solved. We're freeing information so it can be used safely and securely wherever it's needed. We're creating the very best ideas that can most easily be put into action to help our clients improve the quality of care and lower costs for millions. This is where the best and the brightest work together to make positive change a reality. This is the place to do your life's best work.(sm)
Colorado Residents Only: The salary range for Colorado residents is $79,700 to $142,600. Pay is based on several factors including but not limited to education, work experience, certifications, etc. As of the date of this posting, In addition to your salary, UHG offers the following benefits for this position, subject to applicable eligibility requirements: Health, dental, and vision plans; wellness program; flexible spending accounts; paid parking or public transportation costs; 401(k) retirement plan; employee stock purchase plan; life insurance, short-term disability insurance, and long-term disability insurance; business travel accident insurance; Employee Assistance Program; PTO; and employee-paid critical illness and accident insurance.
*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Group’s Telecommuter Policy.
Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.
UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.
Job Keywords: NLP Developer , Telecommute, Telecommuter, Telecommuting, Work at Home, Work from Home, Remote",208.0
136,data+scientist,"
",209.0
137,data+scientist,"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!
Position Summary

The Director of Inventory Analytics and Data Science will serve as the head of inventory analytics and data science for Petco Enterprise. The individual requires critical thought leadership focused on developing analytical processes, tools and strategy for driving improved performance throughout inventory lifecycle. The role is responsible for growing and managing a team of varied levels of analysts and data scientists by setting a compelling strategic vision for the team. The individual will be responsible for leading advanced analytical modeling, simulation and optimization projects. The incumbent will be laser focused in search of opportunities to build long-lasting relationships with Petco’s customers.
Essential Job Functions: The incumbent must be able to perform all of the following duties and responsibilities with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Oversee the entire lifecycle of inventory from Inventory Flow to Capacity Allocation to Fulfillment Centers.

Control key inventory health metrics such as in-stocks, safety stocks and vendor fill rates by engaging with Transportation, Logistics, and Warehouse Operations Teams.

Apply Supply Chain Inventory Management Concepts, such as Safety Stock and Cycle Stock Calculations, and Operations Research Concepts, such as demand optimization and decision analysis, to create demand forecasts and purchase forecasts.

Ability to guide the use statistical computing languages and version control systems (e.g., Python, R, and Github) to work with large datasets to prepare key inventory management analyses

Leverage Supply Chain Models to purchase the optimum inventory to stay in-stock on all sales channels (stores, shipping, same day delivery, and pick up)

Setup internal project management workflows to help develop future inventory management decision-making tools.
Use critical Supply Chain metrics to prepare analytical models to identify excess inventory and overstock and share accurate inventory health with Finance, Accounting, Merchandizing, and Supply Chain teams and share final recommendations with appropriate teams to initiate promotions, markdowns and clearance.
Own and develop data visualization reports in BI tools on all aspects of inventory management

Education/Experience

MBA, Masters or Phd in Supply Chain, Operations Research, Statistics, Applied Math or Economics

10 – 12 years of work or experience in analytics or data science teams with a supply chain focus.

Deep understanding of inventory/revenue management and supply chain analytics

Strong knowledge of guiding teams to build tools and analysis using languages such as R/ Python

High level of comfort with analytical approaches and quantitative methods to deal with very large datasets.

Experience applying Operations Research methodologies to make supply chain decisions.
Experience improving and optimizing supply chain processes by developing mathematical optimization simulations, econometrics models, and decision tree models.

Experience improving forecasting models and replenishment processes by applying Six Sigma Principles: DMAIC and Decision Tree.
Experience designing Replenishment Models to calculate cycle stock and safety stock and optimize inventory costs.
Experience preparing supply chain metrics and scorecards on Business Intelligence platforms to measure inventory health, vendor performance and inventory logistics status
Experience generating customer demand forecast models by manipulating large sets of historical time-series data using ARIMA (Auto Regressive Integrated Moving Average) Models, STL (Seasonal and Trend Decomposition using Loess), and Gradient Boosting.

Extensive exposure to all aspects of Retail/eCommerce from the technical, strategic, and operational perspective is preferred

Petco Animal Supplies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
Category: Corporate
Location: 10850 Via Frontera, San Diego, CA 92127
Schedule: Full_time",210.0
138,data+scientist,"Physical Requirements

Monitors and utilizes computers and test equipment for more than 6 hours a day.
Continuous communication (e.g., on conference calls) which includes the comprehension of information with colleagues, customers, and vendors both in person and remotely.
Works in the lab, can use hazardous chemicals (e.g., glue, machinery).
",213.0
139,data+scientist,"Duration:3+Months
Responsibilities:
Data/AI Cloud Consultant - JD
Experience in Data warehouse Strategy and Design
GCP Products: BigQuery, Looker
Experience in Infrastructure
Library: Apache Beam
GCP products: Cloud Composer
Non-GCP products: Azure AD
The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",214.0
140,data+scientist,"Position Summary
Director will be responsible for building, managing, and leading a Clinical Data Science (CDS) function within the Biostatistics Department. The director will set the vision for the team including strategies, operations, infrastructure, technology innovation, and talent development. The CDS team will be responsible for preparing analysis-ready datasets from raw data through a validation pathway and for providing statistical programming to support data curation and analysis activities for clinical studies used to achieve regulatory approval of IVD and companion diagnostic assays in the US and internationally (including FDA PMA, 510(k), and equivalent EU approval). This position interacts closely with the Biostatistics team, in addition to Clinical Affairs, Clinical Data Management and Bioinformatics.
Responsibilities
Recruit, develop, train and manage a CDS team
Manage budget, timelines, and resource needs
Manage the Biostatistics computational environment including workstations and analysis software licenses
Oversee functions of the team including:
Create clinical analysis datasets that meet internal statistical analysis needs, industry regulations and best practices.
Provide statistical programming support for clinical study data review, complex edit checks and data cleaning to ensure data quality
Maintain complete and auditable programming documentation
Develop, document and maintain reusable programming code
Collaborate with cross-functional teams on dataset development procedures and data programming approaches.
Develop, update, and implement departmental procedures
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in life science, health-related science, clinical data science, statistics, computer science, or related field.
Minimum of 15 years of related work experience; experience can include advanced degree.
Supervisory experience managing teams (5+ years??) is required
Experience in a programming language like R, Python, SQL, or similar
Knowledge of GCPs, ICH, and regulatory requirements
Experience working with clinical trial data or biosample data
Demonstrated cross-functional collaboration while ensuring data quality and commitment to analysis reproducibility
Excellent organizational, written, and verbal communication skills
Able to proactively identify and address areas of inefficiency and provide creative, successful solutions
Flexible; adapts to meet department and company needs.
Experience in the field of genetics, oncology, or knowledge of NGS technology is a plus.
All listed requirements are deemed as essential functions to this position; however, business conditions may require reasonable accommodations for additional task and responsibilities.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",219.0
141,data+scientist,"
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or equivalent combination of technical education and experience
7+ years of software development experience with at least 3 years in a Software Development Manager role.
3+ years experience building distributed systems
1+ years working directly with customers and 3rd party partners
A strong track record of project delivery for large, cross-functional projects
Experience with modern programming languages (Java, C#, Python) and open-source technologies.

At AWS AI, we strive to make it easy for our customers to deploy machine learning models on any endpoint in the cloud or at the edge. Just as SageMaker provides a complete set of services to simplify the task of building and training a Machine Learning model, Neo compiles any machine learning model on any hardware for the best performance. Edge Manager enables running those models efficiently on Edge devices. This role owns the cloud services for both of these two strategic AWS AI SageMaker services. https://aws.amazon.com/sagemaker/edge-manager/ https://aws.amazon.com/sagemaker/neo/
Neo optimizes machine learning models to perform at up to twice the speed of the original framework with no loss in accuracy. Neo can optimize a pre-trained model built with MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, or XGBoost or multiple other frameworks, to a chosen target hardware platform. The Neo runtime uses less than 100th of the space of the framework to run the model on the target hardware. Amazon SageMaker Edge Manager provides a software agent that runs on edge devices for model inference and a separate cloud service for managing models on edge devices.
You will manage and grow a team of software developers with backgrounds in machine learning, distributed systems, AI accelerators, and 24/7 production operations. You will have a passion for operational excellence, scale, fault tolerance, and performance. This role has a significant and direct impact to the business.

Key Responsibilities:

Responsible for the overall software development and deployment life cycle
Execution against project plans and delivery commitments;
Manage the day-to-day activities of the engineering team within an Agile/Scrum environment
Manage departmental resources, staffing, mentoring, and enhancing and maintaining a best-of-class engineering team
Work closely with the engineers to architect and develop the best technical design and approach
Work with customers and PMs on product road map definition
Translate requirements into technical specifications for robust, scalable, supportable solutions that work well within the overall system architecture.

Join us to help AWS customers deploy machine learning models in the cloud and on edge devices at scale in production.

Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life balance. It isn’t about how many hours you spend at home or at work; it’s about the flow you establish that brings energy to both parts of your life. We believe striking the right balance between your personal and professional life is critical to life-long happiness and fulfillment. We offer flexibility in working hours and encourage you to find your own balance between your work and personal lives.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior members enjoy one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.


Experience with large scale distributed systems
Experience building and operating mission critical, highly available (24x7) systems
Experience with Machine Learning
Experience building tools for data scientists or developers
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audience
Exceptional customer relationship skills including the ability to discover the true requirements underlying feature requests, recommend alternative technical and business approaches, and lead engineering efforts to meet aggressive timelines with optimal solutions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",222.0
142,data+scientist,"Minimum Qualifications
",223.0
143,data+scientist,"Job Description
Job Description:
Habana Labs is an innovative company focused on developing purpose-built AI processors, disruptive solutions that will shape the future of AI and Deep Learning computing. Habana was founded in 2016 by successful entrepreneurs, launched its first AI Inference processor in 2018, its Training processor in 2019 and was acquired by Intel in December 2019. The company now operates as an autonomous subsidiary of Intel. Our vision to take AI processing from its current limits to the peak of its potential continues. We see challenges as opportunities, laser focus on execution and are determined to fulfill our vision to improve the quality of life, work and leisure with our AI solutions. We are looking for exceptionally smart people who believe that AI will change the world and would like to join us on our exciting journey.

Are you passionate about solving problems, interacting with customers and working on new applications and products? If yes, come and join our team. We are looking for a hands-on software engineer to join the RND Engineering team, with in-depth knowledge C++/python programming languages, deep learning frameworks, and hardware architecture.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications
BS in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or similar field with 3 + years of experience or MS in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or similar field with 2+ years of experience
2+ years of experience in C++ and python experience and software design skills
1+ year of software engineering experience with one or more of the following:
Experience working with opensource deep learning frameworks
Experience with large compute workloads
Experience with performance optimizations

Preferred Qualifications
2+ years of experience in pytorch and/or tensorflow internals
2+ years of experience in hardware acceleration like GPU or ASIC
2+ years of experience in Parallel and distributed programming
Experience with graph compilers is a plus
Inside this Business Group
The Data Center Group (DCG) is at the heart of Intel’s transformation from a PC company to a company that runs the cloud and billions of smart, connected computing devices. The data center is the underpinning for every data-driven service, from artificial intelligence to 5G to high-performance computing, and DCG delivers the products and technologies—spanning software, processors, storage, I/O, and networking solutions—that fuel cloud, communications, enterprise, and government data centers around the world.
Other Locations

US, California, Santa Clara;US, Oregon, Hillsboro
Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.",224.0
144,data+scientist,"
",236.0
145,data+scientist,"Join the Team of a Premier Online Graduate-Level University and

Imagine Yourself at a Higher Degree.

At Northcentral University (NCU), we strongly believe that our University is only as good as our team of staff, faculty and students around the world united by a commitment to excellence, innovation, diversity and accountability.

We celebrate personal and professional growth and desire to see our team members fully realize and reach their potential. When you join the Northcentral team, you will enjoy a challenging, positive and fun work environment that promotes productivity, achievement and fulfillment.

If you are passionate about making a difference and are ready to be challenged and inspired in your daily work as part of a growing, success-oriented company, then we want to hear from you!

What We Are Looking For

NCU is currently seeking a dynamic individual to become part of our OPIE Office Planning & Institutional Effectiveness team as the Data Visualization & Research Analyst.

Summary:

The Data Visualization & Research Analyst (DVRA) is involved in the collection, extraction, analysis, reporting, interpretation, and recommendation of data and results relating to institutional effectiveness, planning, and accreditation that drive decision-making. Developing queries for data extraction and manipulation using T-SQL or other programming languages, using data visualization software such as Tableau or Power BI to develop presentation quality reports and visuals, while utilizing SAS, R, and/or SPSS for descriptive and inferential statistical analysis used in standard institutional research applications is required for this position. The DVRA must analyze and summarize complex and sensitive issues with campus wide impact in creative and innovative ways (e.g., information dashboards, interactive data visualizations, and metric reports). The DVRA continually evolves and maintains fresh, functional, and compelling visualizations that clearly convey the key insights of report findings in a timely manner. This individual will perform all aspects of the data visualization process from concept to prototype through to launch and upkeep. Furthermore, the DVRA must operate with great independence, often identifying self-training and testing tools to measure the applicability to support the campus and our work.

Essential Functions:
Extracts and manipulates complex data sets using data management software (e.g., T-SQL, other programming languages, etc.) to extract and manipulate mid-to-large data sets from the database and merge or concatenate with other data sets, as needed for further analysis.
Performs statistical procedures related to sampling, correlation analysis, projections and other quantitative/qualitative measures applied in institutional research and creates meaningful reports using data visualization tools that can be acted upon for internal and external constituencies.
Performs a variety of duties related to ensuring data integrity including data cleaning, documentation, audits, and quality control processes.
Provides in-depth analysis and evaluation of variable factors to support report development and create analyses that generate results to new questions.
Develops reports and other methods to present information that highlight primary metrics and findings.
On a regular basis, produces and/or presents analyses to persuade, influence, or negotiate methods and objectives for complex projects utilizing creative presentation techniques to gain interest in analyses that advance campus decision making.
Creates and maintains novel data visualizations that thoughtfully convey key research insights and provide an interactive opportunity for public engagement.
Works closely with researchers and other developers respond to and evaluate ad hoc requests for data, research projects and studies.
Convert mockups into functional data visualizations.
Helps to maintain and develop documentation for all data visualization project deliverables and ensure ease of use for end-users.
Attends classes, seminars, and conferences that enhance expertise. Serves on departmental, campus-wide or university-wide committees as appropriate, and participates in activities that enhance the campus community and support the university mission.
Reasonable and consistent attendance to fulfill requirements of the position.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Ability to communicate complex statistical information to any educated individual
Ability to provide evidence of psychometric soundness of instruments
Advanced database utilization skills (e.g., querying, extraction, manipulation)
Ability to query databases in a data warehouse environment
Experience with higher education academic assessment institutional research theory and practice
Awareness of current trends and directions within the scope of assigned duties
Strong strategic planning, decision-making, negotiation, and persuasion skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication, and interpersonal and organizational skills; ability to present data clearly to a wide range of audiences
Ability to manage multiple detailed tasks/projects simultaneously and meet strict deadlines with frequent interruptions
Proficient with Microsoft Word and other applicants in the Microsoft Office Suite
Strong self-initiative and service oriented; must work well independently and as part of a team
Education and Experience

Master's degree in related area and/or 5-7 years of experience/training relevant to the above stated knowledge and skill sets in higher education is required.
Specialized training in statistical, visualization, and/or data management software applications (e.g., Tableau, Access, advanced Excel techniques, R).
Minimum of 3 years of experience in research methodology, statistical analysis, trending, interpretation of data and findings.
Minimum of 3 years of survey design and administration experience in a higher education environment.
Expertise with large databases and quantitative analytical tools, such as SPSS or SAS
Experience in survey design, development, implementation, and reporting
Working Conditions

This position operates in a remote, home office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, printers, and phones.

NCU will not sponsor applicants for work visas.

Who We Are

Northcentral University (NCU) is a private, nonprofit, online University and a proud affiliate of the National University System with its headquarters in California. We are a graduate university, and a global leader in providing access to regionally-accredited higher education.

NCU offers doctoral, master’s and bachelor’s degrees in business, education, and psychology, as well as doctoral and master’s degrees in technology, health sciences and marriage and family therapy. Our collective goal at Northcentral University is to improve the human condition through the provision of high-quality online degree programs.

NCU was founded in 1996 to provide working professionals around the world with access to a richly- engaging, professionally-relevant, and academically-rigorous educational programs. Today, we continue to serve that mission. Many students at NCU are first-generation graduate students seeking to contribute to their communities through their pursuit of academic growth, research, and practice.

Though we support faculty and student research, NCU is a teaching university. Our faculty dedicate themselves to serving students through a pedagogical model of Teaching through Engagement (TTE). The goal is for all NCU students, faculty and team members to be actively engaged within the University community. Engagement is more than just grading and giving feedback, it is an active relationship between faculty and student, a give and take of ideas and information.

NCU offers a one-to-one learning model, where one student is paired with one professor in each course, creating a more personalized, individual experience for students. These experiences are enhanced by professors’ real-world, practical experience. All NCU faculty hold doctoral degrees.

At NCU, we are widening access to education and reducing educational divides. We are proud of the educational opportunities that we provide, and we recognize that providing this kind of access to all students takes work and collaborative effort. We value diversity of people, thoughts, and ideas. Our global reach affords us the opportunity to teach and learn the significance of diversity – and the power it brings to our endeavors.

NCU is named a 2021 Ragan’s Top Places to Work. Take advantage of this exciting opportunity to join a growing team of passionate individuals.

Apply today!",237.0
146,data+scientist,"Your Responsibilities
Contribute to development of robust oncology protocols using novel designs (i.e. Adaptive, Baysean, BOIN)
Develop and validate applied research strategies relevant to advance existing assets, sponsored trials, and clinical research collaborations
Conduct multi-disciplinary research to decipher disease properties, using both published and novel computational approaches, to impact research and translational path for patient benefit
Deliver novel hypotheses for patient benefit using innovative and adaptive trial designs
Investigate key data assets across the company and leverage applied research strategies and patient data to empower data-driven decisions
Design and analyze key datasets from patient samples before and after treatment to inform and advance research
Provide predictive, original, and actionable insights into therapeutic mechanisms of action for existing and novel therapies
Participation in oversight of written and verbal scientific communications
Presentation of methods, results, and conclusions
Review medical literature and related new technologies
Work seamlessly across Research and Development teams with shared objectives in a mutually productive fashion.
What is Required
Advanced degree in scientific discipline, operations research, computational biology or other relevant field, PhD preferred
Minimum of 10 years oncology clinical development experience including master protocols, basket studies and RWE
Demonstrated practical experience in developing and managing oncology protocols with novel designs (i.e. Adaptive, Baysean, BOIN)
Direct experience using analytics to predict, control and monitor clinical trial performance
Extensive knowledge of application and analysis of synthetic control arms
Strong applied knowledge in predictive analytics, clinical statistics, or machine learning within the field of data science.
Track record of peer-reviewed publications in relevant scientific journals
Deep expertise in algorithmic implementation, statistical programming, and data manipulation
In depth knowledge of domestic and international regulatory guidelines and ICH/GCP
Highly developed collaboration and communication skills, be capable of explaining complex models to a wide audience
Proven expertise in the proactive identification of issues which may impact clinical programs coupled with the ability to contribute to solutions affecting cross-functional matrix teams
About Mirati Therapeutics
Mirati Therapeutics is a late-stage biotechnology company whose mission is to discover, design and deliver breakthrough therapies to transform the lives of patients with cancer and their loved ones. The company is relentlessly focused on bringing forward therapies that address areas of high unmet need, including lung cancer, and advancing a pipeline of novel therapeutics targeting the genetic and immunological drivers of cancer. Mirati is using its scientific expertise to develop novel solutions in two registration-enabling programs: adagrasib (MRTX849), an investigational small molecule, potent and selective KRASG12C inhibitor, as monotherapy and in combination with other agents, and sitravatinib, an investigational spectrum-selective inhibitor of receptor tyrosine kinases in combination with checkpoint inhibitor therapies. Mirati is also advancing its differentiated preclinical portfolio, including MRTX1133, an investigational KRASG12D inhibitor, and other oncology discovery programs. Unified for patients, Mirati's vision is to unlock the science behind the promise of a life beyond cancer.
For more information about Mirati Therapeutics, visit us at Mirati.com or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn.
Why Join?
At Mirati, we have an unapologetic and relentless focus on our mission to transform the lives of patients with cancer and their loved ones. Patients and their families motivate us to work smarter, faster and better. We are driven by the knowledge that our efforts can one-day deliver life-saving therapies for the people who need us most. Urgency, open-mindedness, accountability and collaboration ground our work. These shared values are central to who we are, what we do and how we do it.
Our people fuel our success. They are fearless and passionate in their daily pursuit of our mission. We are committed to continuing to create a company and experience that attracts and keeps the best people. When you want your days to count and the work you do to matter, discovering and delivering potentially life-changing therapies is more than a job, it's the chance to be part of something bigger.
We believe diverse professional experiences and an inclusive culture can drive better outcomes for patients. We want employees to be authentic and use their perspectives to contribute to our mission in a meaningful way.
Mirati cultivates an environment where:
An entrepreneurial attitude is encouraged
Our people are empowered to speak up, embrace the gray and achieve solutions
Diverse experiences are an important of part making the best decisions
We laugh and have fun as a work family
No matter the role, we are unified by our passion for helping patients, and are inspired by a single vision to unlock the science behind the promise of a life beyond cancer. Together, we own Mirati's success.
Learn more at Mirati.com/careers.
Mirati is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) we celebrate diverse experiences without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender identity or expression, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, pregnancy, veteran status, membership in the uniformed services, genetic information, or any other basis protected by applicable law.
Notice to Third Party Agencies: Please note that Mirati Therapeutics Inc. does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.",244.0
147,data+scientist,"
",245.0
148,data+scientist,"Accenture is a global professional services company with leading capabilities in digital, cloud and security. Combining unmatched experience and specialized skills across more than 40 industries, we offer Strategy and Consulting, Interactive, Technology and Operations services—all powered by the world’s largest network of Advanced Technology and Intelligent Operations centers. Our 514,000 people deliver on the promise of technology and human ingenuity every day, serving clients in more than 120 countries. We embrace the power of change to create value and shared success for our clients, people, shareholders, partners and communities. Visit us at www.accenture.com
We are:
Solutions.AI is Accenture's collection of AI solutions that are designed to unlock new efficiencies and growth, enable new ways of working, and facilitate game-changing innovation–3x faster than the typical product lifecycle. Built and delivered on the foundation of Accenture's unparalleled AI expertise, data services, IP and ecosystem partners, our scalable, modular solutions minimize time to market and maximize business impact. The next AI revolution will be built by people like you. Visit us here to find out more about Solutions.AI.
You are:
As a Manager with Accenture you will lead and grow a business leveraging and growing a data science team working with diverse clients and industries. The business focus will be selling new work to clients, delivering analytics solutions and help turn data into actionable insights that drive tangible outcomes, improve performance and help clients lead the market. This position requires experience in growing the business for a solution and leading and inspiring teams with in-depth understanding and use of statistical and data analysis tools, as well as strong technical skills and business acumen. It also requires the capability to contribute to new business development as an expert solution architect with a skill level that translates well in the C-Suite.
The work:
Lead and grow an intelligent marketing data science business across our North American market
Inspire and lead teams responsible for statistical, data mining, machine learning, and/or deep learning techniques in delivering data science insights specifically in the areas of marketing attribution, hyper personalization of marketing content and Next best action solutions
Lead and collaborate with internal Accenture teams and clients to understand challenges and create solutions
Stay abreast of technology trends in artificial intelligence and machine learning
Provide thought leadership to evangelize Accenture’s POV in the market as well as internally
Ultimate oversight of data scientists and data science projects with clients for the business.
Future potential weekly travel

Here’s what you need:
Minimum 5 years of experience in business with significant focus on data science and use of statistical methodologies
Minimum 5 years of experience capturing, assessing and making recommendations, including reviewing data for completeness and consistency, analyzing and interpreting data
Bachelor's degree or equivalent (minimum 12 years) work experience
A minimum 5 years of Deep Knowledge of Marketing Insight analytics domains like marketing attribution (both top-down and bottom-up), hyper-personalization and navigating the data challenges for both bottom up and top down attribution
Bonus points if:
Ability to technically lead data science projects
Experience with intelligent marketing capabilities, including mixed marketing modeling, multi-touch attribution, recommendation engines, personalization
Familiarity with using cloud services (AWS, Google, Azure) or Big Data tools (Hadoop, Hive, Spark) in data science solutions
Ability to work across industries and with cross-functional organizations
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States and with Accenture.
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $113,000 - $228,099 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",247.0
149,data+scientist,"We are:
Applied Intelligence and End to End Analytics, the people who love using data to tell a story. We’re also the world’s largest team of data scientists, data engineers, and experts in machine learning and AI. A great day for us Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry. We believe a mix of data, analytics, automation, and responsible AI can do almost anything—spark digital metamorphoses, widen the range of what humans can do, and breathe life into smart products and services. Want to join our crew of sharp analytical minds Visit us here to find out more about Applied Intelligence.

You are:
Associates who are part of Accenture and End-to-End Analytics add value for our clients by deploying our situation-appropriate analytics and technology. To make the analytical work effective we also pay close attention to process design and change management. Our work helps power many of the world’s best analytics-enabled enterprises. We continue to grow and have several openings for new Associates.

As a Senior Analyst,
You will bring
A Bachelor’s, Master’s, or PhD degree in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Management Science, Statistics, or similar field1 year of experience using programming skills in Excel+VBA, SQL, Python, C#, R, etc.Project and/or classroom experience in areas like data analysis, optimization, machine learning, supply chain management, pricing and promotion analysis, process improvement, or business strategy
You will solve
Ambiguous business problems with data driven approaches. You should have a knack for framing up a customer’s challenges and putting forward sound recommendations supported by quantitative analysis and business evidence.Real business problems from top-tier clients in various industries. We work in high-tech, semiconductor, automotive, retail, fashion, food and beverage, pharma, etc.
You will work with
Project teams of 2-6, generally with a mix of Associates, Consultants, Principals, and Partners.Principals and Partners as mentors for career developmentConsultants and other Associates as “buddies” to help navigate the E2E environmentAll colleagues on activities to help manage E2E’s internal operations.
Important Information
Travel
For now, all Accenture business travel, international and domestic, is currently restricted to client-essential sales/delivery activity only.
Please note: The safety and well-being of our people continues to be the top priority, and our decisions around travel are informed by government COVID-19 response directives, recommendations from leading health authorities and guidance from a number of infectious disease experts.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities.
Senior Analyst
As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is
$72,400-$106,999 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",249.0
150,data+scientist,"About Pacira
Pacira BioSciences, Inc. is a leading provider of non-opioid pain management and regenerative health solutions dedicated to improving outcomes for health care practitioners and their patients. Our in-depth knowledge of non-opioid pain management, coupled with our passion for advancing patient care, drives our commitment to providing solutions that address unmet medical needs and improve clinical results.
Why work with us?
Rarely do you have an opportunity to do work that really matters. What drives us is our mission. What makes us successful are our people. At Pacira, you are part of an inclusive culture that fosters collaboration, growth, and innovative thinking - a place where you can make an impact and help change the standard of care in non-opioid pain management. Be part of our movement, let’s pursue excellence together.
The Manager, Statistical Programming will work in Statistical Programming group to manage and support Statistical Programming deliverables for clinical studies.


Responsibilities:
Technical lead and project manager for multiple studies managing all aspects of study deliverables related to statistical and clinical programming as needed
Represent the statistical programming team at Study Management Team and Clinical Development meetings to address deliverables and timelines
Address resourcing to adequately staff projects as needed
Assist in the review of key study-related documents produced by other functions, e.g. SAP, case report form, data management plan, database specifications, EDC data structures, DMC plans and other clinical documents
Interact and communicate with Statisticians, Data Managers, Clinical Operations, Medical Monitors, Medical Writing and Medical Directors to address programming related study deliverables
Write, test and validate SAS programs to produce analysis datasets, TLGs and presentation output, to be included in reports for submission to regulatory agencies, publications and other communications as needed
Understand and execute department-, product- and study-level macros and utilities. Write, test and validate product- and study-level macros and utilities
Be a technical resource for programming group to provide advice on complex programming tasks and/or standards.
Contribute to the development review of Statistical Programming policies, standard operating procedures and other controlled documents
Interface with outsourcing partners and vendor

Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or above in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Life Sciences or other relevant scientific subject, or equivalent related experience
Minimum 3+ years' clinical research and development programming experience using SAS. R experiences not required but a huge plus.
Knowledge of SDTM and ADaM standards, able to write CDISC standard dataset specifications and follow specifications to create SDTM and ADAM datasets (as needed)
Computer programming using SAS
Fundamentals of project planning and management
Drug development process
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to effectively collaborate in a dynamic environment
Expert level SAS programmer with experience in delivering on complex programming assignments and analysis
Expert level knowledge and extensive hands-on experience of CDISC methodologies
Experience leading or working with centralized teams for Statistical Programming
Experience in FDA/EMEA/CFDA trial and regulatory submissions
Experience with the drug development process (pre-, early, late and/or observational) in related industries or academic research

EEO Statement
Pacira is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants because of race, color, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), national origin, age (40 or older), veteran status, disability or genetic information, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.

At Pacira we are committed to intentionally cultivating a culture of inclusion where all feel welcomed and valued for their background, perspectives, and experiences. We hold one another accountable to promote trust and transparency in support of our communities and collective purpose.",250.0
151,data+scientist,"We are now looking for a Data Scientist.
NVIDIA has continuously reinvented itself over two decades. Our invention of the GPU in 1999 sparked the growth of the PC gaming market, redefined modern computer graphics, and revolutionized parallel computing. More recently, GPU deep learning ignited modern AI — the next era of computing. NVIDIA is a “learning machine” that constantly evolves by adapting to new opportunities that are hard to tackle, that only we can pursue, and that matter to the world. This is our life’s work, to amplify human creativity and intelligence. Make the choice to join us today.
As an integral member of the FP&A Organization, our responsibilities are to leverage data to predict and forecast our revenue and expenses. In the role, you will work on a wide variety of projects. One project could be building a dashboard that tracks KPI's and making it easy to analyze them. Another project could be building a propensity to churn score for our fast growing SaaS businesses. You will be the subject matter authority on data and how to translate it to making better business decisions.

What you'll be doing:
Interpret business trends and make recommendations to increase value of company
Scale automated reporting and analytical solutions across finance organization
Build out data science capabilities
What we need to see:
Bachelor's Degree (or equivalent experience) in Information Management, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Math or related field
5+ years of experience in data science, data analysis/modeling, and data visualization experience in technology or banking industry
Track record for implementing process improvements to manual processes
Experience with SAS/SQL/Python/R/Tableau
Experience with SAP BW, HANA, Analytics Cloud, and Business Objects is a plus
NVIDIA is widely considered to be one of the technology world’s most desirable employers; we have some of the most forward-thinking and hardworking people in the world working for us and, due to unparalleled growth, best-in-class teams are rapidly growing. If you’re creative and autonomous with a real passion for your work, we want to hear from you!
NVIDIA is committed to fostering a diverse work environment and proud to be an equal opportunity employer. As we highly value diversity in our current and future employees, we do not discriminate (including in our hiring and promotion practices) on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression , sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other characteristic protected by law.",401.0
152,data+scientist,"A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.",402.0
153,data+scientist,"A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.",403.0
154,data+scientist,"Are you looking for an opportunity to join a team of data scientists making an impact on the insurance industry? CLARA Analytics is looking for a Data Scientist who is enthusiastic about solving real world problems with data and models, in a culture of innovation, respect, and camaraderie. We are located in Santa Clara, CA, but working remotely is an option.
This is a chance to join a welcoming and collaborative team at a rapidly growing Silicon Valley company. Our mission is to drive the best claims outcomes for both insurers and the insured using innovative machine learning, including deep learning and natural language processing. Our models provide key insights and predictions that guide the claims adjuster in making optimal decisions at every step of the claim process.
Why grow your career with InsurTech? Insurance companies have invested in digitized claims management systems, and are now taking the next step in realizing the full potential of this data. CLARA Analytics is the leader in providing the most technologically advanced solutions in this space, dedicated to expanding the horizons of what is possible. We hope you will join us, bringing your own creativity and expertise to achieve our vision together.
Key Responsibilities
Gain a deep understanding of the goals of our customers in the insurance industry and have a strong grasp on the details of data from claims management systems and medical records
Work directly with customers to define objectives and get feedback on results
Prototype and build end-to-end analysis pipelines, from initial data gathering and exploratory analysis to architecting and developing predictive models, writing documentation and presenting results
Make code ready for production and build stable and efficient scoring pipelines that integrate with our applications
Contribute to the advancement of data science and machine learning at Clara by evaluating and evangelizing new algorithms, tools, and processes
Work with engineering, product teams, and subject matter experts to coordinate planning and execution on projects
Have impact through explainable and actionable AI that drives a great user experience
Enjoy being a part of Clara’s culture of innovation, respect, and camaraderie
Skills Knowledge and Expertise
4+ years practical experience in data science and machine learning, including deep learning
2+ years experience with end to end data science pipelines - data ingestion, processing, machine learning model training and scoring
2+ years experience in the property and casualty insurance industry
Experience with scikit-learn and pandas; preferably also PySpark, Tensorflow, Pytorch, and MLFlow
Proficiency in Python for data science applications
Diligence in coding and willingness to contribute to the rapidly-evolving Data Science infrastructure at Clara
Strong communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences
Proactiveness in raising issues and improving models, pipelines and processes
Collaborative team spirit, excited about brainstorming together towards new AI solutions for Clara products
Passion for the product and going the extra mile to bring subject matter expertise and practical intuition to machine learning models
Benefits
CLARA analytics offers a great benefits package to all full-time employees. Some of the perks you will enjoy are low cost healthcare (or we pay you to opt out!), monthly wellness/gym reimbursement, 401k match, public transportation cost assistance, skill building reimbursements, and more! We encourage creativity and recognize our employee’s talents and contributions with monthly peer recognition “high five” awards. We also work hard to keep employees engaged during Shelter At Home with weekly All Hands meetings, occasional gift packages & doordash surprises. Apply now to be part of a growing, vibrant company!
About CLARA Analytics
We built product platforms that are:
Best-of-breed
Our machine learning-driven solutions illuminate the most accurate and robust data findings in the industry

Easy to use and implement
Although the data science driving our products is complex, we make it simple for our customers to drive results

High performing
Our customers see an increased ROI of 10x after implementing the CLARA platform",478.0
155,data+scientist,"About Houzz
Houzz is the world’s leading platform for home remodeling and design, helping more than 2.5 million home professionals in over 100 categories to grow and manage their business. Through Houzz, a community of more than 65 million homeowners and home design enthusiasts find ideas, hire professionals, source products and access tools to update their homes from start to finish. Houzz is available in every country around the world with localized platforms in more than 10 countries across North America, Europe, Asia and Australia.
About the Role
Houzz is looking for a world-class Revenue Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Revenue Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
__________________
What You’ll Do
Collaborate with leadership, sales, finance, product, engineering, operations and marketing teams to identify, and optimize revenue enhancing opportunities.
Design, develop & deploy necessary KPIs to measure, track and report on revenue and its drivers.
Partner closely with sales and finance teams to aid analysis of revenue related projects.
Identify and recommend enhancements to the data infrastructure.
Measure and effectively communicate results to the entire organization.
Contribute to upscaling the operations and processes of the data science team.
At a Minimum, We’d Like You to Have
An M.S degree in a technical discipline such as statistics, mathematics, computer science, operations research or economics
2+ years data science experience dealing with complex problems in subscription products, user retention, revenue and marketplaces.
Strong proficiency in writing complex SQL queries, manipulating data with pandas, and common python data science libraries and generate dashboards in Tableau
Experience with the hadoop data stack; HDFS, Presto & Hive
Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills
Be a self starter, with an ability to work independently and deliver quality results
Ability to have fun!
__________________
Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz
We’re a Family
At Houzz, we strive to create and foster a strong family environment in our workplace. We collaborate to accomplish our goals, always working as a team. We aim to build a culture of inclusion — celebrating and leveraging our differences for the betterment of one another, our products and our community.
Houzz team members come from many backgrounds and bring diverse experiences to the company. We take pride in making each person feel at home.
We Build the Future
Join Houzz in revolutionizing the home remodeling and design industry and have an impact on our community of more than 65 million homeowners and home design enthusiasts who use our platform and the 2.5 million-plus home professionals around the world who grow and manage their business with Houzz Pro. Houzz has been named one of the most innovative companies in the world by CNBC and others, and is backed by top venture capitalists. At Houzz, you can help drive the future of an industry worth over $1 trillion in the U.S. and Europe alone.
We Make Things Happen
Our team members play a key role in guiding the direction of our company and are able to work across multiple groups to implement fresh ideas that allow Houzz to be the industry leader. If you are interested in applying your passion to create products that will transform the lives of millions of people who are designing, remodeling and decorating their homes, welcome to Houzz.
Benefits and Perks
Competitive salary
Flexible paid time off
Commuter benefits
Medical, dental, vision and pet insurance
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee assistance program
401k retirement savings plan
Flexible spending accounts
Healthy at Houzz program
Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
If you are a California resident applying for a job, you consent to our California Job Applicant Privacy Notice",479.0
156,data+scientist,"About Houzz
Houzz is the world’s leading platform for home remodeling and design, helping more than 2.5 million home professionals in over 100 categories to grow and manage their business. Through Houzz, a community of more than 65 million homeowners and home design enthusiasts find ideas, hire professionals, source products and access tools to update their homes from start to finish. Houzz is available in every country around the world with localized platforms in more than 10 countries across North America, Europe, Asia and Australia.
About the Role
Houzz is looking for a world-class Revenue Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Revenue Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
__________________
What You’ll Do
Collaborate with leadership, sales, finance, product, engineering, operations and marketing teams to identify, and optimize revenue enhancing opportunities.
Design, develop & deploy necessary KPIs to measure, track and report on revenue and its drivers.
Partner closely with sales and finance teams to aid analysis of revenue related projects.
Identify and recommend enhancements to the data infrastructure.
Measure and effectively communicate results to the entire organization.
Contribute to upscaling the operations and processes of the data science team.
At a Minimum, We’d Like You to Have
An M.S degree in a technical discipline such as statistics, mathematics, computer science, operations research or economics
2+ years data science experience dealing with complex problems in subscription products, user retention, revenue and marketplaces.
Strong proficiency in writing complex SQL queries, manipulating data with pandas, and common python data science libraries and generate dashboards in Tableau
Experience with the hadoop data stack; HDFS, Presto & Hive
Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills
Be a self starter, with an ability to work independently and deliver quality results
Ability to have fun!
__________________
Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz
We’re a Family
At Houzz, we strive to create and foster a strong family environment in our workplace. We collaborate to accomplish our goals, always working as a team. We aim to build a culture of inclusion — celebrating and leveraging our differences for the betterment of one another, our products and our community.
Houzz team members come from many backgrounds and bring diverse experiences to the company. We take pride in making each person feel at home.
We Build the Future
Join Houzz in revolutionizing the home remodeling and design industry and have an impact on our community of more than 65 million homeowners and home design enthusiasts who use our platform and the 2.5 million-plus home professionals around the world who grow and manage their business with Houzz Pro. Houzz has been named one of the most innovative companies in the world by CNBC and others, and is backed by top venture capitalists. At Houzz, you can help drive the future of an industry worth over $1 trillion in the U.S. and Europe alone.
We Make Things Happen
Our team members play a key role in guiding the direction of our company and are able to work across multiple groups to implement fresh ideas that allow Houzz to be the industry leader. If you are interested in applying your passion to create products that will transform the lives of millions of people who are designing, remodeling and decorating their homes, welcome to Houzz.
Benefits and Perks
Competitive salary
Flexible paid time off
Commuter benefits
Medical, dental, vision and pet insurance
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee assistance program
401k retirement savings plan
Flexible spending accounts
Healthy at Houzz program
Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
If you are a California resident applying for a job, you consent to our California Job Applicant Privacy Notice",484.0
157,data+scientist,"The Tenstorrent team combines technologists from different disciplines who come together with a shared passion for AI and a deep desire to build great products. We value collaboration, curiosity, and a commitment to solving hard problems.
Find out more about our culture (https://tenstorrent.com/careers/).

CPU Verification Engineer - AI Silicon Design:
Functional verification of high-performance CPUs going into industry leading AI/ML architecture. The person coming into this role will help define DV strategies and execute on them while working alongside with a group of highly experienced engineers across various domains of the AI chip.
Responsibilities:
Define DV requirements for design changes resulting from rapidly evolving AI/ML models; work with engineers across domains to understand real world use cases
Develop DV testplans for ISA and microarchitecture and execute on them
Design and develop component, block and core level testbenches including stimulus engines, microarchitectural models, checkers
Build architectural tools for ISA level verification
Develop stimulus generators that scale from pre-silicon to emulation and post-silicon domain
Evaluate and integrate open-source toolchains into the DV flow
Develop DV environment, tools and infrastructure to enable functional verification for pre-silicon, emulation and post-silicon
Experience and qualifications:
BS/MS/PhD in EE/ECE/CE/CS with at least 5 years of experience
Experience with computer architecture/system components/network/fabric as a part of a CPU, ASIC or SOC design team
Verification methodologies and techniques – Simulation/debug, TB development, stimulus, checking, coverage, infrastructure, tools
Experience with C++ / SV / UVM as well as scripting languages
Experience with assembly level programming
Experience with hardware description languages (Verilog, VHDL) and simulators (VCS, NC, Verilator)
Strong problem solving and debug skills across various levels of design hierarchies
Locations: Santa Clara, CA; Austin, TX or Toronto, ON
Tenstorrent offers a highly competitive compensation package and benefits, and we are an equal opportunity employer.",486.0
158,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Mater’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",556.0
159,data+scientist,"The primary purpose of this role is to provide advanced analytical capabilities to support data science
initiatives. This position gains experience in various areas including, but not limited to: predictive modeling; personalization and recommendation algorithms; natural language processing and text mining; search recall, precision, ranking, and related problems; optimization and mathematical programming with applications in labor scheduling, inventory and capacity planning, network flows, and supply chain optimization.
A Senior Data Scientist solves complex problems that do not yet have solutions in the research. Therefore, the individual in this role must be an expert in his/her field and confident in interacting and proposing solutions to the business. This role influences the thought process and methodology for other team members.

Responsibilities:
Mines and extracts data and applies statistics and algorithms necessary to derive insights for Lowe's and Lowe's Digital
Supports the generation of an automated insights generation framework for Lowe's business partners to effectively interpret data
Provides actionable insights through data science on Personalization, Search & Navigation, SEO & Promotions, Supply Chain, Services, other company priorities, etc.
Tracks success of Lowe's through the development of dashboard reports that measure financial results, customer satisfaction, and engagement metrics
Conducts deep statistical analysis, including predictive and prescriptive modeling in order to provide a competitive advantage at Lowe's
Maintains expert-level knowledge on industry trends, emerging technologies, and new methodologies and applies it to projects as well as using it to guide team members
Leads automation and analytical projects, collaborating across functions in Lowe's and Lowe's Digital
Responsible for influencing, leading the thought process, and defining the appropriate methodology for team members
Translates or provides guidance to more junior level scientists to translate requirements into an analytical approach; asks the right questions to understand the problem; validates understanding with Stakeholder or Manager
Builds or provides guidance for building the analytic approach to solving a business problem; helps identify the sources, methods, parameters, and procedures to be used; clarifies expectations with stakeholders and plans resources accordingly
Leverages deep understanding of statistical techniques and tools to analyze data according to the project plan; communicates with stakeholders to provide updates and manage scope
Prepares final recommendations, ensuring solutions are best-in-class, implementable and scalable in the business
Executes plan for measuring impact based on discussions with stakeholders, partners and senior team members
Executes projects with full adherence to enterprise project management practices by participating in formal and informal training
Maintains knowledge of techniques, technology, industry trends, best practices, and emerging Methodologies

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Data or Information Science, or related quantitative analytic field AND 4 years of experience in analytics AND 2 years of programming experience (Python, Java, Scala, Rust, etc.)
OR
Master's Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Data or Information Science, or related quantitative analytic field AND 2 years of experience in analytics AND 1 year of programming experience (Python, Java, Scala, Rust, etc.)
OR
Ph.D. in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Data or Information Science, or related quantitative analytic field AND 1 year of experience in analytics
ALSO
Knowledge of SQL and various statistical modeling or machine learning techniques

Preferred Qualifications:
In most cases Lowe’s will not be able to provide sponsorship for roles located in the Tech Hub
Ph.D. degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Data or Information Science, or related quantitative analytic field
3 years of experience performing predictive analytics at a large scale enterprise
3 years of experience in data science or advanced analytics in industry
SQL Experience
Programming experience (Python, Java, Scala, Rust, etc.)
Experience using multiple data systems and sources (such as Hadoop, Spark, Aster, Teradata, etc.)
About Lowe’s:
Lowe’s Companies, Inc. (NYSE: LOW) is a FORTUNE® 50 home improvement company serving approximately 18 million customers a week in the United States and Canada. With fiscal year 2019 sales of $72.1 billion, Lowe’s and its related businesses operate or service more than 2,200 home improvement and hardware stores and employ approximately 300,000 associates. Based in Mooresville, N.C., Lowe’s supports its hometown Charlotte region and all communities it serves through programs focused on creating safe, affordable housing and helping to develop the next generation of skilled trade experts. For more information, visit Lowes.com.

About Lowe’s in the Community:
As a FORTUNE® 50 home improvement company, Lowe’s is committed to creating safe, affordable housing and helping to develop the next generation of skilled trade experts through nonprofit partnerships. Across every community we serve, Lowe’s associates donate their time and expertise through the Lowe’s Heroes volunteer program. For the latest news, visit Newsroom.Lowes.com or follow @LowesMedia on Twitter.

Lowe’s is an equal opportunity employer and administers all personnel practices without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex, gender, age, ancestry, national origin, mental or physical disability or medical condition, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic information, or any other category protected under federal, state, or local law.",557.0
160,data+scientist,"Candidates can be fully remote*; The successful candidate should have the ability to create efficient and effective data models in Power BI.Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions. Discover business narratives told by the data and present them to other scientists, business stakeholders, and managers at various levels. Develop and test heuristics. Create and run models. Perform data exploration and data mining. Create business intelligence, dashboards, visualizations, and/or other advanced analytics reports to adequately tell the business narrative and offer recommendations that are practiced, actionable, and have material impact, in addition to being well-supported by analytical models and data.Required Qualifications: Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems. Work experience in addition to degree: 1-3 years. Job-specific knowledge, skills or abilities: Working knowledge of statistics, programming and predictive modeling. Working knowledge of code writing.Job Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $48.00 - $58.00 per hourSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Power BI: 1 year (Required)SQL: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Yes",559.0
161,data+scientist,"Immediate need for a talented Senior Data Scientist with experience in the Utilities Industry. This is a 12+ Contract opportunity with long-term potential and is located in Charlotte, NC. Please review the job description below,

Job ID: 21- 32215

Job Description:
Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions.
Client business narratives told by the data and present them to other scientists, business stakeholders, and managers at various levels.
Develop and test heuristics. Create and run models. Perform data exploration and data mining.
Create business intelligence, dashboards, visualizations, and/or other advanced analytics reports to adequately tell the business narrative and offer recommendations that are practiced, actionable, and have material impact, in addition to being well-supported by analytical models and data.


Required/Basic Qualifications:
Working knowledge of statistics, programming and predictive modeling. Working knowledge of code writing.
Previous experience working in data mining or data engineering.
Possess advanced statistics/machine learning knowledge and implementation skills.
Experience with time series. Understanding of and ability to use programming languages like PySpark and SQL (Structured Query Language).


Our client is a leading Utilities Industry and we are currently interviewing to fill this and other similar contract positions. If you are interested in this position, please apply online for immediate consideration. #cha",560.0
162,data+scientist,"At Barings, we are as invested in our associates as we are in our clients. We recognize those who work diligently for us and reward them for personal and professional integrity, communication skills, distinct competencies and expertise in specific strategies, ability to collaborate as a team member and true dedication to the interests of our clients.
We thank you for your interest in joining the Barings team, and invite you to explore our current employment opportunities.
Job Title
Title: Machine Learning Scientist
Department: Global Technology and Operations – Data Science & Insights
Location: Charlotte, NC
Barings is a $326+ billion* global investment manager sourcing differentiated opportunities and building long-term portfolios across public and private fixed income, real estate, and specialist equity markets. With investment professionals based in North America, Europe and Asia Pacific, the firm, a subsidiary of MassMutual, aims to serve its clients, communities and employees, and is committed to sustainable practices and responsible investment.
*Assets under management as of 3/31/21
Job Summary
As a machine-learning scientist at Barings, you will analyze, model, implement and automate scalable solutions for our customers. You have the opportunity to embed your creativity with an array of ML algorithms in addition with domain knowledge to solve complex business. Successful candidates will be a part of a talented team that is disrupting…
Primary Responsibilities
Automated deployments of machine learning techniques to improve our understanding of customer behavior.
Analyze, extract, and optimize relevant information from large amounts of data to help drive business decisions on product features and operational efficiency
Establish scalable, efficient processes for data analyses, model development, validation and experimentation
Collaborate with cross functional teams to understand business teams and turn research into products
Qualifications:
A graduate degree in computer science, mathematics, data science, statistics, physics, or a related technical field.
Solid grasp of mathematics and machine learning concepts (i.e., optimization functions, linear algebra, etc.)
Knowledgeable of relevant literature around applications for machine learning and deep learning
You should have 3+ years of hands on experience in building machine learning solutions from conceptualization to implementation
Strong knowledge of supervised (classification, regression) and unsupervised techniques (clustering, dimensionality reduction)
Experience with designed experiments
Proficient at programming in Python, Scala, and SQL
Fluency in data manipulation (SQL, Spark, Pandas)
Experience with machine learning tools such as scikit-learn, XGBoost, and Pytorch
Strong problem solving and communication skills
Curiosity. A repeated pattern asking and understanding the “why” behind the data
Desired Skills
Academic thesis or published papers in ML space
Prior experience working in finance, FinTech, or investment facilities
Experience deploying models in a production environment
Barings is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer; Minority/Female/Age/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Individual with Disability/Protected Veteran. We welcome all persons to apply.
Barings offers a comprehensive benefits package including:
CORE BENEFITS & WELLNESS
Medical (including Virtual Care), Prescription, Dental, and Vision Coverage
Fitness Center Reimbursement Program (Including Online Memberships)
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Fertility Benefits
FINANCIAL WELL-BEING
401(k) Plan w/Company Match
Pension Plan
Health Savings Account (HSA) with Company Contributions
Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Health Care & Dependent Care
Retirement Health Reimbursement Account
LIFE INSURANCE
Basic and Supplemental Life Insurance
Spouse and Child Life Insurance
TIME OFF, DISABILITY AND LEAVE OF ABSENCE
Paid Vacation, Sick Days and Annual Holidays
Paid Leave of Absences (Maternity Leave, Parental Leave, Caregiver Leave, Bereavement Time)
Short and Long Term Disability Plans
Paid Volunteer Time
 OTHER BENEFITS
Education Assistance Program
Charitable Matching Gifts Program
Commuter Reimbursement Program
Adoption and Surrogacy Reimbursement Program",561.0
163,data+scientist,"TD Description
About TD Bank, America's Most Convenient Bank®
TD Bank, America's Most Convenient Bank, is one of the 10 largest banks in the U.S., providing more than 8 million customers with a full range of retail, small business and commercial banking products and services at approximately 1,300 convenient locations throughout the Northeast, Mid-Atlantic, Metro D.C., the Carolinas and Florida. In addition, TD Bank and its subsidiaries offer customized private banking and wealth management services through TD Wealth®, and vehicle financing and dealer commercial services through TD Auto Finance. TD Bank is headquartered in Cherry Hill, N.J.
TD Bank, America's Most Convenient Bank, is a member of TD Bank Group and a subsidiary of The Toronto-Dominion Bank of Toronto, Canada, a top 10 financial services company in North America. The Toronto-Dominion Bank trades on the New York and Toronto stock exchanges under the ticker symbol ""TD"".
Job Description
The Data Scientist / Modelling/Forecasting Specialist contributes to strategic technical planning and identify opportunities to support business strategy. Expert role which provides technical leadership to others in the development of a broad range of complex models that support business needs.
Job Requirements
Acts as a subject matter expert integrating cross function understanding within their own field of specialty
Works autonomously and accountable for acting as a lead within a specialized analytics function and may provide work direction to others
Provides seasoned specialized knowledge, advice and/or guidance to various stakeholders and team members
Expert at utilizing data sources across the organization with ability to integrate data across multiple platforms
Works effectively across multiple business units with numerous stakeholders to deliver advanced analytics solutions
Scope of role may have business segment and /or enterprise impact
Generally focuses on broad range of complex issues that may span from medium long term issues (e.g. 6-12 months)

Must be eligible for employment under regulatory standards applicable to the position.
Qualifications
Undergraduate degree or technical certificate
7+ years relevant experience
Preferred experience in SAS & Python
Proficient PC skills including a strong competency in MS Excel and PowerPoint, and a variety of PC based analytical and reporting software packages.
Experience making complex and broad predictions based on a vast amount of past and/or present data through the development of statistical and/or mathematical models
Strong analytical and program solving skills are required to interpret data and draw conclusions
Excellent written and verbal communications skills
Inclusiveness
At TD, we are committed to fostering an inclusive, accessible environment, where all employees and customers feel valued, respected and supported. We are dedicated to building a workforce that reflects the diversity of our customers and communities in which we live in and serve, and creating an environment where every employee has the opportunity to reach their potential.
If you are a candidate with a disability and need an accommodation to complete the application process, email the TD Bank US Workplace Accommodations Program at USWAPTDO@td.com . Include your full name, best way to reach you, and the accommodation needed to assist you with the application process.
EOE/Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
Job Family
Advanced Analytics & Modelling
Job Category - Primary
Finance / Accounting
Job Category(s)
Finance / Accounting
Hours
40 Hours / Per Week
Business Line
TD Bank AMCB
Time Type
Full Time
Employment Type
Regular
Country
United States
Province/State
Delaware, New Jersey, North Carolina
City
Charlotte, Cherry Hill, Wilmington
Work Location
11325 North Community House Road, Suite 575, 1701 Route 70 East
Work Remotely
Nationwide, Statewide
**Province/State (Primary)
New Jersey
City (Primary)
Cherry Hill
ProvState 2
Delaware
City(s) 2
Wilmington
ProvState 3
North Carolina
City(s) 3
Charlotte
Job Expires
14-Oct-2021",562.0
164,data+scientist,"Job Description:
The Talent Acquisition Consultant I position will sit in the Global Human Resources (GHR) organizations within Global Talent Acquisition (GTA). It will provide strategic staffing support for Bank of America's Chief Data Office (CDO) organization. The role must be located in a GHR Hub Location.
The CDO Talent Acquisition team is responsible for hiring highly qualified professionals both internally and externally that are responsible for enterprise data, data governance, enterprise information architecture and Activity Based Costing & Artificial Intelligence (AI) governance. This role will support hiring for CDO positions at all levels across multiple cities within the US to create a diverse, best in class organization. The majority of the hiring is focused on B5 and B4 individual contributor and manger level roles.
Position Overview and Description:
Strong, seasoned recruiter to provide full life cycle recruiting to include creating the overall search strategy all the way through to offer extension.
TA Consultant will be responsible for sourcing, assessing technical and leadership capabilities, consulting with leaders and business partners on process and strategy as well as recommending compensation packages, offer negotiations and closing.
TA Consultant will partner with senior leaders within the CDO organization as well as multiple business partners across HR and finance on various hiring processes and strategies
Heavy focus on mid-level hiring across multiple hub cities within the US
Creating and implementing a diversity hiring strategy to ensure slates are broad and diverse across key repeatable jobs at all levels
Consult with leaders on market intelligence and key trends in the industry and how these trends impact their organization, hiring strategies and future pipeline.
Scope of Responsibilities:
Manage client and candidate relationships at the professional level
Provide consultative search recruiting services; including research, market intelligence, sourcing, advising clients; managing the overall end to end process
Continuous networking and pipelining to identify a broad and diverse external talent slate
Extensive executive client interaction
Ability to understand the Technology industry to effectively identify and recruit talent with relevant high caliber expertise
Effectively manage all compliance and operational risk related to our Workday staffing system as well as overall hiring processes
Requirements:
Must have significant experience in professional level recruiting, managing end to end sourcing and recruiting processes for niche, complex skill sets.
Experience developing and executing candidate sourcing strategies, cold calling, and candidate assessment through in-depth phone screens/interviews, consulting senior leaders on talent acquisition strategy and candidate management/offer negotiations.
Experience recruiting for complex, hard to find niche skill sets and industries
Proven track record of directly sourcing talent with specific subject matter expertise required in competitive markets
Ability to work across large complex matrixed organization to achieve results
Must have client management experience, with the ability to influence executives and provide consultative services
Must have an ability and desire to stay abreast of market conditions
Excellent candidate management capabilities including managing salary negotiations from pre-qualifying to ""close""
Must be a team player and have the ability to be flexible and adaptable to rapid changes in processes and requisition volumes
Highly Preferred:
Experience in technology recruiting, ideally recruiting for Data Science, Data Architects, Developers and Engineers or other highly technical roles
Intermediate level Excel and PowerPoint skills
Reporting and analytics capabilities
Experience working in Workday
Job Band:
H5
Shift:
1st shift (United States of America)
Hours Per Week:
40
Weekly Schedule:
Referral Bonus Amount:
0",563.0
165,data+scientist,"Job Description:
The NFRR Center Program Management Office is accountable for ensuring change adherence to the enterprise change policy during the onboarding of new and existing reports from the front line unit or control function to the NFRR Center.
A Senior Data Analyst is responsible for ensuring NFRR products and services are serviceable and valuable to users. Key responsibilities include working with users and development teams to ensure the onboarding process, including key data and business requirements are fit for purpose, defining and monitoring the processes and controls that adhere to EDM Standards, and helping to triage and remediate data incidents, and ensure onboarding activities are completed on time, on budget and reports are accurate and complete. A Senior Data Analyst is an individual contributor at a program level. Flexible skill set is required across project management and business analysis to allow for proper utilization of resources across a large, diverse portfolio of work.
The Senior Data Analyst:
Performs data analysis and helps construct reports to answer business questions and reveal business insights
Guides changes to report processes, business requirements and data transformation logic
Works with business partners to define business and data requirements for onboarding
Contributes to the definition and maintenance of the data dictionary on new reports as needed
Conducts production parallel reconciliation and may support user acceptance testing on report changes
Aligns and monitors key performance indicators and internal controls related to program/project execution
Required Skills:
5+ years of relevant experience delivering large projects with significant impact to multiple lines of business, that may have cross-functional or inter-departmental implications
Experience in managing large transformational data-driven projects in Global Markets space and working knowledge of securities & derivatives domain
Experience driving/supporting multiple projects simultaneously
Applies all aspects of program/project management: resource planning, work breakdown, risk/issue management, financial management, implementation planning, testing, training/communication, etc.
Must be able to translate plans/policies into specific goals, tactics, action plans and deliverables
Able to interpret and effectively document business and technical requirements
Strong analytical skills with ability to analyze data and identify trends
Ability to communicate clearly (written and verbal) and navigate at all levels in the organization with the detail appropriate to the forum and audience
Ability to effectively navigate a highly matrixed organization
Ability to navigate ambiguity
Highly organized with critical thinking abilities at both the strategic and tactical levels
Understanding of Lean-Agile frameworks in general, but an especially deep grasp of the Scaled Agile Framework, JIRA, Confluence, Horizon
Excellent facilitation / presentation skills, experience with large groups and senior leadership
Ability to connect business outcomes with operational and technological considerations
Insight to identify gaps and execution risks and escalate as appropriate
Ability to understand, interpret and track meaningful metrics
Strong sense of urgency
May also serve as a practice subject-matter expert, consultant or coach.
Executive reporting skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, EXCEL, PowerPoint, Visio and MS Project)
Experience with Bank of America key tools – PPRT, PCM, Changescape, Horizon, JIRA, Confluence
Engage in ad-hoc data projects varying in scope and priority
Candidate must aptly manage day-to-day interactions and relationships with a diverse group of colleagues across multiple time zones
Desired Skills:
Six sigma certification and/or operational excellence experience
Experience with regulatory efforts/risk and compliance/GBAM
Experience migrating processes - transferring to new teams or taking processes on/offshore
Experience with regulatory or operational risk management
Familiarity with Enterprise Report Registry, PRC/ORCIT, RCSA process, Metrics/Key Controls
Job Band:
H5
Shift:
1st shift (United States of America)
Hours Per Week:
40
Weekly Schedule:
Referral Bonus Amount:
0",564.0
166,data+scientist,"Company Description
CapTech is a team of master builders, creators, and problem solvers who help clients grow efficient, successful businesses. We unite diverse skills and perspectives to transform how data, systems, and ingenuity enable each client to advance what’s possible in a changing world.
As perceptive partners, our U.S-based consultants find inspiration in the unknown and enjoy getting our hands dirty solving our clients’ myriad of challenges. Across industries and business goals, we fuse technical depth and analytical prowess with creative savvy to move clients forward. This drive helps each organization use technology, management, and insight to turn ideas into action. Together, we create outcomes that exceed the expected — which is one of the reasons we’ve been on the Inc. 500/5000 list for over a decade.

Job Description
CapTech Machine Learning Engineers are responsible for designing and implementing data-driven solutions for our clients, with specific focus on building and deploying scalable machine learning systems in enterprise environments. CapTech employees enjoy a collaborative environment and have many opportunities to learn from and share knowledge with other CapTech analysts, architects, and our clients.
Specific responsibilities for the Machine Learning Engineer position include:
Strategizing with clients, data scientists, engineers, and other members of cross-functional teams to implement end-to-end machine learning solutions and identify new machine learning approaches to meet business needs (e.g., building pipelines to enable ML models in an enterprise setting).
Deconstructing client needs into data-driven processes/models and analytical measures.
Analyzing and transforming large datasets hosted on a variety of enterprise-level data platforms, (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP).
Designing, developing, and deploying advanced analytical solutions leveraging client data (e.g., recommender systems, natural language processing, risk scoring).
Productionizing ML systems with a focus on optimization and scalability to satisfy clients’ requirements.
Growing CapTech’s Machine Learning practice through delivering client presentations, writing proposals, attending various business development events, and leading teams of junior data scientists and engineers.

Qualifications
Typical experience for successful candidates includes:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Hands-on experience manipulating and analyzing large (multi-billion record) data sets.
Hands-on experience developing data-driven solutions using Python, Scala, or similar languages.
Proficiency leveraging SQL, MapReduce/Hive, NoSQL and/or modern data processing frameworks in a production setting.
Moderate proficiency with data warehousing tools/environments: e.g. Snowflake, Teradata, SQL Server, RDS, Presto.
Comfort and proficiency in framing data-driven problems from cross-industry business requirements.
Experience across multiple analytical practices such as: consumer analysis, marketing analysis, financial analysis, website analysis, healthcare analysis and/or social media analysis.
Hands-on experience implementing production-scale machine learning systems in one or more domains (i.e. personalization, natural language processing, computer vision).
Knowledge of DevOps and automation best practices.
Knowledge of statistics and statistical modeling methods.
Knowledge of model management and model versioning best practices.
Additional Information
We provide challenging and impactful opportunities in our client work and internal teams, while keeping individual interests in mind. We want everyone at CapTech to be able to envision a lifelong career here, which is why we offer a variety of career paths based on your skills and passions. As a CapTecher, you will experience exciting and rewarding roles that help you grow and make a difference, while having fun along the way.
At CapTech we offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package including, but not limited to:
Competitive salary with performance-based bonus opportunities
Three comprehensive Medical Plan options (PPO and HDHP), as well as Dental and Vision coverage
Company paid basic Life and AD&D, Short-Term and Long-Term Disability Insurance
Matching 401(k)
Cell Phone stipend
Competitive Paid Time Off
Paid Birth and Family Bonding Leave
Adoption Assistance
Training and Certification opportunities eligible for expense reimbursement
Team building and social activities
Mentor program to help you develop your career
CapTech is an equal opportunity employer committed to fostering a culture of equality, inclusion and fairness — each foundational to our core values. We strive to create a diverse environment where each employee is encouraged to bring their unique ideas, backgrounds and experiences to the workplace. For more information about our diversity, Inclusion and belonging efforts, click HERE.
At this time, CapTech cannot transfer nor sponsor a work visa for this position. Applicants must be authorized to work directly for any employer in the United States without visa sponsorship.
Candidates must be eligible to work in the U.S. for any employer directly (we are not open to contract or “corp to corp” agreements).
CapTech is a Drug-Free work place.
Candidates must have the ability to work at CapTech’s client locations.
Some positions may require travel.
CapTech has not contracted/does not contract with any outside vendors in its recruitment process. If you are interested in this position, please apply to CapTech directly.
#LI-AB1",565.0
167,data+scientist,"We Are:
As part of our Data & AI, you will lead technology innovation for our clients through robust delivery of world-class solutions. You will build better software better! There will never be a typical day and that’s why people love it here. The opportunities to make a difference within exciting client initiatives are unlimited in the ever-changing technology landscape. You will be part of a highly collaborative and growing network of technology and data experts, who are taking on today’s biggest, most complex business challenges using the latest data and analytics technologies. We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have an opportunity to work in roles such as Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Chief Data Officer covering all aspects of Data including Data Management, Data Governance, Data Intelligence, Knowledge Graphs, and IoT. Come grow your career in Technology at Accenture!
You Are:
A Business Intelligence pro with a talent for blending creativity, critical thinking, and strategy to help clients visualize their data. You build and deliver solutions that collect, transform, analyze, and report data, and you provide key knowledge and value at different levels—strategic and tactical as well as operational. You’re in your element in a team setting where you can use your formidable creative and analytical powers to crush problems. Communication and people skills You have both in spades, along with strong leadership chops. Working in an information systems environment makes you more than happy.
The Work:
Answer client’s business questions by dissecting their data, using measurement techniques, drafting KPIs, and building reports and dashboards.Collaborate with clients and team members on data visualizations using tools such as Tableau, Qlik, IBM Cognos, Plotly, and Kibana, per clients’ needs.Generate requirements for application designs while pinpointing the best type of visualization to meet your client’s needs.Build and test functional prototypes for BI, data discovery, and analytics solutions.Run data and dashboard quality assurance throughout the design phase in collaboration with your team.Build dashboard automation processes and pull together and deliver presentations based on your findings.Work together with IT Architects, BI analysts, database developers, application developers, and functional practitioners, as well as with clients/partners.

What You Need:
Minimum of 2 years of combined data, analytics and strategic consulting experience
Minimum of 2 years of analytical delivery platform implementation experience
Minimum of 2 years of experience one or more of the following areas:
Minimum of two years of experience one or more of the following areas:
Business Translator (identifying business problem, initiative, analytics intervention, data scientist management, data science interpretation, storytelling)
Analytics led Performance models (spanning multi-functions with direct/ indirect causality, used to inform strategic and operational planning and decision making)
Data & Analytics Transformation (current state assessment, strategy development, value case, roadmap, and blueprint)
Process Automation, Machine Learning, and Artificial Intelligence practices (knowledge of how advancing digital tools and techniques are applied in enterprise data and analytics strategies and roadmaps)
A Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience (12 years) or an Associate’s Degree with 6 years of work experience
Bonus points if you have:
Experience with any cloud (AWS, Azure, GCP) is a strong plus
Create a value chain to help address the challenges of acquiring data, evaluating its value, distilling & analyzing.
Lead data modeling activities to capture and model data requirements, business rules, and logical and physical models
Examine data from multiple sources, and share insights which provide competitive advantage
We will not accept external applications from applicants located in Colorado, unless the role can only be performed in Colorado. As required by the Colorado Equal Pay Transparency Act, Accenture provides a reasonable range of minimum compensation for roles that may be hired in Colorado. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors including but not limited to skill set, level of experience, and specific office location. For the state of Colorado only, the range of starting pay for this role is $61,600 - $114,499 and information on benefits offered is here.
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",566.0
168,data+scientist,"At Barings, we are as invested in our associates as we are in our clients. We recognize those who work diligently for us and reward them for personal and professional integrity, communication skills, distinct competencies and expertise in specific strategies, ability to collaborate as a team member and true dedication to the interests of our clients.
We thank you for your interest in joining the Barings team, and invite you to explore our current employment opportunities.
Job Title
Title: Machine Learning Scientist
Department: Global Technology and Operations – Data Science & Insights
Location: Charlotte, NC
Barings is a $326+ billion* global investment manager sourcing differentiated opportunities and building long-term portfolios across public and private fixed income, real estate, and specialist equity markets. With investment professionals based in North America, Europe and Asia Pacific, the firm, a subsidiary of MassMutual, aims to serve its clients, communities and employees, and is committed to sustainable practices and responsible investment.
*Assets under management as of 3/31/21
Job Summary
As a machine-learning scientist at Barings, you will analyze, model, implement and automate scalable solutions for our customers. You have the opportunity to embed your creativity with an array of ML algorithms in addition with domain knowledge to solve complex business. Successful candidates will be a part of a talented team that is disrupting…
Primary Responsibilities
Automated deployments of machine learning techniques to improve our understanding of customer behavior.
Analyze, extract, and optimize relevant information from large amounts of data to help drive business decisions on product features and operational efficiency
Establish scalable, efficient processes for data analyses, model development, validation and experimentation
Collaborate with cross functional teams to understand business teams and turn research into products
Qualifications:
A graduate degree in computer science, mathematics, data science, statistics, physics, or a related technical field.
Solid grasp of mathematics and machine learning concepts (i.e., optimization functions, linear algebra, etc.)
Knowledgeable of relevant literature around applications for machine learning and deep learning
You should have 3+ years of hands on experience in building machine learning solutions from conceptualization to implementation
Strong knowledge of supervised (classification, regression) and unsupervised techniques (clustering, dimensionality reduction)
Experience with designed experiments
Proficient at programming in Python, Scala, and SQL
Fluency in data manipulation (SQL, Spark, Pandas)
Experience with machine learning tools such as scikit-learn, XGBoost, and Pytorch
Strong problem solving and communication skills
Curiosity. A repeated pattern asking and understanding the “why” behind the data
Desired Skills
Academic thesis or published papers in ML space
Prior experience working in finance, FinTech, or investment facilities
Experience deploying models in a production environment
Barings is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer; Minority/Female/Age/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Individual with Disability/Protected Veteran. We welcome all persons to apply.
Barings offers a comprehensive benefits package including:
CORE BENEFITS & WELLNESS
Medical (including Virtual Care), Prescription, Dental, and Vision Coverage
Fitness Center Reimbursement Program (Including Online Memberships)
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Fertility Benefits
FINANCIAL WELL-BEING
401(k) Plan w/Company Match
Pension Plan
Health Savings Account (HSA) with Company Contributions
Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Health Care & Dependent Care
Retirement Health Reimbursement Account
LIFE INSURANCE
Basic and Supplemental Life Insurance
Spouse and Child Life Insurance
TIME OFF, DISABILITY AND LEAVE OF ABSENCE
Paid Vacation, Sick Days and Annual Holidays
Paid Leave of Absences (Maternity Leave, Parental Leave, Caregiver Leave, Bereavement Time)
Short and Long Term Disability Plans
Paid Volunteer Time
 OTHER BENEFITS
Education Assistance Program
Charitable Matching Gifts Program
Commuter Reimbursement Program
Adoption and Surrogacy Reimbursement Program",567.0
169,data+scientist,"Immediate need for a talented Senior Data Scientist with experience in the Utilities Industry. This is a 12+ Contract opportunity with long-term potential and is located in Charlotte, NC. Please review the job description below,

Job ID: 21- 32215

Job Description:
Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions.
Client business narratives told by the data and present them to other scientists, business stakeholders, and managers at various levels.
Develop and test heuristics. Create and run models. Perform data exploration and data mining.
Create business intelligence, dashboards, visualizations, and/or other advanced analytics reports to adequately tell the business narrative and offer recommendations that are practiced, actionable, and have material impact, in addition to being well-supported by analytical models and data.


Required/Basic Qualifications:
Working knowledge of statistics, programming and predictive modeling. Working knowledge of code writing.
Previous experience working in data mining or data engineering.
Possess advanced statistics/machine learning knowledge and implementation skills.
Experience with time series. Understanding of and ability to use programming languages like PySpark and SQL (Structured Query Language).


Our client is a leading Utilities Industry and we are currently interviewing to fill this and other similar contract positions. If you are interested in this position, please apply online for immediate consideration. #cha",568.0
170,data+scientist,"Duration:6+Months
Responsibilities:
6 years of working experience in Teradata and Ab Initio
Expert in defining and implementing various data movement patterns in Data warehouse environment
Very good analytical and problem solving skills
Should have strong technical experience in Design Mapping specifications HLD LLD Development Coding Unit testing using Ab Initio and Teradata
Good knowledge in developing UNIX scripts Teradata BTEQ
Must have the ability to relate to both business and technical members of the team and possess excellent communication



Requirements:
Should be able to provide oversight and technical guidance to junior members in the team
Expert in Data Warehousing concepts and implementing the same
Good Knowledge in Creating transformation scripts using Teradata utilities like BTEQ FEXP MLOAD FASTLOAD
Ability to respond quickly to issues and risks
Ability to create the Design document for the specifications either suitable for Ab Initio mapping or Teradata Scripts
Provide Root Cause Analysis for defects to minimize defects in future
Supports process improvements
Should have exposure to work in AGILE delivery environment
Work experience in Banking and Finance industry is desired




The Capgemini Freelancer Gateway is enabled by a cutting-edge software platform that leads the contingent labor world for technology innovation. The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
A global leader in consulting, technology services and digital transformation, Capgemini is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50 year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organizations to realize their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. It is a multicultural company of over 200,000 team members in more than 40 countries. The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.",569.0
171,data+scientist,"Wondering what’s within Beckman Coulter?
Take a closer look.

Join a team where you can be heard, be supported, and always be yourself. At Beckman Coulter, a Danaher company, we’re building a culture that celebrates backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of all our associates. At first glance, you’ll see we are dedicated to advancing and optimizing the laboratory to move science and health care forward for more than 80 years. Look again and you’ll see we are invested in you and you’ll have the opportunity to build a meaningful career, be creative, and try new things with the support you need to be successful. You’ll find the Danaher Business System , which makes everything possible. You’ll also see a company that investors trust—our culture of continuous improvement has helped us outperform the S&P 500 by more than 5,000% over the past 25 years.

And no matter where you look at Beckman Coulter, at the heart of what we do, you’ll witness our shared purpose—helping realize life’s potential—in action. Our work helps improve millions of lives.

We hope you’ll see yourself here, too.

As the Data Scientist, Clinical Decision Support Solutions, you will be responsible for the design, development and delivery of machine learning solutions for Beckman Coulter Diagnostics. This role can be remote or based in one of Beckman Coulter’s offices in Brea, CA; Miami, FL; or Chaska, MN. In this role, reporting to the Senior Data Scientist, CDSS, you will help shape an innovative digital diagnostics portfolio of new offerings that use machine learning and AI technology to improve clinical outcomes, and you will collaborate with a team of highly skilled software engineers and data scientists to deliver these predictive analytics to healthcare providers via integrated CDS solutions . You will accomplish this by being hands-on and collaborating with your team, other business groups, electronic health record (EHR) vendors, clinicians, and hospital IT teams. Your projects will leverage data from medical diagnostics and electronic health records to deliver actionable insights.

Beckman Coulter is looking for a passionate and ambitious leader to join us in this cutting-edge digital healthcare transformation journey; someone who is driven by our strong sense of purpose to improve patient health. We are seeking a candidate who is comfortable working in a dynamic fast-paced environment with a strong sense of urgency and proven ability to lead resources in a flexible and adaptable environment.

The essential requirements of the job include:
Advanced degree (Master’s preferred) in engineering, science, mathematics, or related field.

Knowledge of the latest machine learning and data visualization tools and methods as applied in business contexts.

Knowledge of Machine Learning Life Cycle with experience having taken at least one machine learning project from development to successful deployment.

Experience working with agile software development methods, such as scrum and Kanban.

Ability to effectively summarize results from analysis to a diverse set of audiences with varying background and technical skills.

Willingness to travel up to 25% required (post-COVID).

It would be a plus if you also possess previous experience in:

Experience in the fields of IoT, including fault diagnosis and prediction, and/or in life sciences, medical diagnostics, biostatistics and more.

Experience with time series data leveraging methods such as regression, classification, survival analysis, and ARIMA

Experience with Deep Learning and associated tools, such as TensorFlow and GPUs

Experience working with cloud computing, including AWS and/or Azure

Beckman Coulter, a Danaher company, offers a broad array of comprehensive, competitive benefit programs that add value to associates’ and their families’ lives. Whether it’s a health care program or paid time off, our programs contribute to life beyond the job. Check out our benefits at danaherbenefitsinfo.com . We believe you’ll like what you see.

We believe that creativity and innovation thrive when the most diverse set of voices are heard, and that’s why we’re taking concrete steps to ensure that we’re fostering an inclusive and engaging workplace for our team. If you’d like to learn more, read stories from our associates on our Careers Blog or contact one of our recruiters.

#LI-CM4

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.",570.0
172,data+scientist,"
Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
10+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building and deploying ML models or hands on experience developing deep learning models
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the world’s AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, we’d like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
Inclusive Team Culture
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have thirteen employee-led affinity groups, reaching 85,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 16 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

Work/Life Balance
Our team puts a high value on work-life harmony. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here. We are a customer-obsessed organization—leaders start with the customer and work backwards. They work vigorously to earn and keep customer trust. As such, this is a customer facing role in a hybrid delivery model. Project engagements include remote delivery methods and onsite engagement that will include travel to customer locations as needed.

Mentorship & Career Growth
Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:

Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers’ models after they are prototyped
Mater’s degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers’ organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",571.0
0,chemical+engineer,"Position is temp to hire/Monday – FridayInterviews will be in personThis is an immediate needSkills Required:  * Chemical Engineering Bachelor degree  * Process and project engineering experience Engineer II will perform assignments requiring knowledge and application of complex engineering principles. This position is responsible for the performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned. This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes. They are typically responsible for managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant. Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets. Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities. Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning. Is able to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly. Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency. Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.A Bachelors in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering is required and 5 or more years of engineering experience. Job Type: Full-timePay: $32.83 per hourBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceLife insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftApplication Question(s):Have you read the full job description and do you have the experience required?Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Chemical or Mechanical Engineering: 5 years (Required)Language:English (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",0.0
1,chemical+engineer,"Our Partner, a manufacturer of cryogenic equipment used in the production, storage, and distribution of liquefied natural gas (LNG) and industrial gases, is looking for a Process Technology Engineer. This is an excellent full-time opportunity located in The Woodlands, Texas.Job SummaryThe Process Technology Engineer - Contractor works with the Process Engineering and Process Technology teams to develop new and innovative processes from conceptual design to commercial development. The candidate must have the ability to work well with others, provide expert knowledge and opinions. The Engineer must be able to prepare process information, reports, presentation and package of information to present to the working team, as well as the management and business personnel.Activities will include the following:Work with other Engineers in the development of new and upgraded processesWrite process descriptions for new and/or updated processesSupport development of simulationsSupport development work of heat and material balancesSupport and develop Process Flow DiagramsSupport and develop P&IDsPrepare process equipment data sheets, equipment lists, electrical usage, and utility usage listsAbility to support process systems calculations, including line sizing, hydraulic evaluations, vessel sizing, valve sizing, etc.Develop process control schemes for new processesCheck process engineering work performed by other process engineersAssist in the preparation of Start-up and Operating ManualsRequirementsBachelors, Masters, or Ph.D. Degree in Chemical EngineeringMinimum of 10 year of industry experienceStrong preference of someone with 20+ years of experience in acetylene production, processing, and manufacture.Knowledge of chemical engineering “First Principles”Working knowledge of ASPEN HYSYS and/or SimSci process simulation softwareWorking knowledge of ASPEN and/or AVEVA dynamic simulation software.Experienced and knowledgeable in acetylene processing and handling.Experience in operating facilities dealing with production of acetyleneKnowledgeable of codes and standards dealing with acetylene processes and handlingGood understanding of process safety codes and standards, PSM regulation, NFPA codes and standards, general safety standards when dealing with acetylene and acetylene manufacture.Understands basic applicable engineering codesStrong communication skills both verbal and written for the purpose of explaining challenges and solutions internallyGood interpersonal skills to successfully interface other engineering disciplines and customersJob Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $45.00 - $55.00 per hourBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceHealth savings accountVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayAbility to Commute/Relocate:The Woodlands, TX: Reliably commute or willing to relocate with an employer-provided relocation package (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:acetylene: 10 years (Required)Language:English (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",1.0
2,chemical+engineer,"Opportunity: Permanent opportunity with a leading independent oil and natural gas exploration and production company located in Houston Texas. Company has a balanced portfolio of properties consisting of significant base of current production and reserve. Portfolio consists of 450+ drilling locations primarily in the Texas market. They have proven highly stable despite the industry downturn and pandemic exhibited by a 200% increase to stock price since 2019.Under limited supervision, oversee and monitor daily oil and gas production operations including completions and production enhancement projects to ensure maximum productivity and profitability. Could be assigned to an Asset Team, Function Area or Production Operations. Continuously improve programs, processes, and relationships.Permanent HireMonday-Friday flex scheduleCompensation based on experienceRetirement program with company matchMultiple benefits packages for health, dental, vision.Paid Time Off, Company HolidaysNew corporate office 2021Essential job functions: Based in Houston and will work split schedule working in-office and from homeWill travel to Eagle Ford typically consisting of a day trop 2-3 times per monthMonitor and review producing well performance to optimize oil and gas production and troubleshoot problem wellsUtilize advanced project management skills to design and implement new well completions, recompletions, artificial lift, production facilities, etc.Monitor equipment performance for efficiency, maintenance, repair or changePrepare AFE and economic justifications for capital and expense projects, and work together with field supervisor to insure proper implementationCoordinate with Operations personnel on field operations as necessaryMonitor and control Capital and LOE spending to maximize profit and loss potentialReview and approve vendor invoices for goods and servicesHelp ensure regulatory compliance, and represent the company at regulatory hearing or industry meetingsAssist other company departments by providing engineering expertise for various special projects such as field studies, acquisitions, joint ventures, specialized reporting, forecasting, etc.Provide engineering support to field personnel as neededPerforms engineering assignments which require problem identification and development of best solutions.Assignments are broad in nature, requiring originality and ingenuity.Operates with some latitude in making autonomous decisions.Reviews progress with leadership.Plans and conducts research, designs, develops and executes phases of larger project or a total project of moderate complexity.May be the lead engineer on challenging projects with some functional supervision.Under general supervision, plans, conducts and provides leadership on assignments.Reviews progress and evaluates results.Plans and identifies resources for given projects or tasks.Recommends changes in procedures.Assignments are broad in nature, requiring originality and ingenuity.Operates with some latitude in making autonomous decisions. Reviews progress with leadership.Knowledge, Skills, and AbilitiesBachelor's Degree in Engineering5-15 years’ experience5 years’ recent experience in Eagle FordAbility to travel to Eagle Ford for site visitsMechanical lift experience (artificial lift, plunger lift)Spotfire experience requiredPre-production well design experience requiredPhysical Requirements: Must be able to move about the facility, squat, reach, pull lift, and use hands and fingers and other fine motor tasks.Must be able to speak, write, and understand English.Occasionally will have to lift up to 50 LBS.Work will sometimes be performed in the plant or warehouses which are not air conditioned.TalentWell is a National recruitment firm with headquarters located in Houston Texas. We specialize in contract-to-hire and permanent placement positions across a number of industries including oil & gas, manufacturing, and healthcare. We offer all of our employee’s excellent benefits including medical, dental, vision, and retirement plans. TalentWell is an equal opportunity employer and are committed to creating an inclusive and diverse workforce.Job Type: Full-timePay: From $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible scheduleHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftCOVID-19 considerations:Yes per CDCEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Production Engineer: 4 years (Required)Eagle Ford: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",2.0
3,chemical+engineer,"JOB NUMBER: 6 MONTH CONTRACT – TEMP TO HIRE!**MUST BE AVAILABLE FOR IMMEDIATE HIRE**JOB SUMMARY: Under general supervision, the Engineer II will perform assignments requiring knowledge and application of complex engineering principles.This position is responsible for the performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned.This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes.They are typically responsible for managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.Ability to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.Bachelor’s Degree in Chemical Engineering is required and 5 or more years of process and project engineering experience.Cenergy is a dynamic, diverse, woman-owned company that has provided stellar support to our clients globally for over 25 years! We hire extraordinary people, and each of our team members are encouraged to embody our core values to drive innovation and own it with integrity and trust while adding to our positive and forward thinking atmosphere.Cenergy employees can enjoy the following robust benefits and resources:Ongoing Training (RSO, Systems, Software Programs, OSHA Safety, JJ Keller, etc.)Continuous Employment Development and LearningOngoing Advocacy, internal assets with HSE, Legal and HR teams and experts to aid in Employee Career Path and Advancement401KAetna & Kaiser Group Medical CoverageDental Insurance CoverageVision Insurance CoverageBasic Life Insurance & AD&DLong Term DisabilityVoluntary Short Term DisabilityAccess to Health JoyGAP Medical CoverageDirect DepositHealth Savings and Flexible Spending AccountsJob Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $30.00 - $32.00 per hourBenefits:Health insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Managing large process area in plant: 2 years (Preferred)process/project engineering: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",3.0
4,chemical+engineer,"Duties:Assist production manager in organizing and managing day-to-day activities for plant operations to achieve daily production goals.Maintain proper documentation for all plant related activities.Set overall plant policies and procedures to ensure effective operations.Ensure plant compliance with company policies and government regulations.Provide training and guidance to workers to meet performance standards with Managers and Safety & Environmental Coordinator.Strive for continuous plant process improvements for increased productivity.Maintain work area clean, safe, and organized.Other duties as required by management.
Experience / Education /Skills:Preferably a BS degree in Chemical Engineering, Process Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or equivalent experience.Comprehensive knowledge/experience in Chemical/Plastic Manufacturing and related fields will be preferable.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills will be required.Self-motivation and initiative to resolve issues and implement internal improvements with minimal supervision. A “hands-on” person that is not reluctant to troubleshoot.Computer skills should include practical usage of Microsoft Office, spreadsheet (Excel), word-processing (word), presentation (PowerPoint) and email programs (outlook).
Please send resume to airaha@pasona.com.",4.0
5,chemical+engineer,"SUMMARY: The DCS Engineer is responsible for assisting the Site DCS/Systems Manager in overseeing DCS/Systems resources for the site (DCS, historians, PLCs).Key Responsibilities include:Perform programming and troubleshooting of assigned DCS/Systems as needed.Propose modifications to DCS/Systems equipment that improve plant performance, safety, or reliability, and reduce costs.Develop scope and design of DCS/Systems capital projects and oversee engineering commissioning and startup, assuring on-time completion.Support the Digital Transformation initiative by proposing projects, developing scope and risk/benefit analysis, and performing cost and ROI estimates.Perform regular system health monitoring checks, including server and workstation hardware integrity, fault LED’s, communications integrity, available memory, time sync, cabinet internals (dust removal), monitor display quality, etc.Work with unit process engineers and DCS Manager to develop and maintain DCS interlock lists, DCS training manuals, sequence flowcharts, and How-To documents.Assist units in maintenance of DCS/Systems and assist in hardware and software changes as necessaryMonitor and address DCS alarms, update alarm surveys, propose fixes, and work with unit engineers to execute action items.Develop and maintain a Master Alarm Data Base for all units in accordance with the ISA 18.2 Alarm Management standard.Keep up to date in training for system software updates and revisions, and revise training manuals as necessary.Monitor DCS system alarms (including Windows event logs) and system performance, and work with system TAC to resolve issues quickly to maintain system reliability.Assist DCS/Systems Manager in configuring and maintaining the Pi system, adding/modifying tags and users, adding notifications, troubleshooting issues with Pi, and monitoring system health.Review event summaries and monitor logs for DCS manual interventions, and assist unit process engineers in developing DCS solutions to eliminate the interventions if needed.Provide DCS training for engineers and board operators.Review and audit DCS MOC’s for accuracy, assist engineers in simulations, and double check programming changes.Assist the DCS manager in the development of OT cybersecurity policies, procedures, training, and training logs.Monitor antivirus scans for unwanted files or potential intrusions, and perform audits of USB ports and GPO enforcement.Apply operating system security patch updates and antivirus software definition file updates in a timely manner.Perform regular system backups (or monitor automated backups), including trends, event summaries, batch data, and hard drive images, and become proficient in restoring related files as needed.Develop and maintain KPI’s, dashboards, statistics, and other metrics to keep DCS Manager informed on DCS system health and performance.Job Type: Full-timePay: $68,000.00 - $120,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offSchedule:12 hour shiftAbility to commute/relocate:Pasadena, TX 77507: Reliably commute or planning to relocate before starting work (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:DCS programming in a chemical process: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",5.0
6,chemical+engineer,"Salary: $95k - 125k per year
Reference: 860072

job summary:

We Are seeking a Process Controls Engineer for the Greater Houson, TX. Area.

This is a Direct Hire opportunity with one of the most well known Oil & Gas Companies in the country!
Shift: Days

Pay: $95K -125K
Requirements:

Bachelor's in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering is required
5 + years of engineering experience.
3-5 years control system(DCS) maintenance and configuration experience
Foxboro IA /EVO system experience preferred.

location: Pasadena, Texas
job type: Permanent
salary: $95,000 - 125,000 per year
work hours: 8am to 4pm
education: Bachelors

responsibilities:
performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned. This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes. They are typically responsible for
Managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.
Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.
Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting
Performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.
General control system(DCS) configuration changes needed to optimize plant operations and alarm management.
Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.
Is able to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.
Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.
Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.

qualifications:
Experience level: Experienced
Minimum 5 years of experience
Education: Bachelors (required)

skills:
Process Improvement

Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",6.0
7,chemical+engineer,"Associate Project Engineer
Take your next career step at ABB with a global team that is energizing the transformation of society and industry to achieve a more productive, sustainable future. At ABB, we have the clear goal of driving diversity and inclusion across all dimensions: gender, LGBTQ+, abilities, ethnicity and generations. Together, we are embarking on a journey where each and every one of us, individually and collectively, welcomes and celebrates individual differences.
Working as a Associate Project Engineer, for various Energy Service engineering projects in Process Automation Energy Industries in Houston, Texas, providing technical details, costs and deliverables for sales proposals. Reporting to the Functional Safety Execution Center Lead, you will be responsible for engineering and programming distributed controls systems in our Process Automation, Energy Industries team. This position will be responsible for all aspects of a project including creating and reading logic and flow diagrams, programming, Human Machine Interface (HMI), simulation, enclosure design, testing and start-up.
Your responsibilities
Work as part of an integrated design team to meet project requirements and deliverables.
Work with Customer to understand details of the process to be controlled.
Conduct reviews of application design with Customer and ABB project team to ensure that the control requirements have been captured correctly.
Design and test automation enclosures with ABB or 3rd party process automation.
Implement the control application code using ABB or 3rd party process automation engineering tools.
Develop simulation.
Design and test graphics.
Complete testing of the new control application.
Travel for Customer meetings and onsite commissioning activities.
Train Customer resources on developed control applications.
Provide onsite commissioning and startup coverage to help troubleshoot any issues with the new applications.
Your background
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering – Chemical, Electrical or Computer Science preferred and 0 to 2 years of experience.
Ability and willingness to travel approximately 10% of the time.
Reimbursement for relocation is not available.
Knowledge and/or experience in control system applications software programming and troubleshooting is preferred.
Strong technical knowledge of programming techniques is preferred.
Experience in software strategy design, developing user requirements, functional requirements, and detailed design is preferred.
Strong interpersonal skills to communicate and work with diverse discipline project teams.
Ability to learn new methods and technologies.
Proficient in standard workstation tools: Microsoft® Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint®).
Must be a US citizen or permanent resident of USA
Benefits
Retirement plan
Life insurance
Medical insurance
Disability insurance
Wellbeing program
More about us
ABB Energy Industries is enabling safe, smart and sustainable projects and operations for businesses across the oil, gas, chemicals, life sciences, power generation and water sectors. Driving integrated solutions that automate, digitalize and electrify industry we connect our people and technology to help our customers adapt and succeed. With over 50 years domain expertise, we continue to innovate and reshape traditional approaches across the energy sector with our technologies designed to improve operational efficiency, reduce risk, reduce energy consumption and waste. We look forward to receiving your application. If you want to discover more about ABB, take another look at our website www.abb.com. Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action at ABB ABB is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, creed, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, citizen status, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, marital status, family medical leave status, or protected veterans status. For more information regarding your (EEO) rights as an applicant, please visit the following websites: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm. http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf As an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, applicants may request to review the Affirmative Action Plan of a particular ABB facility between the hours of 9:00 A.M. - 5:00 P.M. EST Monday through Friday by contacting an ABB HR Representative at 1-888-694-7762. Protected veterans and qualified individuals with a disability may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access ABB's career site as a result of your disability. You may request reasonable accommodations by calling an ABB HR Representative at 1-888-694-7762 or by sending an email to US-AskHR@abb.com. Resumes and applications will not be accepted in this manner.",7.0
8,chemical+engineer,"Where you fit in?
The Process Engineer is typically assigned specific Process Units to support as part of an area Production Team. At times, the he/she may instead be assigned to key studies, projects and improvement activities. The successful candidate will join the Deer Park Refinery Process Engineering Team and will be assigned an operations support area basis experience and need.
What’s the role?
The Process Engineer is responsible for providing technical process engineering support such that the safe, environmentally sound, reliable and profitable operation of the units to which s/he is assigned is assured. This role might cover the Kerosine Hydrotreater unit, Reformer and Sulfur units.
Primary responsibilities include short term and long-term process monitoring, support process safety activities (FIM/FAM/PHA/MOC), support turnarounds and major maintenance activities, prepare/present technical knowledge for operator training, support abnormal situation management, catalyst selection, and support HSE compliance tasks. Identifies and communicates issues to the appropriate technical and operations personnel. Leads or assists in evaluation of complex technical or operational problems. Assists as appropriate in problem definition and ensuring solutions. Provides technical documentation to ensure knowledge retention, continuity, and organizational learning. Provide support to long term strategy planning for the units/systems. Provides support and leadership to multidiscipline teams addressing cross organizational issues / opportunities.
The Process Engineer is expected to:
Provide day-to-day technical support to Operations in delivery of production plans.
Design/asset optimization activities concentrate on routine topics (guided by procedures or multiple precedents). Has greater exposure to process integration, as the job holder needs to integrate a wider range of disciplines when undertaking design activities for projects.
Works as an autonomous Process Engineer, translates the guidelines and standards into practice and solves common technical challenges. Works within company standards and policies under defined directions while receiving occasional guidance on techniques. Makes recommendations and improvements to existing processes.
Ensures integration of related discipline activities to achieve delivery which is safe (all aspects of HSSE - personal/process safety and environment), fit for purpose and meeting cost-value optimization.
Independently manages the relation with multiple (groups of) internal and external stakeholders on a tactical level.
Conduct Proactive Technical Monitoring (Optimization, Margin, NEVC)
Long-Term Process Monitoring (LTPM) – Catalyst, Heat Exchangers. etc.
Process Models and Simulations
Track, Compile and Troubleshoot Process Engineering Material & Energy Balances
Track/Troubleshoot Product Quality issues
Complete assigned Feed Acceptance Tasks
Support Abnormal Situation Management (ASMs; e.g. S/D, S/U, Troubleshooting/Recommendations)
Participate or Lead Causal Investigations
Participate or Lead Management of Change (MOCs)
Complete documentation of key Process Engineering work/activities (Technical Knowledge Management)
Support Turnarounds and Major Maintenance Activities (i.e. Pitstops, MOCs, Procedure Reviews, Lookback, Scope, MEC etc.)
Catalyst Monitoring and Selection (loading/unloading)
Identify and Assess Growth Projects / Asset Integrity & Maintain Margin (e-SIP and follow up support)
Support Process Safety Activities (PHA, RHA, etc.)
Support Projects
Lead or Support HSE Compliance Tasks (Environmental release calcs as needed, Radar, FIM, etc.)
Prepare/Present Technical Knowledge Training (to Operations)
Support Procedures Reviews
Lead or Support MTO Items
End of the month accounting/closing (Chemicals and Utilities)
P&ID Review
24/7 focal point for technical assurance ( as needed).
Support and participate in turnaround activities for the assigned units.
Skills & Requirements
What we need from you -
Must have legal authorization to work in the US on a full-time basis for anyone other than current employer.
Bachelor’s degree is required; Chemical Engineering is an advantage
Minimum of four (4) years industrial experience in process technology or plant operations preferable in Reformer units, Hydro processing or/and ARU/SWS units.
Good knowledge of refining processes in general (Crude Units, Conversion units, etc.).
Working knowledge of process control systems and theory.
Knowledge of corrosion mechanisms as they apply to the processes being supported and of the materials, process controls and methods to mitigate those mechanisms.
Previous assignment as Project /Operations Support Engineer.
The individual must be proficient in the use of spreadsheets, computer and simulation models.
Company description
Shell is a global group of energy and petrochemical companies with about 84,000 employees across more than 70 countries. We aim to meet the world’s growing need for more and cleaner energy solutions in ways that are economically, environmentally and socially responsible. We have expertise in exploration, production, refining and marketing of oil and natural gas, and the manufacturing and marketing of chemicals.
As a global energy company operating in a challenging world, we set high standards of performance and ethical behaviors. We are judged by how we act and how we live up to our core values of honesty, integrity and respect for people. Our Business Principles are based on these. They promote trust, openness, teamwork and professionalism, as well as pride in what we do and how we conduct business.
Building on our core values, we aspire to sustain a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels respected and valued, from our employees to our customers and partners. A diverse workforce and an inclusive work environment are vital to our success, leading to greater innovation and better energy solutions.
An innovative place to work
There’s never been a more exciting time to work at Shell. Everyone here is helping solve one of the biggest challenges facing the world today: bringing the benefits of energy to everyone on the planet, whilst managing the risks of climate change.
Join us and you’ll add your talent and imagination to a business with the power to shape the future – whether by investing in renewables, exploring new ways to store energy or developing technology that helps the world to use energy more efficiently.
A rewarding place to work
Combine our creative, collaborative environment and global operations with an impressive range of benefits and joining Shell becomes an inspired career choice.
We’re huge advocates for career development. We’ll encourage you to try new roles and experience new settings. By pushing people to reach their potential, we frequently help them find skills they never knew they had, or make career moves they never thought possible.
Shell Oil Company, a subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell plc, has reached an agreement for the sale of its interest in Deer Park Refining Limited Partnership, a 50-50 joint venture between Shell Oil Company and P.M.I. Norteamerica, S.A. De C.V. (a subsidiary of Petroleos Mexicanos, or Pemex). The transaction will transfer Shell’s interest in the partnership, and therefore full ownership of the refinery, to Pemex, subject
to regulatory approvals. Employees assigned to the Refinery assets in scope for divestment will be offered employment by Pemex with effect upon closing in accordance with the transaction. The transaction is expected to close in Q4 2021.
",8.0
9,chemical+engineer,"About Weaver
With offices coast to coast, Weaver is the 36th largest CPA firm in the United States and the largest independent accounting firm based in the Southwest. We serve clients from Fortune 500 public companies to mid-market private firms, as well as government entities, not-for-profit organizations and individual business owners. The firm is particularly well-known in financial services, energy, manufacturing and distribution, construction, technology, real estate, health care and government. Our services go beyond traditional assurance and tax services to include risk advisory, transaction advisory, IT advisory, energy compliance and consulting, forensics and litigation services, and specialty tax services such as international tax, state and local tax and private client services.
What makes Weaver different is our entrepreneurial mindset, coupled with a diverse and accepting culture that makes room for people to grow and succeed. We take pride in hiring and developing people who respect everyone for who they are and what they contribute, no matter how different. We’re committed to doing work we’re deeply proud of, always striving to transcend client expectations. We support each other, day in and day out, in work and in life. These are just a few of our core values, and they are the foundation of every interaction with our clients and with each other. Find out more about our services, industry experience and culture at weaver.com.
Position Profile
Weaver seeks an Energy Compliance Services Associate I Engineer to join our growing team. Weaver’s Energy Compliance Services (ECS) practice helps companies of all sizes understand regulatory requirements and maintain compliance of transportation fuel regulations, including gasoline, renewable fuels, and greenhouse gases. We are the subject matter experts of technical laws and regulations by US Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and the California Air Resources Board (CARB).
The role of the ECS Associate I Engineer is to develop an understanding of technical laws and regulations related to the ECS practice. This individual will be responsible for completing consulting engagements, as well as performing regulatory compliance assessments. They will assist with engineering reviews, do on-site visit inspections of renewable fuels facilities, perform mass and energy balance calculations, and draft engineering review reports. They will also manage multiple assignments with the supervision of more experienced team members. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and deadline-oriented with strong interpersonal, communication, teamwork and professional skills.
Education and Skills
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited University
0-2+ years of experience in chemical engineering field
Currently holds or working towards an Engineer-in-Training (EIT), or Professional Engineer (PE) license, or has the goal to progress professionally by working toward obtaining certifications
Experience performing mass and energy balance calculations
Experience interpreting and preparing block flow diagrams (BFDs), process flow diagrams (PFDs), and process descriptions
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook
If the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam has not been taken yet, candidate will be expected to take and pass the exam within one year of start date
Ability to learn quickly and adapt to a fluid working environment
Weaver is an Equal Opportunity Employer
At this time, Weaver is only accepting resumes submitted directly by the candidate or by employee referral.",10.0
10,chemical+engineer,"Location Name: Texas City, TX
Job/Requisition ID: 64906
Location Address: 2401 5th Avenue South, Texas City, TX, United States (US), 77590
Education Level: Master's Desired
Relevant Experience Level: Mid Career (4-10 Years)
Employee Group: Regular - Full Time
Employee Subgroup: Salaried Exempt
POSITION SUMMARY:
This position reports to the APC Supervisor in the Process Control Group at the Galveston Bay Refinery. The Advanced Process Control Engineer’s primary role is to build and maintain Advanced Process Controllers (APCs), also known as Multivariable Controllers (MVCs). This role requires strong analytical, organizational, interpersonal, and communication skills.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Maintain performance of installed APC applications. Improve stability, robustness, economic performance, and Health, Environmental, and Safety performance of APC applications.
Enhance refinery economics by maintaining knowledge of Product Control Targets, economic drivers, and constraints limiting profitability. Maintain knowledge of future plans for changing operating conditions and equipment modifications.
Work collaboratively with refinery resources to identify and develop new APC applications to maximize profitability. Execute project to develop or modify APC application. Produce and/or update documentation.
Monitor and communicate APC KPIs for assigned areas.
Identify the need for and provide training to Operations and other refinery personnel on APC applications.
Act as a lead or a participant in incident investigations and participate in the Management of Change (MOC) process.
Support the development of APC knowledge and skills within MPC.
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:
Bachelor’s Degree in chemical engineering or an M.S. or Ph.D. in multivariable control required
Minimum of 4 years’ experience in process controls preferred
Proficiency in Experion PKS or Honeywell TPS preferred
Proficiency in Aspentech DMCPlus and DMC preferred
#LI-PH1

About Marathon Petroleum Corporation
Marathon Petroleum Corporation (MPC) is a leading, integrated, downstream energy company headquartered in Findlay, Ohio. The company operates the nation's largest refining system. MPC's marketing system includes branded locations across the United States, including Marathon brand retail outlets. MPC also owns the general partner and majority limited partner interest in MPLX LP, a midstream company that owns and operates gathering, processing, and fractionation assets, as well as crude oil and light product transportation and logistics infrastructure.
Travel Expected: Up to 10%
Marathon Petroleum Company LP is an Equal Opportunity Employer and gives consideration for employment to qualified applicants without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, mental or physical disability, medical condition or AIDS/HIV status, ancestry, national origin, genetic information, military, veteran status, marital status, citizenship or any other status protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws. If you would like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant, click here.
If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process at Marathon Petroleum LP, please contact our Human Resources Department at talentacquisition@marathonpetroleum.com. Please specify the reasonable accommodation you are requesting, along with the job posting number in which you may be interested. A Human Resources representative will review your request and contact you to discuss a reasonable accommodation.
Equal Opportunity Employer: Veteran / Disability
Marathon Petroleum Company LP participates in the E-Verify program in some states in which it operates (including AL, AZ, GA, MS, NC, SC, TN, and UT). For more information before proceeding, please see details in English or Spanish. Right to Work Statement English or Spanish.
To view benefit information for Marathon Petroleum Corporation please visit mympcbenefits.com.",11.0
11,chemical+engineer,"Safety and Risk Management Analyst
Job Purpose
The ideal candidates will be detail-oriented chemical engineering graduates with a desire to succeed and a willingness to learn. You will be provided with a mentor to train you in the finer aspects of process safety and risk management, and to further develop your engineering skills. Upon developing the necessary skills, you will be working as a key member of our team executing projects for the world largest production companies.
Duties and Responsibilities
Evaluating and designing pressure relief systems
Developing detailed safety and risk management design documentation
Delivering high-quality technical evaluations
Providing support for on-going safety and risk management case work including LNG hazard analysis, HAZOP support, and litigation services
The successful applicants must have:
Communication skills, including willingness to interact with various people
High efficiency and organizational skills
Attention to detail
Technical writing capabilities, including presentation of technical material in a logical, usable manner
Problem-solving abilities, including systematic approach to identification of problems and implementation of solutions

Skills and Experience
BS in Chemical Engineering
Applicant must be legally authorized to work in the United States",12.0
12,chemical+engineer,"Production Engineer - Office Location: Houston Texas - Schedule: 5/2 Mon-Fri with some field visits

Minimum Requirements: 5-15 years experience, Five (5) years Eagle Ford recent experience, Well-versed in lift systems and pre-production well design, Required: Experience with Spotfire, Bachelorâ€™s Degree.
Summary: Under limited supervision, oversee and monitor daily oil and gas production operations, including completions and production enhancement projects to ensure maximum productivity and profitability. Could be assigned to an Asset Team, Function Area, or Production Operations. Continuously improve programs, processes, and relationships.
Essential Functions
Health, Safety & Environment
Operates safely and responsibly in compliance with all environmental, health, and safety guidelines
Report all incidents (health, safety, or environmental) to supervisor and/or HSE Director in a timely fashion per policy or standards
Engineering Duties:
Monitor and review producing well performance to optimize oil and gas production and troubleshoot problem wells
Utilize advanced project management skills to design and implement new well completions, recompletions, artificial lift, production facilities, etc. as required
Monitor equipment performance for efficiency, maintenance, repair, or change
Prepare AFE and economic justifications for capital and expense projects, and work together with field supervisor to ensure proper implementation.
Coordinate with Operations personnel on-field operations as necessary
Monitor and control Capital and LOE spending to maximize profit and loss potential
Review and approve vendor invoices for goods and services
Help ensure regulatory compliance and represent the company at the regulatory hearing or industry meetings
Assist other company departments by providing engineering expertise for various special projects such as field studies, acquisitions, joint ventures, specialized reporting, forecasting, etc.
Provide engineering support to field personnel as needed
Other duties as assigned by supervisor.
Position Requirements

Education / Experience / Training: Bachelor's Degree in Engineering. Experience in a related engineering discipline.
Duties / Responsibilities:
Advanced level impact role in the job family.
Occasional supervision.
Performs engineering assignments that require problem identification and the development of best solutions.
Assignments are broad in nature, requiring originality and ingenuity.
Operates with some latitude in making autonomous decisions.
Reviews progress with leadership.
Plans and conducts research, designs, develops and executes phases of a larger project or a total project of moderate complexity.
Maybe the lead engineer on challenging projects with some functional supervision.
Under general supervision, plans, conducts, and provides leadership on assignments.
Reviews progress and evaluate results.
Plans and identifies resources for given projects or tasks.
Recommends changes in procedures.
Assignments are broad in nature, requiring originality and ingenuity.
Operates with some latitude in making autonomous decisions.
Reviews progress with leadership. Handles other duties as assigned.
Skills / Knowledge /Abilities :
Sound working knowledge of principles, concepts, theories, and/or practices of the applicable discipline.
Intermediate analytical skills.
Good verbal and written communication skills.
Intermediate-level analytical, problem-solving, and project management skills.
Skilled in the use of required systems and software applications.
Understanding of budget process and risk analysis.
*Authorization to work lawfully in the US without sponsorship is required.

*Company housing or per diem is not provided for this position at this time.
The Danos Difference
Team up with Danos, and be a part of one of the safest and best-performing companies in the business.
The Danos name means more than just outstanding performance for our customers. To our growing base of over 1,500 employees, it also means an opportunity to help keep production of energy moving.

Our company culture focuses on the values of integrity, improvement, service, respect and an uncompromising emphasis on safety in the workplace. And part of that is making sure every project goes as planned, every work environment meets the highest industry standards and enforcing a policy of fairness and overall diversity throughout our team.

Weâ€™re always looking to add new, results-driven employees to our workforce. No matter your level of experience, no matter where you are, the right job could be waiting for you at Danos. In addition to stability and competitive wages, benefits of working with Danos also include sustainable health benefit packages, 401K company match and global opportunities. If youâ€™re ready to bring the dedication, weâ€™ll bring the training, resources and support for career success.",13.0
13,chemical+engineer,"The applications engineer is responsible for providing conceptual engineering, cost estimating and proposal preparation for gas processing equipment. Equipment includes modular equipment for dew point plants, mechanical refrigeration units, fractionation trains, cryogenic plants, amine systems, TEG dehydrations, molecular sieve, and other systems found in the mid-stream market.
This position is for an individual with 5 or more years (10 preferred) in the industry capable of developing simulations in HYSYS and/or ProMax. A chemical engineering degree is preferred, but industry experience is just as valuable.
The Gas Processing Department consists of highly skilled, motivated engineers. Considered a core to the success of the company. Gas Processing Applications attracts the best and brightest engineers in the industry and offers exposure to the latest technology in the oil, gas and petrochemical markets.
Principle Duties & Responsibilities
Evaluate the design and performance of the proposed equipment base on customer specifications; ensure deliverability and reliability of suppliers to meet Customer’s specifications and time table.
Review scope definition and project specifications, prepare system process simulation, develop equipment sizing, prepare cost estimates and technical and commercial proposals.
Participate in development of proposal Process Flow Diagrams.
Maintain knowledge of codes and standards applicable to the products in the global market.
Interface with all operational departments within the company.
Maintain customer relationships; participate in client clarification meetings as required.
Position may require some domestic and international travel.
Duties must be performed consistently with the company mission and values and adhere to company policies and procedures.
Quality: Ensure alignment of Enerflex, customer and vendor quality control and quality assurance in bids.
Abide by and promote Enerflex’s HSE policy.
Job Specifications
Engineering or Engineering Technology degree and or an equivalent background. Chemical Engineering degree preferred.
A minimum of 5 years of experience (10 preferred) in estimate gas processing equipment.
Capable of developing simulations in HYSYS or ProMax.
Knowledge of commercial terms and conditions of sale.
Solid IT skills.
Fluency in English.
Advanced knowledge of product mechanical design, thermodynamics, chemical processing, and instrumentation & controls.
Time management skills including multi-tasking competing priorities as needed.
Ability to generate alternative solutions.
Being customer-centered and able to maintain satisfied customer and vendor relationships.
Track record of successfully resolving technical problems with a desire and ability to continue learning
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills.
Must be self-motivated and team oriented, capable of learning, managing time, priorities, and operating well under pressure with little supervision.
Working Conditions
Fast-paced general office environment. Many tasks have high degrees of time sensitivity.
Domestic and international travel is possible on occasion.
May be exposed to confidential information.
Frequently required to work non-standard hours including evenings and weekends.
Disclaimer
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required.
An Equal Opportunity Employer
Enerflex grants equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, genetic information, mental or physical disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Equal employment opportunities are provided in recruitment, hiring, promotions, wages, benefits, and other terms, conditions and privileges of employment.
About Us
Transforming Natural Gas to Meet the World’s Energy Needs. Enerflex is a global leader in full-service natural gas compression, processing, refrigeration systems, and electric power generation equipment and a premier provider of related engineering and mechanical services. Enerflex places its core Values of Integrity, Commitment, Creativity, and Success into action across all aspects of the business. We owe our success to the strength of our employees, our strong commitment to safety, and superior service to our customers.",14.0
14,chemical+engineer,"About Weaver
With offices coast to coast, Weaver is the 36th largest CPA firm in the United States and the largest independent accounting firm based in the Southwest. We serve clients from Fortune 500 public companies to mid-market private firms, as well as government entities, not-for-profit organizations and individual business owners. The firm is particularly well-known in financial services, energy, manufacturing and distribution, construction, technology, real estate, health care and government. Our services go beyond traditional assurance and tax services to include risk advisory, transaction advisory, IT advisory, energy compliance and consulting, forensics and litigation services, and specialty tax services such as international tax, state and local tax and private client services.
What makes Weaver different is our entrepreneurial mindset, coupled with a diverse and accepting culture that makes room for people to grow and succeed. We take pride in hiring and developing people who respect everyone for who they are and what they contribute, no matter how different. We’re committed to doing work we’re deeply proud of, always striving to transcend client expectations. We support each other, day in and day out, in work and in life. These are just a few of our core values, and they are the foundation of every interaction with our clients and with each other. Find out more about our services, industry experience and culture at weaver.com.
Position Profile
Weaver seeks an Energy Compliance Services Associate I Engineer to join our growing team. Weaver’s Energy Compliance Services (ECS) practice helps companies of all sizes understand regulatory requirements and maintain compliance of transportation fuel regulations, including gasoline, renewable fuels, and greenhouse gases. We are the subject matter experts of technical laws and regulations by US Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and the California Air Resources Board (CARB).
The role of the ECS Associate I Engineer is to develop an understanding of technical laws and regulations related to the ECS practice. This individual will be responsible for completing consulting engagements, as well as performing regulatory compliance assessments. They will assist with engineering reviews, do on-site visit inspections of renewable fuels facilities, perform mass and energy balance calculations, and draft engineering review reports. They will also manage multiple assignments with the supervision of more experienced team members. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and deadline-oriented with strong interpersonal, communication, teamwork and professional skills.
Education and Skills
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited University
0-2+ years of experience in chemical engineering field
Currently holds or working towards an Engineer-in-Training (EIT), or Professional Engineer (PE) license, or has the goal to progress professionally by working toward obtaining certifications
Experience performing mass and energy balance calculations
Experience interpreting and preparing block flow diagrams (BFDs), process flow diagrams (PFDs), and process descriptions
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook
If the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam has not been taken yet, candidate will be expected to take and pass the exam within one year of start date
Ability to learn quickly and adapt to a fluid working environment
Weaver is an Equal Opportunity Employer
At this time, Weaver is only accepting resumes submitted directly by the candidate or by employee referral.",15.0
15,chemical+engineer,"Location Name: Texas City, TX
Job/Requisition ID: 64906
Location Address: 2401 5th Avenue South, Texas City, TX, United States (US), 77590
Education Level: Master's Desired
Relevant Experience Level: Mid Career (4-10 Years)
Employee Group: Regular - Full Time
Employee Subgroup: Salaried Exempt
POSITION SUMMARY:
This position reports to the APC Supervisor in the Process Control Group at the Galveston Bay Refinery. The Advanced Process Control Engineer’s primary role is to build and maintain Advanced Process Controllers (APCs), also known as Multivariable Controllers (MVCs). This role requires strong analytical, organizational, interpersonal, and communication skills.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Maintain performance of installed APC applications. Improve stability, robustness, economic performance, and Health, Environmental, and Safety performance of APC applications.
Enhance refinery economics by maintaining knowledge of Product Control Targets, economic drivers, and constraints limiting profitability. Maintain knowledge of future plans for changing operating conditions and equipment modifications.
Work collaboratively with refinery resources to identify and develop new APC applications to maximize profitability. Execute project to develop or modify APC application. Produce and/or update documentation.
Monitor and communicate APC KPIs for assigned areas.
Identify the need for and provide training to Operations and other refinery personnel on APC applications.
Act as a lead or a participant in incident investigations and participate in the Management of Change (MOC) process.
Support the development of APC knowledge and skills within MPC.
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:
Bachelor’s Degree in chemical engineering or an M.S. or Ph.D. in multivariable control required
Minimum of 4 years’ experience in process controls preferred
Proficiency in Experion PKS or Honeywell TPS preferred
Proficiency in Aspentech DMCPlus and DMC preferred
#LI-PH1

About Marathon Petroleum Corporation
Marathon Petroleum Corporation (MPC) is a leading, integrated, downstream energy company headquartered in Findlay, Ohio. The company operates the nation's largest refining system. MPC's marketing system includes branded locations across the United States, including Marathon brand retail outlets. MPC also owns the general partner and majority limited partner interest in MPLX LP, a midstream company that owns and operates gathering, processing, and fractionation assets, as well as crude oil and light product transportation and logistics infrastructure.
Travel Expected: Up to 10%
Marathon Petroleum Company LP is an Equal Opportunity Employer and gives consideration for employment to qualified applicants without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, mental or physical disability, medical condition or AIDS/HIV status, ancestry, national origin, genetic information, military, veteran status, marital status, citizenship or any other status protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws. If you would like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant, click here.
If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process at Marathon Petroleum LP, please contact our Human Resources Department at talentacquisition@marathonpetroleum.com. Please specify the reasonable accommodation you are requesting, along with the job posting number in which you may be interested. A Human Resources representative will review your request and contact you to discuss a reasonable accommodation.
Equal Opportunity Employer: Veteran / Disability
Marathon Petroleum Company LP participates in the E-Verify program in some states in which it operates (including AL, AZ, GA, MS, NC, SC, TN, and UT). For more information before proceeding, please see details in English or Spanish. Right to Work Statement English or Spanish.
To view benefit information for Marathon Petroleum Corporation please visit mympcbenefits.com.",17.0
16,chemical+engineer,"Description
The Assistant Electrical Engineer will assist project teams to create world class designs for new projects, alterations and redevelopments on a variety of projects including power, process, corporate, healthcare, airports, institutional, industrial, manufacturing, government and military facilities. The Assistant Electrical Engineer will work with the project team throughout the design and construction process, adapting electrical plans according to budget constraints, design factors or client needs.
Assists in the electrical design of projects from the conceptual phase through design completion.
Assists with modifying and reviewing production drawings for a variety of projects including, but not limited to: power plants, process facilities, industrial facilities, healthcare facilities, airports, educational institutions, commercial, and governmental and military facilities.
Assists in designing electrical components for project needs and requirements that are set forth by the project managers.
Applies basic knowledge of commonly used electrical concepts, practices, codes, and procedures within the electrical engineering services industry.
Assists with research and complies project related data as required by the project managers.
Assists with correcting and updating drawings provided by senior engineers to verify corrections are made within multiple CAD related software.
Assists with client presentations, shop drawing review, and contract administration for the design of power, process, industrial, healthcare, airports, educational institutions, commercial, and governmental and military facilities.
Assists in performing field inspections, measurements or calculations for public and private clients.
All other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering or related degree from an ABET accredited program.
Or Bachelor of Science in Electrical or related Engineering Technology from an ABET accredited program and successful completion of Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam.
Master of Science degree in Engineering may be substituted for one year of experience.
Successful completion of Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) or Engineer-in-Training (EIT) strongly preferred.
Minimum of a 3.0 GPA strongly preferred.
Prior internship and/or related consulting experience preferred.
Involvement on campus or in the community.
Basic knowledge in standard electrical engineering techniques, principles and procedures.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work methodically and analytically in a quantitative problem-solving environment and demonstrated critical thinking skills.
Proficient computer skills (e.g. Microsoft Office Suite)
Basic computer skills include electrical analysis programs (e.g., RISA), AutoCAD and BIM (e.g., Revit and Tekla).
Strong attention to detail, facilitation, team building, collaboration, organization and problem solving skills.
Demonstrated leadership skills.
Candidates must be legally authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis without requiring future sponsorship for employment visa status.
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Electrical Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 5 % of the Time
Req ID: 212468
\#LI-EC \#OGC",18.0
17,chemical+engineer,"The Company
Formed in 2008 and headquartered in Indianapolis, Indiana, Monument Chemical serves the specialty hydrocarbon industry as a specialty chemicals platform. From five plants in Belgium, Kentucky and Texas, Monument Chemical develops, manufactures and markets a variety of solvents, intermediates, specialty fuels and other specialty products and offers toll manufacturing services. As a company, we are continuously looking to expand our product portfolio to accommodate dynamic market conditions, using a flexible mindset and the support of a strong technical team and multi-purpose equipment.
Monument believes in investing in our businesses, processes, people and cultures. We are all about possibilities' for our customers, our businesses and the specialty chemicals industry. The team at Monument is aligned around a set of commitments to help guide our efforts as the company continues to grow. We are committed to:
Worker health/safety and the environment
Investment in long-term, profitable growth
Innovation while achieving reliable performance
Showing appreciation for each employee within the Monument family
Developing opportunities for growing our people
Integrity, excellence and responsiveness
Making external connections to leverage the strengths of Monument
Monument's goal is to be the most reliable, most adaptable and most responsive manufacturer in the specialty chemicals industry. We believe listening to customer needs first and then working with customers to formulate the best solution is what gives our company a competitive advantage.
Monument Chemical is a privately held company owned by two families: the Fehsenfeld family (owners of The Heritage Group) and the Grube family. These two families have been business partners for over 20 years in various ventures including Calumet Specialty Products Partners, which refines and processes hydrocarbon products.
The Position
Position Title:
Production Engineer (Campaign Team Leader)
Job Status:
Full Time
Reports To: (position)
Operations Manager
FLSA Status:
Exempt
Department:
Operations
Work Schedule:
Day


Description
The Production Engineering role oversees operation of distillation projects and hydrogenation reactors, acts as a technical resource for operations personnel, applies technical skills to optimize plant operations, to implement and commission yield improvement and cost saving projects, participates in procedure reviews and development, operator training, and site qualification efforts.
Essential Functions / Key Accountabilities
As a Production Engineer, you will be responsible for:
Leading the operation of distillation projects and/or hydrogenation reactors.
Understanding/Learning how equipment associated to the campaign operates.
Understanding and working with plant utilities.
Working with the Operations Director to provide data and chemical engineering support for specific product campaigns.
Working closely with Technical Advising and plant personnel to optimize operations and meet plant goals.
Work closely with Quality Assurance personnel to ensure that all product specifications are met.
Assist the Engineering Department in developing cost effective projects to optimize production and minimize working capital.
Develop procedures for items already in production or to be produced in the future.
Preparing and enhancing operating instructions.
Troubleshooting plant operations when actual operation does not meet the expected operation.
Generating reports that detail and summarize a specific campaign effort - Reports include mass balances, process data analysis and de-bottlenecking proposals.
Developing and maintaining campaign specific schedules to meet production demand.
Ensuring campaigns are running efficiently by working with plant personnel, technical advisors and data analysis.
Actively participating with operators in the field to help identify process and safety improvements.
Communicating technical information and issues to plant personnel at all levels within the organization, when needed
Help to optimize the disposition of the waste (water and organics) generated in each project, in order to improve cost saving.
Lead quarterly improvement meetings with Technical Advising personnel for the main projects.
Lead pre-campaign meetings prior start-up to discuss all items related to the project execution.

Education
B.S in Engineering.
Experience / Required Skills
A minimum of 3-8 years work experience in an engineering role.
Must be willing to participate in our 24/7 production facility call out policy, when needed.
Ability to function and communicate with all levels of the organization.
Willing to work on shift for 30 days during 90 day probationary period.
Ability to obtain TWIC Card.
Honeywell Experion experience is a plus.
Microsoft Project experience is a plus.
Certifications / Licenses List any required and preferred certifications/licenses
Physical Demands
Walking. Moving about on foot to accomplish tasks, particularly for long periods of time, up to 12 hours per day.
Sitting. Working from a seated position for up to 12 hours per day.
Climbing. Ascending or descending ladders, stairs, ramps and the like, using feet and legs and/or hands and arms one to two times per day.
Balancing. Maintaining body equilibrium to prevent falling and walking, standing or crouching on narrow or slippery surfaces.
Stooping. Bending body downward and forward by bending spine at the waist.
Kneeling. Bending legs at knee to come to a rest on knee or knees.
Crouching. Bending the body downward and forward by bending legs and spine.
Reaching. Extending hand(s) and arm(s) in any direction.
Pushing. Using upper extremities to press against something with steady force, exerting up to 25 pounds of force occasionally, and/or up to 15 pounds of force frequently, and/or up to 10 pounds of force consistently to move objects forward, downward or outward.
Pulling. Using upper extremities to exert up to 25 pounds of force occasionally, and/or up to 15 pounds of force frequently, and/or up to 10 pounds of force consistently to draw, haul or tug objects in a sustained motion.
Lifting. Raising objects up to 25 pounds occasionally, and/or up to 15 pounds frequently, and/or up to 10 pounds consistently from a lower to a higher position or moving objects horizontally from position-to-position.
Grasping. Applying pressure to an object with the fingers and palm.
Possible subject to environmental conditions. Activities could occur inside and outside.
Subject to extreme heat. Temperatures above 100 for periods of more than one hour.
Subject to vibration. Exposure to movements of the extremities or whole body. Operate/drive utility vehicle.
Subject to hazards. Includes a variety of physical conditions, such as proximity to moving mechanical parts, moving vehicles, electrical current, exposure to high heat or exposure to chemicals.
Must be able to wear appropriate PPE for tasks as required. FRC uniform, hard hat, safety toe work boots, safety glasses, gloves etc.

https://www.dol.gov/sites/dolgov/files/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",19.0
18,chemical+engineer,"JOB NUMBER: 6 MONTH CONTRACT – TEMP TO HIRE!**MUST BE AVAILABLE FOR IMMEDIATE HIRE**JOB SUMMARY: Under general supervision, the Engineer II will perform assignments requiring knowledge and application of complex engineering principles.This position is responsible for the performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned.This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes.They are typically responsible for managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.Ability to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.Bachelor’s Degree in Chemical Engineering is required and 5 or more years of process and project engineering experience.Cenergy is a dynamic, diverse, woman-owned company that has provided stellar support to our clients globally for over 25 years! We hire extraordinary people, and each of our team members are encouraged to embody our core values to drive innovation and own it with integrity and trust while adding to our positive and forward thinking atmosphere.Cenergy employees can enjoy the following robust benefits and resources:Ongoing Training (RSO, Systems, Software Programs, OSHA Safety, JJ Keller, etc.)Continuous Employment Development and LearningOngoing Advocacy, internal assets with HSE, Legal and HR teams and experts to aid in Employee Career Path and Advancement401KAetna & Kaiser Group Medical CoverageDental Insurance CoverageVision Insurance CoverageBasic Life Insurance & AD&DLong Term DisabilityVoluntary Short Term DisabilityAccess to Health JoyGAP Medical CoverageDirect DepositHealth Savings and Flexible Spending AccountsJob Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $30.00 - $32.00 per hourBenefits:Health insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Managing large process area in plant: 2 years (Preferred)process/project engineering: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",23.0
19,chemical+engineer,"Salary: $95k - 125k per year
Reference: 860072

job summary:

We Are seeking a Process Controls Engineer for the Greater Houson, TX. Area.

This is a Direct Hire opportunity with one of the most well known Oil & Gas Companies in the country!
Shift: Days

Pay: $95K -125K
Requirements:

Bachelor's in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering is required
5 + years of engineering experience.
3-5 years control system(DCS) maintenance and configuration experience
Foxboro IA /EVO system experience preferred.

location: Pasadena, Texas
job type: Permanent
salary: $95,000 - 125,000 per year
work hours: 8am to 4pm
education: Bachelors

responsibilities:
performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned. This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes. They are typically responsible for
Managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.
Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.
Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting
Performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.
General control system(DCS) configuration changes needed to optimize plant operations and alarm management.
Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.
Is able to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.
Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.
Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.

qualifications:
Experience level: Experienced
Minimum 5 years of experience
Education: Bachelors (required)

skills:
Process Improvement

Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",25.0
20,chemical+engineer,"Description
We are seeking to hire a Staff Piping Engineer within our Oil, Gas & Chemical Global Practice in our Houston, TX regional office\!
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop and maintain the line list performing calculations and liaison with all associated groups in order to complete and issue the document.
Develop and maintain specialty items and datasheets.
Develop and update requisitions and perform technical bid evaluations to include fabrication/construction specifications of all piping components and materials.
Complete inquiry packages from issue to procurement of materials or subcontract pricing.
Review and prepare bid tabulations on quotations received.
Perform pipe stress analysis (both manual and computer) to verify the piping design layouts are in compliance with applicable codes.
Perform detailed design manual stress calculations or computerized stress calculations as required to markup stress isometrics with relevant comments for piping design, civil/structural and pressure vessel groups for the design purposes.
Check calculations made by other engineers (under some supervision)
Learn to assist the drafting group in resolving routine layout and detailing problems.
Work with the Piping Engineering Lead to ensure that piping drawings match the design calculations.
Learn to assist the Piping Engineering Lead in various project activities
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in mechanical/piping engineering from an accredited program.
Minimum 3 years related experience (completion of master's degree in a related field may be substituted for one year of experience).
Experience using Caesar II.
Completion of FE exam and capable of obtaining PE.
Keen safety awareness.
Excellent written & verbal communication skills.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Works well in a multi-company team environment.
Able to perform job walks wearing personal protective equipment (PPE) in operating facility.
This position requires an experienced and competent individual capable of successfully solving difficult problems that require adaptation and modification of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria.
Must be capable of devising new approaches to problems encountered.
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Piping Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 20 % of the Time
Req ID: 211314
\#LI-HR \#OGC",26.0
21,chemical+engineer,"Description
We are seeking to hire a Staff Piping Engineer within our Oil, Gas & Chemical Global Practice in our Houston, TX regional office\!
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop and maintain the line list performing calculations and liaison with all associated groups in order to complete and issue the document.
Develop and maintain specialty items and datasheets.
Develop and update requisitions and perform technical bid evaluations to include fabrication/construction specifications of all piping components and materials.
Complete inquiry packages from issue to procurement of materials or subcontract pricing.
Review and prepare bid tabulations on quotations received.
Perform pipe stress analysis (both manual and computer) to verify the piping design layouts are in compliance with applicable codes.
Perform detailed design manual stress calculations or computerized stress calculations as required to markup stress isometrics with relevant comments for piping design, civil/structural and pressure vessel groups for the design purposes.
Check calculations made by other engineers (under some supervision)
Learn to assist the drafting group in resolving routine layout and detailing problems.
Work with the Piping Engineering Lead to ensure that piping drawings match the design calculations.
Learn to assist the Piping Engineering Lead in various project activities
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in mechanical/piping engineering from an accredited program.
Minimum 3 years related experience (completion of master's degree in a related field may be substituted for one year of experience).
Experience using Caesar II.
Completion of FE exam and capable of obtaining PE.
Keen safety awareness.
Excellent written & verbal communication skills.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Works well in a multi-company team environment.
Able to perform job walks wearing personal protective equipment (PPE) in operating facility.
This position requires an experienced and competent individual capable of successfully solving difficult problems that require adaptation and modification of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria.
Must be capable of devising new approaches to problems encountered.
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Piping Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 20 % of the Time
Req ID: 211314
\#LI-HR \#OGC",28.0
22,chemical+engineer,"Description
The Burns & McDonnell's Oil Gas Chemical Global Practice in Houston, TX is hiring a Staff Mechanical Engineer to support projects in a variety of industry sectors, including the strategic areas of renewable fuels and carbon capture/reduction.
Primary responsibilities include the application, design (thermal and mechanical), specification, bid and purchase of fired heaters, steam boilers, incinerators, thermal oxidizers, flare systems and other similar fired equipment/packaged systems.
Prepare technical specifications, requisitions, technical bid evaluation, vendor drawing review, act as a responsible engineer through project closeout.
Drive the interface with multiple disciplines and client to meet project design requirements.
Demonstrate an interest in supporting the installation and troubleshooting fired equipment and auxiliary systems (e.x. Burner Management Systems), and be willing to provide pre-commissioning & start-up support as required. Plan, schedule, conduct and coordinate work requiring judgment in the independent evaluation, selection, adaptation and modification of standard engineering techniques, procedures and criteria.
Performs work which involves conventional engineering practices, and may involve a variety of complex features.
Responsible for supplier coordination, and coordination with inspectors.
Reviews and approves design drawings, vendor data and documentation and associated workflow management. Participates in PHA’s, and reviews of PFDs , P&IDs.
Participates in preparation of design guides, guide specifications and support proposals.
Monitors subcontracted technical services activities.
Provides input to estimates, proposals, scheduling, manpower planning, etc.
Conducts field trips to existing plants to gather operating data and equipment information
May coordinate departmental and divisional project studies and report preparation assignments.
Organize & attend FAT’s, develop installation work packages.
Mentoring provided by senior personnel
Qualifications
Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering or related degree from an ABET accredited program.
Or Bachelor of Science in Mechanical or related Engineering Technology from an ABET accredited program and successful completion of Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam.
Master of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering may be substituted for 1 year experience.
3 years of mechanical engineering experience, consulting preferred.
Successful completion (i.e. passing) FE or EIT preferred.
Candidate must be interested in a career in fired equipment and similar packaged systems.
This position requires a competent individual capable of successfully solving difficult problems that require adaptation and modification of standard techniques, procedures and criteria.
Excellent written & verbal communication skills.
Familiarity with design codes and standards such API-520/530/536/538/556/560/673, ASME Boiler & Pressure Vessel Codes, and NFPA-85, PIP.
Prior fired equipment or packaged systems/operations or maintenance/reliability experience is considered a plus.
Travel<25% (Must be willing to take occasional field assignments that may last 2 to 4 months)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Mechanical Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 20 % of the Time
Req ID: 211352
\#LI-HR \#OGC",29.0
23,chemical+engineer,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",30.0
24,chemical+engineer,"Technical Manager00025687
Contribute. Grow. Lead...with OxyChem. Looking for a challenge? Desire to achieve your true potential? OxyChem is a growing, action-oriented, safety driven chemical manufacturing company continually striving to be the best in the business while staying focused on environmental protection. The secret to our success has and will continue to be our people.

Occidental Chemical Corporation (OxyChem) is a leading North American manufacturer of polyvinyl chloride (PVC) resins, chlorine and caustic soda – key building blocks for a variety of indispensable products such as plastics, pharmaceuticals and water treatment chemicals. Other OxyChem products include caustic potash, chlorinated organics, sodium silicates, chlorinated isocyanurates and calcium chloride. OxyChem's market position is among the top three producers in the United States in 2020 for the principal products it manufactures and markets. Based in Dallas, Texas, the company has manufacturing facilities in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.

In a fast-paced industry that demands precision, we create a supportive workplace where the safety and well-being of our employees are paramount. We are committed to rewarding top performers, offering very competitive pay and benefits, and providing tremendous career development opportunities. We are looking for an experienced and self-motivated individual to fill the position of Technical Manager within our Battleground Chlor-Alkali Plant located in
La Porte, TX.

Essential Job Duties:
Maintain protection of the environment and the health and safety of our employees, customers, and the communities in which we operate and or transport our products, as our highest priority.
Ensure that Process Safety and Risk Management principles are incorporated into the foundation of department operations. Ensure annual departmental goals and objectives include meaningful Process Safety activities for all levels of the organization.
Provide leadership for the development and implementation of cost saving projects (fixed, variable and marginal income).
Manage all available technical resources (internal and external) to ensure timely and cost-effective achievement of Chlor-Alkali and Cogeneration priorities.
Provide work direction for process engineers, process control specialist, process safety specialist and laboratory.
Assure compliance to PSM (MOC’s, PSSR’s, Procedures, Audits, etc).
Maintain or develop technical knowledge and skills of all team members at “state of the art”.
Assist operations personnel in troubleshooting process upsets and operation problems.
Drive the implementation of a forward plan through strategic automation to improve the plant’s overall safety, environmental, reliability and cost performance.

Bachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering with a minimum of 8+ years in a manufacturing or technical function in the chemical industry.
High proficiency in Microsoft applications (such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook) and a good working knowledge of SAP.
The ability to lead through teaching and leading by example.
The ability to prepare and lead budget discussions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to read, write and speak in English.
Must be able to respond to off hour emergencies, by guiding and leading technical resources to define and troubleshoot plant issues.
Excellent interpersonal skills including the ability to work as part of a team.
Ability to work weekends, holidays and respond to callouts on a non-routine basis.
Physical requirements – must be able to lift 40 lbs., climb ladders and stairs. Walking, bending, stooping is required. Must be able to wear personal protective equipment including the use of a respirator. Must be able to respond to visual and audible alarms.

Additional Desired Qualifications:
Supervisory experience with both hourly and salaried individuals.

Occidental is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, political preference, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status

Job Engineering
Primary Location United States-Texas-LaPorte
Organization OXY CHEM
Schedule Full-time",32.0
25,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Location - US-TX-Pasadena
Overview
Identify and implement improvements to processes and procedures that will increase capacity, reduce cost; improve safety and quality of Afton’s global supply chain manufacturing processes. Troubleshoot existing processes to improve on stream time and operating efficiency. Work in a team environment with operations and other members of the Unit Operating Teams. Identify opportunities to improve mechanical and instrumentation reliability. Utilize process improvement methodologies including Lean Six Sigma to increase Afton’s profits.
Responsibilities:
Responsibilities
Track operating performance and product quality of production units. Identify causes of departure from standard and initiate corrective actions
Troubleshoot existing processes and initiate corrective actions to improve on stream time and operating efficiency.
Identify and implement improvements to processes and procedures that will increase capacity, reduce production cost, improve safety and quality of chemical manufacturing processes.
Provide technical coverage for plant trials and startups.
Write operating procedures and provide training for chemical operators.
Propose changes in programming logic that will lead to improved process safety, quality, or production efficiency.
Develop in depth expertise on process equipment used at the plants such as reactors, agitators, heat exchangers, pumps, and filters.
Write and obtain approvals for MCR’s (Manufacturing Change Requests) and PCF’s (Process Change Forms) in support of process improvements.
Lead or be a member of PPA (potential problem analysis), JSA (job safety analysis) and PHAs (process hazard analysis teams.
Develop PFDs, P&IDs, mass and energy balances for modified processes.
Develop project scopes for small capital projects.
Specify new process equipment including updating/revising equipment specification sheets. Work with equipment vendors and operations to aide in selection.
Perform data and statistical analysis to make sound processing decisions.
Provide relief coverage for supervision in production units.
Other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Qualifications
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE
BS degree in Chemical Engineering
5 – 7 years of relevant experience
ESSENTIAL SKILLS
Accuracy - Ability to perform work accurately and thoroughly.
Communication, Oral - Ability to communicate effectively with others using the spoken word.
Communication, Written - Ability to communicate in writing clearly and concisely.
Customer Oriented - Ability to take care of the customers’ needs while following company procedures.
Detail Oriented - Ability to pay attention to the minute details of a project or task.
Teamwork - Ability to exhibit a cheerful demeanor toward others and work effectively in a team environment.
Honesty / Integrity - Ability to be truthful and be seen as credible in the workplace.
Initiative - Ability to make decisions or take actions to solve a problem or reach a goal.
Organized - Possessing the trait of being organized or following a systematic method of performing a task.
Relationship Building - Ability to effectively build relationships with customers and co-workers.
Self-Motivated - Ability to be internally inspired to perform a task to the best of one’s ability using his or her own drive or initiative.
Working at Afton
Who We Are – We are a diverse, global family of individuals, who share a passion for developing innovative solutions. We build our professional relationships on respect, integrity and a commitment to safety and quality. Just as these values apply to our professional relationships, they also apply to the way feel about our neighbors and communities.
Our Work - At Afton, our innovative R&D programs lead to global growth. Our lubricant and fuel additives are among the most highly developed and widely used in the petroleum industry. Afton is a recognized and trusted supplier of driveline lubricant additives, engine oil additives, fuel additives and industrial lubricant additives.
Benefits / Compensation - We offer competitive compensation and benefit packages that reflect our commitment to our employees. Our employees are our most treasured asset and we have dedicated resources that allow us to reward our employees for their commitment on an ongoing basis - ensuring our compensation packages are competitive in the industry.
An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual’s race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",33.0
26,chemical+engineer,"
With operations in over 120 countries, we provide better solutions for our customers and richer opportunities for our people. As a leading partner to the energy industry, we’re committed to achieving net-zero carbon emissions by 2050 and we’re always looking for the right people to help us get there. People who are as passionate as we are about making energy safer, cleaner and more efficient.",35.0
27,chemical+engineer,"Description
The Burns & McDonnell Houston, TX regional office is seeking to hire a Senior Piping Engineer to join the Oil, Gas & Chemical Global Practice\!
Check or supervise pipe stress engineering, design engineering and analysis for complex units. Is expected to assist in the design of larger and more complex units with minimal supervision.
Develop and issue line list and specialty items list. Knowledge of speciality item design, piping line class specifications, procurement, technical evaluation of valves, piping and fittings, pipe supports and review piping line class specifications.
Complete pipe stress analysis using Caesar II and pipe support design.
Coordinate with and direct other team members pipe stress engineers, line list specialists and piping specialty items specialists.
Manage job cost accounting, manpower planning, estimating, and change notice submittals, scheduling and progressing workload, budgeting, and reporting.
Act as liaison with the other departments; specifically Piping Design, Structural, Control Systems, Process Engineering.
Review and prepare bid tabulations on quotations received.
Assist Piping Design group in resolving routine layout and detailing problems.
Qualifications
Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering or related degree from an ABET accredited program.
Or Bachelor of Science in Mechanical or related Engineering Technology from an ABET accredited program and successful completion of Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam. Master of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering a plus.
7 years piping engineering experience. EPC project experience preferred.
Professional Engineering License (PE) preferred
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Operates well in a multi-company team environment, Exhibits leadership traits and abilities.
PE registration desired
Proficient in using Caesar II
Advanced MS Office skills (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Experience in engineering and/or construction work process
Jobsite experience
Keen safety awareness
Able to perform job walks wearing personal protective equipment (PPE) in an operating facility
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Piping Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 5 % of the Time
Req ID: 212300
\#LI-DNI \#OGC",38.0
28,chemical+engineer,"Company and Role Summary:


The Lisbon Group provides services within three primary core competencies: Engineering, EPC project execution and management, and Operations Services. We use our recognized expertise in upstream, midstream and LNG production facilities to provide full multi-disciplinary engineering services, EPC Contracting, and operational services. We are a learning organization and apply the lessons and experiences from our projects to continuously improve each of our core competencies. Our Engineering Services Group is responsible for delivering:


Upfront engineering, Feasibility Studies, Conceptual Designs and Front-end Engineering Designs (FEEDs)
Procurement Engineering and Assistance
Detailed Design (Detailed Process, Mechanical, Civil / Structural Engineering)
Safety studies such as HAZOP / HAZID / SIL, vapor dispersion and hazard analysis
Over pressure protection system audit and design, hydraulic line sizing, etc.
Design & Drafting: PFD’s, PID’s, 3D Mechanical, 3D Laser Scanning, as-builts
Field engineering and facility performance and maintenance optimization, project engineering and debottlenecking studies
Site assistance, owner representation, facility acceptance
Construction Support and pre-commissioning, commissioning and start-up plans & procedures
Owner’s Engineering Services


Mission:


The mission of the Principle Process Engineer is to help ensure exceptional process engineering services are provided across Lisbon Group’s projects through hands-on engineering, developing and maintaining internal standards and work practices, and taking accountability of process engineering deliverable production and quality across multiple projects at quality and production rate that only 10% of resources can deliver.


Accountabilities:


Develop and take ownership for project Basis of Designs (BoD)
Develop and take ownership of key process philosophies (relief and blowdown, isolation for maintenance, emergency isolation, operation and controls, sparing and training)
Develop and assume accountability for PFD, PID’s, UFD’s, DPDT, C&E and associated core documents
Develop and maintain corporate process engineering calculations and standards (e.g. relief valve sizing, line sizing, application of margin, simulation standards, etc.)
Support specification and procurement of equipment such as rotating equipment and heat exchangers, air-cooled exchangers, vessels, filters, plate fin exchangers, and columns
Develop and approve equipment datasheets
Engineering report and technical note writing


Required Skills and Experience:


We are an engineering and EPC contractor- a career dedicated to engineering contracting and EPC project execution is required to be successful. 15+ years related offshore and onshore upstream, midstream, or LNG facility experience with engineering contractor (required)
Bachelor of science degree in chemical engineering or related (required)
Proven ability and interest in generating, checking and approving core engineering deliverables described above in a timely / professional manner (required)
Experience developing and owning engineering reports, creating and documenting, engineering calculations, summary reports and PowerPoint slide decks (required)
A proven ability to guide, coach and support the development of senior-level through graduate-level process engineers (required)
Strong written and verbal communication skills (required)
Ability to interact effectively with vendors and clients (approximately 90% of your work involves internal interaction - 10% external)
International experience - we execute work across the globe (beneficial)
Field experience including construction, commissioning, start-up, and operational support (beneficial)


Core Competencies


Success requires a big picture / system thinker that understands how systems and subsystems can be integrated. In addition, you will be a better for this role if you possess the following character traits:


Are a life-long learner.
Possess and appreciate a high degree of candor / honesty.
Are a thorough engineer with patience for a growing organization.
Are a highly self-motivated individual with tenacity and grit.
Thrive in a dynamic work environment.
Excel at big picture thinking, structured fact-based decision making, and have a deep commitment to work projects from concept through the details.
Understand the value of contributing to the engineering community, and value feedback and review.
Can develop and guide deliverables on your own or by others.
Are excited and enjoy working hard and making high impact contributions.
Are eager to help our company grow.
Roll up your sleeves and solve problems in a structured process.
Take true ownership and drive things to completion.


Location:


The successful candidate will be given the option to be either located in the Houston or Seattle office. Our offices are located -

13501 Katy Fwy, Houston, TX 77079

https://www.republicsquare.com/


Or,


1700 NW Gilman STE 210

Issaquah WA 98027


Travel to customer sites will be required. Current customer locations including throughout the US was well as potential for some international travel to Canada, Nigeria, Tanzania, Kenya, Mexico and other countries in Central America and Africa. The successful candidate must be willing and able to travel globally. Expected total travel is up to 25% after initial training is complete.",39.0
29,chemical+engineer,"Project Manager21002380

POSITION AVAILABLE

TITLE: Project Manager
EMPLOYER: Linde, Inc.
LOCATION: The Woodlands, TX
DUTIES: Responsible for the overall project scope, cost, scheduling and deliverables of project and services in an assigned area, from scoping and estimating to start-up. Utilize a defined engineering and project management methodology to partner with operations, maintenance, engineering, procurement, safety and business groups to ensure all work is within assigned scope, mitigate risks, ensure process efficiency and meet business objectives. Work on multiple small sized project assignments simultaneously and perform quality assurance planning and code regulation compliance involved in safety and quality programs. Utilize knowledge of project execution to effectively communicate and participate with cross functional groups to define scope, execute design, installation and resolve problems. Discuss and establish recommendations with other project managers and subject matter experts. Evaluate alternatives and find solutions using a systematic approach to develop improvements and innovations which should ultimately enhance project performance. Apply engineering and project management principles to prepare detailed project plans and control elements of the plan. Analyze costs and benefits to recommend solutions and will make the necessary adjustments to keep projects on course. Prepare required reports, documentation, spreadsheets, database, graphs, cost estimates and summaries to communicate project progress and results. Work closely with project teams, contractors, and subcontractors to ensure that all work is being performed in accordance with project and industry safe work practices. Develop contracting strategies and ensure that the project engineering and construction phases are in compliance with contracts and all applicable safety rules and regulations. Developing project safety, design safety and construction site safety plans.
QUALIFICATIONS:
REQTS: Must have a Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent in Mechanical Engineering, Civil Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Electrical Engineering or a related field plus ten (10) years of experience in the position offered or as a Design Project Engineer or related. Must have ten (10) years of experience in each of the following: Project Engineering, Project Management, and Construction Management; Project development, scope planning and definition, project plan execution, change control management, schedule, cost and resource planning in the chemical industry; Stage-gate project management process and understanding of the Project Management Institute (PMI) work process; Systems and process equipment in industrial gas plant including HyCO and air separation applications; Performing oxygen cleaning and inspecting components cleaned for oxygen service; Designing systems requiring material selection for oxygen and cryogenic systems; line sizing; pump selection; and pressure relief valve sizing and selection; Interpreting process and instrumentation diagrams (P&ID), schematic wiring diagrams (SWD), and electrical one-line diagrams; Working knowledge of industry design codes and practices including ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code; ASME Piping Codes (B31.1, B31.3, and B31.12); API510 Pressure Vessel Inspection Code; and API570 Piping Inspection Code; Knowledge of the OSHA Process Safety Management (PSM) elements; Plant demolition, equipment refurbishment and equipment relocation; Executing construction contract types including reimbursable and lump sum; and Crane and rigging safety, and the ability to interpret lift plans. 25%-50% travel required domestically to Linde sites.
HOURS: Full-Time; Mon-Fri (40 hours per week)
 EEO - All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment w/out regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin,
 protected veteran status, or disability status.
APPLY: Linde, Inc. invites applicants to apply by sending resume to Attn: Michael Dobkins, 1585 Sawdust Road, Suite 300,
 The Woodlands, TX 77380. Must Specify Ref Code 4558759.

Primary Location Texas-The Woodlands
Other Locations North Carolina-Wilmington, Texas-The Woodlands
Schedule Full-time
Job Operations
Unposting Date Ongoing",41.0
30,chemical+engineer,"Technical Manager00025687
Contribute. Grow. Lead...with OxyChem. Looking for a challenge? Desire to achieve your true potential? OxyChem is a growing, action-oriented, safety driven chemical manufacturing company continually striving to be the best in the business while staying focused on environmental protection. The secret to our success has and will continue to be our people.

Occidental Chemical Corporation (OxyChem) is a leading North American manufacturer of polyvinyl chloride (PVC) resins, chlorine and caustic soda – key building blocks for a variety of indispensable products such as plastics, pharmaceuticals and water treatment chemicals. Other OxyChem products include caustic potash, chlorinated organics, sodium silicates, chlorinated isocyanurates and calcium chloride. OxyChem's market position is among the top three producers in the United States in 2020 for the principal products it manufactures and markets. Based in Dallas, Texas, the company has manufacturing facilities in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.

In a fast-paced industry that demands precision, we create a supportive workplace where the safety and well-being of our employees are paramount. We are committed to rewarding top performers, offering very competitive pay and benefits, and providing tremendous career development opportunities. We are looking for an experienced and self-motivated individual to fill the position of Technical Manager within our Battleground Chlor-Alkali Plant located in
La Porte, TX.

Essential Job Duties:
Maintain protection of the environment and the health and safety of our employees, customers, and the communities in which we operate and or transport our products, as our highest priority.
Ensure that Process Safety and Risk Management principles are incorporated into the foundation of department operations. Ensure annual departmental goals and objectives include meaningful Process Safety activities for all levels of the organization.
Provide leadership for the development and implementation of cost saving projects (fixed, variable and marginal income).
Manage all available technical resources (internal and external) to ensure timely and cost-effective achievement of Chlor-Alkali and Cogeneration priorities.
Provide work direction for process engineers, process control specialist, process safety specialist and laboratory.
Assure compliance to PSM (MOC’s, PSSR’s, Procedures, Audits, etc).
Maintain or develop technical knowledge and skills of all team members at “state of the art”.
Assist operations personnel in troubleshooting process upsets and operation problems.
Drive the implementation of a forward plan through strategic automation to improve the plant’s overall safety, environmental, reliability and cost performance.

Bachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering with a minimum of 8+ years in a manufacturing or technical function in the chemical industry.
High proficiency in Microsoft applications (such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook) and a good working knowledge of SAP.
The ability to lead through teaching and leading by example.
The ability to prepare and lead budget discussions.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to read, write and speak in English.
Must be able to respond to off hour emergencies, by guiding and leading technical resources to define and troubleshoot plant issues.
Excellent interpersonal skills including the ability to work as part of a team.
Ability to work weekends, holidays and respond to callouts on a non-routine basis.
Physical requirements – must be able to lift 40 lbs., climb ladders and stairs. Walking, bending, stooping is required. Must be able to wear personal protective equipment including the use of a respirator. Must be able to respond to visual and audible alarms.

Additional Desired Qualifications:
Supervisory experience with both hourly and salaried individuals.

Occidental is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, political preference, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status

Job Engineering
Primary Location United States-Texas-LaPorte
Organization OXY CHEM
Schedule Full-time",43.0
31,chemical+engineer,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",44.0
32,chemical+engineer,"Description
The Burns & McDonnell Houston, TX regional office is seeking to hire a Senior Piping Engineer to join the Oil, Gas & Chemical Global Practice\!
Check or supervise pipe stress engineering, design engineering and analysis for complex units. Is expected to assist in the design of larger and more complex units with minimal supervision.
Develop and issue line list and specialty items list. Knowledge of speciality item design, piping line class specifications, procurement, technical evaluation of valves, piping and fittings, pipe supports and review piping line class specifications.
Complete pipe stress analysis using Caesar II and pipe support design.
Coordinate with and direct other team members pipe stress engineers, line list specialists and piping specialty items specialists.
Manage job cost accounting, manpower planning, estimating, and change notice submittals, scheduling and progressing workload, budgeting, and reporting.
Act as liaison with the other departments; specifically Piping Design, Structural, Control Systems, Process Engineering.
Review and prepare bid tabulations on quotations received.
Assist Piping Design group in resolving routine layout and detailing problems.
Qualifications
Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering or related degree from an ABET accredited program.
Or Bachelor of Science in Mechanical or related Engineering Technology from an ABET accredited program and successful completion of Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam. Master of Science degree in Mechanical Engineering a plus.
7 years piping engineering experience. EPC project experience preferred.
Professional Engineering License (PE) preferred
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Operates well in a multi-company team environment, Exhibits leadership traits and abilities.
PE registration desired
Proficient in using Caesar II
Advanced MS Office skills (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Experience in engineering and/or construction work process
Jobsite experience
Keen safety awareness
Able to perform job walks wearing personal protective equipment (PPE) in an operating facility
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Piping Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 5 % of the Time
Req ID: 212300
\#LI-DNI \#OGC",46.0
33,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Celanese is a Fortune 500 global chemical innovation company that engineers and manufactures chemicals used in products essential to everyday living. Headquartered in Dallas, TX, we employ over 7,700 dedicated people working between 43 facilities across 18 countries. We are committed to employee growth and creating shareholder value to ensure continued opportunities make a difference. Our company focuses on the safety of its employees, provides competitive compensation (including benefits starting day 1), and emphasizes giving back to the community. For more information about Celanese and our products please visit www.celanese.com
Responsibilities:
Will be responsible for the monitoring, troubleshooting, and improvement of the MeOH unit process control system
Identifies opportunities for business technology improvements exploiting existing system capabilities and potential
Uses automation and advanced logic technologies to advance the four core principles of Stewardship, Quality, Reliability, and Engagement (SQRE)
Leverages technology improvements across manufacturing processes and companies to deliver value, innovation, and high performance
Collaborates with IT and OT Systems owners to minimize technology interruptions
Develops risk plans for equipment obsolescence and recommendations for path(s) forward
Gatekeeper for new technology, trials and implementation regarding product, process and equipment
Ensure process and business networks are functional
Develop and implement digitization strategy.
Provides project management, training and change management for digitization projects and initiatives
Responsible for the maintenance and configuration of DCS to provide high availability of all control system components.
Perform routine system maintenance and modifications (e.g. back-ups, file maintenance, system performance tuning, system patching and software upgrades) to minimize downtime and loss of information.
Support other systems as needed (e.g. data historian, yield accounting, BLAN, PCN).
Qualifications:

Strong ability to multi-task and work in a self-directed manner.
Fundamental understanding of process control theory, experience with process modeling tools and techniques, experience with loop tuning
Experience troubleshooting and programming control systems
Ability to work with technical resources, external vendors, Operations, business line, and any other key stakeholders
Ability to troubleshoot control systems from the field element up through operator interfaces and databases
Experience with DeltaV DCS
Experience with Triconex SIS
Experience with Wonderware
Experience with Allen Bradley
Working knowledge of instrumentation design and installation
Hands on experience working with DCS hardware and software, PLC's and data historians.
Required Years of Experience:
Minimum 7+ years chemicals industry or equivalent experience
Required Education:
Bachelor of Science Engineering Degree",47.0
34,chemical+engineer,"ChampionX has an immediate need for a Supply Chain Engineer to be part of our Leadership Development Program. This is your opportunity to join a large growing company offering a competitive base salary, bonus structure and benefits.
The primary purpose of this early career program is for participants to cultivate and refine their leadership skills in preparation for a future career in Supply Chain management. This five- to six-year program provides a broad perspective of ChampionX, and the opportunity to gain detailed knowledge to develop the fundamental skills needed for a successful career. Participants will receive assignments within a variety of manufacturing, logistics, quality, procurement, or engineer-focused positions. You will have a dedicated manager and peer associate to support your development and technical training as you cultivate your leadership skills.
As your future with ChampionX unfolds, expect your initial rotation to be at one of our key plants in North America and subsequent relocation in 2-4 years. You will be supported with a relocation allowance.
Potential assignments within the program could include:
PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR
In this role you will drive daily manufacturing operations to deliver targeted safety, quality, production, and cost results. You will gain knowledge in executing the plan, functional area knowledge, production procedures, and managing, assets and quality. You will also develop your management skills as you learn the skill of leading and motivating your team to be successful to execute the plan.
LOGISTICS SUPERVISOR
In this role, you will supervise logistics activities (storage, shipping) including inventory control, warehousing, transportation, logistics planning, and order processing and customer service. You will also develop your management skills as you learn the skill of leading and motivating your team to be successful to execute the plan.
PRODUCTION PLANNER
As a production planner you will identify strategies for the on-time delivery of product based on trends in material supply, manufacturing capacity and customer demand. You will gain knowledge in creating a plan, capacity review and management, demand planning, parameter management, forecasting systems, product life-cycle, root cause analysis and new product introduction.

QUALITY ENGINEER
In this role you will promote continuous improvement in quality, process control and material efficiency based on statistical analysis of manufacturing and systems capabilities. You will gain knowledge in quality process and metrics, problem solving driven from complaints, ISO systems and producing products within specifications.
PROJECT ENGINEER
As a project engineer you generate ideas, develops capital approval requests and ensures assigned projects are implemented on-time and within budget. You will gain knowledge in project planning, project management, managing external resources, and equipment reliability, while you create a vision and implement best practices.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
Pursuing a bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, or related degree
Anticipated graduation date of May 2021 or December 2021.
No immigration sponsorship provided for this role.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills.
Strong computer proficiency with MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Access.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Willingness to relocate.
Regardless of where you start your career, expect to be challenged and stretched to reach your greatest potential. As you prove successful in your assignments, you will be positioned in strategic leadership roles to bring our Supply Chain leadership depth to world-class status. At ChampionX the solution is YOU!
About ChampionX
We are ChampionX. Formerly Nalco Champion upstream, we bring more than 90 years of expertise and innovation to solve the toughest oil and gas challenges across reservoir, production, midstream and water applications.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
At ChampionX, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.
In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce.",48.0
35,chemical+engineer,"The Process Engineer will be responsible for day-to-day operations support of a specific operating unit and/or utility. This includes learning key operating conditions and their impact on performance. Daily review and making necessary adjustments to the conditions based on rate and other influencing factors. This position works closely with plant operators, supervisors, and management to optimize the plant performance. Assists production in troubleshooting of process problems. Monitors key parameters (material yield, energy, quality, capacity utilization, etc.) of all processes to maintain past gains and establish process optimization opportunities. Identifies process optimization/improvement opportunities and provide necessary engineering to implement. This will include being MOC champion and project engineering. Provides technical support for major process outages and startups. Takes the lead or assists in development, design, and coordination of feasibility studies, preliminary engineering and major process capital projects.
Requirements
BS degree in Chemical Engineering
Preferably 5 to 7 years experience in chemical manufacturing or petroleum refinery.
Must be analytical in interpreting data and making recommendations based upon that data.
Must possess excellent communication skills, have good interpersonal skills, able to work well in teams and work independently and strategically for the plant site.
Must be able to exhibit good judgment with excellent attention to detail.",49.0
36,chemical+engineer,"Job Summary

The Senior Chemical Engineer II is responsible for providing technical sales assistance and performing mastery level design and analysis work as directed to support various field and fabrication offices. This position will be responsible for the overall system design of industrial facilities in the downstream refining and chemical process areas.

Essential Functions

Actively supports the Company’s commitment to safety and its “Core Values.”
Represents the Company at all times with high moral standards while adhering to the Company’s “Code of Business Conduct and Ethics.”
Independently applies extensive and diversified knowledge of principles and practices in broad areas of assignments and related fields.
Assists the Business Development and Proposal teams by interacting with potential clients in order to determine the needs of the client and offer the appropriate package for bidding.
Uses advanced techniques in the modification or extension of theories and practices of sciences and disciplines to complete assignments.
Works on a major project or several projects of moderate scope with complex features.
Reviews complete project documents for conformity and quality assurance.
Develops new techniques and/or improved processes, materials, or products.
Assists upper level management or staff as a technical specialist or advisor.
Coordinates work with all staff necessary, including remote employees, to complete assignments.
Reviews and approves scopes and schedules for assignments.
Prepares proposals to provide professional services or obtain funding for engineering projects or programs.
Receives supervision and guidance related to overall objectives, critical issues, new concepts, and policy matters.
Receives direction on unusual conditions and developments.
Lead Process Hazard Analysis (PHA) Sessions and participate in HAZOP studies.
Represents the organization in communications and conferences pertaining to broad aspects of engineering assignments.
Performs other related duties, as directed.


Qualifications
BS in Chemical Engineering required. Professional Engineer (PE) required.
8+ years related engineering experience with an emphasis in the Petrochemical Industry.
Strong understanding of systems and chemical engineering practices and processes for facilities working with alkylation, dehydrogenation, isomerization, etc.
Demonstrated experience in the design of process piping and chemical processes such as alkylation, dehydrogenation, isomerization, etc.
Demonstrated experience developing process parameters including mass flow, heat transfer, material balance capacities and rates.
Demonstrated experience with one of the following analysis tools: HYSYS, ProMax or other simulation software.
Demonstrated experience developing the system design including PFD, PID, Layouts and Specifications.
Demonstrated experience developing not to exceed horse powers and basic process data with preliminary information.
Demonstrated experience identifying key process and system data.
Demonstrated experience selecting equipment such as process equipment and instruments.
Demonstrated experience in developing industry specific calculations for systems such as chemical balance, pipe flow rates, compression, maximum intended inventory, over pressure protection.
Demonstrated experience with multiple materials within the industry of expertise.
Demonstrated experience interfacing with the mechanical, structural, controls, and electrical engineers.
Demonstrated experience with the management of key design basis documents.
General understanding of API, ANSI, and NFPA.
Demonstrated experience performing construction cost estimates for industrial installations.
Experience developing sizing information for Process Equipment (compressors, pumps, heat exchangers, distillation columns, separators, reactors, etc.) and providing information in the form of equipment data sheets
Experience preparing material selection designation (diagram) for plant requirements.
Demonstrated experience with Battery Limit Lists including the line lists, equipment list, and initial instrument list.
Experience with logic diagrams and cause & effect charts for the facility.
Experience with flare system analysis and final reporting, including the sizing of the relief valve inlet and outlet line sizing.
Demonstrated experience in downstream refining and chemical industries. Strong skill set in understanding PFD’s and P&ID’s; 3D and 2D routing and modeling; development of isometric drawings and selection for valves is required.
Possesses advanced oral and written communication skills.
Occasional overtime and travel may be required.


EEO/M/F/Disability/Vets/Affirmative Action Employer

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, genetic information, marital status, disability, veteran status, or other legally protected characteristic or category.",52.0
37,chemical+engineer,"Description
Lead multi-disciplinary or controls-specific engineering teams to develop instrument and controls engineering design packages.
Perform calculations and develop engineering solutions in support of the maintenance of projects.
Lead preparation of controls systems (DCS and/or PLC), Continuous Emissions monitoring systems (CEMS) and instrument contracts.
Manage control system retrofits and migrations.
Develop detailed scope documents to identify how the upgrade/migration will be executed.
Lead preparation of instrument design deliverables, including instrument list, instrument construction specifications, instrument installation details, and instrument location plans.
Develop piping and instrumentation diagrams (P&ID’s) and equipment subcontract package specifications.
Manage instrument and control system specifications, instrument and instrument valve data sheets, and requests for quotation (RFQ) and technical bid summaries.
Design control system logic and configuration, graphic interfaces, and Input/Output (I/O) lists.
Manage vendor I/O and instrument lists and coordinate I/O to determine partitioning of the control system hardware.
Manage verification of design calculations, project studies, and report preparation.
Lead development of specifications and site study for design of systems.
Provide assistance with P&ID design including instrumentation and related mechanical design.
Evaluate technical bids and manage vendor contracts.
Review and approve vendor drawings.
Plan and lead factory acceptance tests, control wiring design, and logic design.
Provide technical assistance during commissioning at project site.
Manage quality reviews of project submittals.
Manage sales and marketing efforts and identify key pursuits.
Ensure compliance with company and site safety policies.
All other duties as assigned. Up to 15% to client sites (Refineries and Chemical Plants) and vendor shops visits
Qualifications
Requires a Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or a directly related field plus seven (7) years of related experience in instrumentation or controls engineering.
Must have six (6) years of experience in each of the following (experience may be gained concurrently):
Performing SIL calculations
SmartPlant Instrumentation INtools (SPI) (high level user)
Full project life cycle experience from FEL II through project closeout
Preparing and reviewing LOPA documents
Preparing and reviewing SIF (Safety Instrumented Function) test procedures
Supporting estimating group at each project phase through various means including instrument specifications and bid processes
Assisting process group in the development of P&ID’s and client reviews
Working directly with clients and vendors in developing design
Developing Instrumentation and Controls design deliverables such as instrument specifications, instrument inquiry, purchase requisition packages, instrument indices, cause and effect diagrams, or level sketches
Must have four (4) years of experience in each of the following (experience may be gained concurrently):
Field experience specifically with hot cutover, turnover, loop check, and commissioning checkout
Managing construction and client in testing of SIF test procedures
Will accept a Master’s degree plus six (6) years of required experience in lieu of Bachelor’s degree plus seven (7) years of required experience. Must be willing and eligible to obtain or currently hold a valid Transportation Worker Identification Card (TWIC). Must have ISA84 SIS Certification. Up to 15% to client sites (Refineries and Chemical Plants) and vendor shops visits.
Qualified applicants please submit resume to www.burnsmcd.com/careers. Requisition ID 212054. Employees may also refer a candidate to apply and be eligible for an award through Burns & McDonnell’s Employee Referral Program described in the company’s Policy Manual. Burns & McDonnell Engineering Company, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Instrumentation & Controls Engineering
Primary Location US-TX-Houston
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 212054
Not Applicable \#OGC N/A",53.0
38,chemical+engineer,"Job Summary:

TPC Group is seeking a Sr Engineer, Process Safety Management. The ideal candidate will serve as a PSM subject matter expert and will provide corporate support to all TPC locations. The ideal candidate must be experienced in facilitating Process Hazard Analysis (PHAs) and Layers of Protection Analysis (LOPA), and one who thrives in a collaborative, open, team environment and is driven by the opportunity to make an impact.

This position will be part of the Corporate PSM organization with responsibility for establishing corporate strategy and providing direct support to operations through continuous development and improvements of the fourteen (14) elements of Process Safety Management.

Job Duties and Responsibilities:

Consistently maintain and demonstrate a high regard for personal and process safety, for the protection of employees, the public, and company assets.
Provide technical support and guidance to support Operations and Engineering in implementing sustainable process safety programs and culture through knowledge of PSM/RMP, process safety practices, Recognized and Generally Accepted Good Engineering Practices (RAGAGEP), industry best practices and codes, safety & engineering standards, and practical implementation methods.
Ability to recognize hazards associated with chemical processes and equipment.
Accountable to schedule, coordinate, document and facilitate PHA/LOPA revalidations, maintaining the 5-year window required for revalidation of each study.
Lead/facilitate and participate in Incident Investigations.
Continually drive effectiveness and improvements within established Management of Change (MOC) and Pre-Startup Safety Review (PSSR) processes.
Interpret P&IDs and other process safety information.
Track and maintain corrective actions stemming from site PHAs, incident investigations, compliance audits, insurance audits, site safety assessments and other PSM and EHSS activities.
Report monthly key performance indicators for Process Safety Performance.
Participate in internal and external PSM/RMP audits as a qualified PSM & HSS auditor.
Ability to interpret and communicate federal, state, and local requirements associated with equipment design and integrity.
Remains current with emerging issues related to Process Safety Management.
Develop, implement, and report key PSM performance leading and lagging indicators (KPIs) to track the progress and health of PSM programs.

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent (chemical or mechanical engineering a plus) chemical industry or refining experience (10 years PSM/RMP experience, including basic process safety knowledge)
8-10 years PHA facilitation experience, including experience leading chemical facility PHA and LOPA studies
Must understand Level of Protection Analysis (LOPA), including but not limited to Independent Protection Layers (IPLs), Safety Instrumented Systems (SIS), Instrumented Safety Function, Safety Integrity Level, and Risk Reduction Factors
Must understand the concept of inherently safer design and hierarchy of controls
Must understand and be capable of interpreting facility siting studies (FSS) and quantitative risk analyses (QRAs); including siting of temporary buildings and structures
Practical experience in use of PHA software (PHA Works, PHA Pro, etc.)
Working knowledge of Microsoft Word and Excel

Preferred Qualifications:

Prior EHSS auditing experience
Dakota software experience
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to perform multiple functions and tasks simultaneous
Good administrative skills; development and completion of checklists, filing and thorough documentation of tasks performed",54.0
39,chemical+engineer,"Must have a background in polymers resin manufacturing, supply chain logistics and downstream conversion processes.
The successful candidate will prepare and maintain all of the Houston plant’s production processes, procedures and work descriptions. The candidate will have a background in a chemical plant, plastics, resin environment.
The successful candidate will also be responsible for:

 Production Process design.
Developing and maintaining their aspects of the ISO 9000 quality system in cooperation with the QC Manager
Lead all quality assurance activities in the plant and train employees accordingly in cooperation with the QC Manager
Facilitating all aspects of process engineering for new and existing products from feasibility testing to process automation.
Developing, updating and improving all process related software
Investigating and integrating new technologies in the processing area.
Designing process protocols, providing analysis of data and generating required compliance documentation.
Troubleshooting and resolution of all process and quality problems
Reduction of costs and quality improvement through engineering approaches.
Acting as the lead on site engineer to coordinate all process related design, equipment bids evaluation, installation and start-up of all production related machines and equipment before releasing lines to normal operation.
Product design

 Preparing product structures & matrix for supporting marketing plan and R&D feedback loop.
Review & conducting the ITP (Inspection & Test Plan) & IP (Inspection Procedure) especially for new product. This needs close coordination with quality assurance dept.
Review MSDSs and update production accordingly.
Applied knowledge about various chemicals and polymers and their effects on polymers to assist production department to make the best quality product. This includes advising production department on the chemical and physical properties of the raw materials and their limitations to ensure the compounding processes is optimized and meet or exceed customer product specifications
Prepares reports on trials for Sales and Marketing team to understand the processing limits and capability when running new products.
Key Accountabilities: Strategic Contribution

Understand and follow up all activities related to his job that are connected to the strategy of the company.
Propose the use of quality and process control systems that could be of strategic importance for the company, meaning that can have an important impact to customer satisfaction.
Leadership

Watch closely the leadership style of the plant management and other colleagues, search for related training on line and live, get familiar with the leadership culture of the company. Budgeting & Cost Control
Be aware of the plant’s cost structure and be always alert on how to reduce operational cost.
Calculate the cost of quality control and find the best balance between customer satisfaction and company’s performance

Customer Relationship Management

Liaise with key contacts inside the company to broaden the relationship, improve communications and ensure satisfaction of the customers.
Liaise with employees of the customers to solve efficiently problems and issues or help them design new or improved raw materials. Operate and Improve Production Lines
Support all production staff to run efficiently all process lines at the design production rate, according to quality specifications
Learn, apply and improve all production related software• Continuously reducing change over time and downtime
Train effectively colleagues
Respect, follow and spread all safety, environmental and loss prevention requirements and procedures.
 the continuous improvement culture in the plant, train all personnel to related techniques and methods.

Resolution of internal Issues

Support and coach his colleagues to solve all production internal issues.
Assures process engineers’ communication with other departments (warehouse, logistics, plant management etc) is smooth, to the benefit of the company.
Minimum Qualifications:

BS degree in Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or Polymer Engineering.
Minimum Experience:

7-10 Years (10 years Maximum) Plastics Experience.

Job-Specific Skills:

Process and Production Control Systems Knowledge (SPC, QPC).ERP Knowledge desirable.
English Language
Knowledge of polymers resin manufacturing, supply chain logistics and downstream conversion processes.
Willingness to be involved in the production process at all levels.
Computer Skills.
Project Management education and experience.
High Level Analytical Skills and use of various models and engineering formulas. Knowledge of process factor correlation software (including functions of Excel).
Extended knowledge of the operation and daily maintenance of extruders and bulk conveying systems.
Knowledge of PLC programming and process control
Required experience:
chemicals and polymers, plastics, resin, polyurethane: 7 years
Job Type: Full-time",55.0
40,chemical+engineer,"Bachelor’s degree in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering minimum required.25+ years minimum relevant experience in the chemical and petrochemical industries with at least 10 in Ammonia synthesis.Experience in design and operating principles of Steam Methane Reforming upstream of the Ammonia plant is a must.Proven track record in performing technology selection studiesPast experience developing a Request for Proposal to be sent to licensors for the development of a Process Design Package (PDP)Past experience performing a role similar to an owner’s engineer during the development of a PDP and a FEEDExperience in Commissioning/operational Trouble shooting.Travel < 20% expected.Plans individual work to accomplish objectives.Identifies gaps in the design and works to resolve and close them proactively.Communicates effectively across all levels of the organizations.Advises and provides perspectives from a variety of sources internally and externally to solve problems. Works well with others across all levels.Serves as technical resource to projects and estimating.Continuously improves efficiency and performance.Actively seeks feedback from customers and takes action to improve processes.Proactively looks for solutions to improve quality, cost and safety.Reviews and provides input to project schedule.
#LI-ES1
",57.0
41,chemical+engineer,"
CEMEX es una institución EEO/AA (igualdad de oportunidad/acción afirmativa) y no discrimina en base al sexo, edad, raza, color, religión, discapacidad física o mental, credo, origen nacional, estatus veterano, orientación sexual, infomación genética, identidad de género, o expresión de género en los programas o actividades los cuales opera.",60.0
42,chemical+engineer,"Professor Haotian Wang is hiring a postdoc for his lab to focus on the topic of electrocatalysis, electroorganicsynthesis, ion conductors and ion exchange membranes, or other fields in energy andsustainability that are related to the group’s current research.
Specific Major/Discipline - Chemistry, materials science, chemical engineering, or closely related field
Experience Preferred:
Experience in electrochemistry
Experience in organic/electroorganic synthesis
Experience in ion conductors or ion exchange membranes
Minimum Skills Required:
Basic knowledge of electrochemistry and materials science
Familiarity with energy/sustainability concepts
Familiarity with new electrocatalytic reaction proposal design and drafting
Ability to master the essence of the material in the scientific literature and to recognizeshortcomings in the published work
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, as well as oral presentation skills
Organization and time management skills
Ability to work in a collaborative environment
Ability to work independently and professionally with minimal supervision and direction
Ability to train first year graduate students with basic experimental skills
Skills Preferred - Ability to independently develop innovative ideas and projects related toelectrochemistry, organic/electroorganic synthesis, ion conducors, and ion exchange membranes.
Essential Functions:
Explores frontiers of electrosynthesis of chemical feedstocks
Synthesizes catalytic materials
Performs characterizations of synthetic catalytic materials
Trains newly recruited graduate students with essential experimental skills
Analyzes results of experiments for key input parameters
Publishes and presents research findings
Supports project management and collaboration across institutions or disciplines
Designs and implements research protocols; adapts new procedures, methods or instrumentation relative to research procedures
Provides academic services (ie. teaching classes) to the department as required-Performs all other duties as assigned
Required Documents - Curriculum Vitae",61.0
43,chemical+engineer,"Job Summary:

TPC Group is seeking a Sr Engineer, Process Safety Management. The ideal candidate will serve as a PSM subject matter expert and will provide corporate support to all TPC locations. The ideal candidate must be experienced in facilitating Process Hazard Analysis (PHAs) and Layers of Protection Analysis (LOPA), and one who thrives in a collaborative, open, team environment and is driven by the opportunity to make an impact.

This position will be part of the Corporate PSM organization with responsibility for establishing corporate strategy and providing direct support to operations through continuous development and improvements of the fourteen (14) elements of Process Safety Management.

Job Duties and Responsibilities:

Consistently maintain and demonstrate a high regard for personal and process safety, for the protection of employees, the public, and company assets.
Provide technical support and guidance to support Operations and Engineering in implementing sustainable process safety programs and culture through knowledge of PSM/RMP, process safety practices, Recognized and Generally Accepted Good Engineering Practices (RAGAGEP), industry best practices and codes, safety & engineering standards, and practical implementation methods.
Ability to recognize hazards associated with chemical processes and equipment.
Accountable to schedule, coordinate, document and facilitate PHA/LOPA revalidations, maintaining the 5-year window required for revalidation of each study.
Lead/facilitate and participate in Incident Investigations.
Continually drive effectiveness and improvements within established Management of Change (MOC) and Pre-Startup Safety Review (PSSR) processes.
Interpret P&IDs and other process safety information.
Track and maintain corrective actions stemming from site PHAs, incident investigations, compliance audits, insurance audits, site safety assessments and other PSM and EHSS activities.
Report monthly key performance indicators for Process Safety Performance.
Participate in internal and external PSM/RMP audits as a qualified PSM & HSS auditor.
Ability to interpret and communicate federal, state, and local requirements associated with equipment design and integrity.
Remains current with emerging issues related to Process Safety Management.
Develop, implement, and report key PSM performance leading and lagging indicators (KPIs) to track the progress and health of PSM programs.

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent (chemical or mechanical engineering a plus) chemical industry or refining experience (10 years PSM/RMP experience, including basic process safety knowledge)
8-10 years PHA facilitation experience, including experience leading chemical facility PHA and LOPA studies
Must understand Level of Protection Analysis (LOPA), including but not limited to Independent Protection Layers (IPLs), Safety Instrumented Systems (SIS), Instrumented Safety Function, Safety Integrity Level, and Risk Reduction Factors
Must understand the concept of inherently safer design and hierarchy of controls
Must understand and be capable of interpreting facility siting studies (FSS) and quantitative risk analyses (QRAs); including siting of temporary buildings and structures
Practical experience in use of PHA software (PHA Works, PHA Pro, etc.)
Working knowledge of Microsoft Word and Excel

Preferred Qualifications:

Prior EHSS auditing experience
Dakota software experience
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to perform multiple functions and tasks simultaneous
Good administrative skills; development and completion of checklists, filing and thorough documentation of tasks performed",62.0
44,chemical+engineer,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",64.0
45,chemical+engineer,"Title:
OTS Consultant- Competency Assurance
Job Description

Do you love tackling technical training and competency development challenges using cutting edge digital training solutions ?


Do you have rich experience in delivering training simulation solutions (OTS) and training programs?


KBR Technology Led Industrial Solutions (TLIS) is looking for Senior Consultant - Competency Assurance to work with our customers and other KBR Technology teams to craft cloud/on-premise digital training solutions and training programs for clients globally with immediate focus in Americas and in APAC regions. As a trusted training advisor to our customers, you will work with technology, solutions and services teams to craft highly scalable, flexible and robust training solutions and programs that help our customers to assure adequate competency development level of their operation teams and to benefit the most from TLIS digital training solutions.


As a successful Senior Consultant - Competency Assurance you will be challenged to think differently, and build creative and cost-effective digital training solutions including but not limited to operator training simulations. If you are highly technical and experienced in delivering OTS and related training programs then this could be the role for you.
Job Responsibilities
Lead development efforts for new digital training solutions and training programs for all KBR licensed technologies, especially cloud-based OTS and on-line training programs
Act as the key instructor to deliver the online or on-premise training programs, in certain circumstances, join commissioning and startup team to support plant initial startups
Work closely with customer as well as KBR Technology Teams to collect customer requirements and devise fit-for-purpose training solution and programs for customer
May lead and direct the work of the team of specialists in a specific or key OTS or training project or be responsible for developing critical components of the systems yourself.
Guide OTS/Training Technical Leads for project delivery and resolution of technical issues
Manage technical services and relationship with key existing OTS and training customers
Assist in response to ITB, RFQ and client inquiries, and in general, support for estimates, proposals, sales pursuit, and developing marketing assets
Job Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Chemical Engineering required; advanced degree preferred
Minimum of twelve (12) years of Chemical Engineering related experience in Petrochemical, Chemicals, Polymer and Refining, ammonia experience is highly preferred
Requires a minimum of eight (8) years of proven, diversified OTS experience
Experience in building and delivering a training program to clients is highly preferred , plant commissioning and startup experience is a plus
Experience in minimum one OTS/dynamics simulation software, with INDISS/INDISS+, UNISIM, HYSYS preferred
Experience in OTS-DCS integration with a minimum one major DCS platform
Familiarity and experience with the latest PC operating systems and data interfacing techniques such as OPC are required. Experience with C++ and similar modern programming languages will be a plus.
Ability to work cohesively with a diversified group of specialists located in Houston and Pune, India
Excellent oral & written communication skills
Willing to travel anywhere across the globe as required for delivery of on-premise training solutions or programs
BENEFITS
KBR offers a selection of competitive lifestyle benefits which could include a 401K plan with company match, medical, dental, vision, life insurance, AD&D, flexible spending account, disability, paid time off, or flexible work schedule. We support career advancement through professional training and development.
INCLUSION AND DIVERSITY AT KBR
At KBR, we are passionate about our people, sustainability, and our Zero Harm culture. These inform all that we do and are at the heart of our commitment to and ongoing journey toward being a more inclusive and diverse company. That commitment is central to our team of teams philosophy and fosters an environment of real collaboration across cultures and locations. Our individual differences and perspectives bring enhanced value to our teams and help us develop solutions for the most challenging problems. We understand that by embracing those differences and working together, we are more innovative, more resilient, and safer. We Deliver — Together.
KBR is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, veteran status, genetic information, union status and/or beliefs, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law.",65.0
46,chemical+engineer,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",67.0
47,chemical+engineer,"Senior Process Controls Engineer21002279
About Linde:
Linde is a leading global industrial gases and engineering company with 2020 sales of $27 billion. We live our mission of making our world more productive every day by providing high-quality solutions, technologies and services which are making our customers more successful and helping to sustain and protect our planet.
The company serves a variety of end markets including aerospace, chemicals, food and beverage, electronics, energy, healthcare, manufacturing and primary metals. Linde's industrial gases are used in countless applications, from life-saving oxygen for hospitals to high-purity & specialty gases for electronics manufacturing, hydrogen for clean fuels and much more. Linde also delivers state-of-the-art gas processing solutions to support customer expansion, efficiency improvements and emissions reductions.
For more information about the company and its products and services, please visit www.linde.com.

Job Overview: Provide technical and project support for the implementation, troubleshooting and monitoring of process controls systems for the North American Industrial Gases (NAIG) Hydrogen and Carbon Monoxide business.

Reporting Relationships: This position reports to the HyCO Process Controls Engineering Manager.

Primary Responsibilities:
Support process control and monitoring systems nationally for hydrogen and carbon monoxide facilities in Praxair NAIG, consisting mainly of Steam Methane Reforming (SMR) processes.
Lead and execute moderately complex engineering projects with minimal supervision.
Works closely with Global Hydrogen Engineering to ensure projects are meeting standards in accordance with Praxair policies and procedures
Actively involved in the planning of CSU activities for HYCO plants nationally to prevent obsolescence
Perform project engineering and maintenance work from design to implementation and ensure adherence to Praxair Guidelines and Standards.
Participate as a key contributor on projects and serve as a technical lead as well as providing technical guidance to others as required.
Work independently and make decisions with minimal supervision based on full awareness of viability, cost and other benefits.
Develops and implements innovative process controls solutions to chronic issues.
Provide primary control system hardware/software support, instrumentation, and process engineering/optimization to a variety of field personnel including operations technicians, instrument technicians, process engineering and various members of the operations management teams.
Provide support in the areas of training, troubleshooting, environmental compliance, Root Cause Analysis (RCA) and preventative /corrective maintenance, focusing on all areas of advanced process control systems.
Ensure control system changes are implemented in accordance with Praxair Management of Change Protocols.
Actively involved in the planning, identification, and development of long-range capital programs, especially in the area of control system upgrades
Demonstrate significant technical independence, excellent project management skills and leadership in development of control systems applications and safety standards.
Play an active role and lead aspects of projects involving Control Systems
Ensure equipment for new projects meet Praxair Standards and Specifications
Represent US HyCO Business in rollout and implementation of Cyber Security
Write, Update, and Execute Functional Test Procedures
Provide off hours support to resolve control system problems
Serve as a subject matter expert in SRS, SIL ratings, and ISA84 requirements
Travel nationally to other US locations as required for support (up to 25 – 35%)
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science in Engineering or 10 years or more experience in Control Systems or Computer Related Field
Minimum of five (5) years of chemical industry experience.
Advanced understanding of continuous chemical processes.
Working knowledge of primary instrumentation.
Proficiency with schematic wiring diagrams
Proficiency with process control content of P&I diagrams.
Experience with managing Control System Upgrades

Preferred Qualifications:
Practical applications experience with Foxboro, Emerson Delta V, Allen-Bradley PLC5, Control Logix, Bailey INFI190 control systems.
Proficient working knowledge in steam methane reforming
Project Management experience
Advanced process troubleshooting experience.

Critical Competencies:
STRATEGIC SKILLS
Advanced
OPERATING SKILLS
Executive
ENERGY & DRIVE
Advanced
ORGANIZATIONAL UNDERSTANDING
Advanced
COURAGE
Intermediate
PERSONAL & INTERPERSONAL SKILLS
Advanced
At Linde, we strive to create a work environment that treats all employees with respect, supports new thoughts and ideas, encourages growth and development, celebrates our differences, and embraces inclusion. Linde is committed to remaining an employer of choice for the diverse, ever-increasing pool of global talent. To learn more, visit About Linde.

We offer a comprehensive competitive benefits package including paid holidays and vacation, health, dental, disability, life insurance, 401(k) (with matching), and pension benefits.

Linde thanks all applicants in advance for their interest; however, only those applicants who are being considered for an interview will be contacted.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other reason prohibited by applicable law.

Primary Location Texas-Deer Park
Schedule Full-time
Job Engineering
Unposting Date Ongoing",68.0
48,chemical+engineer,"POSITION OVERVIEW
The Ascend Performance Materials CHB Process Engineering Dept. is seeking a highly motivated Senior Process Design Engineer with leadership ability and desire to do chemical process design. This position will have an important role in providing oversight for developing the design of projects to expand capacity, new process development, improve site productivity, and improve site reliability. The position offers a challenging environment with broad responsibilities and opportunities for growth in both leadership & technical skills. This position will be based in our Chocolate Bayou facility in the Alvin, TX area.
TARGETED OUTCOMES
Identifies and develops process solutions which meet the performance and flexibility needs of the business.
Develops creative process designs for new chemicals business with phased capital approaches.
Applies approved design practices, work processes, and design tools to develop innovative, cost effective solutions.
Effectively applies the new technology development and project stage-gate processes to complete project deliverables.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Unit lead process design engineer providing technical direction/oversight to process design engineers supporting projects within assigned unit(s).
Serves as the process design engineer on large or small project teams.
Track results of performance metrics for assigned units and develop templates/work processes as needed.
Plan/coordinate/direct activities for project within assigned units.
Leads design reviews for various projects to ensure the options considered are creative and cost-effective.
Provide process design guidance and technical oversight on assigned process units.
Performs process simulation and other modeling needed to evaluate potential process and equipment design alternatives.
Provides process data to collaboratively develop equipment design specifications with other engineering disciplines.
Develops process design packages in support of expense or capital projects and Technology improvement programs. Such packages include the design basis, heat & material balances, PFDs, equipment specifications, and economics for viable design alternatives.
Develops or modifies process flow-sheets, including PFDs and P&IDs.
TEAM
Reports to: Process Design Engineering Manager
Team: Collaborates with process engineers, project engineers, discipline engineers, production engineers, operations, reliability, ESSH.
REQUIRED EXPERIENCE
BS or MS in Chemical Engineering.
10+ years’ industrial experience with 2+ years’ experience leading process design teams with capital projects $5MM-$50MM.
REQUIRED SKILLS
Self-motivated leader, capable of leading process design teams and interfacing with cross functional teams.
Strong technical and analytical skills with the ability to innovate and creatively solve complex problems.
Excellent interpersonal skills with the ability to work with cross-functional teams to take an idea from concept to commercialization.
Ability to influence senior management.
Strong communication skills, both oral and written.
Proven track record of delivering results.
Ability to coach and mentor junior process engineers.
Proficient in applying basic chemical engineering principals such as heat transfer, vapor-liquid equilibria, mass transfer, solids separation, chemical reactions, fluid flow mechanics, and thermodynamics to the process design of new or modified chemical production facilities.
Proficient in the process design of equipment including pressure vessels, distillation columns, heat exchangers, pumps, compressors, control valves, atmospheric tanks, solids separation equipment, pressure relief devices, etc.
Proficient in the use of process design software and simulation packages such as Aspen HYSYS.
PREFERRED SKILLS
Petrochemical process design – fluidized bed reactors, distillation design, heat exchangers.
Specialty chemicals process design - batch reactors, solids separation, crystallization, centrifuges.
Specific experience with Aspen Plus, Aspen EDR, AFT Software (Fathom & Arrow), and iPRSM.
Demonstrated ability to handle multiple priorities.
Experience using Six-Sigma tools.
Previous manufacturing experience and closure of PHA items.
Process design of projects $50MM-$1B.
Expertise and industry subject matter expert – industry standards committees, AIChE, new process/product development, etc.
PE license.
Why work at Ascend?
If you are looking for a career with one of the plastics industry’s most enlightened employers, Ascend Performance Materials offers an opportunity to develop a true sense of fulfillment and pride in your achievements.
Ascend provides an exciting platform from which you, your family and your community will benefit. You’ll become a trusted member of an interdependent and safe working environment where your opinions and ideas will be encouraged and respected, regardless of your position. Working alongside a diverse range of renowned technical experts on a continuous stream of industry-leading products and technologies, you’ll find a wide variety of opportunities within our growing business for both learning and career development.
Our culture is built on a strong set of core values that foster innovation and collaboration across every level of the organization. It is a culture grounded in open relationships between every member of the Ascend team. All of this is driven by an inspirational leadership team, intently focused on maximizing the new investment in the business.
The essence of our organization is embodied in the words “inspiring everyday,” and we have built a strong and confident business with performance at its core. It will be challenging but holistically rewarding and will enable you to achieve your personal and professional aspirations.
Ascend is an organization that genuinely seeks to inspire our people to inspire others. We believe this gives Ascend a higher purpose, making it a unique work environment for you to consider when choosing career options
Ascend is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran’s status, genetic testing, sexual orientation or any other characteristic or status protected under federal, state or local law.
Why work at Ascend?
Our vision is to be the recognized leader in the nylon 6,6 value chain, creating new possibilities with PA66 for everyone, everywhere, every day. We achieve that through living our Ascend values.
We care . We operate safely with high integrity for our employees, our customers and our communities. Our people are our greatest assets, and our Total Rewards Program extends beyond traditional benefits to include access to on-site medical clinics at our U.S. facilities, a global wellness rewards program and Performance Matters, an employee-driven recognition plan. Our Commitment to Zero demonstrates our belief that is it possible to operate with zero personal injuries, zero process safety incidents and zero environmental releases. And the Ascend Cares Foundation, led by Ascend employees, supports Ascend families in times of need, provides inspiring opportunities for community engagement and facilitates community leadership.
Customer-focused . We exist for our customers; they drive our actions. Their success is our success. Our plastics and chemicals are building blocks that help make everyday essentials safer and more sustainable, and we constantly strive to develop new and innovative products to meet the future needs of our customers. And that customer focus doesn’t only apply to the marketplace – it also applies to how we treat our colleagues and our fellow community members.
Better every day . We invest in our people and our processes to improve every day. A2E, our continuous improvement program, guides the way we do business. And this way of problem solving applies not only to our manufacturing practices but also to our commitment to developing our people. You’ll see it during your career at Ascend in our leadership development, skills training and mentoring programs
Agile . We think broadly and lead proactively in a constantly evolving organization and industry. Agility doesn’t mean simply working quickly – it means critical thinking, creative problem solving and novel approaches to everyday challenges.
One Ascend . All together, with a common set of goals and an eye toward the future. We don’t accept silos. We look for ways to share across departments, sites and geography. This means you won’t be boxed into a single role at Ascend – you could get the chance to work with teams across the globe to improve the way we serve our people, our customers and our communities.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, national origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, citizenship, genetic information or other protected status under federal, state or local laws.",71.0
49,chemical+engineer,"Job Description

Do you love tackling technical training and competency development challenges using cutting edge digital training solutions ?

Do you have rich experience in delivering training simulation solutions (OTS) and training programs?

KBR Technology Led Industrial Solutions (TLIS) is looking for Senior Consultant - Competency Assurance to work with our customers and other KBR Technology teams to craft cloud/on-premise digital training solutions and training programs for clients globally with immediate focus in Americas and in APAC regions. As a trusted training advisor to our customers, you will work with technology, solutions and services teams to craft highly scalable, flexible and robust training solutions and programs that help our customers to assure adequate competency development level of their operation teams and to benefit the most from TLIS digital training solutions.

As a successful Senior Consultant - Competency Assurance you will be challenged to think differently, and build creative and cost-effective digital training solutions including but not limited to operator training simulations. If you are highly technical and experienced in delivering OTS and related training programs then this could be the role for you.
Job Responsibilities
Lead development efforts for new digital training solutions and training programs for all KBR licensed technologies, especially cloud-based OTS and on-line training programs
Act as the key instructor to deliver the online or on-premise training programs, in certain circumstances, join commissioning and startup team to support plant initial startups
Work closely with customer as well as KBR Technology Teams to collect customer requirements and devise fit-for-purpose training solution and programs for customer
May lead and direct the work of the team of specialists in a specific or key OTS or training project or be responsible for developing critical components of the systems yourself.
Guide OTS/Training Technical Leads for project delivery and resolution of technical issues
Manage technical services and relationship with key existing OTS and training customers
Assist in response to ITB, RFQ and client inquiries, and in general, support for estimates, proposals, sales pursuit, and developing marketing assets
Job Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Chemical Engineering required; advanced degree preferred
Minimum of twelve (12) years of Chemical Engineering related experience in Petrochemical, Chemicals, Polymer and Refining, ammonia experience is highly preferred
Requires a minimum of eight (8) years of proven, diversified OTS experience
Experience in building and delivering a training program to clients is highly preferred, plant commissioning and startup experience is a plus
Experience in minimum one OTS/dynamics simulation software, with INDISS/INDISS+, UNISIM, HYSYS preferred
Experience in OTS-DCS integration with a minimum one major DCS platform
Familiarity and experience with the latest PC operating systems and data interfacing techniques such as OPC are required. Experience with C++ and similar modern programming languages will be a plus.
Ability to work cohesively with a diversified group of specialists located in Houston and Pune, India
Excellent oral & written communication skills
Willing to travel anywhere across the globe as required for delivery of on-premise training solutions or programs
BENEFITS
KBR offers a selection of competitive lifestyle benefits which could include a 401K plan with company match, medical, dental, vision, life insurance, AD&D, flexible spending account, disability, paid time off, or flexible work schedule. We support career advancement through professional training and development.
INCLUSION AND DIVERSITY AT KBR
At KBR, we are passionate about our people, sustainability, and our Zero Harm culture. These inform all that we do and are at the heart of our commitment to and ongoing journey toward being a more inclusive and diverse company. That commitment is central to our team of teams philosophy and fosters an environment of real collaboration across cultures and locations. Our individual differences and perspectives bring enhanced value to our teams and help us develop solutions for the most challenging problems. We understand that by embracing those differences and working together, we are more innovative, more resilient, and safer. We Deliver — Together.",72.0
50,chemical+engineer,"Baker Engineering and Risk Consultants, Inc. (BakerRisk) is a global provider of process safety and risk management services to companies in the petroleum and chemical industries, as well as engineering and testing services for government agencies and private companies involved with hazardous materials. Utilizing advanced methodologies and proprietary in-house tools, BakerRisk engineers assess the consequences and risks associated with potentially catastrophic events including explosions, fires, and toxic material releases.
Job Summary
The successful candidate will work with engineers and a small development team to create and improve software used to perform engineering analyses. Working with a small team of developers means you will have opportunities to learn and participate in a wide range of software engineering tasks.
Specific Job Duties and Responsibilities
Derive and improve engineering-level models for implementation into user-friendly software.
Work with engineering experts (local and remote) to gather and understand software requirements and implement new engineering models.
Work with local and remote teams to find, trouble-shoot, and resolve software issues.
Required Skills & Qualifications
Proficient in one or more object-oriented language such as .NET, Java, and C/C++.
Demonstrated competency in your field of engineering.
Competent in Transport Phenomena with demonstrated understanding of CFD and/or FEA.
Familiarity with software engineering concepts such as object-oriented programming, with the desire to expand this skill set.
Familiar with numerical methods.
Eager to learn and responds well to constructive criticism.
Education and Experience
Must possess at least a Master’s degree in a field of engineering, such as Civil, Mechanical, Aerospace, or Chemical Engineering.
BakerRisk offers a competitive salary and benefit package including holiday, vacation and sick leave pay, medical/dental insurance, 401(k), Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP), and potential for a year-end bonus.
Additional Information: For additional information, please see our website at www.BakerRisk.com
(BakerRisk) is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants receive equal consideration, regardless of their race, color, religion, age, gender, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, national origin, or any other protected status. BakerRisk and its affiliated companies are drug-free workplaces.",73.0
51,chemical+engineer,"Project Manager21002380

POSITION AVAILABLE

TITLE: Project Manager
EMPLOYER: Linde, Inc.
LOCATION: The Woodlands, TX
DUTIES: Responsible for the overall project scope, cost, scheduling and deliverables of project and services in an assigned area, from scoping and estimating to start-up. Utilize a defined engineering and project management methodology to partner with operations, maintenance, engineering, procurement, safety and business groups to ensure all work is within assigned scope, mitigate risks, ensure process efficiency and meet business objectives. Work on multiple small sized project assignments simultaneously and perform quality assurance planning and code regulation compliance involved in safety and quality programs. Utilize knowledge of project execution to effectively communicate and participate with cross functional groups to define scope, execute design, installation and resolve problems. Discuss and establish recommendations with other project managers and subject matter experts. Evaluate alternatives and find solutions using a systematic approach to develop improvements and innovations which should ultimately enhance project performance. Apply engineering and project management principles to prepare detailed project plans and control elements of the plan. Analyze costs and benefits to recommend solutions and will make the necessary adjustments to keep projects on course. Prepare required reports, documentation, spreadsheets, database, graphs, cost estimates and summaries to communicate project progress and results. Work closely with project teams, contractors, and subcontractors to ensure that all work is being performed in accordance with project and industry safe work practices. Develop contracting strategies and ensure that the project engineering and construction phases are in compliance with contracts and all applicable safety rules and regulations. Developing project safety, design safety and construction site safety plans.
QUALIFICATIONS:
REQTS: Must have a Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent in Mechanical Engineering, Civil Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Electrical Engineering or a related field plus ten (10) years of experience in the position offered or as a Design Project Engineer or related. Must have ten (10) years of experience in each of the following: Project Engineering, Project Management, and Construction Management; Project development, scope planning and definition, project plan execution, change control management, schedule, cost and resource planning in the chemical industry; Stage-gate project management process and understanding of the Project Management Institute (PMI) work process; Systems and process equipment in industrial gas plant including HyCO and air separation applications; Performing oxygen cleaning and inspecting components cleaned for oxygen service; Designing systems requiring material selection for oxygen and cryogenic systems; line sizing; pump selection; and pressure relief valve sizing and selection; Interpreting process and instrumentation diagrams (P&ID), schematic wiring diagrams (SWD), and electrical one-line diagrams; Working knowledge of industry design codes and practices including ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code; ASME Piping Codes (B31.1, B31.3, and B31.12); API510 Pressure Vessel Inspection Code; and API570 Piping Inspection Code; Knowledge of the OSHA Process Safety Management (PSM) elements; Plant demolition, equipment refurbishment and equipment relocation; Executing construction contract types including reimbursable and lump sum; and Crane and rigging safety, and the ability to interpret lift plans. 25%-50% travel required domestically to Linde sites.
HOURS: Full-Time; Mon-Fri (40 hours per week)
 EEO - All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment w/out regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin,
 protected veteran status, or disability status.
APPLY: Linde, Inc. invites applicants to apply by sending resume to Attn: Michael Dobkins, 1585 Sawdust Road, Suite 300,
 The Woodlands, TX 77380. Must Specify Ref Code 4558759.

Primary Location Texas-The Woodlands
Other Locations North Carolina-Wilmington, Texas-The Woodlands
Schedule Full-time
Job Operations
Unposting Date Ongoing",74.0
52,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Celanese is a Fortune 500 global chemical innovation company that engineers and manufactures chemicals used in products essential to everyday living. Headquartered in Dallas, TX, we employ over 7,700 dedicated people working between 43 facilities across 18 countries. We are committed to employee growth and creating shareholder value to ensure continued opportunities make a difference. Our company focuses on the safety of its employees, provides competitive compensation (including benefits starting day 1), and emphasizes giving back to the community. For more information about Celanese and our products please visit www.celanese.com
Responsibilities:
Support planning & coordination of DCS control system upgrades based on existing system status and priority
Support the definition of corporate strategy for system upgrades and vendor selection
Support the implementation of the DCS systems
Support corporate strategy to achieve excellence in digital manufacturing and transformation towards Industry 4.0
Ensure the DCS system selection 'decision tree' is followed by the major sites, ensuring alignment with the Operation Leader and ensuring comptetive bids from the major DCS suppliers
Guide and support individual system upgrades
Support Advance Process Control and OTS revitalization effort in Celanese
Support a team of BPCS and process control experts
Ability to support a DCS systems upgrade
Support BPCS implementations in Major Projects / New Builds
Support effort to deploy OTS for various units across the Celanese organization.
Hands on experience with Honeywell TDC/Experion, Emerson Delta V DCS Systems, and common PLC platforms.

Qualifications:
Ability to lead / support DCS systems upgrades from concept through operational support.
Ability to interact with a global network of specialists
Track record deploying Advanced Process Controls
Experience with DeltaV, Honeywell, common PLCs, OSI PI and Aspen DMC
10+ Years of relevant industry experience
BS Degree in an Engineering field",75.0
53,chemical+engineer,"JOB NUMBER: 6 MONTH CONTRACT – TEMP TO HIRE!**MUST BE AVAILABLE FOR IMMEDIATE HIRE**JOB SUMMARY: Under general supervision, the Engineer II will perform assignments requiring knowledge and application of complex engineering principles.This position is responsible for the performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned.This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes.They are typically responsible for managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.Ability to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.Bachelor’s Degree in Chemical Engineering is required and 5 or more years of process and project engineering experience.Cenergy is a dynamic, diverse, woman-owned company that has provided stellar support to our clients globally for over 25 years! We hire extraordinary people, and each of our team members are encouraged to embody our core values to drive innovation and own it with integrity and trust while adding to our positive and forward thinking atmosphere.Cenergy employees can enjoy the following robust benefits and resources:Ongoing Training (RSO, Systems, Software Programs, OSHA Safety, JJ Keller, etc.)Continuous Employment Development and LearningOngoing Advocacy, internal assets with HSE, Legal and HR teams and experts to aid in Employee Career Path and Advancement401KAetna & Kaiser Group Medical CoverageDental Insurance CoverageVision Insurance CoverageBasic Life Insurance & AD&DLong Term DisabilityVoluntary Short Term DisabilityAccess to Health JoyGAP Medical CoverageDirect DepositHealth Savings and Flexible Spending AccountsJob Types: Full-time, ContractPay: $30.00 - $32.00 per hourBenefits:Health insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Managing large process area in plant: 2 years (Preferred)process/project engineering: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",77.0
54,chemical+engineer,"Today, Lonza is a global leader in life sciences operating across three continents. While we work in science, there’s no magic formula to how we do it. Our greatest scientific solution is talented people working together, devising ideas that help businesses to help people. In exchange, we let our people own their careers. Their ideas, big and small, genuinely improve the world. And that’s the kind of work we want to be part of.
Our Lonza site in Houston is seeking a Manufacturing Science and Technology (MSAT) Manager, Viral Vector. This position is responsible for managing a medium group of Scientists and Engineers whose major responsibility is process Technology Transfer from PD or clients to GMP Viral Vector production. This incumbent serves as the MSAT business partner within the Viral Vector asset at Lonza Houston. The responsibilities of this management role include coaching, mentoring, and providing guidance and technical leadership roles in client-facing projects and/or Lonza strategic projects, establishing new processes and policies, and mediating conflicts, providing technical input and guiding company strategy, prioritizing work and assisting in establishing long term group direction and objectives.
Key responsibilities:
Provide general supervision to a group of MSAT Scientists and Engineers whose responsibility is process Technology Transfer of Viral Vector manufacturing processes including Upstream and Downstream
Serves as the MSAT business partner for Viral Vector asset.
Establishing short term and long-term group directions and objectives. Responsible for resource allocation and project prioritization.
Provide technical guidance to reports and cross functional asset teams in areas of process Tech transfer, process design and scale-up, facility fit, gap analysis, FMEA risk assessment, troubleshooting and investigation.
Drive innovation and continuous improvement.
Build cross functional relationships with other internal and external stakeholders, including but not limited to Process Development, Viral Vector Manufacturing, Quality units, Supply Chain, Facilities and Engineering, and other global MSAT organizations.
Communicate effectively with internal and external stakeholders.
Serves as a Subject Matter Expert during internal and external audits.
Coach and develop staff for future leadership roles. Manages group performance.
Follows all training and policy guidelines established for the facility as well as all cGMP requirements. Ensures employee training profile is up to date at all times by regular monitoring of training lists (e.g. ComplianceWire, SAP Learning Portal) and completing all training in a timely fashion.
Key requirements:
Bachelors Degree in Engineering and/or Life Sciences. Preferably in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnology, other Life Sciences Degrees are acceptable. MS or PHD preferred
Highly experienced in cell biology, adherent and suspension cell culture, scale-up and bioreactor operation, chromatography operation, UF/DF, and TFF
Work experience in viral vector product/process development or manufacturing is a plus.
Advanced experience in Biologics Process Development, MSAT or Manufacturing
Strong leadership skills The capacity to motivate, encourage and influence others, in the achievement of specific objectives, and to carry ultimate responsibility.
Prior experience managing a staff
Experience with Biologics CMC regulations, international guidelines including but not limited to FDA, EMA, ICH.
Understand emerging technologies (Cell and Gene Therapy) and think ahead in the interests of Lonza
Facilitates changes and be flexible to learn new processes and new technology, Lonza processes for delivering results
Communicate effectively and work successfully in a team.
Every day, Lonza’s products and services have a positive impact on millions of people. For us, this is not only a great privilege, but also a great responsibility. How we achieve our business results is just as important as the achievements themselves. At Lonza, we respect and protect our people and our environment. Any success we achieve is no success at all if not achieved ethically.
People come to Lonza for the challenge and creativity of solving complex problems and developing new ideas in life sciences. In return, we offer the satisfaction that comes with improving lives all around the world. The satisfaction that comes with making a meaningful difference.
Lonza is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a qualified individual with disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",78.0
55,chemical+engineer,"Professor Haotian Wang is hiring a postdoc for his lab to focus on the topic of electrocatalysis, electroorganicsynthesis, ion conductors and ion exchange membranes, or other fields in energy andsustainability that are related to the group’s current research.
Specific Major/Discipline - Chemistry, materials science, chemical engineering, or closely related field
Experience Preferred:
Experience in electrochemistry
Experience in organic/electroorganic synthesis
Experience in ion conductors or ion exchange membranes
Minimum Skills Required:
Basic knowledge of electrochemistry and materials science
Familiarity with energy/sustainability concepts
Familiarity with new electrocatalytic reaction proposal design and drafting
Ability to master the essence of the material in the scientific literature and to recognizeshortcomings in the published work
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, as well as oral presentation skills
Organization and time management skills
Ability to work in a collaborative environment
Ability to work independently and professionally with minimal supervision and direction
Ability to train first year graduate students with basic experimental skills
Skills Preferred - Ability to independently develop innovative ideas and projects related toelectrochemistry, organic/electroorganic synthesis, ion conducors, and ion exchange membranes.
Essential Functions:
Explores frontiers of electrosynthesis of chemical feedstocks
Synthesizes catalytic materials
Performs characterizations of synthetic catalytic materials
Trains newly recruited graduate students with essential experimental skills
Analyzes results of experiments for key input parameters
Publishes and presents research findings
Supports project management and collaboration across institutions or disciplines
Designs and implements research protocols; adapts new procedures, methods or instrumentation relative to research procedures
Provides academic services (ie. teaching classes) to the department as required-Performs all other duties as assigned
Required Documents - Curriculum Vitae",79.0
56,chemical+engineer,"
CEMEX es una institución EEO/AA (igualdad de oportunidad/acción afirmativa) y no discrimina en base al sexo, edad, raza, color, religión, discapacidad física o mental, credo, origen nacional, estatus veterano, orientación sexual, infomación genética, identidad de género, o expresión de género en los programas o actividades los cuales opera.",80.0
57,chemical+engineer,"Senior Process Controls Engineer21002279
About Linde:
Linde is a leading global industrial gases and engineering company with 2020 sales of $27 billion. We live our mission of making our world more productive every day by providing high-quality solutions, technologies and services which are making our customers more successful and helping to sustain and protect our planet.
The company serves a variety of end markets including aerospace, chemicals, food and beverage, electronics, energy, healthcare, manufacturing and primary metals. Linde's industrial gases are used in countless applications, from life-saving oxygen for hospitals to high-purity & specialty gases for electronics manufacturing, hydrogen for clean fuels and much more. Linde also delivers state-of-the-art gas processing solutions to support customer expansion, efficiency improvements and emissions reductions.
For more information about the company and its products and services, please visit www.linde.com.

Job Overview: Provide technical and project support for the implementation, troubleshooting and monitoring of process controls systems for the North American Industrial Gases (NAIG) Hydrogen and Carbon Monoxide business.

Reporting Relationships: This position reports to the HyCO Process Controls Engineering Manager.

Primary Responsibilities:
Support process control and monitoring systems nationally for hydrogen and carbon monoxide facilities in Praxair NAIG, consisting mainly of Steam Methane Reforming (SMR) processes.
Lead and execute moderately complex engineering projects with minimal supervision.
Works closely with Global Hydrogen Engineering to ensure projects are meeting standards in accordance with Praxair policies and procedures
Actively involved in the planning of CSU activities for HYCO plants nationally to prevent obsolescence
Perform project engineering and maintenance work from design to implementation and ensure adherence to Praxair Guidelines and Standards.
Participate as a key contributor on projects and serve as a technical lead as well as providing technical guidance to others as required.
Work independently and make decisions with minimal supervision based on full awareness of viability, cost and other benefits.
Develops and implements innovative process controls solutions to chronic issues.
Provide primary control system hardware/software support, instrumentation, and process engineering/optimization to a variety of field personnel including operations technicians, instrument technicians, process engineering and various members of the operations management teams.
Provide support in the areas of training, troubleshooting, environmental compliance, Root Cause Analysis (RCA) and preventative /corrective maintenance, focusing on all areas of advanced process control systems.
Ensure control system changes are implemented in accordance with Praxair Management of Change Protocols.
Actively involved in the planning, identification, and development of long-range capital programs, especially in the area of control system upgrades
Demonstrate significant technical independence, excellent project management skills and leadership in development of control systems applications and safety standards.
Play an active role and lead aspects of projects involving Control Systems
Ensure equipment for new projects meet Praxair Standards and Specifications
Represent US HyCO Business in rollout and implementation of Cyber Security
Write, Update, and Execute Functional Test Procedures
Provide off hours support to resolve control system problems
Serve as a subject matter expert in SRS, SIL ratings, and ISA84 requirements
Travel nationally to other US locations as required for support (up to 25 – 35%)
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science in Engineering or 10 years or more experience in Control Systems or Computer Related Field
Minimum of five (5) years of chemical industry experience.
Advanced understanding of continuous chemical processes.
Working knowledge of primary instrumentation.
Proficiency with schematic wiring diagrams
Proficiency with process control content of P&I diagrams.
Experience with managing Control System Upgrades

Preferred Qualifications:
Practical applications experience with Foxboro, Emerson Delta V, Allen-Bradley PLC5, Control Logix, Bailey INFI190 control systems.
Proficient working knowledge in steam methane reforming
Project Management experience
Advanced process troubleshooting experience.

Critical Competencies:
STRATEGIC SKILLS
Advanced
OPERATING SKILLS
Executive
ENERGY & DRIVE
Advanced
ORGANIZATIONAL UNDERSTANDING
Advanced
COURAGE
Intermediate
PERSONAL & INTERPERSONAL SKILLS
Advanced
At Linde, we strive to create a work environment that treats all employees with respect, supports new thoughts and ideas, encourages growth and development, celebrates our differences, and embraces inclusion. Linde is committed to remaining an employer of choice for the diverse, ever-increasing pool of global talent. To learn more, visit About Linde.

We offer a comprehensive competitive benefits package including paid holidays and vacation, health, dental, disability, life insurance, 401(k) (with matching), and pension benefits.

Linde thanks all applicants in advance for their interest; however, only those applicants who are being considered for an interview will be contacted.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other reason prohibited by applicable law.

Primary Location Texas-Deer Park
Schedule Full-time
Job Engineering
Unposting Date Ongoing",82.0
58,chemical+engineer,"Equal Opportunity Employer / Veterans / Disabled
Product Engineer II
Position Summary
This position is primarily responsible for the maintenance of all control valve product lines and supervision of subordinates.
What You Will Do:
Manage the engineering service request (ESR) process
Maintain all control valve product lines including; troubleshooting, analyzing, and resolving product issues.
Troubleshoot design related issues in production
Assist with quality first article inspection (FAI)
Create production drawings for products from 3D solid models or sketches with limited direction including the creation of 3D CAD Models
Maintain Oracle including; BOM’s, Part Numbers, Routers, etc.
Report department KPI’s
Ensure that design changes to products comply with regulatory requirements (ex. NACE, API, UL)
Maintain design integrity of products to meet safety requirements of local, federal and industry requirements at a minimum.
Develop prototypes, test plans and validate design changes or new suppliers through analysis and testing as required.
Participate in or conduct design reviews, provide feedback, using appropriate tools, i.e. FMEA, analyses, field and lab testing.
May supervise subordinates.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required:
Comfortable giving technical presentations/interfacing with customers and suppliers.
Process controls functionality – valves, actuators, regulators, level controls, etc.
Risk assessment skills and ability to exhibit sound judgment in decisions making
Exhibits good creativity and innovation in design work while keeping project goals in mind.
Knowledge and adherence to export control regulations.
Logical thinking, deductive reasoning and attention to details.
Cause and effect analysis skills
Product evaluation, testing and reporting skills
Solid understanding of engineering mechanics, fluid flow and pneumatics.
FMEA (Failure Modes and Effects Analysis)
Geometric Dimension and Tolerance (GD&T)
Knowledge of quality standards and manufacturing processes.
Ability to work independently and within a team environment with strong organization skill as well as excellent attention to detail.
Proficient with software such as Microsoft Word and Excel, PowerPoint, Oracle and Adobe.
Shows respect, understanding, tact and concern to others; develops and maintains effective relationships with others.
Maintains confidentiality and has high ethical standards.
Demonstrates a personable, positive and enthusiastic attitude
Fosters teamwork and collaboration within and across work groups.
Is open to change and new information; adapts behavior or work methods in response to new information, changing conditions or unexpected obstacles; effectively deals with ambiguity.
Understanding of current process requirements, rules, and procedures.
Education & Experience:
Bachelor's degree in Mechanical Engineering, Master Degree preferred
At least 7 years of related experience in field and with similar control valve products
Proficient experience in 3D/CAD Solid Modeling - CREO
About Norriseal Wellmark
Norriseal Wellmark, a ChampionX company (formerly Apergy), a leading provider of highly engineered equipment and technologies that help companies drill for and produce oil and gas safely and efficiently around the world.
Renowned for innovative design and precision manufacturing, our products are used worldwide in a range of industries, including oil and gas production and transmission, refining, petrochemical/chemical processing, marine, power generation, pulp and paper, food and beverage, high-pressure HVAC, steel manufacturing, and other applications. We market and support our products through a global network of representatives and customer service teams.
Since 1962, customers have turned to Norriseal Wellmark for quality, service and value. We realize that our reputation depends not only on products, but also on the skills and commitment of our people. Norriseal-Wellmark provides a professional work atmosphere with a comprehensive benefits package, including a generous 401(k) plan. If you share our determination for excellence, we welcome you to apply.
Our Commitment
Norriseal Wellmark is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. (Equal Opportunity Employer Posters)
If you have a disability and you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to submit an online application, please email talent.manager@apergy.com or call 713-849-1224. This email and phone number is created exclusively to assist disabled job seekers whose disability prevents them from being able to apply online. Only messages left for this purpose will be returned. Messages left for other purposes, such as following up on an application or technical issues not related to a disability, will not receive a response.
Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
At ChampionX, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.
In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce.
We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles’ Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",84.0
59,chemical+engineer,"Salary: $95k - 125k per year
Reference: 860072

job summary:

We Are seeking a Process Controls Engineer for the Greater Houson, TX. Area.

This is a Direct Hire opportunity with one of the most well known Oil & Gas Companies in the country!
Shift: Days

Pay: $95K -125K
Requirements:

Bachelor's in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering is required
5 + years of engineering experience.
3-5 years control system(DCS) maintenance and configuration experience
Foxboro IA /EVO system experience preferred.

location: Pasadena, Texas
job type: Permanent
salary: $95,000 - 125,000 per year
work hours: 8am to 4pm
education: Bachelors

responsibilities:
performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned. This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes. They are typically responsible for
Managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.
Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.
Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting
Performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.
General control system(DCS) configuration changes needed to optimize plant operations and alarm management.
Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.
Is able to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.
Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.
Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.

qualifications:
Experience level: Experienced
Minimum 5 years of experience
Education: Bachelors (required)

skills:
Process Improvement

Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",85.0
60,chemical+engineer,"About Our Opportunity

AVEVA is a global leader in industrial software, driving digital transformation and sustainability. By connecting the power of information and artificial intelligence with human insight, AVEVA enables teams to use their data to unlock new value. We call this Performance Intelligence. AVEVA’s comprehensive portfolio enables more than 20,000 industrial enterprises to engineer smarter, operate better and drive sustainable efficiency. AVEVA supports customers through a trusted ecosystem that includes 5,500 partners and 5,700 certified developers around the world. The company is headquartered in Cambridge, UK, with over 6,500 employees and 90 offices in over 40 countries. Learn more at www.aveva.com.


We take pride in our core values and the diversity of our people, valuing the unique experience and expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business. At AVEVA, we’re all about Limitless possibilities. Are you?

Optimization Lead Engineer
Location: Houston, TX

Responsibilities:
A Senior Consultant/Engineer is required to join the Services Group to deliver process modeling and optimization solutions to our customers in the global process industries.

This position reports to the Regional Practice Lead on Project basis and primary responsibilities will include:

Execute optimization projects and contribute to the technical success of optimization applications while meeting customer requirements and working within established budgets and timeframes; Interfaces with the Simulation Project Manager and client.Review process drawings and data, configure and test open-equation process models, automate model applications and commission on-line process models.Monitors Project activities, including testing activities, on a broad basis to ensure the Optimization Project is performing its work in compliance with Project Quality Assurance requirements.Develop and maintain expert level knowledge of requirements, features and application of optimization technologies. Make effective and novel use of these technologies.Advice and coach junior engineers to develop ROMeo applications.Participate in client meetings for model reviews and validation.Execute Factory Acceptance and Site Acceptance Test to validate the model with real-time operational data.Commission ROMeo applications at site, connect to plant control system and historian.
Skills & Qualifications:
Bachelors/Masters/PhD in Chemical Engineering with at least 5+ years of industry experience with focus on modeling, control and optimization.High degree of expertise in fundamental modeling of refinery and chemical reactors.Hands on experience with commercial process simulation tools like ROMeo, Aspen-RTO, Pro/II, Hysys, Dynsim.Seeking an individual who will take initiative.Demonstrated ability to evaluate, manage and market, new technologies.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Able to work effectively in a team environment. Be able to liaison between research teams (industrial and academic).Strong attention to details.
AVEVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to being an exemplar employer with an inclusive culture, developing a workplace environment where all our employees are treated with dignity and respect. We value diversity and the expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business.

Come and join AVEVA to create the transformative technology that enables our customers to engineer a better world.

Concerning agencies: AVEVA does not accept unsolicited resumes and will not be responsible for fees related to such.",87.0
61,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",90.0
62,chemical+engineer,"The Work-Study Assistant, under general supervision, will assist the Department of Chemical Engineering with daily operations, research and special projects.
Responsibilities:
Collect and analyze research data for engineering presentations
Request equipment or supplies necessary to complete assigned projects
Assist assigned faculty member with research
Perform route clerical duties
Perform other duties as assigned.
Required Education and Experience:
Presently enrolled at Prairie View A&M University for least nine (9) graduate or six (6) undergraduate semester credit hours during the term in which the work is to be done.
Must be in good academic standing (SAP) as demonstrated through your college; minimum 2.0 GPA
No prior experience necessary
For work eligibility during a summer term, a student must be enrolled for at least six (6) graduate or undergraduate semester credit hours during the term in which the work is to be done or preregistered at least six (6) undergraduate semester hours or nine (9) graduate semester hours for the upcoming fall term.
Preferred Education and Experience:
Chemical Engineering major.
Preferred Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
N/A
Other Requirements:
N/A
Job Posting Close Date:
8/20/2021
Required Attachments:
Please attach all the required documents listed below in the attachment box labeled as either “Resume/CV or Resume/Cover Letter” on the application. Multiple attachments may be included in the “Resume/CV” or Resume/Cover Letter” attachment box. If you do not attach the required documents, you will not be considered for this position. Do not submit your application without these documents attached.
Cover Letter (Optional)
Resume
Detailed Class Schedule
Proof of Work-Study Acceptance
Application Submission Guidelines:
The required documents listed in the above-Required Attachments section must be attached to the application before the job closing date indicated to ensure full consideration for the application submitted. Please contact the Office of Human Resource on or before the closing date stated above at 936-261-1793 or seo@pvamu.edu should you need assistance with the online application process.
All applicants are required to apply via our Career Site on or before the closing date indicated on the job posting. Applicant inquiries received via email and websites such as Indeed, HigherEdJobs, etc. will not be considered unless the individual has applied to the available position via the PVAMU career site.
Background Check Requirements:
All positions are security-sensitive. Applicants are subject to a criminal history investigation, and employment is contingent upon the institution’s verification of credentials and/or other information required by the institution’s procedures, including the completion of the criminal history check.
Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action/Veterans/Disability Employer committed to diversity.",92.0
63,chemical+engineer,"Bachelor’s degree in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering minimum required.25+ years minimum relevant experience in the chemical and petrochemical industries with at least 10 in Ammonia synthesis.Experience in design and operating principles of Steam Methane Reforming upstream of the Ammonia plant is a must.Proven track record in performing technology selection studiesPast experience developing a Request for Proposal to be sent to licensors for the development of a Process Design Package (PDP)Past experience performing a role similar to an owner’s engineer during the development of a PDP and a FEEDExperience in Commissioning/operational Trouble shooting.Travel < 20% expected.Plans individual work to accomplish objectives.Identifies gaps in the design and works to resolve and close them proactively.Communicates effectively across all levels of the organizations.Advises and provides perspectives from a variety of sources internally and externally to solve problems. Works well with others across all levels.Serves as technical resource to projects and estimating.Continuously improves efficiency and performance.Actively seeks feedback from customers and takes action to improve processes.Proactively looks for solutions to improve quality, cost and safety.Reviews and provides input to project schedule.
#LI-ES1
",93.0
64,chemical+engineer,"
Required Qualifications:",95.0
65,chemical+engineer,"Where you fit in?
The Hydrocarbon Economist is an individual contributor role and a member of a pool of Economists that collectively focus on Crude and Feedstocks, Refinery, Products related economics and optimizations in the short medium and long term. Economists are part of the Business Management department and work closely with the Schedulers, Production, Logistics, Technology the Laboratory, as well as commercial contacts in Shell Trading & Supply, Shell Chemicals, PMI and other third parties
What’s the role?
The Hydrocarbon Economist will support the Deer Park (DPK) Refinery ensuring the DPK site is optimized in the short, medium and longer term. The Economist will play an active role in medium- and longer-term planning of the Refinery and in the economic variance analysis of business performance. The Economist plays a key role in support of management of the Refining economic steers, with significant opportunity for stakeholder management both internal and external to the Refinery.
The Economist manages the integrated profit and loss associated with the refinery production activity at the Deer Park Refinery. This role provides economic steer, works to maximize margin, and manages all hydrocarbon commercial relationships with respect to assigned product streams. The Economist manages the delivery of robust commercial strategies and the end-to-end optimal refinery production plan with a key objective of driving improvements in margin tactics, in the operational (day/week) and tactical time-frames (1 to 6 months).
Key accountabilities and responsibilities of the Economist are:
Negotiates, manages and provides assurance for contracts related to the assigned product streams. Acts as primary interface with Shell Trading and external counterparties on these products. Supports the contract negotiations of intra-site purchases and sales with Shell Chemical.
Act as the primary interface with Shell Trading & Supply and other internal and external counterparties to maximize business opportunities and minimize losses from operational problems, including inventory management.
Support broader Business Management in the development and optimization of the weekly and monthly refinery operating plan as well as the annual business plan. Leads coordination of the plan with partners (internal and external) relating to the assigned product streams.
Support planning of shutdowns and turnarounds to minimize economic and customer impact, seeking optimization opportunities working closely with partners.
Evaluate economics and sensitivities associated with various medium- and longer-term margin options for the Deer Park Refinery as well as assessments of projects as it relates to site investments/decisions
Determine the margin plan as part of the Deer Park Refinery Business Planning process
Identify and develop ideas/project justifications to improve profitability, customer satisfaction, reliability and product quality. Strongly consider how these improvements may impact other areas. Participate in and provide support to project teams that involve products of responsibility.
Leads product quality improvement initiatives, including giveaway reduction, release procedure development and investigations (working closely with the Product Quality Focal Point).
Leads the Deer Park Site Systems Teams, where applicable, including driving short term optimization as well as longer term opportunity identification and implementation.
Has assurance responsibility for all assigned streams’ pricing correctly flowing through financials.
Supports margin variance analysis (MVA) by comparing plans to actual performance.
Ensures compliance with all relevant product regulations, including compiling and filing quarterly and annual EPA reports.
Support the Contracts Coordinators (hydrocarbon and non-hydrocarbon) with Economic assessments in relation to various contracts with Shell and other 3rd parties.
Promotes win-win relationships with service providers, affiliates and customers (including Economics and Scheduling, Business Development, Operations, Technology, Shell Trading & Supply, Shell Chemicals, PMI and 3rd parties).
Teams:
Ad-hoc member of Integrated Business Development Team
Business representative of relevant area Production Team Focus & Finish Cash Optimization
Special Challenges:
Manage relationships with service providers, affiliates, customers, and internal stakeholders with sometimes differing objectives and priorities
Willing to backfill other roles, demonstrating a learner’s mindset, with an ability to work as part of a multi-disciplinary team in an ever-changing and fast-paced environment.
The job requires energy, creativity, flexibility, and adaptability to changing priorities and business conditions.
Understanding concepts of risk vs reward and dealing with uncertainty will be essential in delivering via this role and in Business Management
Skills & Requirements
What we need from you -
Must have legal authorization to work in the US on a full-time basis for anyone other than current employer.
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering; Chemical Engineering preferred – MBA a plus.
Minimum of five (5) years experience in chemical plant or refinery with knowledge of hydrocarbon management
Process Engineering experience preferred
Some knowledge/experience with refinery configurations, processes, and refinery economics
Understanding of Oil markets
Technical Competencies Required:
Some tactical hydrocarbon planning
Refinery optimization
Awareness of a Linear Program (LP) & understanding/interpreting model output
Supply Chain Economics & Analysis
Awareness of Supply Chain Integration & Optimization
Awareness of Oil Movements & Product Handling
Awareness of Tactical Supply Chain Planning
Product and Product Quality Management
Leadership and Other Competencies Required:
Demonstrates knowledge or skill in all Leadership Attributes (Authenticity, Growth, Collaboration, Performance)
Strong business acumen and commercial skills
Strong stakeholder management
Strong negotiating skills
Strong interpersonal skills
Strong written, verbal and presentations skills
Strategic Thinking
Company description
Shell is a global group of energy and petrochemical companies with about 84,000 employees across more than 70 countries. We aim to meet the world’s growing need for more and cleaner energy solutions in ways that are economically, environmentally and socially responsible. We have expertise in exploration, production, refining and marketing of oil and natural gas, and the manufacturing and marketing of chemicals.
As a global energy company operating in a challenging world, we set high standards of performance and ethical behaviors. We are judged by how we act and how we live up to our core values of honesty, integrity and respect for people. Our Business Principles are based on these. They promote trust, openness, teamwork and professionalism, as well as pride in what we do and how we conduct business.
Building on our core values, we aspire to sustain a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels respected and valued, from our employees to our customers and partners. A diverse workforce and an inclusive work environment are vital to our success, leading to greater innovation and better energy solutions.
An innovative place to work
There’s never been a more exciting time to work at Shell. Everyone here is helping solve one of the biggest challenges facing the world today: bringing the benefits of energy to everyone on the planet, whilst managing the risks of climate change.
Join us and you’ll add your talent and imagination to a business with the power to shape the future – whether by investing in renewables, exploring new ways to store energy or developing technology that helps the world to use energy more efficiently.
A rewarding place to work
Combine our creative, collaborative environment and global operations with an impressive range of benefits and joining Shell becomes an inspired career choice.
We’re huge advocates for career development. We’ll encourage you to try new roles and experience new settings. By pushing people to reach their potential, we frequently help them find skills they never knew they had, or make career moves they never thought possible.
Shell Oil Company, a subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell plc, has reached an agreement for the sale of its interest in Deer Park Refining Limited Partnership, a 50-50 joint venture between Shell Oil Company and P.M.I. Norteamerica, S.A. De C.V. (a subsidiary of Petroleos Mexicanos, or Pemex). The transaction will transfer Shell’s interest in the partnership, and therefore full ownership of the refinery, to Pemex, subject
to regulatory approvals. Employees assigned to the Refinery assets in scope for divestment will be offered employment by Pemex with effect upon closing in accordance with the transaction. The transaction is expected to close in Q4 2021.
",96.0
66,chemical+engineer,"We are actively seeking a Project Manager who is a highly motivated leader to join our Chemical team. The successful candidate must have extensive experience in executing projects for the Consumer, Agricultural, Specialty or Petrochemical industries with the highest level of quality, cost effectiveness, and a focus on safety.
Responsibilities
Responsibilities include all aspects of client relationship development and project execution including proposal development and presentation, management of project resources, project budgets and forecasting, schedule management, project engineering, integration, installation, start-up and project closure.
The work will be varied and may include conceptual studies, detailed design, field installation, or construction support for projects ranging from small capital or maintenance projects to full EPC capital projects.
The candidate must excel at being able to communicate across a multi-office, multi-disciplinary team and will have ultimate responsibility for successful execution of the project to meet the technical and commercial goals.
Maintaining and growing solid client relationships is a key responsibility. Successful Design Group Project Managers have leadership skills and experience with a drive to grow and expand local and regional clients.
Requirements
15+ years of project management experience in executing projects for the petrochemical / chemical industries.
Highly motivated leader with varied experience managing projects of different sizes and types.
Requires strong engineering skills and demonstrated success with the highest level of quality, cost effectiveness, and focus on safety.
Awareness of engineering best practices and standards applicable to the Chemical industry required.
Technical background in facility / unit operations and design is essential to be able to recognize and address technical deficiencies before they result in risk to the project, client, or company.
Technical background and PSM proficiency is strongly preferred.
Strong analytical skills, and a sound understanding of project management fundamentals – scheduling resources, managing and forecasting costs.
Experience with Client development, consulting and experience in the preparation of proposals for engineering services are highly desirable.
Excellent communication and presentation skills as well as a professional demeanor are essential. This position must communicate effectively with Clients, Vendors, Contractors and other Design Group employees at all levels of responsibility.
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education
B.S. in Mechanical Engineering or Chemical Engineering is preferred but consideration will be given to other degrees based on actual project experience.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",97.0
67,chemical+engineer,"The AECOM Houston office, Water and Wastewater Group, is seeking a Project Manager responsible for the planning, design and construction phases of public works projects in southeast Texas. The ideal candidate for this position will be responsible for the following duties:


Technical lead for multi-disciplinary teams to undertake water and wastewater treatment and pumping projects.
Direct and manage the implementation of the project including coordination with project stakeholders, consultants, contractors and other external and internal parties to achieve project milestones.
Prepare technical memoranda, planning studies and final design calculations, plans and specifications;
Manage project deliverable, budgets, schedules. Ensure compliance with the company’s Quality Assurance policies and procedures.
Oversee and manage construction phases of projects to ensure works are completed in accordance with the contract documents, on time and budget;
Ensure project work is undertaken in accordance with corporate health and safety policies and quality management systems;
Prepare proposals and qualification documents in the interest of obtaining new assignments
Maintain client relationships; assist in identification and pursuit of business development opportunities

About AECOM

At AECOM, we believe infrastructure creates opportunity for everyone. Whether it’s improving your commute, keeping the lights on, providing access to clean water or transforming skylines, our work helps people and communities thrive.

We take on the most complex challenges and pioneer innovative, iconic solutions that push the limits of what’s possible – the world’s longest cable-stayed bridge, record-breaking sports events, the largest greenfield port development mega project, life-sustainingand disaster recovery programs, and the tallest tower in the Western Hemisphere.

On projects spanning transportation, buildings, water, governments, energy and the environment, we deliver professional services throughout the project lifecycle.

We are proud to be recognized for excellence:
+ _Fortune_ ’s World’s Most Admired Companies – 2014-2020

+ \#1 in Transportation and General Building in _Engineering-News Record_ 's 2019 “Top 500 Design Firms” and #1 2019 “Top 200 Environmental Firms”

+ VIQTORY 2020 Military Friendly® Gold Employer

+ DCSA—Water

+ With more than 3,200 Water professionals in all major markets throughout the United States and Canada, AECOM’s Water business line leverages nearly a century of local, national and international project experience to provide today’s municipalities, industries and governments with cost-effective solutions to their Water challenges. We deliver our services—from environmental planning studies to detailed design, construction management, and operations and maintenance—to a wide range of public and private sector clients. Our public sector work encompasses everything from small rural communities, to large urban centers, to agencies with regional responsibilities. Our private sector work includes assignments for multiple commercial/industrial sectors, including oil and gas, chemicals, power, food and beverage, manufacturing and pharmaceuticals.https://aecom.com/markets/water/

Minimum Requirements

BA/BS and 8 years of relevant experience or equivalency of education and experience

Preferred Qualifications

MS Civil or Chemical Engineering

15 Years of experience

5 years of Process experience

Experience in group management

Experience in business Development

What We Offer

When you join AECOM, you become part of a company that is pioneering the future. Our teams around the world are involved in some of the most cutting-edge and innovative projects and programs of our time, addressing the big challenges of today and shaping the built environment for generations to come. We ensure a workplace that encourages growth, flexibility and creativity, as well as a company culture that champions inclusion, diversity and overall employee well-being through programs supported by company leadership. Our core values define who we are, how we act and what we aspire to, which comes down to not only delivering a better world, but working to “make amazing happen” in each neighborhood, community and city we touch. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we believe in each person’s potential, and we’ll help you reach yours.",98.0
68,chemical+engineer,"AECOM has an opportunity for an MIS / EHS Project Manager . AECOM offers the freedom and flexibility to work remotely and/or be located at one of a variety of offices within the United States.

The responsibilities of this position include, but may not be limited to, the following:

+ Experience in managing EHS Management Information System projects (e.g., working with client IT and business entities, software partners and the project team)

+ Develops and manages the schedule, budget, and risk registry.

+ Solves medium to highly technical, complex problems on multiple projects, and provides consultative support to internal staff.

+ Assists with the transfer of knowledge of technical skills.

+ Project could range from medium to high complexity.

+ Viewed as a subject matter expert within the organization.

+ Acts as a mentor to less senior MIS/EHS MIS staff.

+ Serves as the lead on proposal writing

About AECOM

At AECOM, we believe infrastructure creates opportunity for everyone. Whether it’s improving your commute, keeping the lights on, providing access to clean water, or transforming skylines, our work helps people and communities thrive. We take on the most complex challenges and pioneer innovative, iconic solutions that push the limits of what’s possible – the world’s longest cable-stayed bridge, record-breaking sports events, the largest greenfield port development mega project, life-sustaining disaster recovery programs, and the tallest tower in the Western Hemisphere. On projects spanning transportation, buildings, water, energy, and the environment, we deliver professional services throughout the project lifecycle.

We are proud to be recognized for excellence:
+ Named one of Fortune magazine's ""World's Most Admired Companies"" for the sixth consecutive year

+ Ranked #1 in Engineering News-Record’s 2020 “Top 200 Environmental Firms”

+ Ranked #1 in Transportation and General Building in Engineering News-Record’s 2020 “Top 500 Design Firms”

+ VIQTORY 2020 Military Friendly® Gold Employer

DCS—Environment

AECOM is the leading, worldwide environmental services provider to industry and government — delivering sustainable energy and environmental solutions to meet compliance, business and operational needs. Our advisory and technical staff deliver specialized solutions to unusual and complex problems facing client projects across the full business life cycle — from asset planning, development and operations, to product integration and facility compliance, to site remediation, restoration, sustainability and reuse, and holistic strategies that improve and modernize next generation energy infrastructure. Our solutions balance complex technical, regulatory, business and stakeholder issues to produce measurable value and cost-saving approaches for our clients

Our services are delivered by 7,400 responsive environmental professionals around the world. Our global staff has in-depth knowledge of local and regional requirements and broad technical expertise in 60 disciplines. We work together across our global network to bring the best resources, skills, and efficiencies to our projects.

Minimum Requirements

+ BA/BS degree and 8+ years of relevant MIS/EHS experience or demonstrated equivalency of experience and/or education

+ Demonstrated experience with MIS/EHS software applications such as Enablon, Intelex, Cority, Sphera Solutions, etc.

+ MIS/EHS Project Management experience

+ Ability to travel to client meetings up to 20% within the United States, possibly for up to a week at a time

+ Valid US Driver's License is required

+ A pre-employment motor vehicle driving record verification will be conducted

+ Due to the nature of the work, US Citizenship is required

Preferred Qualifications

+ BS degree in Environmental Science, Environmental Engineering, Chemical Engineering, or a related field

+ Project Management Certification (PMP or similar) highly desired

+ Business Analyst Experience and/or Certification

+ Business Development/Client care experience

+ Knowledge of Agile and Waterfall methodologies

+ Experience with MS SharePoint, MS Visio, and MS Projects

What We Offer

When you join AECOM, you become part of a company that is pioneering the future. Our teams around the world are involved in some of the most cutting-edge and innovative projects and programs of our time, addressing the big challenges of today and shaping the built environment for generations to come. We ensure a workplace that encourages growth, flexibility and creativity, as well as a company culture that champions inclusion, diversity and overall employee well-being through programs supported by company leadership. Our core values define who we are, how we act and what we aspire to, which comes down to not only delivering a better world, but working to “make amazing happen” in each neighborhood, community and city we touch. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we believe in each person’s potential, and we’ll help you reach yours.",99.0
69,chemical+engineer,"We are currently looking for a dynamic individual as a Sr. Corporate Process Safety Engineer II/ Sr Staff Process Safety Engineer for our EHS Division at our Advanced Technology Center located in The Woodlands, TX.
This position will provide technical support for the Global Process Safety Center of Excellence on specific project activities to impact the advancement of the Global Process Safety Division Support Plan, Governance, and Programs. This requires a self-starting, degreed Engineer knowledgeable of Process Safety (PS) concepts, 15+ years of Process Safety core functions including but not limited to PHAs, HazOPs, LOPA, Safety Integrity Level (SIL) Target assessment, Facility Siting, Dispersion and release analysis modeling, Incident Investigation leadership, experience and demonstrated industry leadership, including CCPS and International published articles and seminar presentations.
Description of Position Duties:
· Leadership – An exciting opportunity in leading / directing groups of PS subject matter experts, interacting at all levels of both EHS and manufacturing organizations to influence change, and promote PS as a core organizational expectation. The successful individual will help define a vision for the PS organization, strengthening existing programs to achieve their full capability, and participate as an internal and industry resource in PS profession. Effective engagement in PHA / SIL Target assessment in a broad range of PS study types with a proven level of effectiveness in mentoring others is expected, including At least 5 years of prior experience mentoring others to an experienced or expert skill level in a limited range of PS study types.
· Process Safety – Advanced, innovative, critical thinking individual, delivering improvement of Corporate PS programs/procedures & management systems. This requires full engagement with EHS/Engineering professionals throughout the Huntsman businesses on a global basis, including contract professionals. Requires 12+ years of confirmed experience delivering site and corporate programs, procedures, and related guidance of technical and non-technical PS elements. Electrical Area Classification and Static Ignition system review, evaluator, program guidance capability is preferable.
Communications – Proven communication skills, both written and verbal in English are mandatory; additional languages are desirable. Effectively, persuasively engage with all organization and manufacturing levels is expected. Formal / informal to progress SIL/SIF life cycle principles is critical. Also involves 12+ years’ experience collecting, analyzing, presenting technical data and providing recommendations for improvements is vital. Presents PS topics to internal and external technical advisory committees and influences outcome(s).
SIF Design – Effective program management should include best practices in accordance with current industry practices and trends, including a working knowledge and practitioner of IEC 61511. Assist facilities as needed in applying SIL target assessments, design verification of Safety Instrumented Functional systems, EHS Criticality Assessments, Alarm Management, and Process Safety Lifecycle. Knowledgeable in SIF Design/Maintenance/Proof Testing technology and concepts is a plus.
Implementation – Assist facilities as needed with the implementation of PS programs and management systems. This will involve development of implementation plans / schedules. Develop and implement communication plans with facilities. Scheduling / conducting the implementation and reporting PS performance. Provide a direct role in delivering guidance and facility program deployment, including integration of recent acquisitions in a fast-paced, growth agenda.
Training – Develop and conduct PS training courses. Clear oral / written communication / presentation skills will be a critical success element. Also, skills in developing training objectives, building training materials (including assessment / feedback criteria) will be critical. Identify and document training needs for PS new/revised programs, including target audience, desired competency level (defined knowledge/skills), training format (CBT, presentation material instruction), trainer identification, trainer competency needs, post-training competency assessments, and training record maintenance expectations. At least 8 years of prior experience in the development and leading of a wide range of PS related training topics.
PS Performance Monitoring – Responsible for monitoring of corporate PS performance indicators (KPIs). Data analytics skills are needed to assess performance, identify improvements, and develop improvement plans.
Process Safety Audit Protocols – Support development, maintenance and professional use of PS audit protocols (globally).
EHS Auditing - Serve on Process Safety audit teams, both domestically and internationally, in order to provide: (1) familiarity with Huntsman operations, (2) awareness of legislative/regulatory developments with business impacts, and (3) conformance with Huntsman EHS Protection Policy and (4) compliance to regional applicable regulations.
Additionally, may be requested to assist in: (1) conducting opening and closing presentations, (2) peer reviewing the final audit report.(3) Review facility audit action plans and verify closure of action plans, as applicable.
Incident Investigation – As requested, lead and/or participate in PS related incident investigations. This will involve: 1) gathering critical, factual, evidence / data, 2) interviewing witness(es) and knowledgeable personnel, 3) leading an investigation team through investigation techniques, 4) determining incident root causes, 5) identifying corrective measures to prevent recurrences, 6) developing formal reports and deliberate, focused presentations for senior management, 7) communicating lessons learned across the organization, and 7) assisting with implementation of corrective measures, as applicable.
At least 8 years of prior experience leading PS incident investigations using Apollo (or similar methodologies) and HFACs (Human Factors Analysis and Classification) including high potential PS events; at least 5 years of prior experience training and mentoring others in simple investigatory methods; at least 2 years assisting or leading PS Leadership, Cultural, and Organizational Effectiveness assessments.
Industry Knowledge – Participate in Industrial Committees on Huntsman’s behalf to gain knowledge and drive industrial practices/trends. Participate in bench-marking efforts, integrate knowledge into Huntsman’s active PS continuous improvement process and provide industry leadership in setting industry standards and performance criteria.
At least 10 years of prior experience collecting, analyzing, and presenting technical data and providing recommendations for improvements and presents on PS topics to senior leadership and advisory groups and influences outcome(s).
Qualifications for the ideal candidate?
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering – Chemical preferred - with 15+ years minimum experience in Process Safety
Proficient in all core elements of Process Safety and have the related computer skills, process safety system life cycle management
Must be willing and able to travel (approximately 40-60%), both domestic and international
Confirmed experience delivering site and corporate programs, procedures, and related guidance of technical and non-technical PS elements is required
EHS auditing experience is required
Communicates tactfully and effectively both verbally and in writing and maintains effective work relations with those encountered during assignment at HATC
Flexibility and adaptability to dynamic organizational priorities is critical for job success
What can we offer you?
Huntsman offers unsurpassed opportunities to build a successful future. Our diverse portfolio creates a range of career fields including manufacturing, research and development, technical services, sales and marketing, customer service – and the list goes on.


Here, you can make an impact and make a difference. Come join us!
Huntsman is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all qualified applicants for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, gender identification, sexual orientation and/or expression or any other characteristic protected by law in every location in which we have facilities national or local.

P lease refer to https://www.huntsman.com/privacy/online-privacy-notice for Company’s Data Privacy and Protection information.
All unsolicited resumes presented by recruitment agencies are treated as pro bono information or service.
Huntsman is aware of a scam involving fraudulent job offers . Huntsman does not make job offers until after a candidate has submitted a job application and has participated in a face-to-face interview. Please be advised that emails from Huntsman always end in “@huntsman.com” and that any job offer that requires payment or requires you to deposit a check is likely a scam. If you have questions about any open positions at Huntsman, please visit our Careers website at http://www.huntsman.com/corporate/a/Careers .
LI
~IND123",100.0
70,chemical+engineer,"Our Lonza site in Houston is seeking a Manufacturing Science and Technology Senior Scientist. As a member of the MSAT Team (Manufacturing Science and Technology), you are responsible for the successful transfer of processes into production. As such, you are in direct contact with our clients and Research & Development scientists. You ensure process scalability and manufacturability. You are the person in charge for process integration related aspects during campaign preparation and you are responsible for process supervision and reporting during and after production campaigns. In addition, you will coordinate all process relevant major deviations and process adaptations and you are responsible for continuous improvement of the manufacturing processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Functional Lead for Process Technology Transfer:
The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will be responsible for the successful transfer of Upstream Viral Vector Processes into GMP production. The incumbent will collaborate with cross-functional teams including Process Development (PD), Manufacturing, Quality Assurance, Supply Chain, and Program Management among others to ensure on time delivery of Technology Transfer activities. The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will also represent Lonza at client facing meetings and provide guidance and support to junior team members on MSAT activities.
Technical Upstream Subject Matter Expert (SME):
The incumbent will act as Upstream SME within the MSAT team as well as for other Lonza teams. The activities include but are not limited to, performing process fit-to-plant, and Failure Modes and Effects Analysis (FMEA)-based risk assessment, equipment characterization and scale-up, characterizing and scaling-up equipment, authoring and reviewing Process Flow Diagrams, Bill of Materials, and reviewing and approving Production Batch records. The incumbent will provide technical support to GMP execution of the new processes and critical unit operations and lead/support Deviation Investigations, Corrective Action Prevention Plans (CAPAs), and Change Controls.
Data Management:
The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will perform detailed review of processes from Clients and PD of various operational parameters. The incumbent will generate Technology Transfer documents (e.g. protocols, reports, process summary), perform process monitoring (manufacturing data analysis, summary, and presentation), author campaign summary reports and recommends improvements for MSAT practices and procedures.
Key Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree required in a field of study such as Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnology, or other life science fields.
Master of Science or PhD in Chemical Engineering or other life sciences is preferred.
Substantial work experience in suspension cell culture, scale-up and bioreactor operation (e.g. Ambr, Thermo, Applikon, WAVE, etc), perfusion, Tangential Flow Filtration (TFF) for Ultrafiltration/Diafiltration (UF/DF).
Experience with Biologics Process Development, Technology Transfer, MSAT and/or Manufacturing is preferred.
Work experience in viral vector gene therapy product/process development and/or manufacturing is desired.
Knowledge of CMC regulations, and international guidelines including but not limited to Federal Drug Administration (FDA) is desired.
Every day, Lonza’s products and services have a positive impact on millions of people. For us, this is not only a great privilege, but also a great responsibility. How we achieve our business results is just as important as the achievements themselves. At Lonza, we respect and protect our people and our environment. Any success we achieve is no success at all if not achieved ethically.
People come to Lonza for the challenge and creativity of solving complex problems and developing new ideas in life sciences. In return, we offer the satisfaction that comes with improving lives all around the world. The satisfaction that comes with making a meaningful difference.
Lonza is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a qualified individual with disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",101.0
71,chemical+engineer,"Our Lonza site in Houston is seeking a Manufacturing Science and Technology Senior Scientist. As a member of the MSAT Team (Manufacturing Science and Technology), you are responsible for the successful transfer of processes into production. As such, you are in direct contact with our clients and Research & Development scientists. You ensure process scalability and manufacturability. You are the person in charge for process integration related aspects during campaign preparation and you are responsible for process supervision and reporting during and after production campaigns. In addition, you will coordinate all process relevant major deviations and process adaptations and you are responsible for continuous improvement of the manufacturing processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Functional Lead for Process Technology Transfer:
The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will be responsible for the successful transfer of Upstream Viral Vector Processes into GMP production. The incumbent will collaborate with cross-functional teams including Process Development (PD), Manufacturing, Quality Assurance, Supply Chain, and Program Management among others to ensure on time delivery of Technology Transfer activities. The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will also represent Lonza at client facing meetings and provide guidance and support to junior team members on MSAT activities.
Technical Upstream Subject Matter Expert (SME):
The incumbent will act as Upstream SME within the MSAT team as well as for other Lonza teams. The activities include but are not limited to, performing process fit-to-plant, and Failure Modes and Effects Analysis (FMEA)-based risk assessment, equipment characterization and scale-up, characterizing and scaling-up equipment, authoring and reviewing Process Flow Diagrams, Bill of Materials, and reviewing and approving Production Batch records. The incumbent will provide technical support to GMP execution of the new processes and critical unit operations and lead/support Deviation Investigations, Corrective Action Prevention Plans (CAPAs), and Change Controls.
Data Management:
The MSAT Upstream Sr. Scientist will perform detailed review of processes from Clients and PD of various operational parameters. The incumbent will generate Technology Transfer documents (e.g. protocols, reports, process summary), perform process monitoring (manufacturing data analysis, summary, and presentation), author campaign summary reports and recommends improvements for MSAT practices and procedures.
Key Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree required in a field of study such as Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnology, or other life science fields.
Master of Science or PhD in Chemical Engineering or other life sciences is preferred.
Substantial work experience in suspension cell culture, scale-up and bioreactor operation (e.g. Ambr, Thermo, Applikon, WAVE, etc), perfusion, Tangential Flow Filtration (TFF) for Ultrafiltration/Diafiltration (UF/DF).
Experience with Biologics Process Development, Technology Transfer, MSAT and/or Manufacturing is preferred.
Work experience in viral vector gene therapy product/process development and/or manufacturing is desired.
Knowledge of CMC regulations, and international guidelines including but not limited to Federal Drug Administration (FDA) is desired.
Every day, Lonza’s products and services have a positive impact on millions of people. For us, this is not only a great privilege, but also a great responsibility. How we achieve our business results is just as important as the achievements themselves. At Lonza, we respect and protect our people and our environment. Any success we achieve is no success at all if not achieved ethically.
People come to Lonza for the challenge and creativity of solving complex problems and developing new ideas in life sciences. In return, we offer the satisfaction that comes with improving lives all around the world. The satisfaction that comes with making a meaningful difference.
Lonza is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a qualified individual with disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",102.0
72,chemical+engineer,"Fluence Analytics is a New Orleans and Houston based startup company that delivers patented measurement products, data analytics, and automation technologies in the $1 trillion per year polymer industry and the $160 billion per year biopharma industry. Our core technologies measurably and reliably impact our customers production efficiency, R&D, safety, and profitability.
The successful field application engineer has worked on field installations, startups and commissioning of instrumentation, analyzers or other complex equipment in industrial environments. This individual is highly motivated, an intuitive hands-on troubleshooter, and is willing to go above and beyond to get things done. Experience working with customers in high pressure situations and ability to quickly solve unexpected issues is very important. Background in either instrumentation, mechanical engineering, chemical engineering, chemistry, automation and control systems engineering are additional potential attributes of our ideal candidate. This position, working at a fast paced startup, is ideal for a self motivated individual looking for a challenge, a lot of responsibility, autonomy and willing and able to pitch in where they are needed.
What you will get to do:
FIELD ENGINEERING - Offsite, hands-on field installation, startup, troubleshooting, commissioning, service and support of company products for permanent or trial projects. Could require extended (up to 75%) travel domestically and internationally.
DOCUMENTATION AND PROJECT ENGINEERING - Works closely with engineering and manufacturing team to plan the execution of builds, installations and startups with customers. Also works closely with customer and/or their engineering contractors during pre-installation all the way through ongoing customer service and support. Documents all aspects of work.
CUSTOMER SUPPORT AND DATA REVIEW - Remote and offsite customer support for preventative maintenance, troubleshooting, customer personnel training, etc. Review sensor and instrument data. Documentation of all data, performance or customer issues. Work with the team on training and/or design solutions to problems from field experience.
ASSEMBLY, TESTING AND CERTIFICATION - When onsite, works on assembly of analyzer systems, quality control and factory acceptance testing. Coordinates & prepares test documentation and certifications to validate functionality and performance for customers.
PRODUCT ENGINEERING - When onsite, works with engineering team to provide feedback on system performance in the field, encountered issues, participate in design reviews, support R&D and testing.
Requirements
5+ years' work experience in field engineering or application engineering roles. Ideally in petrochemical or related industrial applications working in field installation, startup and commissioning of process instrumentation, analyzers or other equipment.
B.S. in mechanical engineering, electrical, chemical engineering, chemistry or very closely related technical discipline with direct experience in fluidic systems, instrumentation and/or analyzers.
High mechanical, hands-on aptitude for fluidic, instrumentation and/or analyzer equipment with demonstrated success working with these.
Strong analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Ability to work in a team environment on multiple projects simultaneously.
Previous roles working in or serving process industries or similar industrial manufacturing environments.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Very good at interacting with a team and with external stakeholders and customers.
Self motivated, organized, diligent and capable of doing whatever it takes to complete projects, interact successfully with customers and demonstrate value of our products.
Experience working with contractors and vendors utilizing clearly defined requirements.
Your bonus qualifications – a couple of these are a plus but not required!
5-10+ years in field or application engineering roles. Ideally in petrochemical or related applications working in field installation, startup and commissioning of process instrumentation, analyzers or other equipment.
Knowledge of polymer applications and chemistry.
Experience or general understanding of industrial automation e.g. PLCs.
Previous experience with sampling systems.
Benefits
Salary commensurate with experience
Stock options will be offered
Health, dental and vision benefits
FSA
401K
Paid Time Off (Vacation and Holidays)",104.0
73,chemical+engineer,"Today, Lonza is a global leader in life sciences operating across three continents. While we work in science, there’s no magic formula to how we do it. Our greatest scientific solution is talented people working together, devising ideas that help businesses to help people. In exchange, we let our people own their careers. Their ideas, big and small, genuinely improve the world. And that’s the kind of work we want to be part of.
The Bioprocessing Scientist will work hands-on in a high-performing, cross-functional team with the goal of developing and transferring scalable processes from clients to Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP) for the manufacture of viral gene therapy products. Team member will be responsible developing and authoring experimental study plans and reports, executing experimental studies, analyzing data, supporting the execution of manufacturing activities (including Process Description and Block Flow documents) and providing additional support to other departments as required (Quality Assurance, Quality Control, Program Management) with minimal supervision.
Key responsibilities:
Planning and performing tech transfer experiments in Process Development (PD) lab related to viral vector process development, optimization tech transfer and problem-solving; using stirred-tank bioreactors and chromatography skid up to pilot scale. May require moderate support of Senior scientist.
Scrutinizes processes for improvement and scalability, and utilizes background and expertise in upstream production, harvest, recovery, and chromatography and formulation technologies to establish and optimize new processes for incorporation into viral product manufacturing.
Responsible for compiling and analyzing data from Process Development, troubleshooting and historical processes, and summarizing in high-quality reports, supported with accurate and up to date records, including appropriate lab notebook annotations.
Designs and executes experiments with minimal supervision, including data analysis and communication. Interprets results and proposes next steps to manager.
Helps to create and revise task orders for contractual relationships and new client development.
Capable of achieving deliverables in a timely fashion, and clearly communicating results to clients and cross-functional teams.
Expected to evaluate and recommend new technologies to enhance efficiencies of processes and scale, where applicable.
Serve as project-lead for client-specific upstream process development and process tech transfer, from client to Process development group and from PD to Production group.
Ability to manage and prioritize several projects in parallel is key.
Expected to tackle complex problems where analysis of technical data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors. Ensures schedules, and performance requirements are met.
Key requirements:
BS degree in biosciences, engineering or related discipline plus 5 years of related bioprocess experience in an FDA-regulated environment; or MS degree and 2-4 years of experience.
Must have thorough knowledge of cGMP requirements and facilities
Hands-on expertise with scalable bio-production platforms with direct experience of bioreactors, depth filtration/clarification, ultrafiltration/diafiltration) and chromatography technologies
Must possess good mathematics, engineering, statistical analysis and good documentation skills.
Demonstrated skills in problem-solving and proposing solutions
Formal tech transfer experience in developing new processes, scaling processes, and transferring processes into operations is a must. Working knowledge of closed and single use systems highly desirable.
Demonstrated ability to prioritize projects and manage time including the ability to meet deadlines as set by supervisor
Must possess proven excellent written and oral communication skills including prior successful experiences in technical writing;
Independent work skills; strong work ethic; delegating skills; ability to perform in a team setting essential for this key position
Able to work in cross-functional project teams in a highly matrixed fast-paced clinical grade manufacturing organization.
Every day, Lonza’s products and services have a positive impact on millions of people. For us, this is not only a great privilege, but also a great responsibility. How we achieve our business results is just as important as the achievements themselves. At Lonza, we respect and protect our people and our environment. Any success we achieve is no success at all if not achieved ethically.
People come to Lonza for the challenge and creativity of solving complex problems and developing new ideas in life sciences. In return, we offer the satisfaction that comes with improving lives all around the world. The satisfaction that comes with making a meaningful difference.
Lonza is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a qualified individual with disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",105.0
74,chemical+engineer,"Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity",107.0
75,chemical+engineer,"SUMMARY: The DCS Engineer is responsible for assisting the Site DCS/Systems Manager in overseeing DCS/Systems resources for the site (DCS, historians, PLCs).Key Responsibilities include:Perform programming and troubleshooting of assigned DCS/Systems as needed.Propose modifications to DCS/Systems equipment that improve plant performance, safety, or reliability, and reduce costs.Develop scope and design of DCS/Systems capital projects and oversee engineering commissioning and startup, assuring on-time completion.Support the Digital Transformation initiative by proposing projects, developing scope and risk/benefit analysis, and performing cost and ROI estimates.Perform regular system health monitoring checks, including server and workstation hardware integrity, fault LED’s, communications integrity, available memory, time sync, cabinet internals (dust removal), monitor display quality, etc.Work with unit process engineers and DCS Manager to develop and maintain DCS interlock lists, DCS training manuals, sequence flowcharts, and How-To documents.Assist units in maintenance of DCS/Systems and assist in hardware and software changes as necessaryMonitor and address DCS alarms, update alarm surveys, propose fixes, and work with unit engineers to execute action items.Develop and maintain a Master Alarm Data Base for all units in accordance with the ISA 18.2 Alarm Management standard.Keep up to date in training for system software updates and revisions, and revise training manuals as necessary.Monitor DCS system alarms (including Windows event logs) and system performance, and work with system TAC to resolve issues quickly to maintain system reliability.Assist DCS/Systems Manager in configuring and maintaining the Pi system, adding/modifying tags and users, adding notifications, troubleshooting issues with Pi, and monitoring system health.Review event summaries and monitor logs for DCS manual interventions, and assist unit process engineers in developing DCS solutions to eliminate the interventions if needed.Provide DCS training for engineers and board operators.Review and audit DCS MOC’s for accuracy, assist engineers in simulations, and double check programming changes.Assist the DCS manager in the development of OT cybersecurity policies, procedures, training, and training logs.Monitor antivirus scans for unwanted files or potential intrusions, and perform audits of USB ports and GPO enforcement.Apply operating system security patch updates and antivirus software definition file updates in a timely manner.Perform regular system backups (or monitor automated backups), including trends, event summaries, batch data, and hard drive images, and become proficient in restoring related files as needed.Develop and maintain KPI’s, dashboards, statistics, and other metrics to keep DCS Manager informed on DCS system health and performance.Job Type: Full-timePay: $68,000.00 - $120,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offSchedule:12 hour shiftAbility to commute/relocate:Pasadena, TX 77507: Reliably commute or planning to relocate before starting work (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:DCS programming in a chemical process: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",108.0
76,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a MSAT Scientist or Engineer that is open to relocating to the Portsmouth, NH area. A generous relocation package would be provided. The salary is $65-180k depending on experience, with full benefits.As a Scientist/Engineer, you will responsible for execution of all laboratory-based studies and lead projects in support of commercial manufacturing scale implementation of exciting PAT technologies. This role thrives in a highly dynamic lab team by utilizing a wide range of skill sets spanning from an acute understanding of small and large-scale bioreactor operations, advanced statistical data analysis, making risk-based process decisions, to collaborating with internal and external team players, and upholding high standards for documentation and data integrity. Some weekend work on a non-routine basis will be involved for this role.Key responsibilities: Execution of MSAT laboratory studies in the Upstream OR Downstream Cell Culture Lab in support of cGMP activities at manufacturing scale.Quality document generation coming out of such studies, and being able to perform data analyses to draw scientific conclusions.Collaborate with various internal and external stakeholders to effectively communicate study plans and outcomes to maintain commercial manufacturing timelines.Being able to contribute at an individual level as well as part of an organized team in a fast-paced environment.Key requirements: Bachelor of Science degree in Biological Sciences or Biomedical/Chemical Engineering.Biotech industry experience in Process Development and Process Scale-up / Scale-down, in a manufacturing setting is preferred.Knowledge with cell biology, cell culture, scale up and mass transfer, bioreactor operation, disc stack centrifugation and filtration is highly preferred.Working knowledge in aseptic technique and familiarity with mammalian cell culture.Comprehensive experience with statistical analysis and tools.An equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a qualified individual with disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $65,000.00 - $180,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible scheduleHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offRelocation assistanceTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:No",109.0
77,chemical+engineer,"
Required Qualifications:",110.0
78,chemical+engineer,"Primary responsibility is daily operations — safety, environmental responsibility, PSM compliance, product quality, production rates, maintenance coordination, mechanical PM compliance, and procedure / PSI / P&ID documentation updates.
Other responsibilities can include experimental and process engineering support work within the operations area while maintaining safe operating conditions; initiating investigations into the need for technical work based on a review of plant technical and quality issues; process improvements including improving environmental performance, reducing energy requirements, incremental production increases, enhance mechanical reliability, and product purity improvement.
Incumbent will be involved in directing the development of new process methods, implementing computer modeling for process design, and supervising the completion of process and mechanical flow sheets, design reports, and operational documentation. Incumbent will be responsible for implementing the facility’s quality processes at the unit level. Incumbent will work directly with operators to relay information and concerns.
Requirements
BS Chemical Engineering
Train and Perform as a member of the Emergency Response Team - Fire Brigade and Hazmat Technician
2-5 years of experience in a chemical plant or engineering
Thorough understanding in applying a broad range of principles and theories within the technical field; significant knowledge of chemical process unit operations
Experience with problem solving and ability to work with a ""process improvement"" mindset
Benefits
ALTIVIA offers a comprehensive benefits package including paid holidays/vacation and sick, affordable medical, dental, life insurance and 401k plan.",111.0
79,chemical+engineer,"About Our Opportunity

AVEVA is a global leader in industrial software, driving digital transformation and sustainability. By connecting the power of information and artificial intelligence with human insight, AVEVA enables teams to use their data to unlock new value. We call this Performance Intelligence. AVEVA’s comprehensive portfolio enables more than 20,000 industrial enterprises to engineer smarter, operate better and drive sustainable efficiency. AVEVA supports customers through a trusted ecosystem that includes 5,500 partners and 5,700 certified developers around the world. The company is headquartered in Cambridge, UK, with over 6,500 employees and 90 offices in over 40 countries. Learn more at www.aveva.com.


We take pride in our core values and the diversity of our people, valuing the unique experience and expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business. At AVEVA, we’re all about Limitless possibilities. Are you?

Optimization Lead Engineer
Location: Houston, TX

Responsibilities:
A Senior Consultant/Engineer is required to join the Services Group to deliver process modeling and optimization solutions to our customers in the global process industries.

This position reports to the Regional Practice Lead on Project basis and primary responsibilities will include:

Execute optimization projects and contribute to the technical success of optimization applications while meeting customer requirements and working within established budgets and timeframes; Interfaces with the Simulation Project Manager and client.Review process drawings and data, configure and test open-equation process models, automate model applications and commission on-line process models.Monitors Project activities, including testing activities, on a broad basis to ensure the Optimization Project is performing its work in compliance with Project Quality Assurance requirements.Develop and maintain expert level knowledge of requirements, features and application of optimization technologies. Make effective and novel use of these technologies.Advice and coach junior engineers to develop ROMeo applications.Participate in client meetings for model reviews and validation.Execute Factory Acceptance and Site Acceptance Test to validate the model with real-time operational data.Commission ROMeo applications at site, connect to plant control system and historian.
Skills & Qualifications:
Bachelors/Masters/PhD in Chemical Engineering with at least 5+ years of industry experience with focus on modeling, control and optimization.High degree of expertise in fundamental modeling of refinery and chemical reactors.Hands on experience with commercial process simulation tools like ROMeo, Aspen-RTO, Pro/II, Hysys, Dynsim.Seeking an individual who will take initiative.Demonstrated ability to evaluate, manage and market, new technologies.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Able to work effectively in a team environment. Be able to liaison between research teams (industrial and academic).Strong attention to details.
AVEVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to being an exemplar employer with an inclusive culture, developing a workplace environment where all our employees are treated with dignity and respect. We value diversity and the expertise that people from different backgrounds bring to our business.

Come and join AVEVA to create the transformative technology that enables our customers to engineer a better world.

Concerning agencies: AVEVA does not accept unsolicited resumes and will not be responsible for fees related to such.",113.0
80,chemical+engineer,"Salary: $95k - 125k per year
Reference: 860072

job summary:

We Are seeking a Process Controls Engineer for the Greater Houson, TX. Area.

This is a Direct Hire opportunity with one of the most well known Oil & Gas Companies in the country!
Shift: Days

Pay: $95K -125K
Requirements:

Bachelor's in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering is required
5 + years of engineering experience.
3-5 years control system(DCS) maintenance and configuration experience
Foxboro IA /EVO system experience preferred.

location: Pasadena, Texas
job type: Permanent
salary: $95,000 - 125,000 per year
work hours: 8am to 4pm
education: Bachelors

responsibilities:
performance of the operations and achieving targeted metrics for the area they have been assigned. This includes understanding chemical processes and predicting what happens in those processes. They are typically responsible for
Managing large process area or multiple process areas in a plant.
Evaluates results compared to goals and performance targets.
Leads the day-to-day surveillance of operations, running Engineering Applications and conducting
Performance analysis, and initiating continuous improvement activities.
General control system(DCS) configuration changes needed to optimize plant operations and alarm management.
Leads risk assessments, customer technical meetings, and assists management in medium and long term planning.
Is able to anticipate operational changes and needs and responds accordingly.
Initiates Approval for Expenditure (AFE) that achieve the organizational and department goals and leads studies to solve recurring problems and improve operational efficiency.
Prepares reports and participates in the knowledge management processes.

qualifications:
Experience level: Experienced
Minimum 5 years of experience
Education: Bachelors (required)

skills:
Process Improvement

Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",114.0
81,chemical+engineer,"The AECOM Houston office, Water and Wastewater Group, is seeking a Project Manager responsible for the planning, design and construction phases of public works projects in southeast Texas. The ideal candidate for this position will be responsible for the following duties:


Technical lead for multi-disciplinary teams to undertake water and wastewater treatment and pumping projects.
Direct and manage the implementation of the project including coordination with project stakeholders, consultants, contractors and other external and internal parties to achieve project milestones.
Prepare technical memoranda, planning studies and final design calculations, plans and specifications;
Manage project deliverable, budgets, schedules. Ensure compliance with the company’s Quality Assurance policies and procedures.
Oversee and manage construction phases of projects to ensure works are completed in accordance with the contract documents, on time and budget;
Ensure project work is undertaken in accordance with corporate health and safety policies and quality management systems;
Prepare proposals and qualification documents in the interest of obtaining new assignments
Maintain client relationships; assist in identification and pursuit of business development opportunities

About AECOM

At AECOM, we believe infrastructure creates opportunity for everyone. Whether it’s improving your commute, keeping the lights on, providing access to clean water or transforming skylines, our work helps people and communities thrive.

We take on the most complex challenges and pioneer innovative, iconic solutions that push the limits of what’s possible – the world’s longest cable-stayed bridge, record-breaking sports events, the largest greenfield port development mega project, life-sustainingand disaster recovery programs, and the tallest tower in the Western Hemisphere.

On projects spanning transportation, buildings, water, governments, energy and the environment, we deliver professional services throughout the project lifecycle.

We are proud to be recognized for excellence:
+ _Fortune_ ’s World’s Most Admired Companies – 2014-2020

+ \#1 in Transportation and General Building in _Engineering-News Record_ 's 2019 “Top 500 Design Firms” and #1 2019 “Top 200 Environmental Firms”

+ VIQTORY 2020 Military Friendly® Gold Employer

+ DCSA—Water

+ With more than 3,200 Water professionals in all major markets throughout the United States and Canada, AECOM’s Water business line leverages nearly a century of local, national and international project experience to provide today’s municipalities, industries and governments with cost-effective solutions to their Water challenges. We deliver our services—from environmental planning studies to detailed design, construction management, and operations and maintenance—to a wide range of public and private sector clients. Our public sector work encompasses everything from small rural communities, to large urban centers, to agencies with regional responsibilities. Our private sector work includes assignments for multiple commercial/industrial sectors, including oil and gas, chemicals, power, food and beverage, manufacturing and pharmaceuticals.https://aecom.com/markets/water/

Minimum Requirements

BA/BS and 8 years of relevant experience or equivalency of education and experience

Preferred Qualifications

MS Civil or Chemical Engineering

15 Years of experience

5 years of Process experience

Experience in group management

Experience in business Development

What We Offer

When you join AECOM, you become part of a company that is pioneering the future. Our teams around the world are involved in some of the most cutting-edge and innovative projects and programs of our time, addressing the big challenges of today and shaping the built environment for generations to come. We ensure a workplace that encourages growth, flexibility and creativity, as well as a company culture that champions inclusion, diversity and overall employee well-being through programs supported by company leadership. Our core values define who we are, how we act and what we aspire to, which comes down to not only delivering a better world, but working to “make amazing happen” in each neighborhood, community and city we touch. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we believe in each person’s potential, and we’ll help you reach yours.",115.0
82,chemical+engineer,"We are actively seeking a Project Manager who is a highly motivated leader to join our Chemical team. The successful candidate must have extensive experience in executing projects for the Consumer, Agricultural, Specialty or Petrochemical industries with the highest level of quality, cost effectiveness, and a focus on safety.
Responsibilities
Responsibilities include all aspects of client relationship development and project execution including proposal development and presentation, management of project resources, project budgets and forecasting, schedule management, project engineering, integration, installation, start-up and project closure.
The work will be varied and may include conceptual studies, detailed design, field installation, or construction support for projects ranging from small capital or maintenance projects to full EPC capital projects.
The candidate must excel at being able to communicate across a multi-office, multi-disciplinary team and will have ultimate responsibility for successful execution of the project to meet the technical and commercial goals.
Maintaining and growing solid client relationships is a key responsibility. Successful Design Group Project Managers have leadership skills and experience with a drive to grow and expand local and regional clients.
Requirements
15+ years of project management experience in executing projects for the petrochemical / chemical industries.
Highly motivated leader with varied experience managing projects of different sizes and types.
Requires strong engineering skills and demonstrated success with the highest level of quality, cost effectiveness, and focus on safety.
Awareness of engineering best practices and standards applicable to the Chemical industry required.
Technical background in facility / unit operations and design is essential to be able to recognize and address technical deficiencies before they result in risk to the project, client, or company.
Technical background and PSM proficiency is strongly preferred.
Strong analytical skills, and a sound understanding of project management fundamentals – scheduling resources, managing and forecasting costs.
Experience with Client development, consulting and experience in the preparation of proposals for engineering services are highly desirable.
Excellent communication and presentation skills as well as a professional demeanor are essential. This position must communicate effectively with Clients, Vendors, Contractors and other Design Group employees at all levels of responsibility.
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education
B.S. in Mechanical Engineering or Chemical Engineering is preferred but consideration will be given to other degrees based on actual project experience.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",119.0
83,chemical+engineer,"Be part of something altogether life-changing
Working at Cytiva in the Life Sciences industry means being at the forefront of providing new solutions to transform human health. Our incredible customers undertake life-saving activities ranging from fundamental biological research to developing innovative vaccines, new medicines, and cell and gene therapies.
At Cytiva you will be able to continuously improve yourself and us – working on challenges that truly matter with people that care for each other, our customers, and their patients. With associates across 40 countries, Cytiva is a place where every day is a learning opportunity – so you can grow your career and expand your skills in the long term. Cytiva is proud to work alongside a community of nine fellow Danaher Life Sciences companies. Together, we’re pioneering the future of science and medicine, developing products that enable researchers in the fight to save lives.
What you’ll do

Develop and maintain business relationships through personal contact on a regular on-going basis to provide resin design in focus for Biotech and translational accounts in their territory
Provide expert technical leadership during sales process by demonstrating product and application knowledge for Cytiva resin products. Support Research and Process Development customers with technical chromatography dialogue, resin screening, experimental set up, DOE and HTPD work.
Assist with Process Design using experience, knowledge of diverse molecules, and process optimization. Provide scale up and process productivity considerations as needed to achieve successful purifications.
Provide advanced application focused AKTA training in Process Development labs. Supporting complex AKTA configurations and well as column packing of Cytiva resins from lab columns through small scale Axichrom columns.
Support Downstream process trouble shooting for Cytiva products. Provide chromatography resin and Akta application information, answer inquiries, give presentation, assist with logistics, and provide limited lab bench work.

Who you are

BS Degree in Science (Biology, Biochemistry, Chemistry) or Engineering
Good understanding and knowledge of the Biopharmaceutical /Biotech Industry and strong, working knowledge of chromatography plus hands on experience in protein purification.
Three years of progressively responsible post-bachelor's experience as Research Scientist or Chromatography Product Specialist, or Field Application/Technical Specialist is acceptable.
Solid problem-solving skills - ability to resolve complex problems, communicate issues and propose solutions to both external customers and internal team members.
Team oriented with a customer satisfaction mindset
Ability to communicate effectively using local language
Willingness to travel within geographic region as well as to periodic nationwide sales meetings and tradeshows
To the extent you are applying for a position that requires you to operate a Cytiva owned/leased, privately owned/leased or rental vehicle for company business, you must be willing to submit to a check of your driving record To the extent you are applying for a position that requires you to operate a Cytiva owned/leased, privately owned/leased or rental vehicle for company business, you must be willing to submit to a check of your driving record

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 68,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.
Danaher is committed to a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels they belong and all voices are heard. We believe in our associates and the unique perspectives they bring to every challenge, which is why we’ll empower you to push the boundaries of what’s possible.
If you’ve ever wondered what’s within you, there’s no better time to find out.
Danaher Corporation and all Danaher Companies are equal opportunity employers that evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or other characteristics protected by law. The “EEO is the Law” poster is available here .",121.0
84,chemical+engineer,"SENIOR TECHNICAL SERVICE ENGINEER Naphtha Block:
Axens has an immediate opening in the Houston office, for a technical service engineer with a B.S. in Chemical Engineering and minimum 7 years experience in the petroleum refining or petrochemical fields.
Position responsibilities include:Analyzing and monitoring the performance of current operating units in the areas of Reforming, Isomerization, Naphtha Hydrotreating, Selective Hydrogenation, and AdsorbentsReviewing reports by other Axens engineers before issuance to clientProviding and leading field-based technical support in the areas of equipment readiness inspections, catalyst loading, catalyst activation, catalyst regeneration, commissioning and start-up assistance for Axens licensed units and Axens catalyst supplied units in refinery applicationProviding client training as required including the preparation of training materials and testing of Standard Operator Training Simulators
Requirements include:Experience in Reforming technologyExperience with unit monitoring and field supportMust have a willingness to work flexible hours and travel as requiredMust have excellent computer skills particularly in Excel and simulation programs (especially PRO II/ProVision)Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Preferred skills include:Experience in Isomerization, Naphtha Hydrotreating, Selective Hydrogenation, Adsorbents or Catalyst performance modeling is a plus.Experience in basic process design and project engineering is a plus.Fluency in Spanish is a plus
EEO STATEMENT Note: Axens NA is an EEO employer We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified candidates will receive consideration for all positions without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.
E-Verify Axens NA participates in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program",131.0
85,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronics is an ongoing journey of discovery: our 58,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in Healthcare, Life Science and Electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronics is a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


Everything we do in EMD Electronics is to help us deliver on our purpose of being the company behind the companies, advancing digital living. We are dedicated to being the trusted supplier of high-tech materials, services and specialty chemicals for the electronics, automotive and cosmetics industries. We foster a global collaborative organization made up of individuals who have the passion to win, obsess about the customer, are relentlessly curious and act with urgency. Together, we push the boundaries of science to make more possible for our customers.


This role does not offer sponsorship for work authorization. External applicants must be eligible to work in the US.


Your Role:


The Chemical Engineer will work in the New Product Development group. You will be lead in research and development of organosilane and organometallic chemicals for EMD Electronics customers in the semiconductor industry worldwide. The Chemical Engineer will work purification of chemistries with techniques such as distillation, adsorption, and sublimation.


Work closely with a group of synthetic chemists to understand the impurities that exist in the raw materials and with product managers to understand those that need to be removed to meet customer specifications.
Collaborate with the Small Volume Manufacturing team to transfer laboratory scale processes to intermediate production by providing optimal conditions for purification.
Establish conditions through experimental design and execution and process modeling using software tools.
Support research and development of methods for cleaning and packaging material into industry standard or customer owned packages while maintaining product integrity.
Use the respirator depending on the hazard and equipment configuration, so the candidate should be capable of being fitted for and using a respirator.


Physical Attributes:


Some travel. 10% or less
Must work in a glove box for 2 plus hours at a time


Who You Are:


Minimum Qualifications:


Bachelor's Degree in Science in Chemistry, Physics, or Engineering
6+ years of industrial research or process engineering experience

OR

Master's Degree of Science in Chemistry, Physics, or Engineering
3+ years of industrial research or process engineering experience or a Doctorate in Chemistry, Physics, or Engineering
1 to 2 years of industrial research or process engineering experience

OR

Doctorate in Chemistry, Physics, or Engineering


Preferred Qualifications:


Experience with the process simulation software ASPEN, handling air and moisture sensitive compounds
Ability to work in a glove box, and experience with high purity materials
Demonstrate the ability to work independently and manage multiple project commitments simultaneously


What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 223905


Location: Carlsbad


Career Level: C - Professional (1-3 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.

Job Segment: Semiconductor, Product Development, Laboratory, Physics, Science, Research",132.0
86,chemical+engineer,"If you were standing in front of a building that was on fire, would you rush in to save lives?

When making a tough call, does your gut win over your head and heart?

When playing Rock Paper Scissors, do you look for and exploit patterns in the behavior of your opponent?

When you open the newspaper, do you immediately go for the crossword?

Do you prefer the unexpected over routine?

If you answered Yes to any of these questions, then stop looking for a job! Join SMA for an adventure:
• Take control of your career • Help accomplish great things • See the results of your hard work

The Job: Chemical Engineer
Chemical Engineer: A Chemical Engineer has the requisite education and credentials as an engineer, scientist or technologist contributing to the development, modification and improvement of hardware, software and related services. In addition to requiring an understanding of engineering and technical disciplines, these projects involve experience with requirements analysis, concept development, engineering and manufacturing. The expected degree of expertise varies by the career level.
Career Stage: Associate Fellow
Location: San Diego,CA, United States
Period of Performance: This is an open position
Pay: Project-based at approximately $113.00/Hour ranging from $110.50/Hour to $115.50/Hour USD (paid in the currency of residence)
Reference ID: O-013188.56
About Us: We are SMA, the leader in professional services for project-based industries. We help companies win in their markets by informing their strategic choices, improving their competitiveness, and performing on critical projects. Join our community of over 650 professionals like yourself—all confident in their capabilities and who want choices that will accelerate their career. We offer flexible work opportunities, meritocratic pay and benefits. To learn more about SMA, please visit our website at www.smawins.com, and follow us on Glassdoor, Facebook and LinkedIn.
About You: You have approximately more than 25 years of experience in this role
You are relentless in solving problems, work well in teams, and enjoy a challenge
You are a citizen of country where the opportunity is located or have to right to work in that country, and have completed the appropriate level of education in a relevant field
You are looking for adventure!
SMA is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religious creed, national origin, physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. As a condition of employment SMA will require proof of your legal ability to work in the United States and conduct a background check and drug test. If employment is for a location outside of the US, proof of work permit or other legal ability to work in that country is required.",133.0
87,chemical+engineer,"Company descriptionElement Biosciences is a multi-disciplinary startup focused on innovating genetic analysis tools for the research and diagnostic markets. The Company's technology will broaden the end user experience through improved data quality and simplified workflows to benefit discoveries and diagnosis in healthcare.Job Description: Sr Staff Engineer / Sr Manager, Microfluidics Process Development We are looking for a driven, passionate professional to co-develop our processes with our products. We look for flexible candidates eager to build an amazing company and launch an amazing product! The Process Development team is integrated with our technology and product development teams, with a focus on pulling the technology out of the lab and enabling it in Operations.This role will be working on developing the microfluidics device component of our product. The devices incorporate cutting edge technologies from materials science, device assembly, and surface chemistry disciplines, which makes this role highly integrative. We are looking for technical and/or people leaders in this position.DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIESPlan and execute experiments within the device production process that involve multiple materials on synthetic substratesBuild documentation for user and system requirements, participate in product architecture and design, drive risk analysis, and support integration and testing activitiesWork with development scientists and engineers to establish chemistry protocols translate to standard operating proceduresLead troubleshooting problems in experiments in terms of assay design, protocol and reagents.Lead projects in device assembly and surface chemistry to support the operations transfer and commercialization of the product/processLead development of supplier partners to support successful component development and product commercializationPlan quality control approach for product and process reagents and substratesLead and manage growth of Process Development team in the microfluidics device areaRELEVANT SKILLS and ABILITIES: Experimental design and statistical data analysis and visualization (such as JMP or R) are required; additional capabilities with image analysis and scripting are a plusExperience in pilot/full-production environments, including tech transfer activities, sustaining support, and continuous improvementCreative and independent thinker; excellent communication skills; good team worker; ability to multitask and work independently; and ability to find creative solutions to problems are required.Proficient in device assembly and/or surface functionalization and related metrology techniques, e.g. thin-films deposition (ALD, CVD, sputtering, etc), material removal (etch, CMP), and metrology including SEM, AFM, XPS, XRF, SIMS, etc.Knowledge and use of computer software for technology and business purposes is required.Ability to produce high quality work with great attention to detail in a rapid and efficient manner.EDUCATION/TRAINING/WORK RELATED EXPERIENCE: Successful candidates will have Educational background in mechanical or chemical engineering, materials science, bioengineering, or engineering physics, or similar fieldsTypically requires a Bachelors degree with 8-12 years experience, OR Masters with 6-10, OR PhD with 4-7 years experience.Experience in both Development (new product introduction) and Operations settings, preferably with experience commercializing products in a fast-paced environmentWe offer competitive compensation and benefit packages. We are committed to providing opportunities to our colleagues so they can achieve the best versions of themselves in their career trajectories. Join our winning team!Job Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timeAdditional Compensation:Other formsWork Location:One locationBenefits:Health insuranceDental insuranceVision insuranceRetirement planSigning bonusPaid time offFlexible scheduleParental leaveRelocation assistanceProfessional development assistanceThis Company Describes Its Culture as:Innovative -- innovative and risk-takingAggressive -- competitive and growth-orientedTeam-oriented -- cooperative and collaborativeSchedule:Monday to Friday",134.0
88,chemical+engineer,"Requirments:· Responsible for various aspects of the III-V laser wafer fabrication processes, including both manufacturing and R&D activities.· Responsible for improving/developing new processes used for the fabrication of both III-V lasers and detectors.· Maintain SPC and characterization.· Monitor/upgrade relevant processes.· Work with device engineers on DOE for process development.· Help to maintain process equipment.· Work with vendors.Qualification:· BS in physics, chemistry, material science or related field.· Minimum 3 years experience in the semiconductor processing field, including all aspects of the photolithographic process, wet chemical etching, spin-on dielectrics, plasma cleaning/etching, metal deposition, mask design. etc. III-V experience preferred.· Experience with dry etching, RIE, ICP, etc is plus.· Understanding of SPC and DOE for process control and optimization.· Ability to work extended periods in a cleanroom environment and work with chemicals.· Excellent communication skills.· Previous process engineering experience in a manufacturing environment is a plus.Job Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timePay: $76,000.00 - $96,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Doctorate (Preferred)Experience:Manufacturing: 2 years (Required)Wafer Fab: 2 years (Required)Semiconductor: 2 years (Required)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:No",135.0
89,chemical+engineer,"Job description Process EngineerPosition SummaryProcess Engineer, or Manufacturing Process Engineer, designs and implements systems and equipment procedures used manufacturing facilities. Their main duties include testing and monitoring equipment, updating current system processes, and conducting risk assessments.Primary Duties and ResponsibilitiesCollaborates with project staff to create cost estimates of materials, time, labor, and other resources required to complete the projectConducting research to develop new and improved processes for manufacturingEstablishing safety procedures for individuals working with dangerous chemicalsDesigning and planning equipment layoutConducting tests and monitoring the process performance throughout productionTroubleshooting problems associated with manufacturing processesEvaluating processes and equipment to ensure compliance with environmental and safety regulationsEstimating production costs * Facilitates and contributes to the development of project plans and designsCompares the actual cost of development project to estimatesCollaborates with design group to change plans if problems ariseAnalyzes equipment, systems, processes, to identify modifications to improve efficiency, increase quality, and reduce costsCollaborates with project engineers from other plants to share problems and solutionsEvaluate quality control processes and make recommendations for improvements in quality controlPerforms other related duties as assignedWillingness to go above and beyond to support independent and team projects to support business targets and metrics as assignedMaintains knowledge of new and developing manufacturing technology, equipment, and applications; applies this knowledge to recommend and implement new technology and processes.Education, Experience, and Skills: Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent combination of experience and educationExperienced with Microsoft Office programs (including Microsoft Excel, Visio and Microsoft Project and AutoCAD. Experience with Autodesk AEC Suite highly desirable.Experience in material handling industry or steel construction industry highly desirableExperience with the application of CAD/CAM/CAE systems to machining technology, manufacturing software migration, manufacturing processesExcellent organizational and planning skillsExcellent interpersonal and communication skillsExcellent computer skills and ERP/MRP systems knowledge. Experience with Epicor a plusBasic understanding of ISO 9000 design requirements.Physical Demands and Work Environment: The physical demands and work environment described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the primary duties and responsibilities of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the primary duties and responsibilities.Required to be able to read documents and computer screens.Usual office working conditionsTravel required: 10-25%Occasional exposure to shop elements such as noise, dust, fumes, and odors.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Manufacturing: 3 years (Preferred)Willingness to travel:25% (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:Yes",136.0
90,chemical+engineer,"Job Title —Process Engineer, at Vastek Inc.
Company —Vastek Inc.
Location —San Diego, California.
Job type —Full-time.
Job Description:
Work effectively in highly cross-functional project teams and work independently to accomplish project goals.
Take leadership of validation strategies on new process equipment, with timely implementation by working with resource planning.
Organize interdisciplinary team meetings to plan the utilization of resources and define a project schedule and establish the scope of the validation project. Engage with equipment suppliers from Design through Site Acceptance phases of projects by assisting with document development, review and summary reports. Provide on-site support during machine installation/operational qualification and process characterization to verify design specifications are met.
Follow established procedures to perform and lead improvement initiatives for detailed, accurate, and compliant engineering documentation for Master Validation Plans. pFMEA, Equipment Installation, Test Melhod Validation, Characterization, Process QuaHfication and Process Validation.
Review, edit, approve development documents such as material specifications, machine drawings, Process & Instrumentation Diagrams (P&IDs), and Engineering Protocols/Reports/Datasheets.
Update - Test Procedures, Process Control Documents, Material Acceptance Forms, and Fabrication Procedures when required.
Identify and Drive opportunities to improve the quality system as it relates to design control deliverables including Risk Management documents.
Reviews performance of machinery, equipment, and manufacturing processes to verify their efficiency and investigate and initiate corrective actions to prevent problems and ensure product quality.
Develops manufacturing processes that are applicable to statistical process control and may develop those techniques.
Required Qualification & Experience:Requires at least a Bachelors degree or higher in an engineering discipline such as industrial engineering, mechanical engineering, chemical engineering, engineering management, manufacturing engineering, or a closely related field.
Send resume to attn: Daniella Loza, VAStek, Inc. 1230 Columbia Street, Suite 1180, San Diego, CA 92101(refer to job title).",137.0
91,chemical+engineer,"Downstream Process and Fermentation Engineer - San Diego, CA

Job Description
To realize our goal of building a next-generation Yarrowia lipolytica yeast platform, each of our strains need to be successfully deployed. Therefore, we are seeking a Downstream Process Engineer to help with this great challenge. With your motivation for process development, and a particular interest in downstream product recovery and purification, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and deploying downstream processes which meet quality, cost, and process reliability objectives.

Duties and Responsibilities
Design and manage the execution of laboratory and pilot scale downstream experiments, leading to the definition of commercially viable processes, harvest of and product recovery, that leverage engineered organismsWork with fermentation and synthetic chemistry scientists to adapt, optimize and scale-up laboratory scale processes to achieve commercially viable and robust process protocolsWork with manufacturing partners to design fermentation and downstream processes to fit the partners facility equipment and successfully transfer processes to themManage the execution of bench scale assays and proof-of-concept experimentsDevelop mass and energy balances, process flow and instrumentation diagrams, simulations and cost models.Conceive ideas to reduce the cost of manufacture of product, develop and implement experimental plans to test and evaluate feasibility of ideas.Work with external engineered systems and process equipment partners to design and assess alternative processes and equipment capable of achieving process requirements.Develop and follow Standard Operating Procedures and additional verbal and written directions.Support the set-up, completion, and clean-up of experiments.Present findings of research in written and oral formats.Maintain detailed and complete lab notebook. Participate and support IP filings.Must be able to work a schedule which includes weekends and extended hours.

Required Experience
B.S. degree in Chemical, Biochemical, Mechanical, Agricultural Engineering or related field with 2 to 3 years’ industrial experience or M.S. degree in similar or related fields with at least 1 year of industrial experience.Hands-on experience with chemical separations equipment (e.g. distillation, filtration, chromatography, centrifugation), and a strong understanding of the underlying theory.Ability to exercise judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques, and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.Knowledge of computer-based monitoring and control systems.Must possess excellent communication and interpersonal skills to facilitate interactions with an interdisciplinary team of scientists, engineers, technicians, and external partners.Familiarity in Process/ Utility Flow diagrams (PFD/UFD), Piping and Instrument Diagrams (P&IDs), and Equipment / Instrument specifications is a plus.Experience with hands-on fermentation processes and bioreactor operations is highly desirable.High-level expertise with modeling software (ASPEN, etc.) and/or building computational models is a plus.
For immediate consideration apply today!
Questions? Please reach out to Dustin at DUSG877@kellyservices.com
#TJP2021_SPEC
Why Kelly®?

Kelly® Science & Clinical is your connection to premier scientific and clinical companies looking to hire talented people just like you. Every day, we match science professionals with dream jobs that fit their skills and interests—it’s the way we think job searching should be. Nearly 100 percent of our science recruiters have a professional background/education in science, so we know a thing or two about the science market and how to get you noticed.
About Kelly®
At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live (plus, did we mention we provide a ton of benefits?). Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.
Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
]]",138.0
92,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineer to join Reagent Development Services team in the Manufacturing Technology Transfer (MTT) group. The MTT group works as an integral part of our Consumables Development and Manufacturing process and is tasked with developing and deploying consumables manufacturing processes of both new and existing products within our production environments.
Responsibilities:
Participate in consumable product development, manufacturing process development, process and product improvements, and other activities in the making of consumable products used in Illumina’s sequencing and Array technology
Work cross functionally with Product development, Supply chain, Manufacturing and Quality to develop processes for new products and improve processes of existing products
Construct and execute controlled experiments (including DOE's) to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions in a production environment to meet production goals
Define technical requirements for manufacturing processes and new production equipment
Author procedures and instructions for new manufacturing processes and train production operators to manufacture product in a GMP environment
Represent Operations needs on development teams for effective transfer of products into manufacturing
Troubleshoot production line issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations
Work on teams to develop and transfer new processes/products to production and enhance their robustness
Requirements:
Work experience in the medical device, biotech, pharmaceutical or semiconductor industries is desirable
Experience with surface chemistry and protein/oligo characterization techniques preferred
Experience with microparticles and oligos preferred
Effective communication skills both verbal and written, analytical and organizational skills to manage different priorities
High level problem solving and reasoning skills required
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with high volume production in a high tech, high volume consumables industry is a plus
Experience with lean Six Sigma is a plus
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills are required
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required
Ability to work independently and collaborate
Education and Experience:
BS/MS/PhD in Biotechnology, Biochemistry, Biomedical Engineering, Chemical Engineering Materials Science or related field with 2-4 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",139.0
93,chemical+engineer,"TriLink BioTechnologies is actively responding to the COVID-19 pandemic through vaccine and diagnostic programs.
TriLink BioTechnologies, a Maravai LifeSciences company, is seeking a Process Engineer I to join our growing team. This role is responsible for providing engineering support for sustaining, scale-up, and system integration of our manufacturing processes. The position will work closely with Manufacturing, Quality, R&D, and IT to develop, improve, and sustain production to help the company take the next steps forward in their growth cycle.
Responsibilities
Responsible for development and implementation of production and analytical “In-process” controls for commercial manufacturing
Responsible for leading and executing transfer of NPIs from development to manufacturing shopfloor
Responsible for independently designing and executing experimental protocols, interpreting data from different sources/format, and preparing scientific/operations development reports
Effective communication with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments
Responsible for leading quality investigations like deviations, CAPAs, NCMRs, OOS, OOT issues
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of production areas
Create and format technical documents like SOPs, master batch record and work instructions
Assist in defining technical requirements for new products
Responsible for identifying and on-boarding laboratory/floor equipment
Characterize and develop key metrics to drive efficiency and robustness improvements in product development
Collaborate with Development, Equipment engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, supply chain, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for manufactured products
Qualifications
BS/MS in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, or related field
Good data analysis skills and a logical approach to problem solving is a must
Experience in organic chemistry, chromatography (HPLC/UPLC, MPLC), NMR and other analytical techniques used in organic synthesis is preferred
Experience in large scale organic synthesis, clean room manufacturing is a plus
Familiarity with nucleoside/Nucleotide chemistry, oligo synthesis is preferred
Strong understanding of statistical knowledge (DOEs, statistical analysis, etc.) is a plus
Familiarity with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is preferred
TriLink BioTechnologies is a rapidly growing biotech firm in San Diego, CA, that offers competitive wages and a full benefits package including medical, dental, vision, LTD, and a retirement plan.
TriLink BioTechnologies is an EEO employer.",140.0
94,chemical+engineer,"Tanvex Biopharma is a biologic pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing organization aiming to provide high quality, value added capabilities to accelerate the introduction of biologic therapeutics to the global market. We currently have an exciting opportunity for an Associate Engineer in our MSAT department at our location in San Diego, CA.
Summary
The MSAT Associate Engineer is responsible for assisting with Manufacturing Science and Technology (MSAT) functions in support of cGMP drug substance manufacturing, including transferring, monitoring, troubleshooting and improving drug substance production processes and technologies. This position will collect and perform statistical analysis of manufacturing in-process control and process parameter data to trend process performance; assist in process related deviation investigations, assess impact to product quality, identify root cause and propose corrective and preventative actions.
The MSAT Associate Engineer will also assist in the authoring of SOPs and batch records for new process and new technology as needed and collaborates in cross functional activities with development and manufacturing personnel, both internal and external, to support process scale-up, technology transfer, process characterization, and process validation. This position will serve as technical resource on equipment capabilities and troubleshooting, and provide process knowledge and technical support on the manufacturing floor.
Requires a Bachelor’s or advanced degree in chemical/biochemical engineering, chemistry/biochemistry, biological sciences, or related disciplines with 0-3 years of relevant experience in biopharmaceutical research and manufacturing settings. Experience with biopharmaceutical manufacturing process and equipment preferred, and knowledge of cGMP and quality systems. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, detail-oriented, productive in team settings, capable of critical thinking in regards to engineering and scientific problem solving, and an effective oral and written communicator across functional areas and technical levels.",141.0
95,chemical+engineer,"SCS Engineers is an employee-owned environmental consulting and contracting firm that designs and implements sustainable environmental solutions. We just celebrated our 51st anniversary as a company on April 1, 2021! Our core capabilities are: environmental due-diligence and assessment, brownfields, redevelopment, site remediation, solid and hazardous waste management, landfill gas, renewable energy, and regulatory compliance for commercial and industrial clients and municipalities responsible for protecting our air, water, and soil. Our employees take pride in their work, and together, we have the singular vision to be the environmental consulting firm of choice for clients and our employee owners. If you thrive in a friendly, collaborative, and client-focused company and desire dynamic and challenging team-based work, then SCS is the place for you. Are you up for the challenge?
Job Summary
We are looking for an entry-level engineer for our Tracer Business Unit. SCS’s Tracer Environmental Division has expertise in all aspects of environmental management, safety and risk analysis, and compliance. SCS Tracer’s Risk Management team focuses on compliance related to risk and process safety-based EPA and OSHA regulations. SCS also provides expertise with state-specific programs such as the California Accidental Release Prevention (CalARP) Program and Nevada’s Chemical Accident Prevention Program (CAPP). The individual will conduct assignments in the field and office settings.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Accurately record data during field work, which could include but not limited to: soil characteristics, lithology, groundwater or surface water data, survey data, photographs, or summaries of visual observations through photograph and written field logs in accordance with standard operating procedures.
Assist with preparation of reports, including report text, tabulated data, charts, graphs, and/or figures.
Collect samples from hazardous and non-hazardous sites, including: soil, air, surface water, groundwater, and landfill gas and coordinate transfer to laboratories.
Oversee and log drilling activities and excavations involving, monitoring well installation, borehole logging, well development, and sampling.
Complete quality control reviews on all work product (reports, design plans, design calculations, data, etc.) prior to submission.
Assist with coordinating contractors, subcontractors, and clients as directed.
Assist with the preparation of permit applications and/or regulatory agency submittals and responses with supporting documentation.
Prepare short form site specific health and safety plans.
Meet all client service preferences and react swiftly to client feedback to improve client satisfaction.
Use SOPs, standards, and templates and make improvement suggestions.
Participate in health and safety training as required
Other Duties and Responsibilities
Other tasks and responsibilities as assigned.
Explain and answer questions on SCS capabilities and services.
Attend networking and trade show events.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.)
High attention to detail
Basic health and safety knowledge
Excellent written and oral communications
Basic AutoCAD knowledge is a plus
Ability to obtain 40 hour HAZWOPER within 1 month
Basic problem solving skills
Ability to read directions for field testing equipment.
Ability to understand and implement SOPs.
Understanding of scientific concepts including: physics, statistics, chemistry, mathematics, and geosciences.
Ability to use basic hand tools such as hammer, screw driver, etc.

Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in engineer required. Relevant majors such as environmental engineering, chemical engineering, or mechanical engineering preferred.
Minimum of 3 months of related environmental work, school or research experience required such as the following:
Experience with PSM/RMP and CalARP Programs
Experience with preparation of common environmental technical reports such as Phase I/II Environmental Site Assessment Reports, Water Board compliance reports, etc.
Valid driver’s license with a driving record in good standing required.

At SCS, you will have an opportunity to contribute to our strategic direction, help us continue to grow, and provide our clients with responsive, innovative, high quality client service. We offer excellent opportunities for career advancement and a competitive compensation package, including: medical, dental, vision, 401K, ESOP, Student Debt Employer Contribution Program, paid holidays and PTO.
SCS Engineers is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). SCS provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran or disabled status.
If you have questions, difficulty using our online system and/or you need an accommodation due to a disability then please contact us about your interest in employment at recruiting@scsengineers.com.",142.0
96,chemical+engineer,"The Senior Quality Engineer will be responsible for developing the Quality controls to support the transfer of products from R&D to manufacturing, and the subsequent ongoing sustaining functions necessary to ensure product quality. This position will work with minimum supervision to develop and implement the appropriate quality methods, acceptance criteria and qualification plans for product release to manufacturing. This role will develop raw material quality control points and support supplier qualifications to ensure raw material consistency. This is a cross-functional role that will frequently interact with management to provide technical assistance related to product expectations, failure analysis and other quality considerations. This role is also required to demonstrate a heightened sense of urgency in resolving matters related to quality and contribute positively in a fast-paced operations environment.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Participate in product design efforts to ensure that quality considerations are incorporated into design components and that the designs are compatible with quality test methods. Evaluate product and process designs for adequacy as related to field performance and manufacturability.Develop quality control strategies for raw materials and support supplier qualifications to ensure material consistency.Support stability studies of new materials new products, and changes as needed.Maintain design control and provide phase deliverables as requiredPerform statistical analysis for experiments and process trend monitoring to support the development of production metrics.Lead complex root cause failure investigation and troubleshooting of customer complaints and product non-conformances within manufacturing.Participate in Complaint Committee meetings and present investigation findings to peers and management.Participate in project team meetings and communicate readiness for product launch.Monitor field complaint data to evaluate new product performance and the impact of changesEducation and ExperienceB.S. in Engineering/Chemistry/Biology/Technical Discipline or equivalent combination of certification and work experience preferred6-8 years’ experience in Quality and Manufacturing Systems in Medical Device and high-volume manufacturing environments requiredMinimum 3 years’ experience in New Product introductions preferredASQ Quality Engineer Certification (CQE) preferredKnowledge/SkillsQuality Engineering skills which includes FMEA, Control Plans, Acceptance criteria, Sampling Plans.Strong technical aptitude and experience (preferably in engineering, chemistry, biology or other life sciences field) is a must.Quality Tools – Problem Solving Methodologies/Process Capability / ISO 13485 / Design of Experiments.Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of employees throughout the organizationAbility to develop and maintain strong working relationships with internal and external customers proficient in Microsoft Office, statistical software programs, operating systems, voice and email, etc.Ability to lead and facilitate a group of technical experts in root cause investigationsKnowledge of quality systems and regulations for medical device industry.High level of technical writing ability and excellent communication skills are requiredAdvanced skills in statistical techniques and quality tools is requiredUnderstanding of medical device Quality System Regulations (QSR) is requiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Remotely:No",144.0
97,chemical+engineer,"Job Responsibilities:
Design and conduct experiments to advance our understanding of electrochemical biosensorsDevelop test methods to characterize new glucose sensing architectures and technologiesSupport execution of test procedures and protocolsPerform data analysis using Excel, JMP, and MATLABCommunicate results to peers and management in oral presentations and written documentsAdditional related duties as required

Skills:
Ability to work hands-on in a fast-paced environmentExtensive experience in a wet laboratory environmentDemonstrated capability of test engineering and method developmentGeneral understanding of statistical analysisStrong work ethic and organizational skillsExcellent communication and interpersonal skills

Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in a technical discipline (e.g., Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, or Materials Science and Engineering) and 2-5 years related experience or Master’s degree and 0-2 years equivalent industry experience

Please note:

Consultant will be onsite FT in San Diego, CA once COVID restrictions are lifted.

This is NOT a Corp to Corp opportunity
We do NOT provide Sponsorship at this time",146.0
98,chemical+engineer,"Tanvex Biopharma is a biologic pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing organization aiming to provide high quality, value added capabilities to accelerate the introduction of biologic therapeutics to the global market. We currently have an exciting opportunity for an Associate Engineer in our MSAT department at our location in San Diego, CA.
Summary
The MSAT Associate Engineer is responsible for assisting with Manufacturing Science and Technology (MSAT) functions in support of cGMP drug substance manufacturing, including transferring, monitoring, troubleshooting and improving drug substance production processes and technologies. This position will collect and perform statistical analysis of manufacturing in-process control and process parameter data to trend process performance; assist in process related deviation investigations, assess impact to product quality, identify root cause and propose corrective and preventative actions.
The MSAT Associate Engineer will also assist in the authoring of SOPs and batch records for new process and new technology as needed and collaborates in cross functional activities with development and manufacturing personnel, both internal and external, to support process scale-up, technology transfer, process characterization, and process validation. This position will serve as technical resource on equipment capabilities and troubleshooting, and provide process knowledge and technical support on the manufacturing floor.
Requires a Bachelor’s or advanced degree in chemical/biochemical engineering, chemistry/biochemistry, biological sciences, or related disciplines with 0-3 years of relevant experience in biopharmaceutical research and manufacturing settings. Experience with biopharmaceutical manufacturing process and equipment preferred, and knowledge of cGMP and quality systems. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, detail-oriented, productive in team settings, capable of critical thinking in regards to engineering and scientific problem solving, and an effective oral and written communicator across functional areas and technical levels.",147.0
99,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a driven and motivated Process Engineer to join our growing consumables development team. The consumables engineering group is responsible for the development, transfer, stabilization, and scaling of Illumina’s industry leading high-volume consumables.
This individual will work with a team of Product Engineers to drive improvements in Illumina’s consumable products through product knowledge, systematic problem solving, data analytics, and data reporting. They will partner with R&D, NPI teams, and Operations to sustain and improve manufactured products with a focus on process robustness, quality, production health, and cost. They will proactively identify business needs, gather requirements, and help determine the actions necessary to drive performance improvement.
Responsibilities:
Characterize product health and develop key metrics to drive efficiency and robustness improvements in product development
Collaborate with Development, Process Engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for manufactured products
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of production areas
Work with senior engineers to identify and implement corrective measures for product variation
Effective communication with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments, and across global sites
Works with development teams to transfer, launch, and scale hardened products into full production
Assist in defining technical requirements for new products
Requirements:
Extremely good data analysis skills and a logical approach to problem solving
Ability to understand data in whatever format it’s presented, and effectively use it to communicate a story and drive action
Strong programming skills (SQL, R preferred) and statistical knowledge (DOEs, statistical analysis, etc.)
Experience in manufacturing support/sustaining and transferring products from R&D to production preferred
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Expert user of Excel, proficient in Word, Outlook, PowerPoint
Familiarity with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Demonstrated ability to work with ambiguous requirements, adapt quickly, and learn
Detail-oriented, proactive, works independently, works well with others
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience with either of the following technologies is a plus: Microarrays or genomic sequencing
Experience in one or more of the following fields is a plus: Oligo Manufacturing, Reagent Formulation, MEMS/Semiconductor Fabrication, or other high-tech, high-volume consumables manufacturing
Education:
BS/MS/PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, or related field
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",148.0
100,chemical+engineer,"TriLink BioTechnologies is actively responding to the COVID-19 pandemic through vaccine and diagnostic programs.
TriLink BioTechnologies, a Maravai LifeSciences company, is seeking a Manufacturing Engineer I Scientist to be part of a new and growing engineering team at TriLink providing process engineering development and support for automating, scaling-up, system integrating, and sustaining our manufacturing processes. We are looking for an entry level candidate to work cross functionally to convert manual manufacturing and QC methods into fully automated workflows. This role will work closely with Manufacturing, Quality, R&D, and IT to develop, improve, and sustain production to help us take the next steps forward in our growth cycle.
Responsibilities
Support the process development and automation of manufacturing from manual laboratory workflows to fully automated workflows on a Hamilton Microlab STAR liquid handling robot
Write and edit methods for Hamilton Liquid Handlers using Venus 3
Train operators in proper use of liquid handling robotics
Troubleshoot and sustain the performance of liquid handling robotics in manufacturing and identify opportunities for continuous improvement
Design and perform DOEs to improve throughput, reliability, and capacity of new automated workflows
Work cross functionally with R&D, Manufacturing and Quality to develop processes for new products and improve processes of existing products
Develop electronic batch records (eBRs) for manufacturing within MES: gather system/end user requirements; complete design, implementation, and testing/validation.
Troubleshoot production line issues and customer complaints related to yield, quality, and throughput. Implement the appropriate robust containments and corrective actions on identification of root cause
Develop user and system requirements and assist with development and execution of qualification protocols
Develop Business Intelligence reports in Tableau
Support site audits and inspections and implement corrections as needed
Qualifications
B.S. Degree or higher in Chemistry, Biochemistry, Bioengineering, Chemical Engineering or other related field
Previous life science industry experience a plus
Programming language experience a plus (SQL, R, Python, C++, C#, Javascript)
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or chemical industries is desirable
Experience with chemical processes (preferably organic) preferred
High level problem solving and reasoning skills required
High level computer skills are required
Experience drafting user, system, and software requirements is preferred
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control, and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with 21 CFR 820, ICH Q7, ISO 9001, and/or ISO 13485 requirements a plus
Lean/Six Sigma experience a plus
Strong multitasking abilities to complete activities in a fast-paced, deadline driven environment
Results-driven self-starter
Ability to manage stress and balance competing demands in a high throughput environment composure
TriLink BioTechnologies is a rapidly growing biotech firm in San Diego, CA, that offers competitive wages and a full benefits package including medical, dental, vision, LTD, and a retirement plan.
TriLink BioTechnologies is an EEO employer.",150.0
101,chemical+engineer,"Title: Process Engineer I
Department: Process Development – Process Simulation and Modeling
Position Summary
Genomatica develops commercial biobased processes to make widely-used chemicals that enable better, more sustainable everyday products . That enables our partners and leading brands to offer better food packaging, auto parts, clothing, tires, carpets, and more.
We’ve commercialized processes for bio-BDO (for plastics) and for biobased butylene glycol (for cosmetics); and our technology drives the world’s first commercial-scale biobased plant for a major intermediate chemical. We’re working on polyamide intermediates (nylon) and on butadiene (tires); and we’re helping numerous companies with their bioprocesses. We have more on the way.
We seek a highly motivated Process Engineer to provide bioprocess design and modeling expertise for the development and deployment of novel biobased chemical processes. This high impact position will work within our process development and modeling team, interface with R&D, licensing, business, and commercial functions to develop and evaluate novel bioprocess technology supporting commercialization of technology including commercial manufacturing, licensing, and capital projects. The Process Engineer will also play a key role evaluating specific unit operation for specific bioprocess technology from lab to pilot and demonstration scales, supporting technology transfer, pilot and demonstration campaign and interfacing with CMO (contract manufacturing organization), commercial partners, and customers. Strong communication skills are a must, as this position will interact internally with multiple functions and externally with current and prospective partners and separation technology companies. Candidates who can demonstrate previous high performance developing and designing industrial fermentation and downstream processes are desired. This position is in San Diego, CA.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Lead the development and commercialization of bioprocess technologies, including planning, evaluating and implementing process technologies in manufacturing plant
Develop technology transfer package, support technology transfer, scale up activities, and pilot and demonstration campaigns
Perform heat and material balance analysis for pilot, demo, and commercial plant and analyze the results. Develop and validate simulation models to identify the issues and propose solution for further improvement, troubleshooting, or optimized operation of the commercial plant.
Travel to the plant and work closely with the engineers and the operators in the manufacturing plant to obtain the operating data, identify the operation and quality issues, and communicate the proposed solutions.
Interact with manufacturing, licensing, business and commercial functions to incorporate feedback from internal and external stakeholders, partners, licensees, and separation technology companies into bioprocess development and designs.
Participate in the analysis and interpretation of lab, pilot and demo scale data, technical literature, and process simulations. Study results, translate this information into equipment and process specifications, and provide recommendations for further development, intellectual property opportunities, and improvement opportunities.
Develop process modeling and simulation; physical property analysis, techno-economic modeling and analysis using Aspen Plus, Aspen Hysys, SuperPro, Excel, or other modeling tools.
Lead project teams in the development and execution of project scope, goals, deliverables, resources and timeline in support of business goals, in collaboration with senior management and stakeholders; effectively communicate project expectations, results and status to team members and stakeholders in a timely and clear fashion.
Mentor junior level personnel.
Qualifications & Experience
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required in order satisfactorily perform in this role.
Education
PhD degree in Chemical or Biochemical Engineering, or related field. Candidates with Bachelor’s or Master’s degrees and a minimum of 3 years of relevant industry experience may also be considered.
Experience
3-6 years of industrial experience. Experience in manufacture operation is a plus.
Knowledge Requirements
Expert in industrial process design, development, and optimization, including fermentation and separation.
Experience in separation technology evaluation and selection for diverse bioproducts is desired.
Proficiency in chemical engineering modeling including kinetic models, unit operation models, and process flowsheet models in both steady state and dynamic simulation. Experience using a variety of software tools (Aspen Plus, Aspen Hysys, EDR, SuperPro, Excel, Python, Matlab, Athena Visual Studio, etc.)
Experience in working with P&IDs and PFD’s, process datasheets, and equipment and Isometric drawings.
Strong background in thermodynamics and phase equilibria is a plus
 Competencies
Strong computational ability with strong analytical skills. Attention to details.
Thorough understanding of chemical engineering fundamentals.
Proven ability to communicate the technical requirements of equipment and processes.
Understanding of project management fundamentals.
Strong knowledge in environmental, health and safety (EH&S) and their impact on process design, development and operations.
Ability to elicit cooperation from, and influence a wide variety of individuals, including upper management, internal department heads, and external collaborators & partners.
Strong negotiation and influence skills including working in a matrix organization, under ambiguity and in fast growing businesses.
Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and responsibilities
Work Environment/ Physical Demands
The work environment and physical demands described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
This position involves working primarily in an office setting. Position should be familiar with a process development laboratory setting. The position requires communication with other individuals through a variety of methods. There are no specific lifting requirements. Position may also require traveling to conferences as well as to demonstration and commercial scale chemical plant facilities.
Genomatica is committed to providing exciting career opportunities in an environment that values trust, respect, openness, teamwork, creativity, enthusiasm, and diligence. We strive to create a culture that enables and encourages everyone to bring their whole selves to work. We are committed to be a company where everyone feels they have equal opportunity to reach their potential. Everyone is accepted and appreciated for who they are and what they bring to Genomatica.
We promote the continued development of an inclusive environment that values diversity through Geno4All, our employee led Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) committee. We are looking for innovative, highly motivated, and collaborative people who enjoy the challenges and rewards of a company devoted to commercializing cutting-edge sustainable technology.
Check us out on our LinkedIn Life page. Genomatica is an equal opportunity employer.
Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law.",151.0
102,chemical+engineer,"Engineer - Battery Storage
Corporate Office, 15445 Innovation Dr, San Diego, California, United States of America Req #1307
 Thursday, August 5, 2021
EDF Renewables North America, a subsidiary of EDF Renewables, is a leading North American independent power producer boasting over 30 years of experience across a broad spectrum of services. Our mission is to deliver renewable solutions to lead the transition to a sustainable energy future.
Scope of Position:
The Battery Storage Engineer is responsible for supporting development, engineering, and construction of Battery Energy Storage Systems, BESS. This responsibility includes evaluation of different battery technologies (cell, modules, racks, containers) and their suitability in different company projects. The responsibility also includes management of BESS plants throughout design and construction phases.

Working Conditions:
80% of the time is spent in the office environment utilizing computers (frequent use of MS Word, MS Excel, and MS Project), phones, and general office equipment, and 20% of the time is spent in the field.
Responsibilities:
35% - Serves as subject matter expert on battery technologies. Reviews: battery technology designs, from cell to container level. For areas beyond his/her skill set, responsible for communicating with internal engineering resources, or engaging outside resources as needed. Represents the department in qualification of manufacturing facilities, factory acceptance testing, etc.
35% - Other activities during development, design and construction of BESS projects. Serves as subject matter expert and/or project engineering manager for multiple project aspects; e.g. BESS sizing, inverter sizing, auxiliary power, metering schemes, SCADA design, etc. Develops and controls of project budget, schedule, and risk analysis. Attends weekly conference call with internal EDFR team and all other contractors and suppliers.
20% - Evaluates BESS safety systems such as fire suppression and its effects on battery chemistry. Recognize and help others to understand the code compliances around the chemical or gas facilities for energy storage. Interface with local Authority Having Jurisdiction (AHJ) regarding issues of thermal runaway, off-gassing, fire safety.
5% - Assist other Project Engineering and Construction Managers on other renewable energy projects as required.
5% - Other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
BS in Electrical, Mechanical or Chemical Engineering.
5+ year’s industry experience in Experience in battery technology. Experience with power plant design is a plus.
Extensive and diversified knowledge of relevant codes, standards and engineering principles and practices required to produce safe, efficient, reliable and cost-effective designs
Experienced with various Microsoft software programs including but not limited to Word, Excel, Project, Outlook, and PowerPoint. Knowledgeable of other programs such as AutoCAD, and Adobe Acrobat , Tableau, a plus.
Strong organizational, interpersonal communication and management skills.
Highly motivated, self-starter, ability to work well with others and be a good team player
We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.
Other details
Pay Type Salary",152.0
103,chemical+engineer,"Quidel Corporation is a is a leading manufacturer of diagnostic solutions at the point of care, delivering a continuum of rapid testing technologies that further improve the quality of health care throughout the globe. An innovator for over 40 years in the medical device industry, Quidel pioneered the first FDA-cleared point-of-care test for influenza in 1999 and was the first to market a rapid SARS-CoV-2 antigen test in the U.S. Under trusted brand names Sofia®, Solana®, Lyra®, Triage® and QuickVue®, Quidel’s comprehensive product portfolio includes tests for a wide range of infectious diseases, cardiac and autoimmune biomarkers, as well as a host of products to detect COVID-19. With products made in America, Quidel’s mission is to provide patients with immediate and frequent access to highly accurate, affordable testing for the good of our families, our communities and the world.
This position provides direction and support to the manufacturing and product development areas utilizing industry standard problem-solving skills and acquired scientific/engineering knowledge to resolve manufacturing issues that impact product quality and delivery. Key activities include, but are not limited to, monitoring of current manufacturing processes, reduction of variation, control/mitigation of process drift, leading / supporting troubleshooting investigations, implementing manufacturing process improvements, assessing feasibility of new manufacturing technology, ensuring manufacturing process robustness, revising/creating new documentation for Manufacturing (manufacturing instructions, routings, bills of material, SOPs, etc), validation of new or improved manufacturing processes and equipment and integrating new products from R&D into manufacturing.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Design and implementation and sustainability of manufacturing processes from the laboratory and concept stage through pilot plant and manufacturing scale-up. Emphasis for this role focuses on ensuring proper manufacturability is built into the design
Responsible for identifying and implementing improvements to both day to day operations and high level systematic changes associated with ensuring all processes and functions come together to achieve throughput and quality goals
Identify failure modes in production and drive/complete investigations/implementations from both a “disposition of material” and “systematic improvement” standpoint
Responsible for characterization of relationships between process inputs, outputs and final device performance
Responsible for sourcing and reducing process variability
Monitors process capabilities and performance through standard statistical process control and analysis methods
Coordinates the execution of process studies and ensures that all studies are captured in the department’s repository
Plans, designs, and coordinates biological, chemical, process and equipment capability experiments as they relate to new or existing equipment, processes and devices
Coordinates performance tests for evaluation of processes
Directs the efforts of junior engineering staff on projects or tasks, as necessary
Carries out duties in compliance with established business policies
Perform other duties & projects as assigned
EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering, Life Science, Engineering, related field or equivalent required
Five years of related experience within a cGMP manufacturing environment required. experience is ideally in process development for related types of medical devices utilizing full range of methods and processes cited above, specifically in the biotechnology environment
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong data analysis, troubleshooting, problem solving skills required
Background in practical statistics a plus
Programming, Kinetic Modeling, SPC, Validation, GMP, Quality/FDA experience a plus
Good knowledge of process optimization, scale up and standardization
Good organizational skills, and the ability to manage multiple tasks
Good communication skills, written and verbal
Knowledge of relevant analytical tools (Design of Experiments, Statistical Process Control, Problem Solving)
Knowledge of related quality system regulations and processes
Advanced computer skills; MS Office, Graphing software
Demonstrates commitment to the development, implementation and effectiveness of Quidel Quality Management System per ISO, FDA, and other regulatory agencies.
Understands and is aware of the quality consequences which may occur from the improper performance of their specific job. Has awareness of device defects that may occur in their area of responsibility, including product design, verification and validation, manufacturing and testing activities.
Before you apply, please make sure you share Quidel’ s values. We pride ourselves on keeping these values in mind every day as we execute on goals and plan for the future. We are seeking employees who share the same mindset and commitment to be customer driven, focused on execution, and new product oriented. We succeed by being determined, optimistic team players.

Quidel is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Women/Disabled/Veterans). We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",153.0
104,chemical+engineer,"Title: Fermentation Engineer I/II
Department: Fermentation

Position Summary
Genomatica develops commercial biobased processes to make widely-used chemicals that enable better, more sustainable everyday products . That enables our partners and leading brands to offer better food packaging, auto parts, clothing, tires, carpets, and more.
We’ve commercialized processes for bio-BDO (for plastics) and for biobased butylene glycol (for cosmetics); and our technology drives the world’s first commercial-scale biobased plant for a major intermediate chemical. We’re working on polyamide intermediates (nylon) and on butadiene (tires); and we’re helping numerous companies with their bioprocesses. We have more on the way.
We seek a highly motivated Fermentation Engineer to develop and deploy novel bio-based chemical processes. This position will experimentally develop and deploy scalable fermentation-based production processes. Strong communication skills are a must as this position will interact internally with multiple functional groups and externally with business partners and service providers.
This position is located in San Diego, CA.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Facilitates the design and implementation of bio-based chemical processes from the laboratory through pilot plant to commercial scale-up and technology transfer.
Guide experimental projects to achieve company goals; analyze and present fermentation data; and determine next steps.
Design and execute fermentation experiments at 250 mL – 30L scale in Genomatica’s Precision Fermentation Laboratory.
Interface between multiple functional groups including Fermentation, Analytical, Strain Engineering, Down stream processing, and Systems Bioengineering.
Lead and/or support technology transfer operations at external piloting, tolling, and manufacturing sites.
Participate in process evaluations through the analysis and interpretation of lab and demonstration scale data, technical literature, and process simulations. Translate this information into equipment and process specifications and provide recommendations for further R&D and intellectual property opportunities.
Qualifications & Experience
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required in order satisfactorily perform in this role.
Education
PhD degree in Chemical Engineering, Bioprocess Engineering, or related field, required direct relevant fermentation experience; preferred 2+ years industrial experience.
Experience
Hands on experience operating fermenters at lab scale.
Experience with design, development, optimization, scale-up, and technology transfer of industrial fermentation-based production processes.
Experience developing microbial fermentation processes, preferably with E. coli .
Advanced process modeling capabilities (Excel, Python, Aspen, etc.).
Strong mechanical aptitude and knowledge of bioreactor control hardware/software.
Proven ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.
Strong analytical skills, attention to detail, and strong computer skills (Microsoft Office, etc.).
Knowledge requirements and competencies
Excellent organizational and prioritization skills with the ability to handle multiple projects at once
Must be flexible and able to work well in a dynamic environment
Able to interact with comfortably, confidently, and professionally with all levels of the organization and external parties
Strong background in microbial physiology preferably for E. coli
Strong chemical engineering fundamentals and application of those to bioprocesses
Desire to learn new skill set
Able to translate complex technical concepts to broader audiences
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Thrives in a collaborative diverse team environment with multiple functional groups
Work Environment/ Physical Demands
The work environment and physical demands described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Working in a lab will bring exposure to typical laboratory hazards.
Ability to travel to current and prospective partner sites (typically less than 25%, with periods of higher frequency).
Genomatica is committed to providing exciting career opportunities in an environment that values trust, respect, openness, teamwork, creativity, enthusiasm, and diligence. We strive to create a culture that enables and encourages everyone to bring their whole selves to work. We are committed to be a company where everyone feels they have equal opportunity to reach their potential. Everyone is accepted and appreciated for who they are and what they bring to Genomatica.
We promote the continued development of an inclusive environment that values diversity through Geno4All, our employee led Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) committee. We are looking for innovative, highly motivated, and collaborative people who enjoy the challenges and rewards of a company devoted to commercializing cutting-edge sustainable technology.
Check us out on our LinkedIn Life page. Genomatica is an equal opportunity employer.
Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law.",154.0
105,chemical+engineer,"The Role
Tesla is looking for a highly motivated battery electrode engineer to develop disruptive cutting-edge electrode technology. This role will explore, evaluate and qualify new battery material, and develop and optimize battery electrode designs and processes within a cross-functional cell engineering team. In this role, you will work closely with many organizations both internal and external to Tesla, taking new battery materials from early stage concept to mass volume production scale.
The battery cell technology is very critical that enables Tesla electric vehicles and energy storage systems are more efficient and reliable. This role will work on the project that make significant impact to accomplish our goals and contribute to our core technologies and products. The work environment is demanding, fast-paced, incredibly exciting and highly rewarding. The ideal candidate should be ready to push their limits, as they join in highly motivated and capable team to make unbelievable things real.
Responsibilities
Lead the battery electrode and process development for advanced high energy density Li ion battery
Design and assess new electrode material in lab scale process and
Conduct systematic processing experiments using electrode formulations as defined by the materials engineering team to identify key parameters for control over product quality and electrochemical performance
Analyze electrode performances and determine their relationship with materials and process parameters then take independent steps to iterate on process improvement to reach target cell performance specifications
Document electrode processing parameters and communicate key learnings to cross-functional teams to enable transition towards production development
Work with manufacturing team to bring up mass production plant
Work in the laboratory/shop environment with analytical equipment (CV, SEM, TGA, FTIR, DSC, optical microscope, data logger, thermal sensing devices, voltmeter, oscilloscope, etc.)
Read and review technology proceedings and papers to broaden knowledge, project future trends and propose directions in energy storage technology development
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities Requirements:
BS degree or higher in Materials Science & Engineering, Chemical Engineer, or Industrial Engineer.
Ability to design and execute new material evaluation and define the correlation between material property and electrode performance
Ability to identify root-causes and conduct troubleshooting to solve issues
Strong academic and scientific background in electrochemistry or applied electrochemistry or electrochemical engineering
Broad knowledge and R&D experience on energy storage materials required
Strong experience in material characterization and analytical technique required
Excellent verbal and written communication, and detailed documentation skills
Skilled at managing multiple projects and priorities simultaneously and ability to independently execute those priorities
Self-motivated and a self-starter with hands-on skills
Team oriented attitude required",156.0
106,chemical+engineer,"Title: Fermentation Engineer I/II
Department: Fermentation

Position Summary
Genomatica develops commercial biobased processes to make widely-used chemicals that enable better, more sustainable everyday products . That enables our partners and leading brands to offer better food packaging, auto parts, clothing, tires, carpets, and more.
We’ve commercialized processes for bio-BDO (for plastics) and for biobased butylene glycol (for cosmetics); and our technology drives the world’s first commercial-scale biobased plant for a major intermediate chemical. We’re working on polyamide intermediates (nylon) and on butadiene (tires); and we’re helping numerous companies with their bioprocesses. We have more on the way.
We seek a highly motivated Fermentation Engineer to develop and deploy novel bio-based chemical processes. This position will experimentally develop and deploy scalable fermentation-based production processes. Strong communication skills are a must as this position will interact internally with multiple functional groups and externally with business partners and service providers.
This position is located in San Diego, CA.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Facilitates the design and implementation of bio-based chemical processes from the laboratory through pilot plant to commercial scale-up and technology transfer.
Guide experimental projects to achieve company goals; analyze and present fermentation data; and determine next steps.
Design and execute fermentation experiments at 250 mL – 30L scale in Genomatica’s Precision Fermentation Laboratory.
Interface between multiple functional groups including Fermentation, Analytical, Strain Engineering, Down stream processing, and Systems Bioengineering.
Lead and/or support technology transfer operations at external piloting, tolling, and manufacturing sites.
Participate in process evaluations through the analysis and interpretation of lab and demonstration scale data, technical literature, and process simulations. Translate this information into equipment and process specifications and provide recommendations for further R&D and intellectual property opportunities.
Qualifications & Experience
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required in order satisfactorily perform in this role.
Education
PhD degree in Chemical Engineering, Bioprocess Engineering, or related field, required direct relevant fermentation experience; preferred 2+ years industrial experience.
Experience
Hands on experience operating fermenters at lab scale.
Experience with design, development, optimization, scale-up, and technology transfer of industrial fermentation-based production processes.
Experience developing microbial fermentation processes, preferably with E. coli .
Advanced process modeling capabilities (Excel, Python, Aspen, etc.).
Strong mechanical aptitude and knowledge of bioreactor control hardware/software.
Proven ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.
Strong analytical skills, attention to detail, and strong computer skills (Microsoft Office, etc.).
Knowledge requirements and competencies
Excellent organizational and prioritization skills with the ability to handle multiple projects at once
Must be flexible and able to work well in a dynamic environment
Able to interact with comfortably, confidently, and professionally with all levels of the organization and external parties
Strong background in microbial physiology preferably for E. coli
Strong chemical engineering fundamentals and application of those to bioprocesses
Desire to learn new skill set
Able to translate complex technical concepts to broader audiences
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Thrives in a collaborative diverse team environment with multiple functional groups
Work Environment/ Physical Demands
The work environment and physical demands described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Working in a lab will bring exposure to typical laboratory hazards.
Ability to travel to current and prospective partner sites (typically less than 25%, with periods of higher frequency).
Genomatica is committed to providing exciting career opportunities in an environment that values trust, respect, openness, teamwork, creativity, enthusiasm, and diligence. We strive to create a culture that enables and encourages everyone to bring their whole selves to work. We are committed to be a company where everyone feels they have equal opportunity to reach their potential. Everyone is accepted and appreciated for who they are and what they bring to Genomatica.
We promote the continued development of an inclusive environment that values diversity through Geno4All, our employee led Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) committee. We are looking for innovative, highly motivated, and collaborative people who enjoy the challenges and rewards of a company devoted to commercializing cutting-edge sustainable technology.
Check us out on our LinkedIn Life page. Genomatica is an equal opportunity employer.
Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law.",158.0
107,chemical+engineer,"Summary:
The fluidic systems engineer is part of the Illumina product development team creating new industry-leading genetic analysis platforms for life sciences and clinical markets. You will work in a very interdisciplinary team environment to develop industry-leading genetic analysis instrumentation and device products.
Primary responsibilities of this position include fluidic architecture innovation, design implementation, metrology development, recipe/workflow optimization, and systems integration in both integrated consumables and instruments utilizing novel reagents and chemistry. This candidate should be highly motivated to work cross-functionally in the ecosystem of fluidics, optics, precision motion, and biochemistry, and embrace role changes throughout the whole product development process from early conceptualization to commercialization and manufacturing transfer. This candidate should be capable of leading functional initiatives or project teams to achieve milestones and targets.
Responsibilities:
Lead innovation of fluidic architecture design and down selection to meet system-level requirements and specifications
Drive design implementation of fluidic ecosystem with optimal engineering tradeoffs
Drive critical parameter management and risk management process to achieve high robustness, reliability, and lifetime performance
Work in a multidisciplinary team to bridge fluidic performance to data quality, output, and turnaround time through performance models and budget
Provide engineering judgement calls with limited data
Lead cross-functional technical teams to troubleshoot complex fluidic system issues, develop metrology tools, identify root causes, and implement corrective actions
Lead the selection and qualification of critical suppliers/partners for both prototyping and manufacturing
Lead functional initiatives to cultivate fluidics engineer best practice in the organization
Education and Experience:
M.S. or PhD in Bioengineering, Applied Physics, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field
Proven track record of minimum one full product development learning cycle from conceptualization to commercialization and manufacturing ramp up
Requirements:
Experience in the development of innovative fluidic systems or components for commercial products
Conduct first-principle and Computational Fluid Dynamics (CFD) analyses to characterize fluid flows to guide design and implementation
Experience in characterization and testing of complex fluidic systems, including design of experiments and root cause analysis, with a track record of leading an investigation team to drive to resolutions
Good understanding of critical parameter management workflow and risk management process
Experience in supplier management, familiar with the process of SOW, RFP, and RFQ
Experience in reliability test design and protocol
Strong statistical analysis skills, using tools such as Excel and JMP to interpret and visualize data
Demonstrated leadership ability to work collaboratively across disciplines
Excellent oral and written communication/presentation skills
Experience in development of biomedical instrument or device is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",159.0
108,chemical+engineer,"Title: Process Modeling Engineer I/II
Department: Process Development
Position Summary
Genomatica develops commercial biobased processes to make widely-used chemicals that enable better, more sustainable everyday products . That enables our partners and leading brands to offer better food packaging, auto parts, clothing, tires, carpets, and more.
We’ve commercialized processes for bio-BDO (for plastics) and for biobased butylene glycol (for cosmetics); and our technology drives the world’s first commercial-scale biobased plant for a major intermediate chemical. We’re working on polyamide intermediates (nylon) and on butadiene (tires); and we’re helping numerous companies with their bioprocesses. We have more on the way.
We seek a highly motivated Process Modeling Engineer to provide bioprocess design and flowsheet modeling expertise for the development of novel biobased chemical processes. This position will work within our process development and modeling team, interface with R&D, licensing, business, and commercial functions to develop and evaluate novel bioprocess technology. Strong communication skills are a must, as this position will interact internally with multiple functions and externally with current and prospective partners and separation technology companies. Candidates who can demonstrate previous high performance modeling industrial fermentation and downstream processes are desired. This position is located in San Diego, CA.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Lead the development of process flowsheet modeling for the development and commercialization of bioprocess technologies. This includes process modeling and simulation; techno-economic modeling and analysis using AspenPlus, SuperPro, Excel, or other modeling tools.
Serve as internal Subject Matter Expert on process flow sheet modeling and physical properties
Lead physical property analysis and modeling for bioprocess design, modeling and development.
Support the development of technology transfer package, support technology transfer, scale up activities, and pilot and demonstration campaigns.
Perform heat and material balance analysis for pilot, demo, and commercial plant and analyze the results. Develop and validate simulation models to identify the issues and propose solution for further improvement, troubleshooting, or optimized operation of the commercial plant.
Interact with licensing, business and commercial functions to incorporate feedback from internal and external stakeholders, partners, licensees, and separation technology companies into bioprocess development and designs.
Participate in the analysis and interpretation of lab, pilot and demo scale data, technical literature, and process simulations. Study results, translate this information into equipment and process specifications, and provide recommendations for further development, intellectual property opportunities, and improvement opportunities.
Qualifications & Experience
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required in order satisfactorily perform in this role.
Education
PhD degree in Chemical or Biochemical Engineering, or related field and a minimum of 2yrs of relevant industry experience. Candidates with Bachelor’s or Master’s degrees and a minimum of 5 years of relevant industry experience will also be considered.
Experience
Greater than 2 years of industry experience.
Knowledge Requirements
Expert in industrial process flowsheet modeling in both steady stage and dynamic simulations using a variety of software tools (Aspen, Hysys, SuperPro, Excel etc.)
Expert in thermodynamic and physical properties for industrial processes, bioproduction processes a plus
Experience in the development and optimization of industrial bioproduction process including fermentation and separation.
Experience with oleochemical processing and purification is desired.
Proficiency in chemical engineering modeling including unit operation models, kinetic models, and fluid dynamics analysis
Experience in modeling separation processes including filtration, centrifugation and chromatography is a plus.
Competencies
Strong computational ability with strong analytical skills. Attention to details.
Thorough understanding of basic chemical engineering principles.
Proven ability to communicate the technical requirements of equipment and processes.
Understanding of project management fundamentals.
Strong knowledge in environmental, health and safety (EH&S) and their impact on process design and operations.
Ability to elicit cooperation from, and influence a wide variety of individuals, including upper management, internal department heads, and external collaborators & partners.
Strong negotiation and influence skills including working in a matrix organization, under ambiguity and in fast growing businesses.
Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and responsibilities
Work Environment/ Physical Demands
The work environment and physical demands described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Genomatica is committed to providing exciting career opportunities in an environment that values trust, respect, openness, teamwork, creativity, enthusiasm, and diligence. We strive to create a culture that enables and encourages everyone to bring their whole selves to work. We are committed to be a company where everyone feels they have equal opportunity to reach their potential. Everyone is accepted and appreciated for who they are and what they bring to Genomatica.
We promote the continued development of an inclusive environment that values diversity through Geno4All, our employee led Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI) committee. We are looking for innovative, highly motivated, and collaborative people who enjoy the challenges and rewards of a company devoted to commercializing cutting-edge sustainable technology.
Check us out on our LinkedIn Life page. Genomatica is an equal opportunity employer.
Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law.",160.0
109,chemical+engineer,"Cue Health Inc. is seeking to hire a full-time Quality Engineer , Bioproduction to provide expertise in quality engineering for the, manufacturing, design and development of bioproduction processes for Cue Health’s in-vitro diagnostic medical device. This role will ensure compliance of the Design History File, the manufacturing process from incoming inspection to Cue Health’s product release and maintenance of the Risk Assessment process.
Reporting to the Senior Manager of Quality Engineering, the Quality Engineer will assist with implementation and maintenance of the Quality Management System (QMS) processes related to design and manufacturing while ensuring conformance to FDA and international regulations and standards. They will work closely with management and cross-functional leaders concerning projects, operational decisions, and scheduling requirements and will conduct briefings and technical meetings for internal and external representatives. Alternate work schedule for this role is Mon-Th, 4X10 hr shifts, 6am start, 4 days off each week.
Responsibilities:
Provides compliance oversight of the various site Quality tools / systems to maintain an effective, compliant, and validated system as per ISO 13485, ISO14971, 21CFR820, 21CFR809, applicable regulatory requirements and Cue Health’s Quality Policy.
Contribute to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Quality System.
Development and documentation of quality plans, processes, procedures, and work instructions.
Ensure compliance of Quality activities for receiving inspection and test, manufacturing process control, nonconforming material, review of design history files and final product release as it relates to the Bioproduction processes.
Provide quality support for marketed products including establish and maintain product quality measures, change orders, planned deviations, corrective and preventive action, and contribute to improvements.
Provide quality support to the product development effort including establish product quality requirements and review of component, assembly, system, equipment qualification documents, and stability reports.
Responsible for input to product risk management system; plans, hazard analysis and FMEA / FMECA with the requirements of ISO14971.
Interface with production teams to provide guidance on supplier qualifications related to design and manufacturing activities and SCARs related to these suppliers.
Perform product failure investigations and facilitate required corrective / preventive actions.
Produce/maintain metrics and/or reports on all activities as required.
Provide training or mentoring to other teams to elevate efficiencies and facilitate compliance to the product development and manufacturing processes.
Support the Quality Assurance Manager for complaints investigation and Quality audits related to design and manufacturing.
Perform other quality related tasks to meet company goal as required.
Requirements:
Knowledgeable of Quality system principles; FDA Quality System Regulation (cGMP); 21CFR820, 21CFR809, ISO 13485 Quality system standards for medical device, IS014971 Risk Management Systems required
Experience in technical transfer and product development in a regulated environment, including design control, hazard analysis, validation, and process metrics
Ability to work with development engineers and other functional group personnel to accomplish common goals
Experience with quality systems and processes as they relate to GMP manufacturing
Detail oriented, with good written and verbal English communication skills
Computer literate in word processing, spreadsheets, databases, and other quality related productivity programs
Application of statistical techniques for quality assurance
BS in a Biomedical Engineering, Chemistry, Life Sciences or equivalent field
5+ years quality engineering experience in the product design of medical or IVD products and/or manufacturing
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic, environment
You will work in a office environment . Your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in the technology, health and diagnostic industry. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a collaborative team on an innovative device. We offer upgraded computer equipment, unlimited snacks, competitive salary.",161.0
110,chemical+engineer,"Project Manager
Company Description:
Anaergia is a global leader in the production of clean energy, fertilizer and recycled water from virtually any waste stream, offering the widest range of maximizing resource recovery solutions for the municipal, industrial, commercial and agricultural markets. Anaergia’s integrated solutions create value for its customers in the forms of renewable energy, quality fertilizers and clean water, while dramatically reducing the cost of waste management. Anaergia delivers integrated solutions globally through established offices in North America, Europe, Africa, and Asia and its breakthrough technologies are in use at over a thousand resource recovery facilities worldwide, reducing greenhouse gas emissions while creating new revenue sources for its clients.
Job Description:
This role reports to the Director of Project Execution
Project Manager Goals
o Meet/improve the as sold project budget
o Meet/improve the as sold project schedule
o Achieve/exceed the Customer expectations/satisfaction
o Develop and submit the agreed documents and reporting within the agreed time
o Manage job’s risks by a proper identification and mitigation plan
o Manage opportunities to grow project’s revenues and GPs


Project Manager Tasks
o Read and understand the contractual terms to consistently deliver the supply in compliance with all the contractual obligations;
o Early identification of project risks for and early adoption of appropriate countermeasures;
o Manage the relationship with customer under any aspect, including in-out official correspondence, calling/attending meetings, minor contractual changes
o Manage sub-contractors, suppliers and purchasing processes;
o Lead the resources appointed to the job, ensuring timely and consistent deliveries;
o Organization of project team including leadership, setting of priorities and dates, conflict management, team motivation
o Ensure coordination and communication within the project team;
o Comply to the “reporting plan” sending requested reports in the requested date with reliable data;
o Create and update the Job Schedule on a regular basis.
o Support sales department with contract negotiation, contract closure and time schedules
o Understand all applicable local regulations and communicate to project team
o Ensure project team adheres to QA/QC plan
o The Project Manager is authorized to:
 Sign job’s correspondence to Customers and Vendors
 Sign POs within DOA’s limits;
 Authorize per project related function’s budget for labor, T&L within the limits set by DOA.
Responsible for the rigorous application of the company rules regarding the project development, the accuracy of reported data and the respect of the contractual/agreed deadlines.


Job Requirements:
Education: Holds a technical diploma or graduation in: Civil Engineering / Mechanical engineering/ Electrical Engineering/ Chemical Engineering or equivalent
Experience: Mature experience as Project Manager in the Industrial Plant business.

Competencies:
The PM has the following technical skillsets:
Deeply understands and is able to manage contracts for supplying complex plants;Understands risk assessment and mitigationIs experienced in managing relationship with the Customers;Is experienced in leading and coordinating the assigned resources;Is knowledgeable in project administration;Ability to create and manage detailed job schedules;Is experienced in the procurement process;Cross Functional competenceSoild Waste / Wastewater / Biogas / Power Generation specific competences.Fluent in English.
For additional information on Anaergia, please visit www.anaergia.com

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Anaergia provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, Anaergia will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",163.0
111,chemical+engineer,"Job Description:
We have unique opportunities and are always looking for exceptional talent. Join a company where you will have an opportunity to grow professionally and personally and give strength to others by Empowering Healing.
The Process Development Engineer II supports both current and new product development projects and is responsible to assist in designing and developing manufacturing processes to optimize capacity, materials, and process flow with the aim of reducing variability within the processes, reducing cost, and improving operating capabilities. Main objective is to identify, develop, and verify processes from early developmental to implementation into manufacturing.
Process Development Engineer will work cross functionally with engineers, scientists, production employees, management, Research & Development, Quality Assurance, Quality Control, and Regulatory Affairs to ensure processes and designs meet the end users needs.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Working individually or in a team setting assist in development of new processes, executing PD studies, running lab assays, documenting changes, and writing SOPs.
Preparing protocols, reports, summaries, and quantitative analyses of basic experiments.
Collaborate with external suppliers of production materials and equipment, and analytic test lab contracts to conduct testing of materials.
Projects may require investigating scientific literature in conjunction with selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions that apply to ongoing project work.
Projects may also require familiarity with cGMP and/or GLP processing.
The individual will also be responsible for general laboratory maintenance (cleaning, ordering materials, making assemblies, monitoring equipment, etc.).


Bachelor's Degree in Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or Bioengineering required.
2-5 years of related industry experience required.
Experience using AutoCAD and/or Solidworks is preferred.
Experience with statistical analysis, and knowledge of statistics software (such as Minitab) is preferred.
Experience in medical device design and application of test standards.
Experience working in a hands-on environment, building and setting up equipment.
Demonstrates an understanding of analysis and interpretation of moderately complex experimental data with proficiency in problem solving and protocol refinement.
Effective communicator (written and verbal), especially within their area(s) of expertise. Ability to participate and discuss data or various topics at team meetings. May be required to present findings to team.
Experience working in a GMP environment/medical device industry.
Good computing skills including Microsoft office.
Familiarity working with cell based aseptic processes is desirable.",164.0
112,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary
We are looking for a highly talented metrology engineer to be a part of the Consumable Characterization team within the Integrated Devices engineering group. A candidate with facility in experimental techniques, statistical methods, data analysis , and programming/scripting languages will be considered. A successful candidate will work in a fast pace d, multidisciplinary environment to create consumable devices that enable next generation sequencing products.
Responsibilities:
Support a wide range of consumable development efforts, including demonstrating the viability of new designs, evaluating process changes/improvements, and resolving urgent issues with on-market products . This may initially be in the area s of nanofabrication and surface chemistry but has the potential to also extend to other consumable technologies.
Engage in development efforts with statistically rigorous experimental design and data analysis . This role has a s pecific e mphasis on supporting investigations through laboratory measurements and data aggregation .
Evaluate , optimize, and introduce new measurement systems to consumable research and development teams .
Actively participate in transferring characterization tools to consumables manufacturing , including demonstrating tool robustness, designing prototype measurement workflows, and training manufacturing process engineers to own systems after transfer
Requirements:
Illumina Integrated Devices group has a strong culture of mentoring. Interested applicants with a strong background conducting quantitative studies with some combination of the skills listed below are encouraged to apply even if all requirements are not met .
Experience with standard nanoscience characterization methods (SEM, AFM, optical microscopy, etc. )
Experience with standard w et lab techniques ( including the handling and preparation of solid, liquid, or thin film samples )
Comfortable working and communicating across disciplines as applicants will often be balancing inputs from consumable design, process , fabrication, and chemistry teams
Experience with statistical analysis (ANOVA, variance component analysis, gage R & R analysis)
Experience with at least one scripting or programming language (python, R , C++, etc )
Experience with image analysis ( imageJ , OpenCV, or similar)
Industry experience with nanofabrication or semiconductor characterization a plus
Experience
BS or MS with 0-2+ years of experience in a field closely aligned with materials chemistry, nanofabrication, or device physics (Biomedical Engineering, Physical Chemistry, Applied Physics, Materials Science, Chemical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Biophysics )
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",165.0
113,chemical+engineer,"The Senior Quality Engineer will be responsible for developing the Quality controls to support the transfer of products from R&D to manufacturing, and the subsequent ongoing sustaining functions necessary to ensure product quality. This position will work with minimum supervision to develop and implement the appropriate quality methods, acceptance criteria and qualification plans for product release to manufacturing. This role will develop raw material quality control points and support supplier qualifications to ensure raw material consistency. This is a cross-functional role that will frequently interact with management to provide technical assistance related to product expectations, failure analysis and other quality considerations. This role is also required to demonstrate a heightened sense of urgency in resolving matters related to quality and contribute positively in a fast-paced operations environment.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Participate in product design efforts to ensure that quality considerations are incorporated into design components and that the designs are compatible with quality test methods. Evaluate product and process designs for adequacy as related to field performance and manufacturability.Develop quality control strategies for raw materials and support supplier qualifications to ensure material consistency.Support stability studies of new materials new products, and changes as needed.Maintain design control and provide phase deliverables as requiredPerform statistical analysis for experiments and process trend monitoring to support the development of production metrics.Lead complex root cause failure investigation and troubleshooting of customer complaints and product non-conformances within manufacturing.Participate in Complaint Committee meetings and present investigation findings to peers and management.Participate in project team meetings and communicate readiness for product launch.Monitor field complaint data to evaluate new product performance and the impact of changesEducation and ExperienceB.S. in Engineering/Chemistry/Biology/Technical Discipline or equivalent combination of certification and work experience preferred6-8 years’ experience in Quality and Manufacturing Systems in Medical Device and high-volume manufacturing environments requiredMinimum 3 years’ experience in New Product introductions preferredASQ Quality Engineer Certification (CQE) preferredKnowledge/SkillsQuality Engineering skills which includes FMEA, Control Plans, Acceptance criteria, Sampling Plans.Strong technical aptitude and experience (preferably in engineering, chemistry, biology or other life sciences field) is a must.Quality Tools – Problem Solving Methodologies/Process Capability / ISO 13485 / Design of Experiments.Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of employees throughout the organizationAbility to develop and maintain strong working relationships with internal and external customers proficient in Microsoft Office, statistical software programs, operating systems, voice and email, etc.Ability to lead and facilitate a group of technical experts in root cause investigationsKnowledge of quality systems and regulations for medical device industry.High level of technical writing ability and excellent communication skills are requiredAdvanced skills in statistical techniques and quality tools is requiredUnderstanding of medical device Quality System Regulations (QSR) is requiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Remotely:No",167.0
114,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary
We are looking for a highly talented metrology engineer to be a part of the Consumable Characterization team within the Integrated Devices engineering group. A candidate with facility in experimental techniques, statistical methods, data analysis , and programming/scripting languages will be considered. A successful candidate will work in a fast pace d, multidisciplinary environment to create consumable devices that enable next generation sequencing products.
Responsibilities:
Support a wide range of consumable development efforts, including demonstrating the viability of new designs, evaluating process changes/improvements, and resolving urgent issues with on-market products . This may initially be in the area s of nanofabrication and surface chemistry but has the potential to also extend to other consumable technologies.
Engage in development efforts with statistically rigorous experimental design and data analysis . This role has a s pecific e mphasis on supporting investigations through laboratory measurements and data aggregation .
Evaluate , optimize, and introduce new measurement systems to consumable research and development teams .
Actively participate in transferring characterization tools to consumables manufacturing , including demonstrating tool robustness, designing prototype measurement workflows, and training manufacturing process engineers to own systems after transfer
Requirements:
Illumina Integrated Devices group has a strong culture of mentoring. Interested applicants with a strong background conducting quantitative studies with some combination of the skills listed below are encouraged to apply even if all requirements are not met .
Experience with standard nanoscience characterization methods (SEM, AFM, optical microscopy, etc. )
Experience with standard w et lab techniques ( including the handling and preparation of solid, liquid, or thin film samples )
Comfortable working and communicating across disciplines as applicants will often be balancing inputs from consumable design, process , fabrication, and chemistry teams
Experience with statistical analysis (ANOVA, variance component analysis, gage R & R analysis)
Experience with at least one scripting or programming language (python, R , C++, etc )
Experience with image analysis ( imageJ , OpenCV, or similar)
Industry experience with nanofabrication or semiconductor characterization a plus
Experience
BS or MS with 0-2+ years of experience in a field closely aligned with materials chemistry, nanofabrication, or device physics (Biomedical Engineering, Physical Chemistry, Applied Physics, Materials Science, Chemical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Biophysics )
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",169.0
115,chemical+engineer,"Summary:
The fluidic systems engineer is part of the Illumina product development team creating new industry-leading genetic analysis platforms for life sciences and clinical markets. You will work in a very interdisciplinary team environment to develop industry-leading genetic analysis instrumentation and device products.
Primary responsibilities of this position include fluidic architecture innovation, design implementation, metrology development, recipe/workflow optimization, and systems integration in both integrated consumables and instruments utilizing novel reagents and chemistry. This candidate should be highly motivated to work cross-functionally in the ecosystem of fluidics, optics, precision motion, and biochemistry, and embrace role changes throughout the whole product development process from early conceptualization to commercialization and manufacturing transfer. This candidate should be capable of leading functional initiatives or project teams to achieve milestones and targets.
Responsibilities:
Lead innovation of fluidic architecture design and down selection to meet system-level requirements and specifications
Drive design implementation of fluidic ecosystem with optimal engineering tradeoffs
Drive critical parameter management and risk management process to achieve high robustness, reliability, and lifetime performance
Work in a multidisciplinary team to bridge fluidic performance to data quality, output, and turnaround time through performance models and budget
Provide engineering judgement calls with limited data
Lead cross-functional technical teams to troubleshoot complex fluidic system issues, develop metrology tools, identify root causes, and implement corrective actions
Lead the selection and qualification of critical suppliers/partners for both prototyping and manufacturing
Lead functional initiatives to cultivate fluidics engineer best practice in the organization
Education and Experience:
M.S. or PhD in Bioengineering, Applied Physics, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Systems Engineering or related field
Proven track record of minimum one full product development learning cycle from conceptualization to commercialization and manufacturing ramp up
Requirements:
Experience in the development of innovative fluidic systems or components for commercial products
Conduct first-principle and Computational Fluid Dynamics (CFD) analyses to characterize fluid flows to guide design and implementation
Experience in characterization and testing of complex fluidic systems, including design of experiments and root cause analysis, with a track record of leading an investigation team to drive to resolutions
Good understanding of critical parameter management workflow and risk management process
Experience in supplier management, familiar with the process of SOW, RFP, and RFQ
Experience in reliability test design and protocol
Strong statistical analysis skills, using tools such as Excel and JMP to interpret and visualize data
Demonstrated leadership ability to work collaboratively across disciplines
Excellent oral and written communication/presentation skills
Experience in development of biomedical instrument or device is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",170.0
116,chemical+engineer,"THIS POSITION COULD BE LOCATED IN EITHER CORVALLIS OR SAN DIEGO
BUSINESS ENVIRONMENT
HP is a proven leader in personal systems and printing, delivering innovations that empower people to create, interact, and inspire like never before. We leverage our strong financial position to extend our leadership in traditional markets and invest in exciting new technologies.
HP has an impressive portfolio and strong innovation pipeline across areas such as:
3D, consumer, office, large format, and industrial printing
Blended reality technology
Tablets, notebooks
Mobile workstations
The GCT (Graphics and Chemistry Technology) lab, which is part of MTO (Microfluidics Technology & Operations), is an exciting and dynamic organization focused on developing technology for multiple internal partners that deliver winning products to the marketplace. The lab is pushing many technology vectors, including thermal inkjet print-head, LEP technology, ink and its components, writing systems & system integration, large- and small-format media, and media primers. These activities range from on-program efforts to off-cycle activities, pushing the technical capabilities of printing for future product embodiments. The market areas that the GCT lab supports also include a diverse and exciting portfolio, balancing core market segment (Signage and Display, Graphics/Technical Production, Indigo, Publishing) with growth (Packaging, Textiles, Synthetic Media) opportunities. The broad range of technologies and markets provide staff members with diverse opportunities to work in exciting technical areas, with multiple opportunities for career development.
JOB DESCRIPTION
GCT R&D Writing Systems Engineers are responsible for enabling new product introductions and/or technology development according to the Technology Development Process or Product Development Process lifecycle per plan of record scope and schedule. As a Writing System Engineer, job responsibilities will include developing system solutions to enable proper ink/media interactions, printhead performance, and maximizing image quality (IQ), reliability, and/or durability through the optimal integration of a diverse set of system technologies obtained from development partners (ink, media, silicon/fluidics, firmware, hardware).
This position will be responsible for developing and maintaining testbed systems and prototype printer testing hardware. Responsibilities include discovering, owning and resolving issues with the testbed and prototype systems as well as working closely with integration engineers developing print heads, supplies, and ink. The Writing Systems Integration group spans across engineering disciplines to ensure that the printer design implemented will meet customer’s needs. Some specifics are:
Provide an optimized design to achieve product performance and reliability through iterative, integrated development, testing, and evaluation of various printer system components: print head, ink, media, printer mechanism, ink cartridge, service station, print mode, ink delivery system.
Understand the fundamentals of the design to deliver outstanding print quality, characterize the product, and be able to provide data to validate product performance.
Key tactics include: testbed setup, understanding printers, understanding control software, troubleshooting, debugging, and driving improvements in design and manufacturing.
Partner with the design teams, printer divisions, and manufacturing to ensure robust product design, reliability, and performance.
Document and transfer specifications, justifications, and knowledge to our manufacturing partners to assure a robust product for the whole product life cycle.
Position may require interaction with HP internal and external partners.
Travel to partner printer divisions, external suppliers, and off-shore HP sites may be required.
QUALIFICATION (Experience & Skills)
Masters/Bachelor’s degree candidates in Mechanical, Electrical, or Chemical Engineering (or related engineering discipline), or equivalent experience.
Experience: More than 3 years of experience performing system development testing, quality testing, or reliability testing in a fast-paced, industrial R&D environment.
Good analytical and problem-solving skills. Knowledge of statistics and statistical packages (MATLAB, JMP, Weibull++).
Understanding of thermal properties of materials, fluidics, electrical systems, software or scripting, control systems, and/or heat transfer.
Good written and verbal communication skills; mastery in English and local language.
Previous printer development experienced is highly preferred.
Collaborates with peers. Strong interpersonal relationship, teamwork, and excellent communication skills.
Typically partners and interacts with high-level Individual Contributors.
Support projects requiring mechanical and/or thermal development and/or reliability testing.
Documents findings in reports and shares conclusions with project team.
Ability to exercise independent judgment, work within defined policies and practices. Determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives.
Exhibit solid planning, organizational and documentation skills.
COMMENTS
Job may require some traveling to other HP sites.
Possibility of Relocation benefits.
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",171.0
117,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented (Lead) Staff, Process Engineers to join and help lead our Site Transfer team. The Site Transfer group works as an integral part of our NPI Launch Pad and is tasked with technical assessments and CMO management to ensure seamless product components transfer and adequate capacity to meet the demand for Illumina.
Responsibilities:
Participate in technical assessment for CMO's capability and capacity to manufacture components for products.
Work closely with CMO to troubleshoot process issues related to yield, quality and throughput.
Review and approve controlled experiments (including DOE's) at CMO site to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions into a production environment to meet project goals.
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations.
Work cross functionally with Supply Chain, Manufacturing and Quality to develop processes for new products and improve processes of existing products.
Represent Operations needs on development teams.
Define technical requirements and write procedures for Production to process product.
Work on teams to develop and transfer new processes/products to production and enhance their robustness.
Requirements:
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or semiconductor industries is desirable.
Experience in synthetic chemistry or oligonucleotide synthesis is desirable.
Experience working in an ISO13485 or FDA certified environment is a plus.
Experience in high-volume production in a high-tech consumables industry is a plus.
Experience in production support and/or process development is desirable.
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is required.
High level problem solving, troubleshooting and reasoning skills are required.
Experience with product development processes and project management skills are a plus.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is desirable.
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills are required.
Experience working with suppliers, vendors, and CMO's.

Education:
B.S./M.S./ PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics or MS/PhD in Materials Science or Physical Chemistry, with 10+ years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",172.0
118,chemical+engineer,"Project Manager
Company Description:
Anaergia is a global leader in the production of clean energy, fertilizer and recycled water from virtually any waste stream, offering the widest range of maximizing resource recovery solutions for the municipal, industrial, commercial and agricultural markets. Anaergia’s integrated solutions create value for its customers in the forms of renewable energy, quality fertilizers and clean water, while dramatically reducing the cost of waste management. Anaergia delivers integrated solutions globally through established offices in North America, Europe, Africa, and Asia and its breakthrough technologies are in use at over a thousand resource recovery facilities worldwide, reducing greenhouse gas emissions while creating new revenue sources for its clients.
Job Description:
This role reports to the Director of Project Execution
Project Manager Goals
o Meet/improve the as sold project budget
o Meet/improve the as sold project schedule
o Achieve/exceed the Customer expectations/satisfaction
o Develop and submit the agreed documents and reporting within the agreed time
o Manage job’s risks by a proper identification and mitigation plan
o Manage opportunities to grow project’s revenues and GPs


Project Manager Tasks
o Read and understand the contractual terms to consistently deliver the supply in compliance with all the contractual obligations;
o Early identification of project risks for and early adoption of appropriate countermeasures;
o Manage the relationship with customer under any aspect, including in-out official correspondence, calling/attending meetings, minor contractual changes
o Manage sub-contractors, suppliers and purchasing processes;
o Lead the resources appointed to the job, ensuring timely and consistent deliveries;
o Organization of project team including leadership, setting of priorities and dates, conflict management, team motivation
o Ensure coordination and communication within the project team;
o Comply to the “reporting plan” sending requested reports in the requested date with reliable data;
o Create and update the Job Schedule on a regular basis.
o Support sales department with contract negotiation, contract closure and time schedules
o Understand all applicable local regulations and communicate to project team
o Ensure project team adheres to QA/QC plan
o The Project Manager is authorized to:
 Sign job’s correspondence to Customers and Vendors
 Sign POs within DOA’s limits;
 Authorize per project related function’s budget for labor, T&L within the limits set by DOA.
Responsible for the rigorous application of the company rules regarding the project development, the accuracy of reported data and the respect of the contractual/agreed deadlines.


Job Requirements:
Education: Holds a technical diploma or graduation in: Civil Engineering / Mechanical engineering/ Electrical Engineering/ Chemical Engineering or equivalent
Experience: Mature experience as Project Manager in the Industrial Plant business.

Competencies:
The PM has the following technical skillsets:
Deeply understands and is able to manage contracts for supplying complex plants;Understands risk assessment and mitigationIs experienced in managing relationship with the Customers;Is experienced in leading and coordinating the assigned resources;Is knowledgeable in project administration;Ability to create and manage detailed job schedules;Is experienced in the procurement process;Cross Functional competenceSoild Waste / Wastewater / Biogas / Power Generation specific competences.Fluent in English.
For additional information on Anaergia, please visit www.anaergia.com

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Anaergia provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, Anaergia will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",173.0
119,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary: By supporting production operations in a “customer service oriented” role, this position identifies, evaluates, develops, designs, and implements improvements, projects, optimizations, process changes, and new technologies to achieve increased productivity, enhanced production flexibility and capacity, improved quality, safer operations, and improved compliance. Executes projects that include specifying, selecting, building, installing and commissioning equipment and/or working with engineering design firms to implement projects. Provides daily support to the Brewing, Packaging, Operations and Maintenance teams to ensure all aspects of production are operating correctly. An ideal candidate will be able to work well with other engineers as well as multiple internal and external customers to expedite the completion of logistically complex projects and maintain reliable/efficient production operations.
Manages and executes projects related to brewing, packaging, and quality processes. These processes include milling, conveying, mashing, brewing, cleaning, fermentation, kegging, bottling, labeling, canning, packaging, palletizing, and water/wastewater operations.
Prepares scope definition, capital cost estimates, operating cost savings, investment justifications (ROI), and cost value analyses.
Prepares scope of work/contracts for outside engineering firms and contractors. Manage and supervise these groups’ work, schedules, work quality, and performance.
Works closely with operating department customers to design improvements to increase efficiencies while enabling a growing range of recipe, beer styles and packaging options.
Assists in identifying and implementing future innovations in the automation of the brewery, improve efficiencies, reduce costs and the brewery’s environmental footprint.
Manages and executes projects to install, commission and improve PLC controls, instrumentation, SCADA and MES interfaces (Ignition preferred).
Applies various programming languages necessary for utilizing the SCADA system including programming PLCs (programmable logic controllers) and the software (Ignition) used as an interface.
Specifies, programs, diagnoses, repairs, and tunes Distributed Control Systems, Programmable Logic Controllers, Supervisory Control and Data Acquisition System, and Computer Based Monitoring and Controls Systems.
Develops schedules, work break down structures, deliverables, budget and resource plans. Develops the scope of assigned projects and execute projects on-schedule and under budget.
Prepares P&IDs, plans, specifications, technical analysis and other documentation needed to define the scope of a project or to resolve a technical issue.
Reviews blueprints and works with consultants, engineers and contractors on various facility upgrades; provides recommendations for changes or additions; designs systems; plans installations; oversees construction, commissioning, and placing new systems, equipment, improvements into operations.
Assists in the design, build, installation, commissioning and troubleshooting of all equipment and processes.
Assists Production and Maintenance Departments in repairing technical problems during production operations by troubleshooting, identifying and repairing it quickly.
Provides technical support to a facility operating 24/7
Effectively manages multiple projects with overlapping tasks and work independently with minimal supervision. Proper balancing of priorities is critical to ensure that project performance aligns with the needs of the business.
Prioritizes workload to ensure maximum business effectiveness is achieved.
Assists in achieving department KPIs, business and production goals.
Works with the brewery management team to lead process improvement initiatives.
Mentors/coaches all personnel within the department related to improvements/projects or support under this person’s responsibility.Salary range varies based on experience and skillset.
Bachelor’s degree required in Chemical, Mechanical, or Electrical, Engineering or a Physics or Computer Science degree.
At least 5 years for a Process Engineer of related experience and/or training.
Must have engineering experience gained through the direct support of a manufacturing or product development function, including designing hardware, tools, fixtures, machinery and/or their controls.
Hands-on experience with the configuration and troubleshooting of the instrumentation and controls of large scale processing equipment and the associated PLC controls is preferred.
Experience with food processing equipment is preferred.
Extensive experience with brewing equipment is very desirable.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite and CAD (AutoCAD preferred).
Proficiency with Allen Bradley and/or Siemens PLCs and controls hardware is very desirable.
Familiarity with SCADA platforms (Ignition preferred).
Professional Engineer (PE) certification a plus.
Lean Six Sigma Green Belt or higher is very desirable.
Must be able to effectively communicate in English, both verbally and written.
Occasional travel required to other Karl Strauss Brewpub Operations or to equipment manufacturers including outside the United States
Physical Demands: Heavy WorkKarl Strauss participates in E-Verify. Click to view: Notice of E-Verify Participation or Right to Work Notice",174.0
120,chemical+engineer,"Commissioning Engineer
Company Description:
Anaergia is a global leader in the production of clean energy, fertilizer and recycled water from virtually any waste stream, offering the widest range of maximizing resource recovery solutions for the municipal, industrial, commercial and agricultural markets. Anaergia’s integrated solutions create value for its customers in the forms of renewable energy, quality fertilizers and clean water, while dramatically reducing the cost of waste management. Anaergia delivers integrated solutions globally through established offices in North America, Europe, Africa, and Asia and its breakthrough technologies are in use at over a thousand resource recovery facilities worldwide, reducing greenhouse gas emissions while creating new revenue sources for its clients.
Job Description:
Commissioning Engineer Goals

o Ensure planning, coordination and cooperation between sub-contractors and vendors on site.
o Ensure the application on the highest safety standard in the start-up and commissioning phase as well as the full compliance to the safety rules.
o Fulfill the agreed reporting with reliable data and within the requested deadline.
o Ensure that all equipment supplied by Anaergia and plant functional tests have been carried out.
o Establish and maintain the Commissioning Program.
o Ensure relevant documentation is in place.
o Ensure correct procedures are followed.
o Ensure a safe system of work is established and maintained
o Coordinate training and ensure that training programs are completed as specified.
o Provide/assist in training activities on the relevant equipment
o Produce Risk Assessments and Method Statements (RAMS) for specific commissioning activities as required.
o Review the RAMS of sub-contractor commissioning or undertaking remedial work on the plant
o Manage the activities of sub-contract commissioning teams.
o Report non-conformance issues to the Commissioning Manager.
o Update drawings and operational documentation to reflect changes made during the commissioning phase.
o Ensure that Site Acceptance Tests (SAT’s) are completed, defects recorded, and arrangements made to rectify any plant faults.
Commissioning Engineer Tasks
o Prior to start of commissioning, obtain all up to date As-Built documentation (Drawings, test sheets, contingency plans). Retain a copy of this on site.
o Carry out the commissioning process and tests in accordance with approved procedures and checklists, identify additional requirements for testing as required, prepare documentation and
procedures to allow commissioning activities and ensure commissioning activities are carried out in a safe manner.
o Monitor and plan the delivery of supplies and service (expediting & logistic) unless it is not covered by supply chain
o Manage the activities of sub-contract commissioning teams.
o Manage directly and/or via contractors the Quality Assurance / Quality Control
o Provide technical knowledge for all areas of the plant.
o Arrange for operations staff to attend scheduled training sessions
o Follow and adhere to the commissioning schedule;
o Maintain works methodologies, contractor test plans and equipment check-sheets;
o Coordinate all resources involved in site activities, both internal or external (outsourcers/sub-contractors), either through the updating and distributing of detailed schedule and/or setting regular site meetings;
o Early identification of project risks for and early adoption of appropriate countermeasures;
o Manage relationship with vendor and sub-contractor for what is concerning technical issues and organization of tasks, including technical correspondence, leaving to the PM the management of contractual related communication;
o Complete relevant commissioning test sheets.
o Manage and update defects/punch lists
Job Requirements:
Education: Holds a technical diploma or graduation in: Civil Engineering / Mechanical engineering/ Electrical Engineering/ Chemical Engineering, Technician or equivalent
Experience: Minimum of 5 years’ experience as Commissioning Engineer in the Industrial Plant business.
Competencies:
The Commissioning Engineer has the following technical skillsets:
Deeply understands and has ability to manage contracts for supplying complex plants;Specialty in control systems, networks, programming PLCs, development of SCADA systems and experience with Siemens and Allen Bradley systems.Skilled in understanding technical drawings, documents, specification;Widely, rather that deeply, knowledgeable in all the disciplines involved with the construction and installation (civil, mechanical, electrical, instrumental, etc.);Knowledgeable in construction codes and regulation;Knowledgeable in quality control of all supplies;Experienced is training resources on safety and technical mattersExperienced in managing relationship with the Customers;Experienced in leading and coordinating the assigned resources;Knowledgeable in “site” project administrationAbility to manage detailed job schedules;Some experience in purchasing required;Solid Waste / Wastewater / Biogas / Power Generation specific competences.Fluent in English.
For additional information on Anaergia, please visit www.anaergia.com
As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Anaergia provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, Anaergia will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",175.0
121,chemical+engineer,"TriLink BioTechnologies is actively responding to the COVID-19 pandemic through vaccine and diagnostic programs.
TriLink BioTechnologies, a Maravai LifeSciences company, is seeking a Senior Process Engineer to join our growing team. This role is responsible for providing engineering support for sustaining, scale-up, and system integration of our manufacturing processes. The position will work closely with Manufacturing, Quality, R&D, and IT to develop, improve, and sustain production to help the company take the next steps forward in their growth cycle.
Responsibilities
Responsible for development and implementation of production and analytical “In-process” controls for commercial manufacturing
Responsible for leading and executing transfer of NPIs from development to manufacturing shopfloor
Responsible for independently designing and executing experimental protocols, interpreting data from different sources/format and preparing scientific/operations development reports
Effective communication with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments
Responsible for leading quality investigations like deviations, CAPAs, NCMRs, OOS, OOT issues
Independently take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of production areas
Assist in defining technical requirements for new products
Characterize and develop key metrics to drive efficiency and robustness improvements in product development
Collaborate with Development, Equipment engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, supply chain, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for manufactured products
Responsible for mentoring and coaching
Qualifications
BS/MS in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, or related field and four or more years of experience in industrial setting
PhD in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, or related field and two or more years of experience in industrial setting
Good data analysis skills and a logical approach to problem solving is a must
Experience in organic chemistry, chromatography (HPLC/UPLC, MPLC), NMR and other analytical techniques used in organic synthesis is highly desirable
Experience in large scale organic synthesis, clean room manufacturing is a must
Familiarity with nucleoside/nucleotide chemistry, Oligo synthesis is desirable
Strong understanding of statistical knowledge (DOEs, statistical analysis, etc.) is a must
Familiarity with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a must
Experience in manufacturing support/sustaining and transferring products from R&D to production is a must
Experience with project management is a must
Strong organizational skills are a must
Excellent verbal and written communication skills are a must
Proficient in Excel, Word, PowerPoint is a must
TriLink BioTechnologies is a rapidly growing biotech firm in San Diego, CA, that offers competitive wages and a full benefits package including medical, dental, vision, LTD, and a retirement plan.
TriLink BioTechnologies is an EEO employer.",176.0
122,chemical+engineer,"About Pacira
Pacira BioSciences, Inc. is a leading provider of non-opioid pain management and regenerative health solutions dedicated to improving outcomes for health care practitioners and their patients. Our in-depth knowledge of non-opioid pain management, coupled with our passion for advancing patient care, drives our commitment to providing solutions that address unmet medical needs and improve clinical results.
Why work with us?
Rarely do you have an opportunity to do work that really matters. What drives us is our mission. What makes us successful are our people. At Pacira, you are part of an inclusive culture that fosters collaboration, growth, and innovative thinking - a place where you can make an impact and help change the standard of care in non-opioid pain management. Be part of our movement, let’s pursue excellence together.
Summary
The purpose of this position is to actively participate in the development of pharmaceutical processes, scale-up, aseptic process validations, manufacturing facility technology transfers, and commercial launch of sterile production manufacturing facilities. Also responsible for manufacturing processes and equipment investigations as well as provide recommendations for integration and commercialization of new processes.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by an individual assigned to this job. Other duties may be assigned.
Trouble-shoot problems that come up during all stages of process development, including clinical and commercial manufacture of sterile injectable drugs.
Document work, summarize findings and present data.
Hands on work to set-up and run experiments on clinical and commercial scale manufacturing equipment.
Provide technical support to other groups including Formulation Development, Analytical Research and Development, Manufacturing, Validation, and QA.
Work in laboratory and GMP manufacturing settings.
Participate in the process development and production of DepoFoam products.
Design and scale-up processes to commercial scales.
Perform factory acceptance testing for new equipment, commissioning, and assist with Validation of new processes as needed.
Participate in pre-commercial manufacturing facility activities (mechanical commissioning, operational commissioning, software testing, aseptic process simulations, SIP qualification, etc.)
Drive individual projects and demonstrate skill set beyond that of an Engineer II.
Education and Experience:
BS in Chemical Engineering, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, or Equivalent
Preferably 5-8 years of pharmaceutical and/or R&D experience
Ability to design and conduct design review of new manufacturing equipment.
Ability to manage multiple responsibilities with a high degree of self-motivation.
Experience with aseptic processing, SIP, and CIP is required.
Knowledge of cGMPs and experimental design required.
Hands on lab, pilot plant, or commercial production experience.
Knowledge of process equipment and chemistry is required.
Ability to work both independently and in cross functional teams.
Demonstrated computer efficiency (e.g., word processing, spreadsheets).
Ability to read P&IDs.
Excellent observation skills and problem solving ability.
Proficient oral, written, and interpersonal communication skills.
EEO Statement
Pacira is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants because of race, color, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), national origin, age (40 or older), veteran status, disability or genetic information, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",177.0
123,chemical+engineer,"The Senior Quality Engineer will be responsible for developing the Quality controls to support the transfer of products from R&D to manufacturing, and the subsequent ongoing sustaining functions necessary to ensure product quality. This position will work with minimum supervision to develop and implement the appropriate quality methods, acceptance criteria and qualification plans for product release to manufacturing. This role will develop raw material quality control points and support supplier qualifications to ensure raw material consistency. This is a cross-functional role that will frequently interact with management to provide technical assistance related to product expectations, failure analysis and other quality considerations. This role is also required to demonstrate a heightened sense of urgency in resolving matters related to quality and contribute positively in a fast-paced operations environment.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Participate in product design efforts to ensure that quality considerations are incorporated into design components and that the designs are compatible with quality test methods. Evaluate product and process designs for adequacy as related to field performance and manufacturability.Develop quality control strategies for raw materials and support supplier qualifications to ensure material consistency.Support stability studies of new materials new products, and changes as needed.Maintain design control and provide phase deliverables as requiredPerform statistical analysis for experiments and process trend monitoring to support the development of production metrics.Lead complex root cause failure investigation and troubleshooting of customer complaints and product non-conformances within manufacturing.Participate in Complaint Committee meetings and present investigation findings to peers and management.Participate in project team meetings and communicate readiness for product launch.Monitor field complaint data to evaluate new product performance and the impact of changesEducation and ExperienceB.S. in Engineering/Chemistry/Biology/Technical Discipline or equivalent combination of certification and work experience preferred6-8 years’ experience in Quality and Manufacturing Systems in Medical Device and high-volume manufacturing environments requiredMinimum 3 years’ experience in New Product introductions preferredASQ Quality Engineer Certification (CQE) preferredKnowledge/SkillsQuality Engineering skills which includes FMEA, Control Plans, Acceptance criteria, Sampling Plans.Strong technical aptitude and experience (preferably in engineering, chemistry, biology or other life sciences field) is a must.Quality Tools – Problem Solving Methodologies/Process Capability / ISO 13485 / Design of Experiments.Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of employees throughout the organizationAbility to develop and maintain strong working relationships with internal and external customers proficient in Microsoft Office, statistical software programs, operating systems, voice and email, etc.Ability to lead and facilitate a group of technical experts in root cause investigationsKnowledge of quality systems and regulations for medical device industry.High level of technical writing ability and excellent communication skills are requiredAdvanced skills in statistical techniques and quality tools is requiredUnderstanding of medical device Quality System Regulations (QSR) is requiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Remotely:No",178.0
124,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary
The Instrumentation and Controls (I&C) Engineer must be an energetic, self-motivated, and innovative individual, who shall possess the skills required to successfully develop and execute project tasks and deliverables, be a collaborative team player, and have a strong drive to deliver to customers. This person will develop and implement I&C concepts on process-driven projects, coordinating with internal process, mechanical, and electrical engineers and also client personnel. Experience in AutoCAD and Revit is necessary for developing drawing deliverables, as well as, experience with databases for developing an instrument index, I/O list and datasheets. Project sizes will vary and will consist primarily of pharmaceutical, biotech, or industrial process projects including both existing building renovations/retrofits and new construction.
Qualifications
Degree in Electrical, Mechanical or Chemical Engineering preferred
3-7 years of experience required, preferably in a design firm setting
Experience with AutoCAD and Revit required
Experience with databases required
Experience with developing instrumentation and control strategies/philosophies for pharmaceutical, biotech, or industrial processes preferred
Responsibilities
Working with an instrument database or similar tool to develop an instrument index, I/O list, instrument data sheets, etc.
Selecting instrumentation for process control applications.
Assisting in instrument sizing calculations for valves, flowmeters, etc.
Assisting process and mechanical engineers with P&ID development by adding I&C symbols to depict the intent of the design.
Creating control panel drawings to include panel layout, panel wiring, and bill of materials.
Developing loop drawings and control wiring drawings to depict I&C circuitry.
Creating instrument location plans and instrument installation details.
Coordinating with architects and electrical engineers to locate control panels and ensuring appropriate control power is provided for I&C devices and panels.
Developing I&C construction specifications.
Following projects after construction documents are issued and reviewing submittals, answering RFIs, and making field visits to verify construction of I&C scope is proceeding per the intent of the design.


Position Type
This is a full-time position
Benefits
CRB offers a complete and competitive benefit package designed for individuals and families.

CRB is an Equal Opportunity Employer – M/F/D/V",179.0
125,chemical+engineer,129,180.0
126,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a New Product Introduction (NPI) engineer to join our growing Cartridge group. This group works as an integral part of our instrument and cartridge assembly manufacturing team (both internal and external) and is tasked with new product introduction, production process development, improvement, and sustaining efforts in a high-volume biotech manufacturing environment. This role will require being highly collaborative and cross functional; partnering with R&D, Quality, Production and other departments to develop processes for new products, as well as sustain and improve processes for existing products. This role primarily relies on outsource suppliers to develop the process and the role also helps drive the overall assembly strategy for flow cell cartridge products.
Responsibilities:
Support development and production processes and in the making of consumable products used in genomic sequencing and microarray products.
Technical lead for manufacturing operations at various vendors and driving contract manufacturer for pre-production builds
Facilitate or support the transfer of manufacturing and QC processes from development through scale-up to volume production in a regulated manufacturing environment.
Collaborate deeply with others to resolve production line issues related to yield, quality, and throughput.
Provides direction, mentorship to engineers and project team members
Design for manufacturability – Provide early and ongoing manufacturing involvement to ensure manufacturability of products
Construct and execute controlled experiments ( including DOE's ) to optimize processes to address yield and quality issues, reduce costs, and drive implementation of solutions to meet goals.
Author technical documents, such as engineering reports, test protocols, validation documents or changes to existing documentation, to support product manufacturing process documentation requirements.
Analyze, trend and monitor process test results, issue reports, and make technical recommendations
Perform root cause analysis investigation using RCA tools ( such as 8D, 7-Step, 5 Why’s or model-based problem solving, etc ) together withsound science and data analysis to make technical and compliance-related recommendations and decisions.
Requirements:
Previous work experience in microelectronics or medical device assembly or wafer back-end process development including singulation, pick & place, wire bonding, underfills, encapsulation molding. micro-dispensing, optical alignment or related processes is highly desired.
High level problem solving and reasoning skills. Strong interpersonal communication skills and the ability to positively influence others and build relationships
Experience in introducing products into manufacturing or high-volume production in a CM/ODM model.
Experience with planning, cost and delivery in relation to project management.
JMP, Minitab and Six Sigma experience is a plus
Consistent record of project management and engineering design required
Well-developed documentation and technical report writing skills.
Comfortable working in areas of high ambiguity and complexity in a fast-paced environment.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required.
Ability to collect, prepare, and present relevant information to influence decision-making within the organization.
Education:
B.S./M.S./ PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, Electrical Engineering or MS/PhD in Materials Science or Chemistry, with at least 5 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",181.0
127,chemical+engineer,"Senior Technical Support Engineer
Senior Technical Support Engineer will report to the General Manager/Technical Director. Senior Technical Support Engineer will be responsible to learn and eventually take over the duties of the G.M. which comprise the following: Fielding customer and internal company technical questions, coordinating required testing and verification of all products to various industry standards or customer specific standards. Responsible to attend, participate and influence product standards committee meetings along with building relationships with other members. This position will also require facilitating the needs of the Sales and Quality Departments. As Senior Technical Support Engineer you’ll be required to answer technical or standards related question for both departments and be available to visit customers when necessary.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Duties include the following (other duties may be assigned):
Become the technical authority for SEIP and act as a technical resource for other departments, representatives, distributors, and OEM’s. Provide technical and application assistance for the sales group and process technical inquiries from the customer base and internally.
Act as SEIP liaison for R&D function and product development activities.
Responsible for the development, maintenance, and updating of product training programs.
Translate customer technical requirements into usable and salable products by working with IPD in Japan.
Assist in and perform basic marketing tasks such as communications, literature, product promotion, advertising, trade shows, etc.
Act as company “clearing house” for industry and agency specification activities. Participate and represent SEIP’s interest at agency committees.
Communicate all standards and industry related information to all SEIP Departments.
Responsible for coordinating specific actions at each Department based on agency and/or industry information.
Responsible for coordinating all customer specific product and industry test which SEIP’s heat-shrinkable products must meet.
Manage regulatory compliance and keep up to date with changing and more stringent rules such as Prop 65, IMDS, RoHS, REACH, etc.
Update literature, both printed and digital. This includes, Data sheets, brochures and marketing collateral materials.
Minimum Qualifications and Requirements
Background in polymer chemistry, R&D, and knowledge of heat-shrinkable products and technologies or other related fields. BS in chemistry or engineering preferred.
Must thoroughly understand and be able to influence industry and agency specifications for heat shrink products.
Needs solid knowledge of competitive products and markets
Strong verbal, written and Microsoft computer skills.
Requires experienced Project Management skills.
Training and presentation experience.
Experience in either face to face or virtual customer interface.
International experience and previous rep/distributor sales are helpful.
Preferences
Master Degree in Chemistry or Engineering
Field application experience
Special Position Requirements
Travel to Customer and Committee meetings is required 10-15%
Will be required to perform internal lab and product testing.
Physical Requirements
While performing the duties of this job the employee may be occasionally required to bend, twist and lift up to 50 pounds.
BENEFITS:
PPO Medical Plan
PPO Dental Plan
PPO Vision Plan
Company-Paid Life Insurance
Generous Vacation PTO
Generous Sick PTO
10 Paid Holidays
About Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc.
Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc. (SEIP) was founded in 1985 as a sales and marketing company. The company was originally formed to sell products made by Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in Japan to North American customers. SEIP is an independent U.S. company and is wholly owned subsidiary of Sumitomo Electric Fine Polymer (SFP). In 1996, SEIP began US production by building a new manufacturing site in San Marcos, CA. SEIP produces, markets, and sells products based upon heat-shrinkable plastics technology. We supply products to a diverse range of customers in a variety of industries. These include the automotive, aerospace, appliance, communications, electronics, medical, and transit industries to name a few.

To learn more about SEIP, please visit http://www.seipusa.com.

About Sumitomo Electric Group
Since the founding of Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in 1897 with copper wire production, we have developed many new technologies and products through innovative R&D activities based on Sumitomo Electric manufacturing technologies for electric wires and power cables. With more than 350 subsidiaries worldwide, we continue to introduce a wide variety of products that fulfill the expectations of society, in five business fields: Automotive, Information & Communications, Electronics, Environment & Energy, and Industrial Materials. We are a Fortune global 500 company.

To learn more about Sumitomo Electric Group, please visit http://global-sei.com.",182.0
128,chemical+engineer,"As a global leader in mass spectrometry, SCIEX delivers solutions for precision detection and quantification of molecules to help protect and advance the wellness and safety of all. Because of our 50 years of groundbreaking innovation, our customers can quickly respond to environmental hazards, better understand biomarkers relevant to disease, improve patient care in the clinic, bring relevant drugs to market faster, and keep food healthier and safer. At SCIEX, you’ll find a rewarding role that amplifies your impact on the world and helps you realize life’s potential.

SCIEX is proud to work alongside a community of nine fellow Danaher Life Sciences companies. Together, we’re pioneering the future of science and medicine, developing products that enable researchers in the fight to save lives.

Would you like to support products you feel passionate about? We are seeking a dynamic, self-motivated Sr. Manufacturing Engineer to join our consumables center-of-excellence located in beautiful Carlsbad, CA! As a core member of our Technical Operations and Sustainment Engineering team, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams to incorporate design changes and drive continuous improvement projects for existing products and assist Capillary Electrophoresis (CE) and Mass Spec (MS) consumable manufacturing. The Manufacturing Scientist implements methods and processes for the production of CE & MS product lines. This role also assists in driving lean manufacturing initiatives and training of manufacturing associates. You will work closely with R&D, Quality, Regulatory and Manufacturing team members. Responsibilities

Plan, lead and conduct independent work requiring root cause analysis, troubleshooting, and modification of established manufacturing processes triggered by continuous improvement initiatives, non-conformances or supplier change notifications per company procedures and guidelines.

Lead complex risk assessments (PFMEA), and verification and validation assessments to ensure the safe and environmentally sound start-up of new or revised processes and assessments of Process Capability (Cpk).

Conduct proof of concept experiments; plan and executes engineering lots.

Participate on project teams to complete other project assignments in support of the CE and MS manufacturing lines.

Regular oral and written communication relating to progress and performance of work. Skills

Ability to work independently and to perform assignments with minimal direction, while working collaboratively with cross-functional teams.

Ability to solve complex problems; take a new perspective using existing solutions.

Ability to do root cause analysis and independent investigations to identify the source of errors in manufacturing.

Skilled at handling the quality of your own work and the work of others.

Experience developing & execution of manufacturing processes, IQ/OQ/PQs, writing procedures, and training manufacturing associates

Experience in chemistry or consumables manufacturing environment.

Familiarity with basic statistical analysis techniques / Mini-tab would be a plus.

Knowledge in CE and MS equipment would be a plus Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Bachelors degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with no less than 5+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering

Master’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Master’s degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with 3+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering experience.

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.

Danaher is committed to a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels they belong and all voices are heard. We believe in our associates and the unique perspectives they bring to every challenge, which is why we’ll empower you to push the boundaries of what’s possible.

If you’ve ever wondered what’s within you, there’s no better time to find out.

#LI-KR2

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.",183.0
129,chemical+engineer,"Cue Health Inc. is seeking to hire a full-time Quality Engineer , Bioproduction to provide expertise in quality engineering for the, manufacturing, design and development of bioproduction processes for Cue Health’s in-vitro diagnostic medical device. This role will ensure compliance of the Design History File, the manufacturing process from incoming inspection to Cue Health’s product release and maintenance of the Risk Assessment process.
Reporting to the Senior Manager of Quality Engineering, the Quality Engineer will assist with implementation and maintenance of the Quality Management System (QMS) processes related to design and manufacturing while ensuring conformance to FDA and international regulations and standards. They will work closely with management and cross-functional leaders concerning projects, operational decisions, and scheduling requirements and will conduct briefings and technical meetings for internal and external representatives. Alternate work schedule for this role is Mon-Th, 4X10 hr shifts, 6am start, 4 days off each week.
Responsibilities:
Provides compliance oversight of the various site Quality tools / systems to maintain an effective, compliant, and validated system as per ISO 13485, ISO14971, 21CFR820, 21CFR809, applicable regulatory requirements and Cue Health’s Quality Policy.
Contribute to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Quality System.
Development and documentation of quality plans, processes, procedures, and work instructions.
Ensure compliance of Quality activities for receiving inspection and test, manufacturing process control, nonconforming material, review of design history files and final product release as it relates to the Bioproduction processes.
Provide quality support for marketed products including establish and maintain product quality measures, change orders, planned deviations, corrective and preventive action, and contribute to improvements.
Provide quality support to the product development effort including establish product quality requirements and review of component, assembly, system, equipment qualification documents, and stability reports.
Responsible for input to product risk management system; plans, hazard analysis and FMEA / FMECA with the requirements of ISO14971.
Interface with production teams to provide guidance on supplier qualifications related to design and manufacturing activities and SCARs related to these suppliers.
Perform product failure investigations and facilitate required corrective / preventive actions.
Produce/maintain metrics and/or reports on all activities as required.
Provide training or mentoring to other teams to elevate efficiencies and facilitate compliance to the product development and manufacturing processes.
Support the Quality Assurance Manager for complaints investigation and Quality audits related to design and manufacturing.
Perform other quality related tasks to meet company goal as required.
Requirements:
Knowledgeable of Quality system principles; FDA Quality System Regulation (cGMP); 21CFR820, 21CFR809, ISO 13485 Quality system standards for medical device, IS014971 Risk Management Systems required
Experience in technical transfer and product development in a regulated environment, including design control, hazard analysis, validation, and process metrics
Ability to work with development engineers and other functional group personnel to accomplish common goals
Experience with quality systems and processes as they relate to GMP manufacturing
Detail oriented, with good written and verbal English communication skills
Computer literate in word processing, spreadsheets, databases, and other quality related productivity programs
Application of statistical techniques for quality assurance
BS in a Biomedical Engineering, Chemistry, Life Sciences or equivalent field
5+ years quality engineering experience in the product design of medical or IVD products and/or manufacturing
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic, environment
You will work in a office environment . Your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in the technology, health and diagnostic industry. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a collaborative team on an innovative device. We offer upgraded computer equipment, unlimited snacks, competitive salary.",184.0
130,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",186.0
131,chemical+engineer,"Responsibilities:
The Equipment Engineering Supervisor will be responsible responsible for maintaining and Illumina’s cGMP high-volume manufacturing lines in San Diego, California. This role is responsible for the supporting Illumina’s Flowcell production lines, residing within Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO). The role is looking for a highly collaborate individual with experience in Operations and collaboration across Supply Chain, Manufacturing, Quality, R&D and Process Engineering.
Work experience in the Medical Device and/or Semiconductor industry would be an advantage. The Equipment Engineering Supervisor will be a subject matter expert with deep experience leading the team to accomplish routine operations, continuous improvement, and projects with energy and enthusiasm. They will work in a dynamic team-oriented environment that supports multiple operations and technologies helping Illumina deliver its highly complex product pipeline in a reliable and sustainable manner.
All listed tasks and responsibilities are deemed as essential functions to this position; however, business conditions may require reasonable accommodations for additional task and responsibilities
Requirements:
Responsible for tactical and day-to-day operations related to tool troubleshooting, maintenance, calibration, and onboarding.
Provide guidance on maintenance/troubleshooting/verification strategies including but not limited to techniques/methods/tools used, setting specifications, failure testing, data analysis
Troubleshoot production line issues related to yield, quality and throughput.
Interface and coordinate with Manufacturing, Engineering, Supply Chain, R&D, Quality, among other departments to ensure maintenance and project activities are on time and meet performance goals.
Build and develop a highly effective & engaged team through teamwork.
Build a great team, deliver exceptional results, create a compelling vision and be a champion of the Illumina Culture.
Maintains staff by recruiting, selecting, and training employees; maintains a safe, secure, and legal work environment.
Mentors and coaches proactively to set the team up for success and provide for personal career growth both technically and managerially.
Responsible for productive cross-site and cross-functional relationship between manufacturing sites.
Troubleshoot production line issues related to product quality and equipment malfunction, safety, or obsolescence.
Experience/Education:
B.S./M.S. Degree in Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Bioengineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or equivalent experience is required.
Typically has 5+ years of direct work experience.
2+ years of people management in an engineering/maintenance and/or related operations field.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",187.0
132,chemical+engineer,"BUSINESS ENVIRONMENT
The GCT (Graphics and Chemistry Technology) lab at HP is an exciting and dynamic organization focused on developing technology for multiple internal partners that deliver winning products to the market place. The lab is pushing many technology vectors, including thermal inkjet print-head, LEP technology, ink, writing systems & system integration, large- and small-format media, and media coatings. Most of these activities are in support of the Graphics Solutions Business, which is a critical growth engine for HP Inc. These activities range from on-program to off-cycle efforts, pushing technical capabilities of printing for future product embodiments. The market areas the GCT lab supports also include a diverse and exciting portfolio, balancing core market segment (Signage and Display, Graphics/Technical Production, Indigo, Publishing) with growth (Packaging, Textile, Synthetic Substrates) opportunities. The broad range of technologies and markets provide staff members with diverse opportunities to work in exciting technical areas, with multiple opportunities for career development.
JOB SCOPE
The scope for this Ink and substrate/media PM position covers responsibilities for ink development in the industrial market segment and all media and coatings development activities across printer platforms including page wide industrial, large format, and small format printers. R&D activities are to support hardware partner growth as well as the media business. Current key areas of focus for this position will include delivering on ink and media solutions that meet our customer demands for printing in publishing and packaging for web press applications. Other opportunities encompass new latex media developments to support latex growth and expanding our ColorLok technology portfolio. This position will also take lead for critical off-cycle initiatives to sustain and increase print growth in line with HP’s broader strategy around sustainability. Key accountabilities include evaluating, planning, executing, and reporting status of projects while developing and managing budgets and schedules for the programs in line with partner needs and market drivers while understanding and considering the underlying business factors; leading on/off-program activities; building and manage project teams; interface with HP internal and external partners; reporting to upper management on status and risks; ensuring products are developed according to regulatory guidelines; establishing the right development, and manufacturing partner for each product; and, knowledge transfer to operations teams at product launch. Furthermore creating a positive work environment with an engaged team.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Specific examples for job responsibilities include:
Project Management. Manage ink and media project development teams in support of web press, large format and small format printing, delivering on key performance attributes while managing to a tight timeline and cost structure. This includes developing plans to fit product needs and requirements to meet value proposition, manage integration activities and partner interactions. Adjust processes and create new development approaches to fit an agile environment in tune with faster time-to-market requirements. In addition, own plans with appropriate Product Engineering teams for manufacturing stabilization beyond product intro, to ensure robust launch and strong understanding of platform fundamentals. Develop budgets, timelines, staffing and schedules and work with GCT lab and media business teams on the correct business model for each development in order to maximize the return for HP. Foster strong innovation in support of product and print growth. Influence for greater efficiencies throughout the product development cycle.
People Management. Lead, coach, and develop project team members on a proactive and positive basis. Provide technical leadership in a highly motivating environment grounded in collaboration and job satisfaction.
Communication. Lead program reviews to business teams, product partners, GCT staff, and senior management as appropriate. Represent media and coatings product performance and program status, including risks and action plans going forward.
Program Interface. Act as interface with the appropriate partner organization in support of GCT lab program management. Ensure alignment on program goals, schedule, resources, and budget. Enable organizational collaboration & strong alignment with development partners and partner organizations. Serve as a direct link to GCT lab staff. Position will require interaction with external partners/suppliers.
Strategic role. Solidify the GCT labs charter and broaden the contribution, engagement, and charter of the team. Establish new ways to maximize & grow the potential of the team based on the Lab’s charter (present and future). In collaboration with our partner organizations, propose and deploy ways to support off-cycle activities based on the partner organizations future market directions/applications and the technology required to enable them.
QUALIFICATION (Experience & Skills)
REQUIRED
Educational and Professional Experience
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering and/or advanced degree in Chemistry or Material Science (or technical experience working with media development and coatings).
7+ years of experience performing in a fast-paced, industrial R&D environment, with emphasis on media/coatings development, paper science, ink, writing systems, and/or system integration.
3+ years in a leadership role in industry.
Program management experience
Demonstrated skills on the following:
Ability to lead technical teams in defining strategies and technical direction.
Exhibit solid planning and organizational skills.
System-level thinking, with ability to identify system-level solutions that meet product requirements in the most efficient, economical manner and within the required schedule/budget.
Leadership across organizational boundaries. Ability to interface with groups from different functions (i.e. hardware, ink, print-head, supplies, product engineering, etc.) and across geographical boundaries.
Ability to interface with external development partners, suppliers, and customers.
Verbal and written communication with technical audience and management.
Other requirements
Effective interpersonal skills.
Strong team-building skills to optimize organizational influence and accountability.
Shown ability to inspire, influence and lead effectively
Strong business acumen.
High motivation, degree of commitment, and initiative.
Understanding the use of financial thresholds and project metrics, budget planning
DESIRED
Experience integrating developments that include media, ink, and hardware for printing platforms.
#LI-Post
About HP


You’re out to reimagine and reinvent what’s possible—in your career as well as the world around you.

So are we. We love taking on tough challenges, disrupting the status quo, and creating what’s next. We’re in search of talented people who are inspired by big challenges, driven to learn and grow, and dedicated to making a meaningful difference.


HP is a technology company that operates in more than 170 countries around the world united in creating technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere.


Our history: HP’s commitment to diversity, equity and inclusion – it's just who we are.

From the boardroom to factory floor, we create a culture where everyone is respected and where people can be themselves, while being a part of something bigger than themselves. We celebrate the notion that you can belong at HP and bring your authentic self to work each and every day. When you do that, you’re more innovative and that helps grow our bottom line. Come to HP and thrive!",188.0
133,chemical+engineer,"Company Description
Guardant Health is a leading precision oncology company focused on helping conquer cancer globally through use of its proprietary blood tests, vast data sets, and advanced analytics. The Guardant Health Oncology Platform leverages capabilities to drive commercial adoption, improve patient clinical outcomes, and lower healthcare costs across all stages of the cancer care continuum.
Guardant Health has launched liquid biopsy-based Guardant360®, Guardant360 CDx, and GuardantOMNI® tests for advanced-stage cancer patients. These tests fuel development of its LUNAR program, which aims to address the needs of early-stage cancer patients with neoadjuvant and adjuvant treatment selection, cancer survivors with surveillance, asymptomatic individuals eligible for cancer screening, and individuals at a higher risk for developing cancer with early detection.

Job Description
In this role, you’ll be responsible for developing, implementing, and scaling complex automated workflows within a regulated state-of-the-art next-generation sequencing lab.
The Senior Automation Engineer will be directly responsible for leading or contributing to all aspects of assay/ reagent manufacturing automation development from concept, requirements definition, and manual assay development to adaptation, optimization, troubleshooting and validation. Will leverage an understanding of molecular biology and biochemistry to troubleshoot analytical and preparation processes. Apply scientific methods and engineering skills to improve the scalability of Guardant Health’s sample processing workflows.
As a Senior Automation Engineer, you must be collaborative and able to effectively participate in or lead cross functional teams working in a variety of projects. These cross functional teams will explore, develop, optimize, test, and implement robust, scalable solutions for Guardant Health’s sample processing workflows with attention to understanding business and user requirements and improving efficiency, throughput, and quality. You will also contribute to protocol generation, report writing and presentation preparation.
The ideal candidate will be able to:
Lead or contribute to development of new assay processes, reagent manufacturing processes and technologies along with innovation in current workflows.
Lead or contribute to the design, development, optimization, and implementation of automated liquid handling processes, systems, and streamlined workflows.
Collaborate closely with other development, operation, and quality & regulatory teams to enable the development and implementation of new workflows.
Analyze workflows, identify bottlenecks, and develop solutions to improve efficiency, throughput, cost, and quality.
Program robotic liquid handling workstations and integrated robotic systems.

Qualifications

BS degree in engineering or science, with 5-8 years of related experience. MS with 4+ years of related work experience or a Ph.D. with 3+ years of related work experience. Preferred degrees; Molecular Biology, Genetics or Biochemistry, Bio-Engineering or, Chemical Engineering.
Experience streamlining workflows, developing automated laboratory processes, and instrumentation systems, from concept generation. As well as requirements gathering through to process validation and implementation.
Hands-on experience with operating and programming liquid handling robotics platforms
Experience with liquid handlers (Hamitlon, Bravo, Agilent, Tecan Etc)
Experience in automated development of next-generation sequencing (NGS) assays and/or standard molecular biology techniques. (ie: nucleic acid isolation and purification, DNA quantitation, PCR, etc.)
Experience working within regulated environments (IVD, LDT, etc.)
Strong communication and collaborative skills
Ability to work, internal & external with diverse scientific, engineering, operational, and regulatory disciplines.
Experience with statistical data analysis, monitoring data quality, and troubleshooting technical problems.
Has NGS or Diagnostic company background a plus
#LI-JD1
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
Employee may be required to lift routine office supplies up to 20 lbs and use office equipment. Majority of the work is performed in a desk/office environment; however, there may be exposed to high noise levels, fumes, and biohazard material in the laboratory environment. Ability to sit for extended periods of time.
Guardant Health is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
To learn more about the information collected when you apply for a position at Guardant Health, Inc. and how it is used, please review our Privacy Notice for Job Applicants.
Please visit our career page at: http://www.guardanthealth.com/jobs/",189.0
134,chemical+engineer,"TriLink BioTechnologies is actively responding to the COVID-19 pandemic through vaccine and diagnostic programs.
TriLink BioTechnologies, a Maravai LifeSciences company, is seeking a Senior Manufacturing Engineer to be part of a new and growing engineering team at TriLink providing process engineering development and support for automating, scaling-up, system integrating, and sustaining our manufacturing processes. We are looking for a Senior Manufacturing Engineering candidate to support the implementation of our manufacturing operations into a Manufacturing Execution System (MES) and our quality control operations into a Laboratory Informatics Management System (LIMS). This role will work closely with Manufacturing, Quality, R&D, and IT to develop, improve, and sustain operations to help us take the next steps forward in our growth cycle.
Responsibilities
Lead the efforts to digitize the manufacturing and quality control process through development, implementation, lifecycle management and support of MES/LIMS systems.
Develop electronic batch records (eBRs) for manufacturing within MES: gather system/end user requirements; complete design, implementation, and testing/validation.
Support system go live activities, master data creation and maintenance.
Provide technical guidance in respect to MES/LIMS capabilities and system GMP Compliance.
Assist business owners to develop system standards and ways of working.
Develop and maintain written procedures and training content as required.
Participate in all activities required to support production, including but not limited to; MES/LIMS user support, troubleshooting, investigations, periodic reviews, root cause analysis, safety and Quality preventative and corrective actions.
Support site audits and inspections and implement corrections as needed
Qualifications
B.S. Degree or higher in Chemistry, Biochemistry, Bioengineering, Chemical Engineering or other related field with 3-5+ years of industry experience
Previous experience working with a MES or LIMS required
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or chemical industries is desirable
Experience with chemical processes (preferably organic) preferred
Programming language experience a plus (R, C++, C#, Javascript)
High level problem solving and reasoning skills required
High level computer skills are required
Experience drafting user, system, and software requirements is preferred
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control, and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with 21 CFR 820, ICH Q7, ISO 9001, and/or ISO 13485 requirements a plus
Lean/Six Sigma experience a plus
This position requires strong adherence to compliance and safety requirements, cGMPs, SOPs, and other manufacturing documents.
Strong multitasking abilities to complete activities in a fast-paced, deadline driven environment
Results-driven self-starter
Ability to manage stress and balance competing demands in a high throughput environment composure
TriLink BioTechnologies is a rapidly growing biotech firm in San Diego, CA that offers competitive wages and a full benefits package including medical, dental, vision, LTD, and a retirement plan.
TriLink BioTechnologies is an EEO employer.",190.0
135,chemical+engineer,"This position requires an individual who must work with minimal supervision to support change and configuration activities of products from inception through end-of-life. The primary focus is the support and iteration of Camstar Manufacturing Execution System (MES) models, leveraging deep system functionality to meet business needs. This person will join a dynamic, fast paced organization supporting new product development teams, as well as sustaining operations. This person is responsible for compiling relevant information related to product and process definition, analyzing business and compliance requirements, assessing risks for impact, and procuring accurate information for use in global systems. Additional tasks include identification and participation in product and process improvements initiatives, as well as management of Engineering Change Requests and Change Orders (ECRs/ECOs) in PLM.


Responsibilities:
Drive improved utilization of MES for a manufacturing area with respect to both configuration and core functionality, and act as “voice of the customer” for manufacturing
Support and iterate models in MES to develop and optimize manufacturing process flows
Engage Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) to assure change and configuration documentation is accurate and complete, all relevant documentation is included, and appropriate implementation strategies and validation activities have been completed.
Understand and provide guidance for use of master data along with the roles played by PLM, ERP, MES, LIMS, etc. in support of manufacturing
Review, monitor, and drive implementation activities as needed to ensure the change has been completed properly
Responsible for the accuracy of system data through process evaluation and validation
Identify, execute, and support process improvement initiatives of varying complexity engaging global, cross-functional support
Able to work independently and requires minimal guidance to perform required tasks
Work with peers and/or subordinates to ensure timely completion of projects and tasks
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to strengthen data accuracy or enhance efficiency
Demonstrate effective communication style working with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments, and across global sites
Provide guidance and training related to MES and other production systems to stakeholders and cross-functional team members
Provide leadership to junior level engineers
All listed tasks and responsibilities are deemed as essential functions to this position; however, business conditions may require reasonable accommodations for additional task and responsibilities.


Requirements:
Direct hands on experience creating and supporting modeling in MES, Camstar MES preferred.
Proven ability to convert process flows into automated workflow models
Technical background in manufacturing, preferably in a life sciences, diagnostic, and/or medical device environment
Experience in configuration management, operations, and/or quality within a regulated industry
Hands-on experience with 3rd Party interfaces that are commonly interfaced with MES applications like ERP, PLM, LIMS, SCADA, Equipment, etc.
Solid understanding of computer system and manufacturing validations
Experience with Software Development Life Cycle of controlled systems preferred
Experience with process and material change and configuration activities within an Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system, SAP preferred
Product Lifecycle Management (PLM) experience, TeamCenter desirable
Experience with ISA-95 with a strong understanding for the boundaries between enterprise and control systems
Working knowledge of ISO 13485 and cGMP requirements desired
High degree of initiative and ownership, as well as a proven history of delivering results while working with several different departments in a fast-paced environment
Preferred experience in Process/Manufacturing engineering
Education:
Typically requires a minimum of 5-10 years of related experience with a Bachelor’s degree or Master's degree in Software Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, or related discipline
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",191.0
136,chemical+engineer,"Kelly® Science & Clinical is seeking Process Development Specialist/Scientist- DOWNSTREAM
professionals who are eager to bring the latest scientific discoveries to life in order to create a brighter, safer and healthier future for all. If you’re passionate about shaping the world we live in and ready for a new challenge, this may be the perfect opportunity for you.
This position will be responsible for leading and executing the process development strategy for our preclinical and clinical scale candidates in development. The candidate will be expected to work in collaboration with our internal research group as well as our external manufacturing partners to develop scalable and robust manufacturing processes to support manufacture of AAV based gene therapy products. The candidate will have responsibilities for process development at research scale to support our preclinical candidates and GMP scale to support our clinical candidates. The successful candidate will be a subject matter expert in process development for AAV based gene therapy products with demonstrated experience in the field. As an early-stage startup this position will require flexibility, creativity and a can-do attitude to enable efficient execution of company objectives. The level of the position will be commensurate with experience.

Responsibilities:
Support development of robust, well-characterized, high quality and high yielding upstream production processes for AAV gene therapy products across internal programs.
Contribute to the design and execution studies to develop a thorough understanding of the process design space, with a view towards technology transfer to a CDMO and successful regulatory filings.
Prepare and review experimental protocols, provide technical input, and function in the role of technical liaison between CDMO and development group to ensure that sound scientific decisions are implemented.
Enable execution of discovery and pre-clinical activities through the production of research grade AAV vectors.
Will be highly communicative and function at a high level in a matrixed management environment.

Minimum Qualification:
Degree in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biochemistry, Virology or other relevant discipline. Scientist level applicants should have a PhD OR a master’s degree with 5+ years of relevant experience; Senior Scientist level applicants should have a PhD, a post-doc, and 2+ years of relevant experience.
Expertise in chromatography (affinity and ion exchange), tangential flow filtration, and dead-end filtration
Good understanding of statistical methods in the application and design of experiments is a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communications skills, and the ability to present and defend positions and approaches critical to program progression and success.
Ability to work in a matrix organization in collaboration with discovery research, nonclinical development, operations, clinical development and with consultants and external service providers.
Work under GLP/GMP to provide high quality, regulatory compliant technical documentation in support of process transfers to manufacturing.
Aseptic cell culture experience is required.

#TJP2021_SPEC
#TJP2021_SCT
Why Kelly®?

Kelly® Science & Clinical is your connection to premier scientific and clinical companies looking to hire talented people just like you. Every day, we match science professionals with dream jobs that fit their skills and interests—it’s the way we think job searching should be. Nearly 100 percent of our science recruiters have a professional background/education in science, so we know a thing or two about the science market and how to get you noticed.
About Kelly®
At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live (plus, did we mention we provide a ton of benefits?). Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.
Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
]]",192.0
137,chemical+engineer,"Tanvex Biopharma is a biologic pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing organization aiming to provide high quality, value added capabilities to accelerate the introduction of biologic therapeutics to the global market. We currently have an exciting opportunity for a MSAT Senior Associate Engineer at our location in San Diego, CA.
Job Summary:
The MSAT Senior Associate Engineer is responsible for assisting with Manufacturing, Science and Technology (MSAT) functions in support of cGMP drug substance manufacturing, including transferring, monitoring, troubleshooting and improving drug substance production processes and technologies.
The MSAT Senior Associate Engineer will investigate and implement new technologies and methodologies to improve manufacturing efficiency and ease of operations; collect and perform statistical analysis of manufacturing in-process control and process parameter data to trend process performance, generate campaign summary reports as needed; assist in process related deviation investigations, assess impact to product quality, identify root cause and propose corrective and preventative actions.
The MSAT Senior Associate Engineer will also implement new equipment and process technologies in the manufacturing area; serve as a technical resource on downstream purification equipment capabilities, and initiate and recommend improvements in process and equipment operation. This position will collaborate in cross functional activities with development and manufacturing personnel, both internal and external, to support process scale-up, technology transfer, process characterization, and process validation
Requires a Bachelors or Advanced degree in chemical/biochemical engineering, chemistry/biochemistry, biological sciences, or related disciplines with 3+ years of relevant experience in biopharmaceutical research and manufacturing settings. Candidate should have experience with downstream purification operations, particularly chromatography and filtration and knowledge of cGMP and quality systems. Must be an effective oral and written communicator across functional areas and technical levels.",193.0
138,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary:
The Process Development Engineer 2- Clinical Lab will work on the development, sustainment, and continuous improvement of our deployed clinical diagnostic products. The role will work closely with operations, product development, software development groups, and quality assurance. The ideal candidate will have experience interfacing with cross-functional teams and facilitating workflow improvements in a clinical laboratory. Furthermore, the candidate should a have analytical skills and interest in interpreting data to drive process optimization and Quality Control. Experience in six sigma, molecular biology methods for nucleic acid applications, sequencing, and liquid handler automation would be beneficial.
Responsibilities:
Work with and sometimes lead cross functional teams to support process changes or troubleshoot processes within the clinical laboratory.
Drive optimization of existing processes to improve efficiency, throughput, robustness and quality
Able to create requirements, plan activities and contribute to budget of allocated project scope, and prioritization of activities/assignments to supporting team members.
Able to identify risk and provide recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at project level.
Design and execution of experiments to support process changes.
Able to own a large subsystem or workflow, without needing oversight.
Analyzes process data to help drive continuous improvement and sustainment efforts.
Be a technical and integration representative for Operations on cross functional initiatives.
Works closely with scientific, bioinformatics, engineering, software, quality, and commercial teams to develop, transfer, and sustain new products into the Clinical laboratory.
Able to manage vendors on a technical level
Mentors peers and supporting engineers on technical skills in one’s area of expertise
Supports and troubleshoots existing processes and provides guidance on potential enhancements.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
Requirements:
B.S./M.S./ PhD in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Physical Chemistry, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, or Materials Science, with at least 2 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation.
Six Sigma preferred
Experience with driving Continuous Improvement initiatives for existing workflows
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Experience with validation and verification processes in a regulated laboratory.
Ability to think innovatively toward solving problems effectively and efficiently.
Adept inter-personal skills to contribute to cross functional project teams and work with stakeholders.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments
Experience with NGS technology preferred
Experience working in an CLIA, CAP, NYS, and/or ISO13485 lab is preferred.
Familiar with automated liquid handlers such Tecan and Hamilton is preferred
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",195.0
139,chemical+engineer,"Under limited supervision, creates basic to moderate complexity water and waste water treatment facilities, water and sewer systems, pipelines, pump stations, remediation sites, solid waste facilities, etc. engineering designs to meet client project requirements. Reviews draft designs and reports for compliance with federal, state and local regulations. Ensures that firm policies and practices are followed on all designs. Performs site reviews and studies, as needed, to ensure designs are aligned with location specifications. Updates design requirements as necessary. Performs water quality analyses and modeling. Contributes to firm's TKM by developing white papers and technical design documentation of new or special case designs, studies, etc.. Submits technical papers and designs for publishing to technical journals. Collaborates with sales staff to create proposals in response to current and potential client requests for proposal (RFPs). Reviews draft proposals for adherence to firm, industry, state, local and federal regulations and best practices. Meets with current and potential future clients to review their current and future design needs. Attends conferences, symposia, etc. to improve the visibility of the firm's products and services in collaboration with applicable sales staff. Performs other duties as required. Provides technical guidance and training to more junior staff. Mentors more junior staff and develops them for future growth within the discipline and firm. May supervise the work of junior engineers on project work.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or related discipline. Certification as an Engineer in Training (EIT) or passing the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam in states where an EIT is not obtainable (within 18 months of hire or promotion or transfer). 5 years of related experience. Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Skills and Abilities
Expert Knowledge of computer assisted design and drafting (CADD) 3D and 4D software and practices. Expert Knowledge of engineer principles of design. Expert Knowledge of Microsoft business software (excel, word, etc.). Excellent verbal and written communi
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with design, permitting and construction of wastewater treatment facilities, and Biowin modeling is preferred.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
20%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",196.0
140,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, motivated, Supplier focused Process Engineers with experience interfacing with reagents and material suppliers to join our growing consumables product development and sustaining team. The Supplier Process Engineer will provide technical leadership to the new product introduction and production sustaining teams with regards to a range of consumables including critical and custom reagents and chemicals, beads, laminates, glass, monomers, polymers, and other consumables . This individual will be responsible for supplier process development, supplier risk reduction, and ensuring that components are adequately characterized to meet stringent high volume manufacturing requirements. She/he will partner with R&D, Quality, NPI and Sustaining Process Development, and Supply Chain to sustain and improve delivered products with a focus on product robustness, quality, production health, and cost. She/he will proactively identify business needs, gather requirements, and help determine the actions necessary to drive performance improvement.
Responsibilities
Work with suppliers to define key process characterization requirements to ensure that supplied consumables are adequately controlled and de-risked.
Work with internal SMEs, stakeholders from engineering, supply chain, and supplier quality to properly define timelines, budget, and integrated evaluation and qualification plans.
Collaborate with Development, Process Engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for reagents and raw material supplied products
Technical point of contact for sustaining suppliers (NCRs, SCARs, SCNs, etc.)
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of incoming material
Lead or lend expertise in various cross-functional jobs/efforts and serve as the internal SME for supplier manufacturing processes
Identify and implement corrective measures for supplied product variation
Effective communication style working with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments, and across global sites
Requirements
Experience working with chemicals and other reagents used in biomedical applications such as nucleotides, oligomers, proteins etc…
Fundamental understanding of chemistry and reaction mechanisms with focus on analytical and organic chemistry
Experience and understanding of analytical investigation techniques such as AFM, SEM, EDX, XPS, FTIR, Ellipsometry, TEM, Mass Spec highly preferred
Knowledge of physical material properties such as CTE, Tg, Modulus, etc…
Experience with failure analysis and 8D methodology.
Experience interfacing with suppliers in an engineering context and driving spec setting activities, process improvement, and component qualifications is highly preferred
Ability to understand data in whatever format it’s presented, and effectively transform it to communicate a story and preferred action plan
Knowledge of with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Familiarity with configuration management (PCS, CIS, PLM)
Expert user of Excel, proficient in Word, Outlook, PowerPoint
Demonstrated ability to work with ambiguous requirements, adapt quickly, and learn
Detail oriented, proactive, works independently, works well with others
High degree of initiative and ownership, as well as a proven history of delivering results while working with several different departments in a fast-paced environment
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Willingness to travel (up to 20%)
Education
B.S./M.S./Ph.D. in Chemistry, Material Science, Polymer Science, Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, or related field with relevant experience in product development, production sustaining, process development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",197.0
141,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronicsis an ongoing journey of discovery: our 57,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in healthcare, life science and performance electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronicsis a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


This role does not offer sponsorship for work authorization. External applicants must be eligible to work in the US.


Your role:


The Quality Engineer (QE) will be part of theQuality Assurance group at Carlsbad, CA. The QE will provide day to day Quality Engineering support for a fast-paced semiconductor materials manufacturing operation. Youwill be a key quality driver for site activities including data automation, statistical analysis, problem solving, action plans, RFCs, and preventative actions to reduce/eliminate risk to product performance to customer.


Who you are:


You provide lead data automation and digitalization analysis by pulling data from various databases and creating automated visualization dashboards. Background in programming (Python, Java script, SQL) highly preferred.

You lead predictive techniques/ advanced data science analytics to identify control points and ensure quality before product manufacturing

You evaluate deviations / OOS OOC conditions and provide guidance for the disposition of non-conforming product

You utilize LEAN Six Sigma practices to implement and improve plant quality standards and processes

You lead root cause investigations for customer complaints and quality investigations using model based problem solving techniques.

You support the site SPC program. Provide SPC/SQC data support and customized trend charts to assess and monitor product/process performance. Prepare SQC Charts/CpK reports and calculate specifications/control limits for both internal and customer requirements

Who you are:


Minimum qualifications:


A minimum of 5 years quality, manufacturing, or technical experience in a fast-paced time sensitive environment

Bachelor's degree in engineering, chemistry, or other technical discipline

Chemical manufacturing or semiconductor experience preferred

Preferred qualifications:
American Society for Quality (ASQ) Certified Quality Engineer (CQE) or other relevant certification is highly preferred

Six Sigma Green Belt or Black Belt certification is a plus
Strong hands-on knowledge of statistical process control (SPC/SQC), root cause analysis and corrective action (CAPA), problem solving, FMEAs, Design of Experiment (DoE), continuous improvement (CI) activities, management of change, and document control systems

Hands-on experience with process improvement, data automation, and data digitization highly preferred

Strong Data analysis and data preparation automation knowledge with background in programming (Python, Java script, SQL, Alteryx/DataIku, Tableau)

Proficient with statistical software including Minitab, JMP, NWA

Strong communication skills with experience working in a collaborative environment

Excellent time management and organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple activities and projects

Demonstrated project management experience as a leader and contributor

SAP experience preferred

ISO Certification (or equivalent) is preferred (such as ISO 9001-2015, ISO 140001, ISO/TS 16949)

What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 216181


Location: Carlsbad


Career Level: D - Professional (4-9 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.

Job Segment: Semiconductor, ERP, CAPA, Lean Six Sigma, Quality, Science, Technology, Management",199.0
142,chemical+engineer,"Cue Health Inc. is seeking to hire a full time Senior Process Engineer, SMT.
Responsibilities:
Provides engineering support to SMT lines and bio/mechanical engineering teams to drive process improvements and stability to the manufacturing process
Develop and review process documents and procedures; partners with management/engineering to implement any needed changes effectively
Develop quality tools and inspection processes to verify the conformity of product to the specification
Perform equipment process validation (IQ,OQ PQ) for SMT equipment and software upgrades
Responsible for assisting management with continuous improvement for cost and productivity
Help support process maintenance for the SMT equipment
Recommend modifications to procedures or processes with supporting data from self-managed projects
Design process fixtures and tools
Assist in new product transfer
Develop engineering support system for multi-line multi-shift organization
Strictly follows safety regulations, policies, and procedures
Implement 5s and lean manufacturing processes
Maintains a safe and clean work area
Additional duties as assigned
Requirements:
5+ years’ experience in SMT production and engineering
Bachelor’s degree focusing on electronics engineering
Previous supervisorial experience desired
Knowledgeable with capacity analysis
Working knowledge of SMT related software (Gerber, AutoCad)
Medical device manufacturing experience required
Comprehensive knowledge of HAZCOM, Lab Chemical Safety, and IQ-OQ-PQ validation
Good communication skills, as well as, reading and writing abilities
Physical Requirements:
Remaining in a stationary position, often standing or sitting for prolonged period of time
Adjusting, moving or lifting objects up to 50 pounds
Repeating motions that may include the wrists, hands and/or fingers
You will work in a manufacturing environment. Your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in the technology, health and diagnostic industry. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a collaborative team on an innovative device. We offer upgraded computer equipment, unlimited snacks, competitive salary.",200.0
143,chemical+engineer,"As a global leader in mass spectrometry, SCIEX delivers solutions for precision detection and quantification of molecules to help protect and advance the wellness and safety of all. Because of our 50 years of groundbreaking innovation, our customers can quickly respond to environmental hazards, better understand biomarkers relevant to disease, improve patient care in the clinic, bring relevant drugs to market faster, and keep food healthier and safer. At SCIEX, you’ll find a rewarding role that amplifies your impact on the world and helps you realize life’s potential.

SCIEX is proud to work alongside a community of nine fellow Danaher Life Sciences companies. Together, we’re pioneering the future of science and medicine, developing products that enable researchers in the fight to save lives.

Would you like to support products you feel passionate about? We are seeking a dynamic, self-motivated Sr. Manufacturing Engineer to join our consumables center-of-excellence located in beautiful Carlsbad, CA! As a core member of our Technical Operations and Sustainment Engineering team, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams to incorporate design changes and drive continuous improvement projects for existing products and assist Capillary Electrophoresis (CE) and Mass Spec (MS) consumable manufacturing. The Manufacturing Scientist implements methods and processes for the production of CE & MS product lines. This role also assists in driving lean manufacturing initiatives and training of manufacturing associates. You will work closely with R&D, Quality, Regulatory and Manufacturing team members. Responsibilities

Plan, lead and conduct independent work requiring root cause analysis, troubleshooting, and modification of established manufacturing processes triggered by continuous improvement initiatives, non-conformances or supplier change notifications per company procedures and guidelines.

Lead complex risk assessments (PFMEA), and verification and validation assessments to ensure the safe and environmentally sound start-up of new or revised processes and assessments of Process Capability (Cpk).

Conduct proof of concept experiments; plan and executes engineering lots.

Participate on project teams to complete other project assignments in support of the CE and MS manufacturing lines.

Regular oral and written communication relating to progress and performance of work. Skills

Ability to work independently and to perform assignments with minimal direction, while working collaboratively with cross-functional teams.

Ability to solve complex problems; take a new perspective using existing solutions.

Ability to do root cause analysis and independent investigations to identify the source of errors in manufacturing.

Skilled at handling the quality of your own work and the work of others.

Experience developing & execution of manufacturing processes, IQ/OQ/PQs, writing procedures, and training manufacturing associates

Experience in chemistry or consumables manufacturing environment.

Familiarity with basic statistical analysis techniques / Mini-tab would be a plus.

Knowledge in CE and MS equipment would be a plus Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Bachelors degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with no less than 5+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering

Master’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Master’s degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with 3+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering experience.

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.

Danaher is committed to a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels they belong and all voices are heard. We believe in our associates and the unique perspectives they bring to every challenge, which is why we’ll empower you to push the boundaries of what’s possible.

If you’ve ever wondered what’s within you, there’s no better time to find out.

#LI-KR2

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.",201.0
144,chemical+engineer,"We’re looking to hire the best, brightest and boldest in the industry. Our employees are the heart of our company. We value passionate individuals who challenge the norms, deliver world-class solutions and bring diverse perspectives.


In this position, you will be joining teams locally and across the country, working on a diverse portfolio of projects. Your tasks could include:

Master planning, research and development, plant hydraulics.


Preparing detailed process design plans and specifications of water, water reuse, and wastewater treatment facilities, headworks, primary and secondary process, solids treatment processes, membrane systems, RO systems, pump stations, chemical feed systems, collection and conveyance systems, storage and mixing; and construction support services.


This role requires strong communication and teamwork with staff in our local office and various engineering disciplines in other offices.


In addition, this employee would have an opportunity to represent CDM Smith at conferences and provide technical support on business development opportunities.


This position is perfect for you if you are looking to elevate your career, take on increasingly challenging work and we will provide the encouragement and support so you can become a strong leader within our industry.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in civil, environmental or chemical engineering.


Professional engineering (PE) license.


7 years of related experience.


Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Certification/License Requirements
Professional Engineer
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with design, permitting and construction of wastewater treatment facilities, and Biowin modeling is preferred.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",202.0
145,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary:
The Process Development Engineer 2- Clinical Lab will work on the development, sustainment, and continuous improvement of our deployed clinical diagnostic products. The role will work closely with operations, product development, software development groups, and quality assurance. The ideal candidate will have experience interfacing with cross-functional teams and facilitating workflow improvements in a clinical laboratory. Furthermore, the candidate should a have analytical skills and interest in interpreting data to drive process optimization and Quality Control. Experience in six sigma, molecular biology methods for nucleic acid applications, sequencing, and liquid handler automation would be beneficial.
Responsibilities:
Work with and sometimes lead cross functional teams to support process changes or troubleshoot processes within the clinical laboratory.
Drive optimization of existing processes to improve efficiency, throughput, robustness and quality
Able to create requirements, plan activities and contribute to budget of allocated project scope, and prioritization of activities/assignments to supporting team members.
Able to identify risk and provide recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at project level.
Design and execution of experiments to support process changes.
Able to own a large subsystem or workflow, without needing oversight.
Analyzes process data to help drive continuous improvement and sustainment efforts.
Be a technical and integration representative for Operations on cross functional initiatives.
Works closely with scientific, bioinformatics, engineering, software, quality, and commercial teams to develop, transfer, and sustain new products into the Clinical laboratory.
Able to manage vendors on a technical level
Mentors peers and supporting engineers on technical skills in one’s area of expertise
Supports and troubleshoots existing processes and provides guidance on potential enhancements.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list, of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs.
Requirements:
B.S./M.S./ PhD in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Physical Chemistry, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, or Materials Science, with at least 2 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation.
Six Sigma preferred
Experience with driving Continuous Improvement initiatives for existing workflows
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Experience with validation and verification processes in a regulated laboratory.
Ability to think innovatively toward solving problems effectively and efficiently.
Adept inter-personal skills to contribute to cross functional project teams and work with stakeholders.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments
Experience with NGS technology preferred
Experience working in an CLIA, CAP, NYS, and/or ISO13485 lab is preferred.
Familiar with automated liquid handlers such Tecan and Hamilton is preferred
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",204.0
146,chemical+engineer,"Senior Technical Support Engineer
Senior Technical Support Engineer will report to the General Manager/Technical Director. Senior Technical Support Engineer will be responsible to learn and eventually take over the duties of the G.M. which comprise the following: Fielding customer and internal company technical questions, coordinating required testing and verification of all products to various industry standards or customer specific standards. Responsible to attend, participate and influence product standards committee meetings along with building relationships with other members. This position will also require facilitating the needs of the Sales and Quality Departments. As Senior Technical Support Engineer you’ll be required to answer technical or standards related question for both departments and be available to visit customers when necessary.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Duties include the following (other duties may be assigned):
Become the technical authority for SEIP and act as a technical resource for other departments, representatives, distributors, and OEM’s. Provide technical and application assistance for the sales group and process technical inquiries from the customer base and internally.
Act as SEIP liaison for R&D function and product development activities.
Responsible for the development, maintenance, and updating of product training programs.
Translate customer technical requirements into usable and salable products by working with IPD in Japan.
Assist in and perform basic marketing tasks such as communications, literature, product promotion, advertising, trade shows, etc.
Act as company “clearing house” for industry and agency specification activities. Participate and represent SEIP’s interest at agency committees.
Communicate all standards and industry related information to all SEIP Departments.
Responsible for coordinating specific actions at each Department based on agency and/or industry information.
Responsible for coordinating all customer specific product and industry test which SEIP’s heat-shrinkable products must meet.
Manage regulatory compliance and keep up to date with changing and more stringent rules such as Prop 65, IMDS, RoHS, REACH, etc.
Update literature, both printed and digital. This includes, Data sheets, brochures and marketing collateral materials.
Minimum Qualifications and Requirements
Background in polymer chemistry, R&D, and knowledge of heat-shrinkable products and technologies or other related fields. BS in chemistry or engineering preferred.
Must thoroughly understand and be able to influence industry and agency specifications for heat shrink products.
Needs solid knowledge of competitive products and markets
Strong verbal, written and Microsoft computer skills.
Requires experienced Project Management skills.
Training and presentation experience.
Experience in either face to face or virtual customer interface.
International experience and previous rep/distributor sales are helpful.
Preferences
Master Degree in Chemistry or Engineering
Field application experience
Special Position Requirements
Travel to Customer and Committee meetings is required 10-15%
Will be required to perform internal lab and product testing.
Physical Requirements
While performing the duties of this job the employee may be occasionally required to bend, twist and lift up to 50 pounds.
BENEFITS:
PPO Medical Plan
PPO Dental Plan
PPO Vision Plan
Company-Paid Life Insurance
Generous Vacation PTO
Generous Sick PTO
10 Paid Holidays
About Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc.
Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc. (SEIP) was founded in 1985 as a sales and marketing company. The company was originally formed to sell products made by Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in Japan to North American customers. SEIP is an independent U.S. company and is wholly owned subsidiary of Sumitomo Electric Fine Polymer (SFP). In 1996, SEIP began US production by building a new manufacturing site in San Marcos, CA. SEIP produces, markets, and sells products based upon heat-shrinkable plastics technology. We supply products to a diverse range of customers in a variety of industries. These include the automotive, aerospace, appliance, communications, electronics, medical, and transit industries to name a few.

To learn more about SEIP, please visit http://www.seipusa.com.

About Sumitomo Electric Group
Since the founding of Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in 1897 with copper wire production, we have developed many new technologies and products through innovative R&D activities based on Sumitomo Electric manufacturing technologies for electric wires and power cables. With more than 350 subsidiaries worldwide, we continue to introduce a wide variety of products that fulfill the expectations of society, in five business fields: Automotive, Information & Communications, Electronics, Environment & Energy, and Industrial Materials. We are a Fortune global 500 company.

To learn more about Sumitomo Electric Group, please visit http://global-sei.com.",206.0
147,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary
The Senior Instrumentation and Controls (I & C) Engineer must be an energetic, self-motivated, and innovative individual, who shall possess the skills required to successfully develop and execute project tasks and deliverables, be a collaborative team player, and have a strong drive to deliver to customers. This person will develop and implement I&C concepts on process-driven projects, coordinating with internal process, mechanical, and electrical engineers and also client personnel. This person will have experience in technical evaluation of vendor qualifications, contractor qualifications, and vendor bids. Experience in AutoCAD and Revit is necessary for developing drawing deliverables, as well as experience with databases for developing an instrument index, I/O list and datasheets. Project sizes will vary, and will consist primarily of pharmaceutical, biotech, or industrial process projects including both existing building renovations / retrofits and new construction.
Qualifications
Degree in Electrical, Mechanical, or Chemical Engineering preferred.
15 plus years of experience required, much of this preferably in a design firm setting
Professional Registration required
Understanding of or experience using AutoCAD and Revit required
Experience with databases required
Experience with developing instrumentation and control strategies/philosophies for pharma, biotech, or industrial processes required
Experience with programming of process control systems preferred
Ability to lead a project from an I&C perspective, to direct the I&C design effort, and to mentor I&C staff required
Experience with ISA and other Industry standards required
Responsibilities
Developing the control system philosophy and an overall control system architecture
Writing narratives that describe the process control systems that may include user requirements specifications and sequences of operation.
Using an instrument database or similar tool to develop an instrument index, I/O list, instrument data sheets, etc.
Selecting instrumentation for process control applications.
Performing instrument sizing calculations for valves, flowmeters, etc.
Assisting process and mechanical engineers with P&ID development by adding I&C symbols to depict the intent of the design.
Creating control panel drawings to include panel layout, panel wiring, and bill of materials.
Developing Control System Network Drawings.
Developing Instrument Bus Drawings.
Developing loop drawings and control wiring drawings to depict I&C circuitry.
Creating instrument location plans and instrument installation details.
Coordinating with architects and electrical engineers to locate control panels and ensure appropriate control power is provided for I&C devices and panels.
Providing I&C input into the controls requirements of complex process and mechanical equipment.
Developing I&C construction specifications.
Following projects after construction documents are issued and reviewing submittals, answering RFIs, and making field visits to verify construction of I&C scope is proceeding per the intent of the design.
Mentoring I&C engineers and directing activities of I&C CAD and Designer support staff.
Position Type
This is a full-time position
Benefits
CRB offers a complete and competitive benefit package designed for individuals and families.

CRB is an Equal Opportunity Employer – M/F/D/V",208.0
148,chemical+engineer,"As a global leader in mass spectrometry, SCIEX delivers solutions for precision detection and quantification of molecules to help protect and advance the wellness and safety of all. Because of our 50 years of groundbreaking innovation, our customers can quickly respond to environmental hazards, better understand biomarkers relevant to disease, improve patient care in the clinic, bring relevant drugs to market faster, and keep food healthier and safer. At SCIEX, you’ll find a rewarding role that amplifies your impact on the world and helps you realize life’s potential.

SCIEX is proud to work alongside a community of nine fellow Danaher Life Sciences companies. Together, we’re pioneering the future of science and medicine, developing products that enable researchers in the fight to save lives.

Would you like to support products you feel passionate about? We are seeking a dynamic, self-motivated Sr. Manufacturing Engineer to join our consumables center-of-excellence located in beautiful Carlsbad, CA! As a core member of our Technical Operations and Sustainment Engineering team, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams to incorporate design changes and drive continuous improvement projects for existing products and assist Capillary Electrophoresis (CE) and Mass Spec (MS) consumable manufacturing. The Manufacturing Scientist implements methods and processes for the production of CE & MS product lines. This role also assists in driving lean manufacturing initiatives and training of manufacturing associates. You will work closely with R&D, Quality, Regulatory and Manufacturing team members. Responsibilities

Plan, lead and conduct independent work requiring root cause analysis, troubleshooting, and modification of established manufacturing processes triggered by continuous improvement initiatives, non-conformances or supplier change notifications per company procedures and guidelines.

Lead complex risk assessments (PFMEA), and verification and validation assessments to ensure the safe and environmentally sound start-up of new or revised processes and assessments of Process Capability (Cpk).

Conduct proof of concept experiments; plan and executes engineering lots.

Participate on project teams to complete other project assignments in support of the CE and MS manufacturing lines.

Regular oral and written communication relating to progress and performance of work. Skills

Ability to work independently and to perform assignments with minimal direction, while working collaboratively with cross-functional teams.

Ability to solve complex problems; take a new perspective using existing solutions.

Ability to do root cause analysis and independent investigations to identify the source of errors in manufacturing.

Skilled at handling the quality of your own work and the work of others.

Experience developing & execution of manufacturing processes, IQ/OQ/PQs, writing procedures, and training manufacturing associates

Experience in chemistry or consumables manufacturing environment.

Familiarity with basic statistical analysis techniques / Mini-tab would be a plus.

Knowledge in CE and MS equipment would be a plus Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Bachelors degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with no less than 5+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering

Master’s degree in Science (Chemistry, Biochemistry, or Molecular Biology) / Master’s degree in Chemical engineering/ Biochemical engineering/ or similar, with 3+ years of Life Science industry and/or consumables, sustaining, manufacturing or manufacturing process engineering experience.

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.

Danaher is committed to a diverse and inclusive culture where everyone feels they belong and all voices are heard. We believe in our associates and the unique perspectives they bring to every challenge, which is why we’ll empower you to push the boundaries of what’s possible.

If you’ve ever wondered what’s within you, there’s no better time to find out.

#LI-KR2

When you join us, you’ll also be joining Danaher’s global organization, where 69,000 people wake up every day determined to help our customers win. As an associate, you’ll try new things, work hard, and advance your skills with guidance from dedicated leaders, all with the support of powerful Danaher Business System tools and the stability of a tested organization.",209.0
149,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineers to join our growing Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO) group. The MTO group works as an integral part of our Consumables Manufacturing process and is tasked with increasing quality and yield within our high-volume Oligonucleotide manufacturing environment.
This Staff Engineer position is tasked with improving the maturity, scale, continuous improvement and efficiency of manufacturing processes; driving key initiatives that include capacity expansion, process scale-up activities, site transfers, and critical pieces of new product introductions. These individuals will both be a driver in the execution of projects and provide technical leadership, partnering cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production and other engineering groups to develop processes for new products and sustain and improve processes for existing products. This role will include direct reports, involve technical mentorship and task prioritization, production process development, improvement and sustaining efforts.
Responsibilities:
Participate in process development, definition and improvement, and other activities in the making of consumable products.
Troubleshoot production line issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Work in cross-functional teams to both represent operational needs and help develop and transfer new processes/products to production and/or to enhance existing processes/products in production.
Construct and execute controlled experiments to optimize and scale synthetic chemistry processes.
Define technical requirements and write procedures for Production to process product.
Develop assessments and strategies for identifying, managing, and reducing product / process risk utilizing a variety of techniques including FMEAs, DOEs, and Control Plans.
Troubleshoot new and existing product or process issues related to yield, quality and throughput, utilizing structured problem-solving techniques and quality assurance mechanisms when appropriate (e.g. 8D, A3, and CAPA)
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations.
Author technical documents including batch records, SOPs, engineering / development reports, and risk / validation assessments.
Requirements:
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or semiconductor industries is required.
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Experience in Oligonucleotide chemistry and analysis is a plus
Experience with downstream liquid handling and purification process methods is required.
Experience with Process Validation and Quality by Design (QbD) experience is a plus
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is required.
Experience developing risk management and process control strategies is required.
High level problem solving and reasoning skills are required.
Demonstrated ability to make oligonucleotides, nucleotides, and/or associated subassemblies
Experience organic synthesis, automated synthesis
High level analytical, problem solving, troubleshooting, and root cause analysis skills
Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills required
Detail-oriented, highly organized and ability to multi-task are essential.
Strong understanding of GMP. Experience working in an ISO 13485 or FDA regulated environment is desirable
Experience with product development processes and project management skills is required.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills are required.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs
Desired Skills:
Prior lead/supervisory experience preferred.
Programming/scripting knowledge is a plus.
Experience with SAP or equivalent ERP system
Experience with lean manufacturing tools and principles is a plus
Experience with Design Transfer for both Research and Diagnostic products is a plus.
Education:
BS/MS with 8+ years of relevant experience or PhD with 3+ years of relevant experience in a production support and/or process development, sustaining, design/transfer or scale-up role.
Field of study in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Organic Chemistry, or Analytical Chemistry with emphasis on Synthetic Organic Chemistry preferred.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",210.0
150,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Imagine… 2 weeks after the birth of your child you realize they aren’t meeting critical developmental milestones and after months of doctor’s appointments you are told your baby has a rare neurological disease that would impact how they would live their lives. This is the reality of parents whose children have Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) and it’s the reason why we at Novartis Gene Therapies are laser focused on bringing hope and possibility to those devastated by rare genetic diseases.
The Senior Scientist, Process Science – Downstream, is responsible to be a technical lead in gene therapy downstream process development, designing and executing downstream process development activities, as well as performing downstream process operations at both small scale and large scale to support pipeline research and pre-clinical studies.
Responsibilities:
Advances complex downstream process development efforts as a technical lead within a cross-functional team across sites.
Independently designs and executes gene therapy downstream process development studies.
Performs experiments at both large-scale and small-scale to support pre-clinical, clinical and commercial programs. Ensures these experiments are done in a timely fashion with high quality.
Stays current with the latest scientific and engineering developments in the field.
Leverages strong understanding of biologics downstream process to evaluate and introduces new technologies and innovative ideas related to downstream process development.
Analyzes and interprets experimental data from process studies with strong statistical mindset. Makes decisions based on statistically sound conclusions.
Presents study results internally and externally in a cross-functional setting.
Independently authors technical reports of studies of process development activities and laboratory experiments, such as development report, study report, investigational summary report, etc.
Collaborates with cross-functional groups to advance pipeline programs. Provides support for regulatory filings and author sections in IND filings.
Leads and mentors technical team fostering innovative and collaborative culture.
Communicates effectively with diverse teams to coordinate lab activities and manage resources.
Other related job duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's, biological sciences, pharmaceutical sciences or related technical field with 8 years relevant experience or Master's with 6 or PHD with 4.
Comprehensive experience with a variety of biopharmaceutical purification processes such as chromatographic separation, depth filtration, precipitation & flocculation, tangential flow filtration, adventitious viral clearance, ultracentrifugation, and impurity clearance.
Proficient in statistical analysis principles and approaches. Working knowledge and experience with Design of Experiment (DoE).
Ability to analyze data to make date-driven decisions and further progress development strategies.
Proven team leader with previous experience of effectively leading technical group.
Innovative with a continuous improvement mindset.
Good communication skills with project management experience in cross-functional setting.
Knowledge of current Good Manufacturing Practices (cGMP) requirements and their indication in process development environment.
Knowledge of viral gene therapy and previous experience with AAV downstream process development is preferred.
Up to 10% travel.
The level of this position will be based on the final candidate’s qualifications.
Why Novartis?
769 million lives were touched by Novartis medicines in 2020, and while we’re proud of this, we know there is so much more we could do to help improve and extend people’s lives. We believe new insights, perspectives and ground-breaking solutions can be found at the intersection of medical science and digital innovation. That a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment inspires new ways of working.
We believe our potential can thrive and grow in an unbossed culture underpinned by integrity, curiosity and flexibility. And we can reinvent what's possible, when we collaborate with courage to aggressively and ambitiously tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges. Because the greatest risk in life, is the risk of never trying! Imagine what you could do here at Novartis!
Novartis Gene Therapies Benefit Summary:
Annual bonus, long term incentive, health insurance, paid vacation/holidays, potential flexible working arrangements (based on role) and an employee recognition program are available for this position, among many other benefits provided to employees of Novartis Gene Therapies.
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Novartis Gene Therapies is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, sexual orientation or veteran status.",212.0
151,chemical+engineer,"Adagene Inc. (Nasdaq: ADAG) is a platform-driven, clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company committed to transforming the discovery and development of novel antibody-based cancer immunotherapies. Adagene combines computational biology and artificial intelligence to design novel antibodies that address unmet patient needs. Powered by its proprietary DPL platform, composed of NEObody, SAFEbody, and POWERbody technologies, Adagene’s highly differentiated pipeline features novel immunotherapy programs. Adagene has forged strategic collaborations with reputable global partners that leverage its technology in multiple approaches at the vanguard of science.
Position Summary
This position is responsible for managing Downstream process development and subsequent manufacturing of biological products at Contract Development and Manufacturing Organizations (CDMOs). Management of CDMOs and CROs is a critical aspect of the job and will include frequent visits to the contractors depending on the intensity of the ongoing activities. The role involves significant cross-functional collaboration with other functions, including but not limited to - R&D Discovery, Upstream, Analytical, Quality Assurance, Toxicology, Regulatory, Project Management, and Executive Leadership.
Essential Functions
These may include, but are not limited to, the following; other duties may be assigned:
Manage and support Downstream Process development

Manage and support Downstream manufacturing, Tech Transfer of Processes, Scale-up within or between CDMOs.

Ensure all experiments and activities are documented appropriately to ensure full traceability of work performed at the CDMO/CRO, including tracking of technical risks, issues and decisions taken.

Contribute to preparation and submission of CMC sections of regulatory submissions and updates (IND, BLA, and post marketing commitments)

Design, manage and support Late-Stage BLA activities - Downstream Process Characterization Studies, Develop control strategies for process validation, PAI support.

Author, review and/or approve Downstream and Virus Clearance related documents, including Batch Records, SOPs, Protocols, sampling plans, development reports, qualification/validation reports and other technical reports.

Support process investigations and help determine root cause of excursions in clinical manufacturing.

Ensure that all processes are in line with health, safety, environmental and quality requirements including regulations, policies, applicable guidelines, and procedures.
Education & Experience
PhD in Biochemistry / Biology / Chemical Engineering, with 7+ years of biological process development and manufacturing experience with a strong record of achievement; or BS/MS
Proven hands-on experience with purification processes such as Chromatography columns, membrane filtration systems, Ultrafiltration/Diafiltration, Final Fill etc.
Proven hands-on experience managing and executing Virus Clearance studies
Demonstrated experience in tech transfer of a process from development to manufacturing or between manufacturing sites.

Technical team management experience

Experience of setting up a process development lab is a plus
Other Information
The position can be outside China location (may require travelling to China)
Position may require working with biological and/or chemical hazards
Equal Opportunity Employer
Adagene is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to diversity and inclusion. We prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, pregnancy, veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics as outlined by federal, state, or local laws. Learn more about your EEO Rights as an applicant.
Adagene will not discriminate or retaliate against applicants who inquire about, disclose, or discuss their compensation.
Adagene will consider for employment all qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with applicable law. If you are applying for a position in San Francisco, review the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance guidelines applicable in your area.
Adagene participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations as required by law. Learn more about the E-Verify program.
Adagene is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to applicants with physical and mental disabilities. Adagene is a drug-free workplace.",214.0
152,chemical+engineer,"Cue Health Inc. is seeking to hire a full-time Quality Engineer , Bioproduction to provide expertise in quality engineering for the, manufacturing, design and development of bioproduction processes for Cue Health’s in-vitro diagnostic medical device. This role will ensure compliance of the Design History File, the manufacturing process from incoming inspection to Cue Health’s product release and maintenance of the Risk Assessment process.
Reporting to the Senior Manager of Quality Engineering, the Quality Engineer will assist with implementation and maintenance of the Quality Management System (QMS) processes related to design and manufacturing while ensuring conformance to FDA and international regulations and standards. They will work closely with management and cross-functional leaders concerning projects, operational decisions, and scheduling requirements and will conduct briefings and technical meetings for internal and external representatives. Alternate work schedule for this role is Fri-Sun, 3X12 hr shifts, 6am-pm, 4 days off each week.
Responsibilities:
Provides compliance oversight of the various site Quality tools / systems to maintain an effective, compliant, and validated system as per ISO 13485, ISO14971, 21CFR820, 21CFR809, applicable regulatory requirements and Cue Health’s Quality Policy.
Contribute to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Quality System.
Development and documentation of quality plans, processes, procedures, and work instructions.
Ensure compliance of Quality activities for receiving inspection and test, manufacturing process control, nonconforming material, review of design history files and final product release as it relates to the Bioproduction processes.
Provide quality support for marketed products including establish and maintain product quality measures, change orders, planned deviations, corrective and preventive action, and contribute to improvements.
Provide quality support to the product development effort including establish product quality requirements and review of component, assembly, system, equipment qualification documents, and stability reports.
Responsible for input to product risk management system; plans, hazard analysis and FMEA / FMECA with the requirements of ISO14971.
Interface with production teams to provide guidance on supplier qualifications related to design and manufacturing activities and SCARs related to these suppliers.
Perform product failure investigations and facilitate required corrective / preventive actions.
Produce/maintain metrics and/or reports on all activities as required.
Provide training or mentoring to other teams to elevate efficiencies and facilitate compliance to the product development and manufacturing processes.
Support the Quality Assurance Manager for complaints investigation and Quality audits related to design and manufacturing.
Perform other quality related tasks to meet company goal as required.
Requirements:
Knowledgeable of Quality system principles; FDA Quality System Regulation (cGMP); 21CFR820, 21CFR809, ISO 13485 Quality system standards for medical device, IS014971 Risk Management Systems required
Experience in technical transfer and product development in a regulated environment, including design control, hazard analysis, validation, and process metrics
Ability to work with development engineers and other functional group personnel to accomplish common goals
Experience with quality systems and processes as they relate to GMP manufacturing
Detail oriented, with good written and verbal English communication skills
Computer literate in word processing, spreadsheets, databases, and other quality related productivity programs
Application of statistical techniques for quality assurance
BS in a Biomedical Engineering, Chemistry, Life Sciences or equivalent field
5+ years quality engineering experience in the product design of medical or IVD products and/or manufacturing
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic, environment
You will work in a office environment . Your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in the technology, health and diagnostic industry. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a collaborative team on an innovative device. We offer upgraded computer equipment, unlimited snacks, competitive salary.",215.0
153,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a driven and motivated Process Engineer to join our growing consumables development team. The consumables engineering group is responsible for the development, transfer, stabilization, and scaling of Illumina’s industry leading high-volume consumables. This individual will work with a team of Product Engineers to drive improvements in Illumina’s consumable products through product knowledge, systematic problem solving, data analytics, and data reporting. They will partner with R&D, NPI teams, and Operations to sustain and improve manufactured products with a focus on process robustness, quality, production health, and cost. They will proactively identify business needs, gather requirements, and help determine the actions necessary to drive performance improvement.
Responsibilities
Characterize product health and develop key metrics to drive efficiency and robustness improvements in product development
Collaborate with Development, Process Engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for manufactured products
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of production areas
Identify and implement corrective measures for product variation
Effective communication with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments, and across global sites
Works with development teams to transfer, launch, and scale hardened products into full production
Assist in defining technical requirements for new products
Requirements
Extremely good data analysis skills and a logical approach to problem solving
Ability to understand data in whatever format it’s presented, and effectively use it to communicate a story and drive action
Strong programming skills (SQL, R preferred) and statistical knowledge (DOEs, statistical analysis, etc.)
Experience in manufacturing support/sustaining and transferring products from R&D to production preferred
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Expert user of Excel, proficient in Word, Outlook, PowerPoint
Familiarity with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Demonstrated ability to work with ambiguous requirements, adapt quickly, and learn
Detail-oriented, proactive, works independently, works well with others
High degree of initiative and ownership, as well as a proven history of delivering results while working with several different departments in a fast-paced environment
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience with either of the following technologies is a plus: Microarrays or genomic sequencing
Experience in one or more of the following fields is a plus: Oligo Manufacturing, Reagent Formulation, MEMS/Semiconductor Fabrication, or other high-tech, high-volume consumables manufacturing
Education
BS/MS/PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, or related field
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",216.0
154,chemical+engineer,"Kelly® Science & Clinical is seeking Process Development Specialist/Scientist- DOWNSTREAM
professionals who are eager to bring the latest scientific discoveries to life in order to create a brighter, safer and healthier future for all. If you’re passionate about shaping the world we live in and ready for a new challenge, this may be the perfect opportunity for you.
This position will be responsible for leading and executing the process development strategy for our preclinical and clinical scale candidates in development. The candidate will be expected to work in collaboration with our internal research group as well as our external manufacturing partners to develop scalable and robust manufacturing processes to support manufacture of AAV based gene therapy products. The candidate will have responsibilities for process development at research scale to support our preclinical candidates and GMP scale to support our clinical candidates. The successful candidate will be a subject matter expert in process development for AAV based gene therapy products with demonstrated experience in the field. As an early-stage startup this position will require flexibility, creativity and a can-do attitude to enable efficient execution of company objectives. The level of the position will be commensurate with experience.

Responsibilities:
Support development of robust, well-characterized, high quality and high yielding upstream production processes for AAV gene therapy products across internal programs.
Contribute to the design and execution studies to develop a thorough understanding of the process design space, with a view towards technology transfer to a CDMO and successful regulatory filings.
Prepare and review experimental protocols, provide technical input, and function in the role of technical liaison between CDMO and development group to ensure that sound scientific decisions are implemented.
Enable execution of discovery and pre-clinical activities through the production of research grade AAV vectors.
Will be highly communicative and function at a high level in a matrixed management environment.

Minimum Qualification:
Degree in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Biochemistry, Virology or other relevant discipline. Scientist level applicants should have a PhD OR a master’s degree with 5+ years of relevant experience; Senior Scientist level applicants should have a PhD, a post-doc, and 2+ years of relevant experience.
Expertise in chromatography (affinity and ion exchange), tangential flow filtration, and dead-end filtration
Good understanding of statistical methods in the application and design of experiments is a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communications skills, and the ability to present and defend positions and approaches critical to program progression and success.
Ability to work in a matrix organization in collaboration with discovery research, nonclinical development, operations, clinical development and with consultants and external service providers.
Work under GLP/GMP to provide high quality, regulatory compliant technical documentation in support of process transfers to manufacturing.
Aseptic cell culture experience is required.

#TJP2021_SPEC
#TJP2021_SCT
Why Kelly®?

Kelly® Science & Clinical is your connection to premier scientific and clinical companies looking to hire talented people just like you. Every day, we match science professionals with dream jobs that fit their skills and interests—it’s the way we think job searching should be. Nearly 100 percent of our science recruiters have a professional background/education in science, so we know a thing or two about the science market and how to get you noticed.
About Kelly®
At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live (plus, did we mention we provide a ton of benefits?). Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.
Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
]]",217.0
155,chemical+engineer,"Technical Support Engineer
Senior Technical Support Engineer will report to the General Manager/Technical Director. Senior Technical Support Engineer will be responsible to learn and eventually take over the duties of the G.M. which comprise the following: Fielding customer and internal company technical questions, coordinating required testing and verification of all products to various industry standards or customer specific standards. Responsible to attend, participate and influence product standards committee meetings along with building relationships with other members. This position will also require facilitating the needs of the Sales and Quality Departments. As Technical Administrator you’ll be required to answer technical or standards related question for both departments and be available to visit customers when necessary.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Duties include the following (other duties may be assigned):
Become the technical authority for SEIP and act as a technical resource for other departments, representatives, distributors, and OEM’s. Provide technical and application assistance for the sales group and process technical inquiries from the customer base and internally.
Act as SEIP liaison for R&D function and product development activities.
Responsible for the development, maintenance, and updating of product training programs.
Translate customer technical requirements into usable and salable products by working with IPD in Japan.
Assist in and perform basic marketing tasks such as communications, literature, product promotion, advertising, trade shows, etc.
Act as company “clearing house” for industry and agency specification activities. Participate and represent SEIP’s interest at agency committees.
Communicate all standards and industry related information to all SEIP Departments.
Responsible for coordinating specific actions at each Department based on agency and/or industry information.
Responsible for coordinating all customer specific product and industry test which SEIP’s heat-shrinkable products must meet.
Manage regulatory compliance and keep up to date with changing and more stringent rules such as Prop 65, IMDS, RoHS, REACH, etc.
Update literature, both printed and digital. This includes, Data sheets, brochures and marketing collateral materials.
Minimum Qualifications and Requirements
Background in polymer chemistry, R&D, and knowledge of heat-shrinkable products and technologies or other related fields. BS in chemistry or engineering preferred.
Must thoroughly understand and be able to influence industry and agency specifications for heat shrink products.
Needs solid knowledge of competitive products and markets
Strong verbal, written and Microsoft computer skills.
Requires experienced Project Management skills.
Training and presentation experience.
Experience in either face to face or virtual customer interface.
International experience and previous rep/distributor sales are helpful.
Preferences
Master Degree in Chemistry or Engineering
Field application experience
Special Position Requirements
Travel to Customer and Committee meetings is required 10-15%
Will be required to perform internal lab and product testing.
Physical Requirements
While performing the duties of this job the employee may be occasionally required to bend, twist and lift up to 50 pounds.
BENEFITS:
PPO Medical Plan
PPO Dental Plan
PPO Vision Plan
Company-Paid Life Insurance
Generous Vacation PTO
Generous Sick PTO
10 Paid Holidays
About Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc.
Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc. (SEIP) was founded in 1985 as a sales and marketing company. The company was originally formed to sell products made by Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in Japan to North American customers. SEIP is an independent U.S. company and is wholly owned subsidiary of Sumitomo Electric Fine Polymer (SFP). In 1996, SEIP began US production by building a new manufacturing site in San Marcos, CA. SEIP produces, markets, and sells products based upon heat-shrinkable plastics technology. We supply products to a diverse range of customers in a variety of industries. These include the automotive, aerospace, appliance, communications, electronics, medical, and transit industries to name a few.
To learn more about SEIP, please visit http://www.seipusa.com.
About Sumitomo Electric Group
Since the founding of Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in 1897 with copper wire production, we have developed many new technologies and products through innovative R&D activities based on Sumitomo Electric manufacturing technologies for electric wires and power cables. With more than 350 subsidiaries worldwide, we continue to introduce a wide variety of products that fulfill the expectations of society, in five business fields: Automotive, Information & Communications, Electronics, Environment & Energy, and Industrial Materials. We are a Fortune global 500 company.
To learn more about Sumitomo Electric Group, please visit http://global-sei.com.",218.0
156,chemical+engineer,"JOB INFORMATION
Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide positions perform a variety of subprofessional corrosion engineering work of intermediate difficulty in connection with monitoring, inspection, data acquisition and interpretation; compile, collect and interpret corrosion data; record, analyze, and interpret test data such as pipe-to-soil potentials and stray currents resistivity; investigate corrosion causes and mechanisms; provide technical assistance on electrical problems and protective coating issues; assist in the development of specifications and drawings to simplify operation and maintenance of cathodic protection systems and process equipment for corrosion control purposes; assist Corrosion Engineers with corrosion control inspections; lead/train Senior Corrosion Engineering Aides; and perform other duties as assigned.

 NOTE:
Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide employees may be required to work at heights in excess of 100 feet, walk in rough terrain in excess of four miles, work with high voltage electricity, and/or work in confined spaces for extended amounts of time. A confined space certification must be obtained within 6 months from being hired.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS
You must meet the following requirements on the date you apply, unless otherwise indicated.

EDUCATION: You must meet ONE of the following options:
Completion of a minimum of 30 semester/45 quarter college-level units in engineering, chemistry or physics.
A National Association of Corrosion Engineers (NACE) CP-1 (CP Tester) or higher Certification.

 NOTE:
Additional qualifying experience may be substituted for education lacked on a year-for-year basis. One year of full-time experience = 30 semester/45 quarter college-level units.
City of San Diego employees using Out-of-Class Assignment (OCA) experience to qualify must submit written documentation signed by their appointing authority or payroll specialist, detailing the work performed, dates, and total number of qualifying OCA hours. OCA experience without the required documentation will NOT be considered.
EXPERIENCE: Three years of full-time corrosion engineering experience in cathodic protection.

LICENSE: A valid California Class C Driver License is required at the time of hire.

HIGHLY DESIRABLE:
A National Association of Corrosion Engineers (NACE) Certification in a specialty field.
REQUIRED DOCUMENTS (MUST SUBMIT WITH APPLICATION):
Proof of transcripts or certification, if utilized to meet the minimum requirements.
For City of San Diego employees, proof of Out-of-Class Assignment (OCA), if utilized to meet the minimum requirements.
Required documents should be attached electronically to your application. If you are unable to attach at the time of application submittal, you must submit them as soon as possible via fax: (619) 533-3337; or to the Employment Information Center: City of San Diego Personnel Department, 1200 Third Avenue - Suite 300, San Diego, CA 92101. Include your name and the title of the position for which you are applying.
SCREENING PROCESS
Please ensure all information is complete and accurate as the responses you provide on the supplemental questions will be reviewed using an automated evaluation system. If you are successful in this initial screening process, your application will be reviewed for applicable education, experience, and/or training to ensure all minimum requirements have been met. Successful candidates will be placed on a list which will be used to fill position vacancies during the next six months (180 days) . For each vacancy, only those candidates with the most appropriate qualifications will be contacted by the hiring department for an interview.
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION
PRE-EMPLOYMENT REQUIREMENTS: Employment offers are conditional pending the results of all screening processes that are applicable to this job, which may include but are not limited to the following: Confirmation of citizenship/legal right to work in the United States; completion of a pre-employment medical review/exam (which may include drug/alcohol testing); reference checks; and a fingerprint check. The fingerprints will be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the California Department of Justice for a conviction record report. Certain positions may require additional screening processes which may include a polygraph examination and background investigation. All of these processes must be successfully completed before employment begins. A positive test for alcohol, illegal drugs or inadequately explained prescription drugs, misrepresentation, falsification, or omission of pertinent facts in any step of the screening/selection process may be cause for disqualification and/or termination of employment. Nothing in this job posting constitutes an expressed or implied contract for employment with the City of San Diego. Applicants must notify the Personnel Department of any changes in their name, address (home, email), or phone number or they may miss employment opportunities.
 Principal Engineering Aide (Option Title: Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide)
Rev. 5- August 2, 2021 (Closing Date Extended)
City employees may be eligible to participate in a benefit program including holidays, vacations, savings and retirement plans, health programs, and other benefits. 

Eligible City employees initially hired or assuming office on or after July 10, 2021, with the exception of Police Recruits participating in the City’s Police Academy, will participate in the City’s Defined Benefit Plan administered by the San Diego City Employees’ Retirement System (SDCERS).

Benefits may change due to employer-employee contract negotiations.

Flexible Benefits Plan Options for Employees Represented by Municipal Employees Associate (MEA)",220.0
157,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineers to join New Product Introduction team in the Manufacturing Technology and Transfer (MTT) group. The MTT group works as an integral part of our Consumables Development and Manufacturing teams and is tasked with developing and deploying consumables manufacturing processes of New Products within our production environments. The individual will provide technical leadership to new product introduction, and production process development. Additionally, s/he will partner cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production, Supply Chain, and other engineering groups to develop, transfer and sustain manufacturing processes for new products.
Responsibilities:
Participate in consumable product development, manufacturing process development, process and product improvements, and other activities in the making of consumable products to sequence genomes
Represent Operations needs on development teams for effective transfer of products into manufacturing
Define technical requirements for manufacturing processes and new production equipment
Author procedures and instructions for new manufacturing processes and train production operators to manufacture product in a GMP environment
Design, develop and source production equipment from vendors and OEM’s, work cross functionally with EHS and Facilities to establish safe production processes to enable manufacturing of consumable products
Troubleshoot new product and manufacturing process issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Develop understanding of CPM (critical parameter management), construct and execute controlled experiments and including DOE's to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions into a production environment to meet project goals
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations to improve product and process quality
Utilize expertise in 6-sigma, DFSS, 8D, DMAIC to solve issues that arise during product and process development phases of new product introductions
Work cross functionally with Product Development, Supply Chain, Manufacturing, Quality teams to enable operations for both launch and high-volume manufacturing
Ensure successful transfer of knowledge into manufacturing and the sustaining support teams
Requirements:
Work experience in the medical device, biotech, pharmaceutical, industries is desired
Experience with reagent formulation, filling, Lyophilization processes, labeling and packaging technologies preferred
Experience and understanding of complex automated manufacturing systems, tools and components (electrical and pneumatic control, sensors, metrology systems, PLCs) is desired
Experience with cGMP and 21 CFR part 11 and supporting manufacturing in an FDA regulated environment is preferred
Effective communication skills both verbal and written, analytical and organizational skills to manage competing project priorities
Experience with Statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with product development processes, design transfer and process and equipment validation
High level problem solving, and reasoning skills required
Experience with high volume production in a high tech, high volume consumables industry is a plus
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required
Education and Experience:
B.S./M.S. in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or Material Science with at least 8 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation
PhD in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Materials Science with at least 3 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",221.0
158,chemical+engineer,"Electric Distribution Senior Project Manager

Essential Duties:
Project Management of assigned projects from feasibility (Site Investigation Reports; Preliminary Site Plan development), through pre- commissioning, which includes actively managing the design, entitlement, construction document development, permitting and construction processes.
Close Out of Project: Oversee distribution of close out materials, facilitate prompt punch list final sign off, completion and resolution of all contract paperwork for final acceptance by client.
Client management: Serve as an accessible senior point of contact for clients and provide responsive and timely answers and solutions to client concerns to ensure repeat client work, manage client expectations, and translate internal and external stakeholder requirements into client deliverables.
Work with all involved disciplines and support staff; prepare or delegate estimated staffing requirements, schedules, and other pertinent data; prepare fee proposals; and conduct fee and contractual agreement negotiations.
Sub-consultant management including sourcing, directing activities and ensuring accurate, timely and within budget deliverables.
Directly responsible for budget management and completion of the billing process, collection of client billings and other operational and financial matters. Hold clients financially responsible for out of scope work prior to engaging Fiedler Group resources.
Ensure company policies, work rules, and processes are followed and other assigned duties.

Accountabilities:
Advance identification of potential technical/execution risks and develop schedule and budget conscience alternatives.
Pro-active and continuous communication and reporting on project progress to client and internal leadership.
Timely and accurate processing of RFIs, Submittals and Change Orders and other job-related documentation.
Managing QA / QC on projects with a systematic approach.

Skills:
Must understand and interpret Contract Documents, Engineering Documents, Specifications, Addendums, etc.
Must be an excellent problem solver and demonstrate accuracy and thoroughness in your work.
Highly organized and able to manage and coordinate project information and documents.
Engage clients with well-articulated proposals and presentations.
Self-motivated, team-oriented, with a strong sense of urgency and adaptable to a fast-paced environment.
General computer skills and proficiency with standard office software
Functioning vehicle, valid CA driver’s license and insurance.

Education and Experience:
Proven, increasing competency over the course of your project management career.
Technical/Professional expertise with 6 or more years of project management experience. At least 4 of those years must have been in an engineering consulting environment specifically hydrogen, and/or electrical.
Required: B.A. or Masters degree (M.A.) or equivalent; or four to ten years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience – Preferred technical degree (e.g. Electrical, Civil Engineering, Mechanical, Chemical Engineering etc.)
Required experience with design process from Concept, Schematics, Design Development, Construction Documentation, Permitting, Bid Phase, Construction Administration and Project Close-out
Required knowledge of design and construction methods
Preferred: PMP Certification
Preferred: Comprehensive understanding of building codes and application to Architectural and Engineering construction drawings.",222.0
159,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a driven, talented Sr Reagent Process Development Engineer to join our growing Reagents Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO) team. The MTO group works as an integral part of our Consumables Manufacturing process and is tasked with increasing quality and yield within our high-volume production environments. These individuals provide technical and operations leadership to production process development, improvement and sustaining efforts. Additionally, these teams will partner cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production and other engineering groups to develop processes for new products, as well as sustain and improve processes for existing products. This individual will be supporting the Reagent Formulation space, helping to stabilize and improve the related processes through troubleshooting, addressing key issue candles, cost-savings projects and SPC.
Responsibilities
Participate in consumable product development, manufacturing process development, process and product improvements, and other activities in the making of consumable products to sequence genomes
Represent Operations needs on development teams for effective transfer of products into manufacturing
Define technical requirements for manufacturing processes and new production equipment
Author procedures and instructions for new manufacturing processes and train production operators to manufacture product in a GMP environment
Troubleshoot new product and manufacturing process issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Develop understanding of CPM (critical parameter management), construct and execute controlled experiments and including DOE's to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions into a production environment to meet project goals
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations to improve product and process quality
Utilize expertise in 6-sigma, DFSS, 8D, DMAIC to solve issues that arise during product and process development phases of new product introductions
Work cross functionally with Product Development, Supply Chain, Manufacturing, Quality teams to enable operations for both launch and high-volume manufacturing
Ensure successful transfer of knowledge into manufacturing and the sustaining support teams
Requirements:
Work experience in the medical device, biotech, pharmaceutical, industries is desired
Experience with reagent formulation, filling, Lyophilization processes, labeling and packaging technologies preferred
Experience and understanding of complex automated manufacturing systems, tools and components (electrical and pneumatic control, sensors, metrology systems, PLCs) is desired
Experience with cGMP and 21 CFR part 11 and supporting manufacturing in an FDA regulated environment is preferred
Effective communication skills both verbal and written, analytical and organizational skills to manage competing project priorities
Experience with Statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with product development processes, design transfer and process and equipment validation
High level problem solving, and reasoning skills required
Experience with high volume production in a high tech, high volume consumables industry is a plus • High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required
Education and Experience
B.S./M.S. in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or Material Science with at least 5 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation
PhD in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Materials Science with at least 3 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",223.0
160,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineers to join our growing Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO) group. The MTO group works as an integral part of our Consumables Manufacturing process and is tasked with increasing quality and yield within our high-volume Oligonucleotide manufacturing environment.
This Staff Engineer position is tasked with improving the maturity, scale, continuous improvement and efficiency of manufacturing processes; driving key initiatives that include capacity expansion, process scale-up activities, site transfers, and critical pieces of new product introductions. These individuals will both be a driver in the execution of projects and provide technical leadership, partnering cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production and other engineering groups to develop processes for new products and sustain and improve processes for existing products. This role will include direct reports, involve technical mentorship and task prioritization, production process development, improvement and sustaining efforts.
Responsibilities:
Participate in process development, definition and improvement, and other activities in the making of consumable products.
Troubleshoot production line issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Work in cross-functional teams to both represent operational needs and help develop and transfer new processes/products to production and/or to enhance existing processes/products in production.
Construct and execute controlled experiments to optimize and scale synthetic chemistry processes.
Define technical requirements and write procedures for Production to process product.
Develop assessments and strategies for identifying, managing, and reducing product / process risk utilizing a variety of techniques including FMEAs, DOEs, and Control Plans.
Troubleshoot new and existing product or process issues related to yield, quality and throughput, utilizing structured problem-solving techniques and quality assurance mechanisms when appropriate (e.g. 8D, A3, and CAPA)
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations.
Author technical documents including batch records, SOPs, engineering / development reports, and risk / validation assessments.
Requirements:
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or semiconductor industries is required.
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Experience in Oligonucleotide chemistry and analysis is a plus
Experience with downstream liquid handling and purification process methods is required.
Experience with Process Validation and Quality by Design (QbD) experience is a plus
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is required.
Experience developing risk management and process control strategies is required.
High level problem solving and reasoning skills are required.
Demonstrated ability to make oligonucleotides, nucleotides, and/or associated subassemblies
Experience organic synthesis, automated synthesis
High level analytical, problem solving, troubleshooting, and root cause analysis skills
Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills required
Detail-oriented, highly organized and ability to multi-task are essential.
Strong understanding of GMP. Experience working in an ISO 13485 or FDA regulated environment is desirable
Experience with product development processes and project management skills is required.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills are required.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs
Desired Skills:
Prior lead/supervisory experience preferred.
Programming/scripting knowledge is a plus.
Experience with SAP or equivalent ERP system
Experience with lean manufacturing tools and principles is a plus
Experience with Design Transfer for both Research and Diagnostic products is a plus.
Education:
BS/MS with 8+ years of relevant experience or PhD with 3+ years of relevant experience in a production support and/or process development, sustaining, design/transfer or scale-up role.
Field of study in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Organic Chemistry, or Analytical Chemistry with emphasis on Synthetic Organic Chemistry preferred.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",224.0
161,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Imagine… 2 weeks after the birth of your child you realize they aren’t meeting critical developmental milestones and after months of doctor’s appointments you are told your baby has a rare neurological disease that would impact how they would live their lives. This is the reality of parents whose children have Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) and it’s the reason why we at Novartis Gene Therapies are laser focused on bringing hope and possibility to those devastated by rare genetic diseases.
The Senior Scientist, Process Science – Downstream, is responsible to be a technical lead in gene therapy downstream process development, designing and executing downstream process development activities, as well as performing downstream process operations at both small scale and large scale to support pipeline research and pre-clinical studies.
Responsibilities:
Advances complex downstream process development efforts as a technical lead within a cross-functional team across sites.
Independently designs and executes gene therapy downstream process development studies.
Performs experiments at both large-scale and small-scale to support pre-clinical, clinical and commercial programs. Ensures these experiments are done in a timely fashion with high quality.
Stays current with the latest scientific and engineering developments in the field.
Leverages strong understanding of biologics downstream process to evaluate and introduces new technologies and innovative ideas related to downstream process development.
Analyzes and interprets experimental data from process studies with strong statistical mindset. Makes decisions based on statistically sound conclusions.
Presents study results internally and externally in a cross-functional setting.
Independently authors technical reports of studies of process development activities and laboratory experiments, such as development report, study report, investigational summary report, etc.
Collaborates with cross-functional groups to advance pipeline programs. Provides support for regulatory filings and author sections in IND filings.
Leads and mentors technical team fostering innovative and collaborative culture.
Communicates effectively with diverse teams to coordinate lab activities and manage resources.
Other related job duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's, biological sciences, pharmaceutical sciences or related technical field with 8 years relevant experience or Master's with 6 or PHD with 4.
Comprehensive experience with a variety of biopharmaceutical purification processes such as chromatographic separation, depth filtration, precipitation & flocculation, tangential flow filtration, adventitious viral clearance, ultracentrifugation, and impurity clearance.
Proficient in statistical analysis principles and approaches. Working knowledge and experience with Design of Experiment (DoE).
Ability to analyze data to make date-driven decisions and further progress development strategies.
Proven team leader with previous experience of effectively leading technical group.
Innovative with a continuous improvement mindset.
Good communication skills with project management experience in cross-functional setting.
Knowledge of current Good Manufacturing Practices (cGMP) requirements and their indication in process development environment.
Knowledge of viral gene therapy and previous experience with AAV downstream process development is preferred.
Up to 10% travel.
The level of this position will be based on the final candidate’s qualifications.
Why Novartis?
769 million lives were touched by Novartis medicines in 2020, and while we’re proud of this, we know there is so much more we could do to help improve and extend people’s lives. We believe new insights, perspectives and ground-breaking solutions can be found at the intersection of medical science and digital innovation. That a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment inspires new ways of working.
We believe our potential can thrive and grow in an unbossed culture underpinned by integrity, curiosity and flexibility. And we can reinvent what's possible, when we collaborate with courage to aggressively and ambitiously tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges. Because the greatest risk in life, is the risk of never trying! Imagine what you could do here at Novartis!
Novartis Gene Therapies Benefit Summary:
Annual bonus, long term incentive, health insurance, paid vacation/holidays, potential flexible working arrangements (based on role) and an employee recognition program are available for this position, among many other benefits provided to employees of Novartis Gene Therapies.
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Novartis Gene Therapies is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, sexual orientation or veteran status.",226.0
162,chemical+engineer,"Adagene Inc. (Nasdaq: ADAG) is a platform-driven, clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company committed to transforming the discovery and development of novel antibody-based cancer immunotherapies. Adagene combines computational biology and artificial intelligence to design novel antibodies that address unmet patient needs. Powered by its proprietary DPL platform, composed of NEObody, SAFEbody, and POWERbody technologies, Adagene’s highly differentiated pipeline features novel immunotherapy programs. Adagene has forged strategic collaborations with reputable global partners that leverage its technology in multiple approaches at the vanguard of science.
Position Summary
This position is responsible for managing Downstream process development and subsequent manufacturing of biological products at Contract Development and Manufacturing Organizations (CDMOs). Management of CDMOs and CROs is a critical aspect of the job and will include frequent visits to the contractors depending on the intensity of the ongoing activities. The role involves significant cross-functional collaboration with other functions, including but not limited to - R&D Discovery, Upstream, Analytical, Quality Assurance, Toxicology, Regulatory, Project Management, and Executive Leadership.
Essential Functions
These may include, but are not limited to, the following; other duties may be assigned:
Manage and support Downstream Process development

Manage and support Downstream manufacturing, Tech Transfer of Processes, Scale-up within or between CDMOs.

Ensure all experiments and activities are documented appropriately to ensure full traceability of work performed at the CDMO/CRO, including tracking of technical risks, issues and decisions taken.

Contribute to preparation and submission of CMC sections of regulatory submissions and updates (IND, BLA, and post marketing commitments)

Design, manage and support Late-Stage BLA activities - Downstream Process Characterization Studies, Develop control strategies for process validation, PAI support.

Author, review and/or approve Downstream and Virus Clearance related documents, including Batch Records, SOPs, Protocols, sampling plans, development reports, qualification/validation reports and other technical reports.

Support process investigations and help determine root cause of excursions in clinical manufacturing.

Ensure that all processes are in line with health, safety, environmental and quality requirements including regulations, policies, applicable guidelines, and procedures.
Education & Experience
PhD in Biochemistry / Biology / Chemical Engineering, with 7+ years of biological process development and manufacturing experience with a strong record of achievement; or BS/MS
Proven hands-on experience with purification processes such as Chromatography columns, membrane filtration systems, Ultrafiltration/Diafiltration, Final Fill etc.
Proven hands-on experience managing and executing Virus Clearance studies
Demonstrated experience in tech transfer of a process from development to manufacturing or between manufacturing sites.

Technical team management experience

Experience of setting up a process development lab is a plus
Other Information
The position can be outside China location (may require travelling to China)
Position may require working with biological and/or chemical hazards
Equal Opportunity Employer
Adagene is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to diversity and inclusion. We prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, pregnancy, veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics as outlined by federal, state, or local laws. Learn more about your EEO Rights as an applicant.
Adagene will not discriminate or retaliate against applicants who inquire about, disclose, or discuss their compensation.
Adagene will consider for employment all qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with applicable law. If you are applying for a position in San Francisco, review the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance guidelines applicable in your area.
Adagene participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations as required by law. Learn more about the E-Verify program.
Adagene is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to applicants with physical and mental disabilities. Adagene is a drug-free workplace.",228.0
163,chemical+engineer,"Cue Health Inc. is seeking to hire a full-time Quality Engineer , Bioproduction to provide expertise in quality engineering for the, manufacturing, design and development of bioproduction processes for Cue Health’s in-vitro diagnostic medical device. This role will ensure compliance of the Design History File, the manufacturing process from incoming inspection to Cue Health’s product release and maintenance of the Risk Assessment process.
Reporting to the Senior Manager of Quality Engineering, the Quality Engineer will assist with implementation and maintenance of the Quality Management System (QMS) processes related to design and manufacturing while ensuring conformance to FDA and international regulations and standards. They will work closely with management and cross-functional leaders concerning projects, operational decisions, and scheduling requirements and will conduct briefings and technical meetings for internal and external representatives. Alternate work schedule for this role is Fri-Sun, 3X12 hr shifts, 6am-pm, 4 days off each week.
Responsibilities:
Provides compliance oversight of the various site Quality tools / systems to maintain an effective, compliant, and validated system as per ISO 13485, ISO14971, 21CFR820, 21CFR809, applicable regulatory requirements and Cue Health’s Quality Policy.
Contribute to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Quality System.
Development and documentation of quality plans, processes, procedures, and work instructions.
Ensure compliance of Quality activities for receiving inspection and test, manufacturing process control, nonconforming material, review of design history files and final product release as it relates to the Bioproduction processes.
Provide quality support for marketed products including establish and maintain product quality measures, change orders, planned deviations, corrective and preventive action, and contribute to improvements.
Provide quality support to the product development effort including establish product quality requirements and review of component, assembly, system, equipment qualification documents, and stability reports.
Responsible for input to product risk management system; plans, hazard analysis and FMEA / FMECA with the requirements of ISO14971.
Interface with production teams to provide guidance on supplier qualifications related to design and manufacturing activities and SCARs related to these suppliers.
Perform product failure investigations and facilitate required corrective / preventive actions.
Produce/maintain metrics and/or reports on all activities as required.
Provide training or mentoring to other teams to elevate efficiencies and facilitate compliance to the product development and manufacturing processes.
Support the Quality Assurance Manager for complaints investigation and Quality audits related to design and manufacturing.
Perform other quality related tasks to meet company goal as required.
Requirements:
Knowledgeable of Quality system principles; FDA Quality System Regulation (cGMP); 21CFR820, 21CFR809, ISO 13485 Quality system standards for medical device, IS014971 Risk Management Systems required
Experience in technical transfer and product development in a regulated environment, including design control, hazard analysis, validation, and process metrics
Ability to work with development engineers and other functional group personnel to accomplish common goals
Experience with quality systems and processes as they relate to GMP manufacturing
Detail oriented, with good written and verbal English communication skills
Computer literate in word processing, spreadsheets, databases, and other quality related productivity programs
Application of statistical techniques for quality assurance
BS in a Biomedical Engineering, Chemistry, Life Sciences or equivalent field
5+ years quality engineering experience in the product design of medical or IVD products and/or manufacturing
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic, environment
You will work in a office environment . Your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in the technology, health and diagnostic industry. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a collaborative team on an innovative device. We offer upgraded computer equipment, unlimited snacks, competitive salary.",229.0
164,chemical+engineer,"Downstream Process and Fermentation Engineer - San Diego, CA

Job Description
To realize our goal of building a next-generation Yarrowia lipolytica yeast platform, each of our strains need to be successfully deployed. Therefore, we are seeking a Downstream Process Engineer to help with this great challenge. With your motivation for process development, and a particular interest in downstream product recovery and purification, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and deploying downstream processes which meet quality, cost, and process reliability objectives.

Duties and Responsibilities
Design and manage the execution of laboratory and pilot scale downstream experiments, leading to the definition of commercially viable processes, harvest of and product recovery, that leverage engineered organismsWork with fermentation and synthetic chemistry scientists to adapt, optimize and scale-up laboratory scale processes to achieve commercially viable and robust process protocolsWork with manufacturing partners to design fermentation and downstream processes to fit the partners facility equipment and successfully transfer processes to themManage the execution of bench scale assays and proof-of-concept experimentsDevelop mass and energy balances, process flow and instrumentation diagrams, simulations and cost models.Conceive ideas to reduce the cost of manufacture of product, develop and implement experimental plans to test and evaluate feasibility of ideas.Work with external engineered systems and process equipment partners to design and assess alternative processes and equipment capable of achieving process requirements.Develop and follow Standard Operating Procedures and additional verbal and written directions.Support the set-up, completion, and clean-up of experiments.Present findings of research in written and oral formats.Maintain detailed and complete lab notebook. Participate and support IP filings.Must be able to work a schedule which includes weekends and extended hours.

Required Experience
B.S. degree in Chemical, Biochemical, Mechanical, Agricultural Engineering or related field with 2 to 3 years’ industrial experience or M.S. degree in similar or related fields with at least 1 year of industrial experience.Hands-on experience with chemical separations equipment (e.g. distillation, filtration, chromatography, centrifugation), and a strong understanding of the underlying theory.Ability to exercise judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques, and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.Knowledge of computer-based monitoring and control systems.Must possess excellent communication and interpersonal skills to facilitate interactions with an interdisciplinary team of scientists, engineers, technicians, and external partners.Familiarity in Process/ Utility Flow diagrams (PFD/UFD), Piping and Instrument Diagrams (P&IDs), and Equipment / Instrument specifications is a plus.Experience with hands-on fermentation processes and bioreactor operations is highly desirable.High-level expertise with modeling software (ASPEN, etc.) and/or building computational models is a plus.
For immediate consideration apply today!
Questions? Please reach out to Dustin at DUSG877@kellyservices.com
#TJP2021_SPEC
Why Kelly®?

Kelly® Science & Clinical is your connection to premier scientific and clinical companies looking to hire talented people just like you. Every day, we match science professionals with dream jobs that fit their skills and interests—it’s the way we think job searching should be. Nearly 100 percent of our science recruiters have a professional background/education in science, so we know a thing or two about the science market and how to get you noticed.
About Kelly®
At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live (plus, did we mention we provide a ton of benefits?). Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.
Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
]]",230.0
165,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a driven and motivated Process Engineer to join our growing consumables development team. The consumables engineering group is responsible for the development, transfer, stabilization, and scaling of Illumina’s industry leading high-volume consumables. This individual will work with a team of Product Engineers to drive improvements in Illumina’s consumable products through product knowledge, systematic problem solving, data analytics, and data reporting. They will partner with R&D, NPI teams, and Operations to sustain and improve manufactured products with a focus on process robustness, quality, production health, and cost. They will proactively identify business needs, gather requirements, and help determine the actions necessary to drive performance improvement.
Responsibilities
Characterize product health and develop key metrics to drive efficiency and robustness improvements in product development
Collaborate with Development, Process Engineering, Quality, Manufacturing, and other departments as needed to address issues with and set appropriate specifications for manufactured products
Take initiative to develop and implement new processes to collect data around and analyze the health of production areas
Identify and implement corrective measures for product variation
Effective communication with all levels of organizational structure, through multiple departments, and across global sites
Works with development teams to transfer, launch, and scale hardened products into full production
Assist in defining technical requirements for new products
Requirements
Extremely good data analysis skills and a logical approach to problem solving
Ability to understand data in whatever format it’s presented, and effectively use it to communicate a story and drive action
Strong programming skills (SQL, R preferred) and statistical knowledge (DOEs, statistical analysis, etc.)
Experience in manufacturing support/sustaining and transferring products from R&D to production preferred
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Expert user of Excel, proficient in Word, Outlook, PowerPoint
Familiarity with Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques
Demonstrated ability to work with ambiguous requirements, adapt quickly, and learn
Detail-oriented, proactive, works independently, works well with others
High degree of initiative and ownership, as well as a proven history of delivering results while working with several different departments in a fast-paced environment
Strong organizational skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience with either of the following technologies is a plus: Microarrays or genomic sequencing
Experience in one or more of the following fields is a plus: Oligo Manufacturing, Reagent Formulation, MEMS/Semiconductor Fabrication, or other high-tech, high-volume consumables manufacturing
Education
BS/MS/PhD in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Biomedical Engineering, Biotechnical Engineering, Bioinformatics, or related field
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",231.0
166,chemical+engineer,"Technical Support Engineer
Senior Technical Support Engineer will report to the General Manager/Technical Director. Senior Technical Support Engineer will be responsible to learn and eventually take over the duties of the G.M. which comprise the following: Fielding customer and internal company technical questions, coordinating required testing and verification of all products to various industry standards or customer specific standards. Responsible to attend, participate and influence product standards committee meetings along with building relationships with other members. This position will also require facilitating the needs of the Sales and Quality Departments. As Technical Administrator you’ll be required to answer technical or standards related question for both departments and be available to visit customers when necessary.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Duties include the following (other duties may be assigned):
Become the technical authority for SEIP and act as a technical resource for other departments, representatives, distributors, and OEM’s. Provide technical and application assistance for the sales group and process technical inquiries from the customer base and internally.
Act as SEIP liaison for R&D function and product development activities.
Responsible for the development, maintenance, and updating of product training programs.
Translate customer technical requirements into usable and salable products by working with IPD in Japan.
Assist in and perform basic marketing tasks such as communications, literature, product promotion, advertising, trade shows, etc.
Act as company “clearing house” for industry and agency specification activities. Participate and represent SEIP’s interest at agency committees.
Communicate all standards and industry related information to all SEIP Departments.
Responsible for coordinating specific actions at each Department based on agency and/or industry information.
Responsible for coordinating all customer specific product and industry test which SEIP’s heat-shrinkable products must meet.
Manage regulatory compliance and keep up to date with changing and more stringent rules such as Prop 65, IMDS, RoHS, REACH, etc.
Update literature, both printed and digital. This includes, Data sheets, brochures and marketing collateral materials.
Minimum Qualifications and Requirements
Background in polymer chemistry, R&D, and knowledge of heat-shrinkable products and technologies or other related fields. BS in chemistry or engineering preferred.
Must thoroughly understand and be able to influence industry and agency specifications for heat shrink products.
Needs solid knowledge of competitive products and markets
Strong verbal, written and Microsoft computer skills.
Requires experienced Project Management skills.
Training and presentation experience.
Experience in either face to face or virtual customer interface.
International experience and previous rep/distributor sales are helpful.
Preferences
Master Degree in Chemistry or Engineering
Field application experience
Special Position Requirements
Travel to Customer and Committee meetings is required 10-15%
Will be required to perform internal lab and product testing.
Physical Requirements
While performing the duties of this job the employee may be occasionally required to bend, twist and lift up to 50 pounds.
BENEFITS:
PPO Medical Plan
PPO Dental Plan
PPO Vision Plan
Company-Paid Life Insurance
Generous Vacation PTO
Generous Sick PTO
10 Paid Holidays
About Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc.
Sumitomo Electric Interconnect Products, Inc. (SEIP) was founded in 1985 as a sales and marketing company. The company was originally formed to sell products made by Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in Japan to North American customers. SEIP is an independent U.S. company and is wholly owned subsidiary of Sumitomo Electric Fine Polymer (SFP). In 1996, SEIP began US production by building a new manufacturing site in San Marcos, CA. SEIP produces, markets, and sells products based upon heat-shrinkable plastics technology. We supply products to a diverse range of customers in a variety of industries. These include the automotive, aerospace, appliance, communications, electronics, medical, and transit industries to name a few.
To learn more about SEIP, please visit http://www.seipusa.com.
About Sumitomo Electric Group
Since the founding of Sumitomo Electric Industries, Ltd. in 1897 with copper wire production, we have developed many new technologies and products through innovative R&D activities based on Sumitomo Electric manufacturing technologies for electric wires and power cables. With more than 350 subsidiaries worldwide, we continue to introduce a wide variety of products that fulfill the expectations of society, in five business fields: Automotive, Information & Communications, Electronics, Environment & Energy, and Industrial Materials. We are a Fortune global 500 company.
To learn more about Sumitomo Electric Group, please visit http://global-sei.com.",232.0
167,chemical+engineer,"The Senior Quality Engineer will be responsible for developing the Quality controls to support the transfer of products from R&D to manufacturing, and the subsequent ongoing sustaining functions necessary to ensure product quality. This position will work with minimum supervision to develop and implement the appropriate quality methods, acceptance criteria and qualification plans for product release to manufacturing. This role will develop raw material quality control points and support supplier qualifications to ensure raw material consistency. This is a cross-functional role that will frequently interact with management to provide technical assistance related to product expectations, failure analysis and other quality considerations. This role is also required to demonstrate a heightened sense of urgency in resolving matters related to quality and contribute positively in a fast-paced operations environment.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Participate in product design efforts to ensure that quality considerations are incorporated into design components and that the designs are compatible with quality test methods. Evaluate product and process designs for adequacy as related to field performance and manufacturability.Develop quality control strategies for raw materials and support supplier qualifications to ensure material consistency.Support stability studies of new materials new products, and changes as needed.Maintain design control and provide phase deliverables as requiredPerform statistical analysis for experiments and process trend monitoring to support the development of production metrics.Lead complex root cause failure investigation and troubleshooting of customer complaints and product non-conformances within manufacturing.Participate in Complaint Committee meetings and present investigation findings to peers and management.Participate in project team meetings and communicate readiness for product launch.Monitor field complaint data to evaluate new product performance and the impact of changesEducation and ExperienceB.S. in Engineering/Chemistry/Biology/Technical Discipline or equivalent combination of certification and work experience preferred6-8 years’ experience in Quality and Manufacturing Systems in Medical Device and high-volume manufacturing environments requiredMinimum 3 years’ experience in New Product introductions preferredASQ Quality Engineer Certification (CQE) preferredKnowledge/SkillsQuality Engineering skills which includes FMEA, Control Plans, Acceptance criteria, Sampling Plans.Strong technical aptitude and experience (preferably in engineering, chemistry, biology or other life sciences field) is a must.Quality Tools – Problem Solving Methodologies/Process Capability / ISO 13485 / Design of Experiments.Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of employees throughout the organizationAbility to develop and maintain strong working relationships with internal and external customers proficient in Microsoft Office, statistical software programs, operating systems, voice and email, etc.Ability to lead and facilitate a group of technical experts in root cause investigationsKnowledge of quality systems and regulations for medical device industry.High level of technical writing ability and excellent communication skills are requiredAdvanced skills in statistical techniques and quality tools is requiredUnderstanding of medical device Quality System Regulations (QSR) is requiredJob Type: Full-timePay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Remotely:No",234.0
168,chemical+engineer,"JOB INFORMATION
Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide positions perform a variety of subprofessional corrosion engineering work of intermediate difficulty in connection with monitoring, inspection, data acquisition and interpretation; compile, collect and interpret corrosion data; record, analyze, and interpret test data such as pipe-to-soil potentials and stray currents resistivity; investigate corrosion causes and mechanisms; provide technical assistance on electrical problems and protective coating issues; assist in the development of specifications and drawings to simplify operation and maintenance of cathodic protection systems and process equipment for corrosion control purposes; assist Corrosion Engineers with corrosion control inspections; lead/train Senior Corrosion Engineering Aides; and perform other duties as assigned.

 NOTE:
Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide employees may be required to work at heights in excess of 100 feet, walk in rough terrain in excess of four miles, work with high voltage electricity, and/or work in confined spaces for extended amounts of time. A confined space certification must be obtained within 6 months from being hired.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS
You must meet the following requirements on the date you apply, unless otherwise indicated.

EDUCATION: You must meet ONE of the following options:
Completion of a minimum of 30 semester/45 quarter college-level units in engineering, chemistry or physics.
A National Association of Corrosion Engineers (NACE) CP-1 (CP Tester) or higher Certification.

 NOTE:
Additional qualifying experience may be substituted for education lacked on a year-for-year basis. One year of full-time experience = 30 semester/45 quarter college-level units.
City of San Diego employees using Out-of-Class Assignment (OCA) experience to qualify must submit written documentation signed by their appointing authority or payroll specialist, detailing the work performed, dates, and total number of qualifying OCA hours. OCA experience without the required documentation will NOT be considered.
EXPERIENCE: Three years of full-time corrosion engineering experience in cathodic protection.

LICENSE: A valid California Class C Driver License is required at the time of hire.

HIGHLY DESIRABLE:
A National Association of Corrosion Engineers (NACE) Certification in a specialty field.
REQUIRED DOCUMENTS (MUST SUBMIT WITH APPLICATION):
Proof of transcripts or certification, if utilized to meet the minimum requirements.
For City of San Diego employees, proof of Out-of-Class Assignment (OCA), if utilized to meet the minimum requirements.
Required documents should be attached electronically to your application. If you are unable to attach at the time of application submittal, you must submit them as soon as possible via fax: (619) 533-3337; or to the Employment Information Center: City of San Diego Personnel Department, 1200 Third Avenue - Suite 300, San Diego, CA 92101. Include your name and the title of the position for which you are applying.
SCREENING PROCESS
Please ensure all information is complete and accurate as the responses you provide on the supplemental questions will be reviewed using an automated evaluation system. If you are successful in this initial screening process, your application will be reviewed for applicable education, experience, and/or training to ensure all minimum requirements have been met. Successful candidates will be placed on a list which will be used to fill position vacancies during the next six months (180 days) . For each vacancy, only those candidates with the most appropriate qualifications will be contacted by the hiring department for an interview.
SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION
PRE-EMPLOYMENT REQUIREMENTS: Employment offers are conditional pending the results of all screening processes that are applicable to this job, which may include but are not limited to the following: Confirmation of citizenship/legal right to work in the United States; completion of a pre-employment medical review/exam (which may include drug/alcohol testing); reference checks; and a fingerprint check. The fingerprints will be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the California Department of Justice for a conviction record report. Certain positions may require additional screening processes which may include a polygraph examination and background investigation. All of these processes must be successfully completed before employment begins. A positive test for alcohol, illegal drugs or inadequately explained prescription drugs, misrepresentation, falsification, or omission of pertinent facts in any step of the screening/selection process may be cause for disqualification and/or termination of employment. Nothing in this job posting constitutes an expressed or implied contract for employment with the City of San Diego. Applicants must notify the Personnel Department of any changes in their name, address (home, email), or phone number or they may miss employment opportunities.
 Principal Engineering Aide (Option Title: Principal Corrosion Engineering Aide)
Rev. 5- August 2, 2021 (Closing Date Extended)
City employees may be eligible to participate in a benefit program including holidays, vacations, savings and retirement plans, health programs, and other benefits. 

Eligible City employees initially hired or assuming office on or after July 10, 2021, with the exception of Police Recruits participating in the City’s Police Academy, will participate in the City’s Defined Benefit Plan administered by the San Diego City Employees’ Retirement System (SDCERS).

Benefits may change due to employer-employee contract negotiations.

Flexible Benefits Plan Options for Employees Represented by Municipal Employees Associate (MEA)",235.0
169,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineers to join New Product Introduction team in the Manufacturing Technology and Transfer (MTT) group. The MTT group works as an integral part of our Consumables Development and Manufacturing teams and is tasked with developing and deploying consumables manufacturing processes of New Products within our production environments. The individual will provide technical leadership to new product introduction, and production process development. Additionally, s/he will partner cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production, Supply Chain, and other engineering groups to develop, transfer and sustain manufacturing processes for new products.
Responsibilities:
Participate in consumable product development, manufacturing process development, process and product improvements, and other activities in the making of consumable products to sequence genomes
Represent Operations needs on development teams for effective transfer of products into manufacturing
Define technical requirements for manufacturing processes and new production equipment
Author procedures and instructions for new manufacturing processes and train production operators to manufacture product in a GMP environment
Design, develop and source production equipment from vendors and OEM’s, work cross functionally with EHS and Facilities to establish safe production processes to enable manufacturing of consumable products
Troubleshoot new product and manufacturing process issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Develop understanding of CPM (critical parameter management), construct and execute controlled experiments and including DOE's to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions into a production environment to meet project goals
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations to improve product and process quality
Utilize expertise in 6-sigma, DFSS, 8D, DMAIC to solve issues that arise during product and process development phases of new product introductions
Work cross functionally with Product Development, Supply Chain, Manufacturing, Quality teams to enable operations for both launch and high-volume manufacturing
Ensure successful transfer of knowledge into manufacturing and the sustaining support teams
Requirements:
Work experience in the medical device, biotech, pharmaceutical, industries is desired
Experience with reagent formulation, filling, Lyophilization processes, labeling and packaging technologies preferred
Experience and understanding of complex automated manufacturing systems, tools and components (electrical and pneumatic control, sensors, metrology systems, PLCs) is desired
Experience with cGMP and 21 CFR part 11 and supporting manufacturing in an FDA regulated environment is preferred
Effective communication skills both verbal and written, analytical and organizational skills to manage competing project priorities
Experience with Statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with product development processes, design transfer and process and equipment validation
High level problem solving, and reasoning skills required
Experience with high volume production in a high tech, high volume consumables industry is a plus
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required
Education and Experience:
B.S./M.S. in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or Material Science with at least 8 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation
PhD in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Materials Science with at least 3 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",236.0
170,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for a driven, talented Sr Reagent Process Development Engineer to join our growing Reagents Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO) team. The MTO group works as an integral part of our Consumables Manufacturing process and is tasked with increasing quality and yield within our high-volume production environments. These individuals provide technical and operations leadership to production process development, improvement and sustaining efforts. Additionally, these teams will partner cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production and other engineering groups to develop processes for new products, as well as sustain and improve processes for existing products. This individual will be supporting the Reagent Formulation space, helping to stabilize and improve the related processes through troubleshooting, addressing key issue candles, cost-savings projects and SPC.
Responsibilities
Participate in consumable product development, manufacturing process development, process and product improvements, and other activities in the making of consumable products to sequence genomes
Represent Operations needs on development teams for effective transfer of products into manufacturing
Define technical requirements for manufacturing processes and new production equipment
Author procedures and instructions for new manufacturing processes and train production operators to manufacture product in a GMP environment
Troubleshoot new product and manufacturing process issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Develop understanding of CPM (critical parameter management), construct and execute controlled experiments and including DOE's to optimize processes, address yield and quality issues and drive implementation of solutions into a production environment to meet project goals
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations to improve product and process quality
Utilize expertise in 6-sigma, DFSS, 8D, DMAIC to solve issues that arise during product and process development phases of new product introductions
Work cross functionally with Product Development, Supply Chain, Manufacturing, Quality teams to enable operations for both launch and high-volume manufacturing
Ensure successful transfer of knowledge into manufacturing and the sustaining support teams
Requirements:
Work experience in the medical device, biotech, pharmaceutical, industries is desired
Experience with reagent formulation, filling, Lyophilization processes, labeling and packaging technologies preferred
Experience and understanding of complex automated manufacturing systems, tools and components (electrical and pneumatic control, sensors, metrology systems, PLCs) is desired
Experience with cGMP and 21 CFR part 11 and supporting manufacturing in an FDA regulated environment is preferred
Effective communication skills both verbal and written, analytical and organizational skills to manage competing project priorities
Experience with Statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is a plus
Experience with product development processes, design transfer and process and equipment validation
High level problem solving, and reasoning skills required
Experience with high volume production in a high tech, high volume consumables industry is a plus • High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus
Experience with product development processes and project management is a plus
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required
Education and Experience
B.S./M.S. in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or Material Science with at least 5 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation
PhD in Mechanical, Chemical Engineering, Bioengineering, Materials Science with at least 3 years of relevant experience in production support/sustaining and/or process definition and development, design, scale-up, improvement and validation is a plus
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",237.0
171,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for driven, talented Process Engineers to join our growing Manufacturing Technical Operations (MTO) group. The MTO group works as an integral part of our Consumables Manufacturing process and is tasked with increasing quality and yield within our high-volume Oligonucleotide manufacturing environment.
This Staff Engineer position is tasked with improving the maturity, scale, continuous improvement and efficiency of manufacturing processes; driving key initiatives that include capacity expansion, process scale-up activities, site transfers, and critical pieces of new product introductions. These individuals will both be a driver in the execution of projects and provide technical leadership, partnering cross-functionally with R & D, Quality, Production and other engineering groups to develop processes for new products and sustain and improve processes for existing products. This role will include direct reports, involve technical mentorship and task prioritization, production process development, improvement and sustaining efforts.
Responsibilities:
Participate in process development, definition and improvement, and other activities in the making of consumable products.
Troubleshoot production line issues related to yield, quality and throughput
Work in cross-functional teams to both represent operational needs and help develop and transfer new processes/products to production and/or to enhance existing processes/products in production.
Construct and execute controlled experiments to optimize and scale synthetic chemistry processes.
Define technical requirements and write procedures for Production to process product.
Develop assessments and strategies for identifying, managing, and reducing product / process risk utilizing a variety of techniques including FMEAs, DOEs, and Control Plans.
Troubleshoot new and existing product or process issues related to yield, quality and throughput, utilizing structured problem-solving techniques and quality assurance mechanisms when appropriate (e.g. 8D, A3, and CAPA)
Analyze process test results, issue reports and make technical recommendations.
Author technical documents including batch records, SOPs, engineering / development reports, and risk / validation assessments.
Requirements:
Work experience in the biotech, pharmaceutical or semiconductor industries is required.
High level computer skills are required. Intermediate level programming knowledge is a plus.
Experience in Oligonucleotide chemistry and analysis is a plus
Experience with downstream liquid handling and purification process methods is required.
Experience with Process Validation and Quality by Design (QbD) experience is a plus
Experience with statistics, Statistical Process Control and DOE techniques is required.
Experience developing risk management and process control strategies is required.
High level problem solving and reasoning skills are required.
Demonstrated ability to make oligonucleotides, nucleotides, and/or associated subassemblies
Experience organic synthesis, automated synthesis
High level analytical, problem solving, troubleshooting, and root cause analysis skills
Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills required
Detail-oriented, highly organized and ability to multi-task are essential.
Strong understanding of GMP. Experience working in an ISO 13485 or FDA regulated environment is desirable
Experience with product development processes and project management skills is required.
Demonstrated ability to accomplish goals while working across departments is required.
Good interdepartmental communication skills and documentation skills are required.
Listed responsibilities are an essential, but not exhaustive list of the usual duties associated with the position. Changes to individual responsibilities may occur due to business needs
Desired Skills:
Prior lead/supervisory experience preferred.
Programming/scripting knowledge is a plus.
Experience with SAP or equivalent ERP system
Experience with lean manufacturing tools and principles is a plus
Experience with Design Transfer for both Research and Diagnostic products is a plus.
Education:
BS/MS with 8+ years of relevant experience or PhD with 3+ years of relevant experience in a production support and/or process development, sustaining, design/transfer or scale-up role.
Field of study in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Organic Chemistry, or Analytical Chemistry with emphasis on Synthetic Organic Chemistry preferred.
At Illumina, we strive to foster a diverse and inclusive workplace by cultivating an environment in which everyone contributes to our mission. Built on a strong foundation, Illumina has always been rooted in openness, collaboration, and seeking alternative views and perspectives to propel innovation in genomics. We are proud to confirm a zero-net gap in pay, regardless of gender, ethnicity, or race. We also have several Employee Resource Groups (ERG) that deliver career development experiences, increase cultural awareness, and demonstrate our collective commitment to diversity and inclusion in the communities we live and work. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer committed to providing employment opportunity regardless of sex, race, creed, color, gender, religion, marital status, domestic partner status, age, national origin or ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, pregnancy, military or veteran status, citizenship status, and genetic information. If you require accommodation to complete the application or interview process, please contact accommodations@illumina.com. To learn more, visit: https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",238.0
172,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Imagine… 2 weeks after the birth of your child you realize they aren’t meeting critical developmental milestones and after months of doctor’s appointments you are told your baby has a rare neurological disease that would impact how they would live their lives. This is the reality of parents whose children have Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) and it’s the reason why we at Novartis Gene Therapies are laser focused on bringing hope and possibility to those devastated by rare genetic diseases.
The Senior Scientist, Process Science – Downstream, is responsible to be a technical lead in gene therapy downstream process development, designing and executing downstream process development activities, as well as performing downstream process operations at both small scale and large scale to support pipeline research and pre-clinical studies.
Responsibilities:
Advances complex downstream process development efforts as a technical lead within a cross-functional team across sites.
Independently designs and executes gene therapy downstream process development studies.
Performs experiments at both large-scale and small-scale to support pre-clinical, clinical and commercial programs. Ensures these experiments are done in a timely fashion with high quality.
Stays current with the latest scientific and engineering developments in the field.
Leverages strong understanding of biologics downstream process to evaluate and introduces new technologies and innovative ideas related to downstream process development.
Analyzes and interprets experimental data from process studies with strong statistical mindset. Makes decisions based on statistically sound conclusions.
Presents study results internally and externally in a cross-functional setting.
Independently authors technical reports of studies of process development activities and laboratory experiments, such as development report, study report, investigational summary report, etc.
Collaborates with cross-functional groups to advance pipeline programs. Provides support for regulatory filings and author sections in IND filings.
Leads and mentors technical team fostering innovative and collaborative culture.
Communicates effectively with diverse teams to coordinate lab activities and manage resources.
Other related job duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's, biological sciences, pharmaceutical sciences or related technical field with 8 years relevant experience or Master's with 6 or PHD with 4.
Comprehensive experience with a variety of biopharmaceutical purification processes such as chromatographic separation, depth filtration, precipitation & flocculation, tangential flow filtration, adventitious viral clearance, ultracentrifugation, and impurity clearance.
Proficient in statistical analysis principles and approaches. Working knowledge and experience with Design of Experiment (DoE).
Ability to analyze data to make date-driven decisions and further progress development strategies.
Proven team leader with previous experience of effectively leading technical group.
Innovative with a continuous improvement mindset.
Good communication skills with project management experience in cross-functional setting.
Knowledge of current Good Manufacturing Practices (cGMP) requirements and their indication in process development environment.
Knowledge of viral gene therapy and previous experience with AAV downstream process development is preferred.
Up to 10% travel.
The level of this position will be based on the final candidate’s qualifications.
Why Novartis?
769 million lives were touched by Novartis medicines in 2020, and while we’re proud of this, we know there is so much more we could do to help improve and extend people’s lives. We believe new insights, perspectives and ground-breaking solutions can be found at the intersection of medical science and digital innovation. That a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment inspires new ways of working.
We believe our potential can thrive and grow in an unbossed culture underpinned by integrity, curiosity and flexibility. And we can reinvent what's possible, when we collaborate with courage to aggressively and ambitiously tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges. Because the greatest risk in life, is the risk of never trying! Imagine what you could do here at Novartis!
Novartis Gene Therapies Benefit Summary:
Annual bonus, long term incentive, health insurance, paid vacation/holidays, potential flexible working arrangements (based on role) and an employee recognition program are available for this position, among many other benefits provided to employees of Novartis Gene Therapies.
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Novartis Gene Therapies is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, sexual orientation or veteran status.",240.0
173,chemical+engineer,"OverviewJOB SUMMARY: Project Support: Will support Project Managers and other engineers in project activities including, but not limited to the following.Purchase of equipment, including preparation of bid packages, acquisition of quotations and bids, preparation of purchase order documents, tracking orders and processing the invoices.Project accounting. Will maintain the accounting records for multiples projects and prepare reports as needed. Will interface with the accounting department.Assist in the preparation and management of project schedules, Gantt charts, and departmental calendars.Prepare Bill of Materials (BOM) for projects under direction of project managers.Assist in the development of project cost estimates.Engineering Departmental Support: Will support activities and projects to maintain efficient operation and continued improvement of the engineering department. These include, but not limited to the following.Evaluation of software packages for process, safety, document control or project management.Document management for the department.Preparation of technical white papers or other documents.Work with management, engineers, and customers to develop new standards for productionProject Engineering: Will support technical and construction activities and necessary for project completion. These activities include, but not limited to the following.Conduct technical inspections of all components built for the project.Field verification of P&IDs and redlining/correction as required.Pressure testing of equipment and systems. Dry down of equipment and systems.Troubleshooting of systems and assisting in start-up activities.Development of operating procedures.Assist in the preparation of the Process Hazards Assessment as required during project planning.Be responsible for ensuring that the project is managed in a safe and professional manner and that it is undertaken in compliance with all relevant SHE requirements.Participate in small improvement projects (SIP) and Lean/Six Sigma projects.Matheson is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth under EEOC.Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, Religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status, or disabilityEOE AA M/F/VET/DisabilityJob Type: Full-timeApplication Question(s):Do you have a Chemical Engineering Degree?Work Location:One location",241.0
174,chemical+engineer,"McCormick & Company, Incorporated, a global leader in flavor, is seeking a Process Engineer reporting to the CI/JTE Leader. This individual will work at the Dallas Plant located in Irving, Texas.
With more than $4 billion in annual sales, the Company manufactures markets and distributes spices, seasoning mixes, condiments and other flavorful products to the entire food industry – retail outlets, food manufacturers and foodservice businesses. We create differentiating flavors consumers prefer with unmatched quality, science, innovation and service. Every day, no matter where or what you eat, you can enjoy food flavored by McCormick. McCormick brings passion to flavor™!
As a company recognized for exceptional commitment to employees, McCormick offers a wide variety of benefits, programs and services. Benefits include, but are not limited to, tuition assistance, medical, dental, vision, disability, group life insurance, 401(k), profit sharing, paid holidays and vacations.
Role Summary
Reporting to the CI/JTE Leader, the Operations Process Engineer will work in a team environment with production, maintenance, supply chain, quality, and engineering in the Dallas plant. This is a developmental role for an individual interested in a career in operations or engineering. Training in the areas of Continuous Improvement, Reliability Engineering, and Leadership will be provided on site or through the McCormick Learning & Development Center.
Responsibilities
Integration of strategic capital into Operations, including:
learning the full function and operation of new equipment
developing training materials and supporting training activities
writing procedures for site operation and quality inspections
developing periodic maintenance schedule format changes
Leadership and coaching of Continuous Improvement teams
Development and documentation of process instructions for new formulations to meet customer requirements and maximize reliability
Providing technical support and assisting with troubleshooting of complex problems
Supporting activities that improve the performance of the plant in the areas of process reliability, safety, and cost
Qualifications & Personal Characteristics
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering (Mechanical, Chemical, or Electrical)
Previous manufacturing experience (co-op, internship or previous employment)
Willingness to relocate for future assignments
Demonstrated communication skills, both written and verbal
Proven ability to work collaboratively in a team-based environment
McCormick & Company is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
McCormick does not offer employment visa sponsorships upon hire or in the future. You must be lawfully authorized to commence work upon being offered employment.",242.0
175,chemical+engineer,"Controls Engineer - Local AssignmentWe want people who are passionate about automationWe’re looking for a results-oriented, self-starter who can design controls hardware and software. Someone who is passionate about bringing manufacturing back to America.You’ll be working for a systems integrator and turnkey controls solutions provider proudly serving the industry since 1989. Buckle up and get ready to work in multiple industries on all kinds of applications. We’re in aerospace, alternative energy, food and beverage, rubber and plastics, automotive, material handling, error proofing, and pretty much anywhere automation is used.Essential Duties & Responsibilities: PLC/HMI/DCS programming.Electrical documents such as: loop diagrams, wiring diagrams, control panel drawings, electrical installation details, etc.Piping and Instrumentation Diagrams (P&IDs). · Control system and electrical inspection, testing (FAT), commissioning and start-up. Including: module assembly shops, control panels, instrumentation, other electrical components and control system programming. ·Review customer specifications to develop scope of supply and implementation. Prepare bid specifications and review vendor documentation for adherence to project specifications. · NFPA/NEC/CSA/ATEX electrical design for hazardous area applications. ·Collaborate with other engineering and drafting disciplines to design electrical and control systems.Specification, review and selection of all types of valves and instrumentation for the control and monitoring of process equipment.Qualifications Required Requirements and Qualifications: · Engineering or technical bachelor’s degree. Chemical Engineering preferred.Minimum relevant work experience: 2 years with engineering degree or 5 years with other technical degree. Multi-disciplinary engineering or technical background a plus.Experience with AutoCAD, DCS/PLC programming a plus. Additional training to be provided as needed.Energetic individual with highly proficient computer skills.Excellent communication skills and the ability to work independently as well as part of a team. Must possess creative problem-solving skills, strong critical thinking skills and a high attention to detail.Ability to program, develop, troubleshoot, and maintain Allen-Bradley (RS Logix 5000) Siemens (Step 7, TIA Portal)Kuka robot and Siemens PLC experience, strongly preferredWhy You’ll Like Working for Us: We care about your physical, mental, and financial wellbeing. We offer competitive compensation, an excellent medical benefit plan with three choices of coverage. The company pays for your Long Term Disability coverage and provides options for Life and Short Term Disability. Paid holidays and paid time off is all part of the package. A traditional 401(k) with company match as well as a ROTH 401(k) is available.We value employee development. Our engineers are exposed to a variety of technical challenges and training and support are necessary for even the most experienced engineers. When certification is necessary for an assignment AMT foots the bill. We work hard to create career paths for our employees whether they aspire to management (our COO started with us as a new college grad) or prefer to stay hands-on (one of our proposal engineers was the fourth employee in the company).We support our engineers.  Walk in our lobby and you’ll see photos of every single team member on our “people wall”. Managers conduct regular online team meetings, we use Yammer, Teams, email, and whatever other tools we can to stay in touch with our team. We publish a monthly internal newsletter that highlights company news and introduces new employees to the rest of the company.Related keywords: controls engineer, electrical engineer, engineerJob Type: Full-timePay: $40.00 - $55.00 per hourBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee discountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offReferral programVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftExperience:Controls Hardware Desgin: 5 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",243.0
176,chemical+engineer,"If you were standing in front of a building that was on fire, would you rush in to save lives?

When making a tough call, does your gut win over your head and heart?

When playing Rock Paper Scissors, do you look for and exploit patterns in the behavior of your opponent?

When you open the newspaper, do you immediately go for the crossword?

Do you prefer the unexpected over routine?

If you answered Yes to any of these questions, then stop looking for a job! Join SMA for an adventure:
• Take control of your career • Help accomplish great things • See the results of your hard work

The Job: Chemical Engineer
Chemical Engineer: A Chemical Engineer has the requisite education and credentials as an engineer, scientist or technologist contributing to the development, modification and improvement of hardware, software and related services. In addition to requiring an understanding of engineering and technical disciplines, these projects involve experience with requirements analysis, concept development, engineering and manufacturing. The expected degree of expertise varies by the career level.
Career Stage: Associate
Location: Dallas,TX, United States
Period of Performance: This is an open position
Pay: Project-based at approximately $38.38/Hour ranging from $24.25/Hour to $52.50/Hour USD (paid in the currency of residence)
Reference ID: O-013176.53
About Us: We are SMA, the leader in professional services for project-based industries. We help companies win in their markets by informing their strategic choices, improving their competitiveness, and performing on critical projects. Join our community of over 650 professionals like yourself—all confident in their capabilities and who want choices that will accelerate their career. We offer flexible work opportunities, meritocratic pay and benefits. To learn more about SMA, please visit our website at www.smawins.com, and follow us on Glassdoor, Facebook and LinkedIn.
About You: You have approximately around 5 years of experience in this role
You are relentless in solving problems, work well in teams, and enjoy a challenge
You are a citizen of country where the opportunity is located or have to right to work in that country, and have completed the appropriate level of education in a relevant field
You are looking for adventure!
SMA is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religious creed, national origin, physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. As a condition of employment SMA will require proof of your legal ability to work in the United States and conduct a background check and drug test. If employment is for a location outside of the US, proof of work permit or other legal ability to work in that country is required.",244.0
177,chemical+engineer,"About the Company Hiring: Our client is a leader in the manufacturing industry.

About the Job: As the Process Engineer, you will be responsible for: Developing and optimizing continuous production and manufacturing processes to achieve the output, quality, and cost goals of the organization. Collecting production data and applying standard scientific and statistical methods to analyze, document, and diagram production processes. Identifying process bottlenecks and devises solutions to resolve. Recommending changes or upgrades to equipment, work methods, or other aspects of the process to improve efficiency and utilization of resources including labor, energy and raw materials. Consulting on major internal production initiatives Serving as the Process Lead on all capital projects. Collaborating with other professionals including R&D managers and other engineers on development and research and product development projects.
Minimum Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in mechanical, chemical, or industrial engineering 10+ years of experience in a process engineering related role in food production companies Experience with large scale capital projects
Salary: $115,000-135,000 base salary plus bonus and equity

Job Status: Direct Hire

Travel: No

Relocation: Yes
Code: IND123",245.0
178,chemical+engineer,"Inspection EngineerIndustrial Air Flow Dynamics, Inc.Job descriptionIndustrial Air Flow Dynamics, Inc. is seeking an Inspection Engineer to join our new HRSGEngineering department. The successful candidate will report and work directly for our VicePresident of HRSG Engineering, Amy Sieben. The Inspection Engineer’s role will be to visit power plant locations all over the USA, conduct internal and external inspections of the HRSG, create a documentation package of the discoveries and report the valuable content to the client. This unique position includes all aspects of the work life; working from home, traveling to visit clients, inside and outside of the unit climbing to complete physical inspections, and occasional office visits for training/meetings. The candidate will be based at their home then travel extensively to plants throughout the country to fulfill the inspection needs during the outage season. The heavy workload will be from February until June, then September untilDecember, the summers will include sporadic travel for online inspections using thermal imaging cameras.IAFD is the leading provider of replacement expansion joints, penetration seals and HRSG duct/liner replacement systems sold to power plants. We are expanding our engineering services with our new HRSG Engineering division, a new and robust offering to our customers with HRSG’s. We supply provide our power plant and utility customers with a turn-key solution driven by our engineering expertise. Our engineering team diagnoses the root cause of the problem, improves on the OEM design, our manufacturing team builds the quality products, and our field services team completes the turn-key process with the on-site installation. With over 20 years of experience, IAFD is a trusted partner to power plants nationwide. Our corporate headquarters is in Cleveland, TX just North of Houston.Essential Skills, Knowledge & Abilities: - Travel to plants, execute inspections on power plant HRSGs and boilers- Learn the IAFD documentation package and create well written and informative reports for clients- Interact with the clients after inspections to connect, deliver recommendations and support their outage needs- Evaluate the unit, historical information, and contribute engineering driven solutions- Communicate with HRSG/E VP on critical discoveries, maximize IAFD’s value while supporting a client’s outageRequirements: - Bachelors or master’s degree in mechanical or chemical engineering- 10 years Combined Cycle Power engineering experience for a Bachelors, 3-5 years for aMasters.- Knowledge of ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code- Excellent technical writing ability to generate reports in the MS Office package to summarize project results and recommendations.- Exposure and knowledge of finite element analysis, computational fluid dynamics, thermography, thermodynamics, root cause failure analysis, structural engineering, high energy piping design- Ability to physically work (standing, stooping, crawling, climbing stairs) up to 10 hours per day performing inspections. Ability to work in confined spaces and at elevated heights.- Ability to obtain a TWIC (Transportation Workers Identification Card)- Ability to comply and pass on-going drug testing and background checks.- Ability to travel extensively during the outage season.IAFD Company Offers: - Affordable medical, dental, vision, long-term disability, life- Vacation, holiday- 401K retirementIndustrial Air Flow Dynamics Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. IAFD Company encourages qualified females, minorities, veterans, and disabled persons to apply.Job Type: Full-timePay: $75,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayOn callEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Engineering: 5 years (Required)Willingness To Travel:50% (Required)Work Location:On the roadWork Remotely:Yes",246.0
179,chemical+engineer,"Wheeler Staffing Partners is seeking a Process Engineer in Plano, TX. The Process Engineer provides advanced engineering and process design support and is responsible for developing and maintaining process specifications, design information and quality assurance documents related to the integrity, cost and scheduling requirements for water treatment systems and related components. Contact Shelby Short (sshort@wheelersp.com) to learn more about this great opportunity!
Responsibilities:
The Process Engineer analyzes specifications and contract documents to determine characteristics of the job and to establish engineering objectives
Reviews all firm (price) proposals and submittals for quality assurance purposes
Provides technical assistance to Sales and Product Support
The Process Engineer develops and maintains process specifications, design information and quality assurance documents related to the integrity, cost and scheduling requirements
Prepare Mass Balance, Sequence of Operation and Function Logic of water treatment equipment and systems
Work with Automation Engineers on PLC programming and control concepts
The Process Engineer will support startup and commissioning of water treatment equipment and systems
Performs all work in accordance with established safety procedures
Other duties may be assigned as required

Requirements:
Degree in the chemical or environmental engineering discipline is required from an
accredited university or other related qualified training,
Three (3) years related experience; and/or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Ability to read and interpret process & instrumentation diagrams, mechanical & structural drawings, and specifications.
Requires knowledge of applicable codes, tables and standard reference books used for design wastewater treatment facilities and relevant piping, electrical, instrumentation and mechanical equipment used in such designs.
Ability to understand and both read, write and converse in English at an advanced level.
Knowledge in German and French languages preferred.
Ability to apply principles of logical or scientific thinking to a wide range of intellectual
and practical problems.
Ability to apply advanced mathematical equations to a variety of complex, nonstandard situations.

WSP specializes in filling your company’s contract, contract-to-hire, direct hire, contingency, and executive positions with professional candidates. From our Executive Retained Search Teams, Direct Hire and Contract Staffing Professionals, and RPO Service offerings we create models to deliver a world-class service, with a sense of urgency and professionalism. Our connections and our candidates combined with a staff backed by over 20 years of experience, ensure that our clients are seeing the right candidates for their career openings.
WSP is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
Follow us on social media to get updates on upcoming jobs!
Twitter: @wheelerspinc
Facebook: Wheeler Staffing Partner
Instagram: @wheelerstaffingpartners20",247.0
180,chemical+engineer,"Adaptive3D is a category leader in printed elastomers for additive manufacturing. Its products enable volume end-use parts production via additive manufacturing of tough, strain-tolerant, tear-resistant, and biocompatible rubbers and rubber-like materials. Adaptive3D’s solutions are designed for high-throughput manufacturing, while maintaining low cost of production, with superior material performance. The company serves a broad customer base across consumer, healthcare, industrial, transportation, and oil and gas markets
Position Overview:
The Chemical Compounding Engineer will ensure successful manufacturing of Adaptive3D photopolymer resins both in-house and at contracted manufacturers by managing supply chain, developing SOPs, compounding resin, and overseeing third-party activities.
Specific duties include:Coordinate with all departments to design procedures to manufacture photopolymer resin formulationsDevelopment of production scale-up formulations and proceduresPlan and direct oversight of production scheduleManufacture photopolymer resin following current standard operating procedures (SOP)Maintain the integrity and cleanliness of the work area with respect to company standards and policies
Develop, implement, and monitor preventative maintenance programs for equipmentTroubleshoot production problems, whether process or material issues, and implement corrections that will minimize impact to production and eliminate root causeGenerate CoA for products for both inhouse and contracted manufacturers by coordinating with the analytical departmentWork with purchasing to acquire, manage and maintain chemical, physical and disposable inventory (for both inhouse and contracted manufacturers) to meet production demandOversee the creation/updates of SOPs with contract manufacturersAnswer technical questions to assist in contract manufacturers scale up processMaintain proper documentation of vendor production batches and CoAs
Plan and direct oversight of production activities from contracted manufacturers
Minimum Requirements:
3-5 years of experience working in chemical compounding
Knowledge of manufacturing batch procedures
Ability to follow sound scientific methods and perform design of experiments
Experience in a chemical laboratory
Experience handling chemicals
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Ability to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds unassisted
Preferred Qualifications:
5 -7 years of experience working in chemical compounding
Previous experience with photopolymer resins
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in chemistry, chemical engineering or related discipline
Employment Type:Full-time (40 hours)
Benefits:Health InsuranceDental Insurance10 paid holidaysPaid time off",248.0
181,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronics is an ongoing journey of discovery: our 58,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in Healthcare, Life Science and Electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronics is a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


Everything we do in EMD Electronics is to help us deliver on our purpose of being the company behind the companies, advancing digital living. We are dedicated to being the trusted supplier of high-tech materials, services and specialty chemicals for the electronics, automotive and cosmetics industries. We foster a global collaborative organization made up of individuals who have the passion to win, obsess about the customer, are relentlessly curious and act with urgency. Together, we push the boundaries of science to make more possible for our customers.


This role does not offer sponsorship for work authorization. External applicants must be eligible to work in the US.


Your role:


The Quality Engineer (QE) will be part of the Quality Assurance group at the EMD Electronics Dallas, TX site. The QE will provide day to day Quality Engineering support for a fast-paced semiconductor and industrial chemical manufacturing operation and be the Voice of the Customer in all quality related matters. The Dallas site manufactures high technology CMP Planarization products for the semiconductor industry and other chemical for various other industries. You will be a key quality driver for site activities including data automation, statistical analysis, problem solving, action plans, RFCs, and preventative actions to reduce/eliminate risk to product performance to customer.


Provide lead data automation and digitalization analysis by pulling data from various databases and creating automated visualization dashboards
Lead predictive techniques/ advanced data science analytics to identify control points and ensure quality before product manufacturing
Evaluate deviations / OOS OOC conditions and provide guidance for the disposition of non-conforming product
Utilize LEAN Six Sigma practices to implement and improve plant quality standards and processes
Lead root cause investigations for customer complaints and quality investigations using model-based problem-solving techniques
Provide SPC/SQC data support and customized trend charts to assess and monitor product/process performance
Prepare SQC Charts/CpK reports and calculate specifications/control limits for both internal and customer requirements
Support the site Disposition Review Board (DRB) process
Support the scale-up and transfer from technology development to high volume manufacturing of new products


Who You Are:


Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, Chemistry, or other technical discipline
5+ years quality, manufacturing, or technical experience in a fast-paced time sensitive environment


Preferred Qualifications:

Chemical manufacturing or semiconductor experience
American Society for Quality (ASQ) Certified Quality Engineer (CQE) or other relevant certification
Six Sigma Green Belt or Black Belt certification
Strong hands-on knowledge of statistical process control (SPC/SQC), root cause analysis and corrective action (CAPA), problem solving, FMEAs, Design of Experiment (DoE), continuous improvement (CI) activities, management of change, and document control systems
Hands-on experience with process improvement, data automation, and data digitization
Strong Data analysis and data preparation automation knowledge with background in programming (Python, Java script, SQL, Alteryx/DataIku, Tableau)
Proficient with statistical software including Minitab, JMP, NWA
Strong communication skills with experience working in a collaborative environment
Excellent time management and organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple activities and projects
Demonstrated project management experience as a leader and contributor
SAP experience
ISO Certification or equivalent (such as ISO 9001-2015, ISO 140001, ISO/TS 16949)

RSRPM


What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 226146


Location: Dallas


Career Level: D - Professional (4-9 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.

Job Segment: Semiconductor, ERP, CAPA, Lean Six Sigma, Quality, Science, Technology, Management",250.0
182,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operations
Develop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and quality
Implement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvements
Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog Technologies
Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous manner
Support the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)
Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

10 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
Experience in Thinfilm Processing including PVD, CVD, and/or Plate
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",251.0
183,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes within the Ion Implant module. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.
The job responsibilities of an Ion Implant Process Engineer include:

Perform lot/equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicate findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerTroubleshoot process/equipment issues; define experiments that lead to improvements in yield, cycle time and world class costDevelop efficient low cost solutions to drive world class quality given aggressive ramp timelineSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment install and startupUse SPC, statistics, and DOE to analyze data.
Minimum requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Physics or a related field2 year job related experience working in semiconductor manufacturing Fabs
Preferred Skills & Qualifications:
Previous wafer Fab and/or startup experience.Prior experience with Ion Implantation processes
Prior experience with 300mm wafer size is a plus.Knowledge of Axcelis/Varian implant equipment is a plus.Ability to analyze electrical parameters and yield is a plus.Ability to quickly gather and analyze data to resolve issues.Ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks/projects.Ability / willingness to work in a team environment to the Fab goalsAbility to effectively deal with a dynamically changing environment.Must be able to communicate and effectively work with others on cross functional teams.Must be able to work with aggressive timelines and drive for timely results that meet or exceed Fab goals.Strong communication skills both written and verbal
To be considered for this position, please apply to this requisition

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or age.

Texas",252.0
184,chemical+engineer,"Requisition Number: HTB-20161010-001
Position Name: Chemical Engineer

Position Type: Temporary to Permanent
Company Description: Hi-Tech Bangla, Inc. (HTB) offers a full complement of specialized engineering, technical and management services to the Energy Systems, Aeronautics, Space Science, Information Technology and Multi-Disciplinary Industries. HTB professionals are engineers, engineering group managers, manufacturing managers and program managers with proven track records of successfully working with local and international operators, prime contractors, subcontractors, service providers as well as research community.
Hi-Tech Bangla, Inc. is seeking a Process Engineer with about 5 years of experience for Energy, Process & Utility sector in the Dallas, TX area. The Process engineer will be a design professional for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost effective, designs, drawings and specifications for process projects in the Energy, Process & Utility industry. The individual will participate as a team member to deliver integrated process/systems as specified and contracted.
Job Description:
Establish, track, and close new business targets consistent with short- and long-term objectives at designated accounts within the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU), Consumer Goods & Packaging (CGP) industries.
Ability to identify unseen business opportunities within the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU), Consumer Goods & Packaging (CGP) industries. Develop a track record of year-over-year profitable revenue growth. Drive profitability through value selling and pricing
Develop, execute and manage 3DS software (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) sales plans, sales budgets, and expense budgets.
Coordinate closely with 3DS regional sales teams as well as collaborating with the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU) industries technical team as necessary to accelerate and drive profitable growth through solution (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) selling.
Experience preparing quotes for potential customer orders.
Understand customer technical applications in order to give technical solution (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) to customers.
Perform all associated tasks to complete Vendor List process required by our customer
Search for RFP of different projects in the supply chain systems of our customers and supports US team for RFP preparation
Responsible for updating Database of Vendor List process in EPU & CGP industries
Support Engineering Design Services
Approach the sales process with a high degree of professionalism and effectiveness by successful utilization of customer centric selling skills and tools
Assist in development of annual budgets and objectives.
Provide accurate monthly forecasts as to key customer demand and new/lost business impacts.
Develop contact matrix and establish strong relationships with key decision makers and project facilitators.
Establish account development plans and network resources up, down and across both the customer's organization and this company.
Deliver the planned results (budget).
Understand key players, applications, requirements, competitors, trends, and needs as well as client potential and share within the targeted industry and account base.
Establish a linkage between the customer's business strategy and client's capabilities.
Implement pricing and market strategies.
Negotiate customer contracts and value packages to insure an acceptable return on resources invested.
Participate in strategy development, help position the business and develop the offer.
Closely monitor product evaluations at key accounts to maximize business potential.

Requirement:

Four-year degree in Chemical Engineering discipline.
Minimum of 5 years of process design and application engineering experience.
Experienced on Natural Gas Process, Compression and Distribution operations.
Strong knowledge in Energy, Process & Utility processing equipment/systems with a working knowledge of controls and instruments commonly used.
Practical experience in some of the following: baking, thermal processing, commercial heat exchangers, fluid transfer (fittings, valves, pumps), evaporator, heat transfer equipment, reboilers, thermal oxidizers, pumps, compressors, and turbo-expanders in Energy, Process & Utility processing.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement and administrative practices.
Experience in ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA
Salary: Negotiable
Contact us: If you are confident, please forward your recent resume to: resume_htb@hi-techbangla.com (No Third Party Please)",253.0
185,chemical+engineer,"About Weaver
With offices coast to coast, Weaver is the 36th largest CPA firm in the United States and the largest independent accounting firm based in the Southwest. We serve clients from Fortune 500 public companies to mid-market private firms, as well as government entities, not-for-profit organizations and individual business owners. The firm is particularly well-known in financial services, energy, manufacturing and distribution, construction, technology, real estate, health care and government. Our services go beyond traditional assurance and tax services to include risk advisory, transaction advisory, IT advisory, energy compliance and consulting, forensics and litigation services, and specialty tax services such as international tax, state and local tax and private client services.
What makes Weaver different is our entrepreneurial mindset, coupled with a diverse and accepting culture that makes room for people to grow and succeed. We take pride in hiring and developing people who respect everyone for who they are and what they contribute, no matter how different. We’re committed to doing work we’re deeply proud of, always striving to transcend client expectations. We support each other, day in and day out, in work and in life. These are just a few of our core values, and they are the foundation of every interaction with our clients and with each other. Find out more about our services, industry experience and culture at weaver.com.
Position Profile
Weaver seeks an Energy Compliance Services Associate II or Senior Associate I Engineer to join our growing team. Weaver’s Energy Compliance Services (ECS) practice helps companies of all sizes understand regulatory requirements and maintain compliance of transportation fuel regulations, including gasoline, renewable fuels, and greenhouse gases. We are the subject matter experts of technical laws and regulations by US Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and the California Air Resources Board (CARB).
The role of the ECS Associate II or Senior Associate I Engineer is to develop an understanding of technical laws and regulations related to the ECS practice. This individual will be responsible for completing consulting engagements, as well as performing regulatory compliance assessments. They will assist with engineering reviews, do on-site visit inspections of renewable fuels facilities, perform mass and energy balance calculations, and draft engineering review reports. They will also manage multiple assignments with the supervision of more experienced team members. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and deadline-oriented with strong interpersonal, communication, teamwork and professional skills.
Education and Skills
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited University
1+ years of experience in chemical engineering field
Currently holds or working towards an Engineer-in-Training (EIT), or Professional Engineer (PE) license, or has the goal to progress professionally by working toward obtaining certifications
Experience performing mass and energy balance calculations
Experience interpreting and preparing block flow diagrams (BFDs), process flow diagrams (PFDs), and process descriptions
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook
If the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam has not been taken yet, candidate will be expected to take and pass the exam within one year of start date
Ability to learn quickly and adapt to a fluid working environment
Employee Referral Program Eligible
Weaver is an Equal Opportunity Employer
At this time, Weaver is only accepting resumes submitted directly by the candidate or by employee referral.",254.0
186,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the job
Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:
Support manufacturing operationsDevelop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and qualityImplement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvementsPerform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution
Minimum requirements:
3 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:Expeience with ASM,TEL or Kokusai furnancesDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",255.0
187,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes within the Ion Implant module. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.
The job responsibilities of an Ion Implant Process Engineer include:

Perform lot/equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicate findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerTroubleshoot process/equipment issues; define experiments that lead to improvements in yield, cycle time and world class costDevelop efficient low cost solutions to drive world class quality given aggressive ramp timelineSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment install and startupUse SPC, statistics, and DOE to analyze data.
Minimum requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Physics or a related field2 year job related experience working in semiconductor manufacturing Fabs
Preferred Skills & Qualifications:
Previous wafer Fab and/or startup experience.Prior experience with Ion Implantation processes
Prior experience with 300mm wafer size is a plus.Knowledge of Axcelis/Varian implant equipment is a plus.Ability to analyze electrical parameters and yield is a plus.Ability to quickly gather and analyze data to resolve issues.Ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks/projects.Ability / willingness to work in a team environment to the Fab goalsAbility to effectively deal with a dynamically changing environment.Must be able to communicate and effectively work with others on cross functional teams.Must be able to work with aggressive timelines and drive for timely results that meet or exceed Fab goals.Strong communication skills both written and verbal
To be considered for this position, please apply to this requisition

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or age.

Texas",256.0
188,chemical+engineer,"Requisition Number: HTB-20161010-001
Position Name: Chemical Engineer

Position Type: Temporary to Permanent
Company Description: Hi-Tech Bangla, Inc. (HTB) offers a full complement of specialized engineering, technical and management services to the Energy Systems, Aeronautics, Space Science, Information Technology and Multi-Disciplinary Industries. HTB professionals are engineers, engineering group managers, manufacturing managers and program managers with proven track records of successfully working with local and international operators, prime contractors, subcontractors, service providers as well as research community.
Hi-Tech Bangla, Inc. is seeking a Process Engineer with about 5 years of experience for Energy, Process & Utility sector in the Dallas, TX area. The Process engineer will be a design professional for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost effective, designs, drawings and specifications for process projects in the Energy, Process & Utility industry. The individual will participate as a team member to deliver integrated process/systems as specified and contracted.
Job Description:
Establish, track, and close new business targets consistent with short- and long-term objectives at designated accounts within the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU), Consumer Goods & Packaging (CGP) industries.
Ability to identify unseen business opportunities within the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU), Consumer Goods & Packaging (CGP) industries. Develop a track record of year-over-year profitable revenue growth. Drive profitability through value selling and pricing
Develop, execute and manage 3DS software (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) sales plans, sales budgets, and expense budgets.
Coordinate closely with 3DS regional sales teams as well as collaborating with the Energy, Processing & Utilities (EPU) industries technical team as necessary to accelerate and drive profitable growth through solution (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) selling.
Experience preparing quotes for potential customer orders.
Understand customer technical applications in order to give technical solution (ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA) to customers.
Perform all associated tasks to complete Vendor List process required by our customer
Search for RFP of different projects in the supply chain systems of our customers and supports US team for RFP preparation
Responsible for updating Database of Vendor List process in EPU & CGP industries
Support Engineering Design Services
Approach the sales process with a high degree of professionalism and effectiveness by successful utilization of customer centric selling skills and tools
Assist in development of annual budgets and objectives.
Provide accurate monthly forecasts as to key customer demand and new/lost business impacts.
Develop contact matrix and establish strong relationships with key decision makers and project facilitators.
Establish account development plans and network resources up, down and across both the customer's organization and this company.
Deliver the planned results (budget).
Understand key players, applications, requirements, competitors, trends, and needs as well as client potential and share within the targeted industry and account base.
Establish a linkage between the customer's business strategy and client's capabilities.
Implement pricing and market strategies.
Negotiate customer contracts and value packages to insure an acceptable return on resources invested.
Participate in strategy development, help position the business and develop the offer.
Closely monitor product evaluations at key accounts to maximize business potential.

Requirement:

Four-year degree in Chemical Engineering discipline.
Minimum of 5 years of process design and application engineering experience.
Experienced on Natural Gas Process, Compression and Distribution operations.
Strong knowledge in Energy, Process & Utility processing equipment/systems with a working knowledge of controls and instruments commonly used.
Practical experience in some of the following: baking, thermal processing, commercial heat exchangers, fluid transfer (fittings, valves, pumps), evaporator, heat transfer equipment, reboilers, thermal oxidizers, pumps, compressors, and turbo-expanders in Energy, Process & Utility processing.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement and administrative practices.
Experience in ENOVIA, DELMIA, 3DVIA, BIOVIA, GEOVIA
Salary: Negotiable
Contact us: If you are confident, please forward your recent resume to: resume_htb@hi-techbangla.com (No Third Party Please)",257.0
189,chemical+engineer,"About Weaver
With offices coast to coast, Weaver is the 36th largest CPA firm in the United States and the largest independent accounting firm based in the Southwest. We serve clients from Fortune 500 public companies to mid-market private firms, as well as government entities, not-for-profit organizations and individual business owners. The firm is particularly well-known in financial services, energy, manufacturing and distribution, construction, technology, real estate, health care and government. Our services go beyond traditional assurance and tax services to include risk advisory, transaction advisory, IT advisory, energy compliance and consulting, forensics and litigation services, and specialty tax services such as international tax, state and local tax and private client services.
What makes Weaver different is our entrepreneurial mindset, coupled with a diverse and accepting culture that makes room for people to grow and succeed. We take pride in hiring and developing people who respect everyone for who they are and what they contribute, no matter how different. We’re committed to doing work we’re deeply proud of, always striving to transcend client expectations. We support each other, day in and day out, in work and in life. These are just a few of our core values, and they are the foundation of every interaction with our clients and with each other. Find out more about our services, industry experience and culture at weaver.com.
Position Profile
Weaver seeks an Energy Compliance Services Associate II or Senior Associate I Engineer to join our growing team. Weaver’s Energy Compliance Services (ECS) practice helps companies of all sizes understand regulatory requirements and maintain compliance of transportation fuel regulations, including gasoline, renewable fuels, and greenhouse gases. We are the subject matter experts of technical laws and regulations by US Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and the California Air Resources Board (CARB).
The role of the ECS Associate II or Senior Associate I Engineer is to develop an understanding of technical laws and regulations related to the ECS practice. This individual will be responsible for completing consulting engagements, as well as performing regulatory compliance assessments. They will assist with engineering reviews, do on-site visit inspections of renewable fuels facilities, perform mass and energy balance calculations, and draft engineering review reports. They will also manage multiple assignments with the supervision of more experienced team members. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and deadline-oriented with strong interpersonal, communication, teamwork and professional skills.
Education and Skills
Bachelor’s degree in Chemical Engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited University
1+ years of experience in chemical engineering field
Currently holds or working towards an Engineer-in-Training (EIT), or Professional Engineer (PE) license, or has the goal to progress professionally by working toward obtaining certifications
Experience performing mass and energy balance calculations
Experience interpreting and preparing block flow diagrams (BFDs), process flow diagrams (PFDs), and process descriptions
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook
If the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam has not been taken yet, candidate will be expected to take and pass the exam within one year of start date
Ability to learn quickly and adapt to a fluid working environment
Employee Referral Program Eligible
Weaver is an Equal Opportunity Employer
At this time, Weaver is only accepting resumes submitted directly by the candidate or by employee referral.",258.0
190,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the job
Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:
Support manufacturing operationsDevelop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and qualityImplement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvementsPerform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution
Minimum requirements:
3 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:Expeience with ASM,TEL or Kokusai furnancesDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",259.0
191,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operations
Develop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and quality
Implement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvements
Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog Technologies
Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous manner
Support the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)
Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:
BS in Electrical Engineering, Electrical & Computer Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science or Physics3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor environmentStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",260.0
192,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operationsDevelop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and qualityImplement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvementsPerform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 200mm wafer in SiC and GaN substrates.Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

2 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Plasma and/or GaN process development experienceDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",261.0
193,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronics is an ongoing journey of discovery: our 58,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in Healthcare, Life Science and Electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronics is a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


Everything we do in EMD Electronics is to help us deliver on our purpose of being the company behind the companies, advancing digital living. We are dedicated to being the trusted supplier of high-tech materials, services and specialty chemicals for the electronics, automotive and cosmetics industries. We foster a global collaborative organization made up of individuals who have the passion to win, obsess about the customer, are relentlessly curious and act with urgency. Together, we push the boundaries of science to make more possible for our customers.


This role does not offer sponsorship for work authorization. External applicants must be eligible to work in the US.


Your Role:


The Planarization Technical Operations Team is looking to add a Scale Up Engineer to our team who will support the Planarization organization at the Dallas, TX site. This role offers an opportunity to work with all the functions within the Planarization organization to transfer new products from the R&D team to the Manufacturing site.

Work with the R&D team to understand new CMP products and the critical factors in the Formulation
Provide input on Scale Up requirements to the NPI Process
Understand the capabilities and limitations of existing manufacturing assets and identify were assets need improvements
Develop and execute timelines and transfer plans aligned with the business needs to move new products from R&D to the HVM manufacturing site
Identify opportunities to improve the scale up and transfer process and work with the team to achieve the improvements
As necessary introduce and qualify new equipment to improve formulation blending capability


Who You Are:


Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or other related engineering discipline
5+ years of experience in Chemistry, Mechanical Engineering, or Chemical Engineering
2+ years of experience with the manufacture and/or development of formulated products


Preferred Qualifications:

Adaptable to quick change and remains constructive under pressure
Highly motivated and responsive to employee and customer needs
Detailed investigation / troubleshooting & presentation skills
Excellent written and verbal communications skills
Skilled in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
Comfortable reporting results to both technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to be productive in a fast-paced environment
Ability to work with people from various backgrounds/cultures
Strong interpersonal skills with the desire to share knowledge and skills


What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 220743


Location: Dallas


Career Level: D - Professional (4-9 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.",262.0
194,chemical+engineer,"SUMMARY
The Asphalt Process Engineer is responsible for ensuring the safety, quality, and reliability of the stillyard processes to meet asphalt supply demands. He/she will supervise all stillyard personnel to ensure the efficient and safe operation of the stillyard, as well as develop, implement and execute process improvement projects with the goal of increasing efficiency, reliability and profitability while reducing process variation. When applicable, the Asphalt Process Engineer will execute approved capital improvements by coordinating with the Asphalt Operations Manager, Plant Engineering Manager and department managers on timelines, budget and resources needed. The Asphalt Process Engineer will use a hierarchy of values (Safety, Quality, Service and Cost) in prioritizing his/her activities, while supporting plant goals and improvement plans.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES
20% - Provide a safe workplace through adherence to company safety policies, housekeeping and defined standards of training.
Ensure compliance to safety policies and procedures. Promote a culture of a safe and clean work environment where safety is the highest priority.
Conduct inspections of plant areas and ensure corrective actions are taken to investigate and resolve safety/quality/reliability/process related issues.
Champions investigation of safety incidents and root cause analysis to help improve site and processes.
Lead production crew safety meetings and ensure operator engagement in the plant safety programs.
Demonstrate a high level of commitment to safety and be a leader in the areas of housekeeping and organization.
40% - Provide leadership for the asphalt operation and direction to the stillyard team on a daily basis.
Guide and lead the team in operational excellence, quality, cost control, diversity, engagement and regulatory compliance.
Drive productivity and foster continuous improvement through sound practices including communication of goals, training of operators, operation of machines within established process specifications, and identification and resolution of production related issues.
Maximize production efficiencies and minimize yield losses while producing high quality products in a safe manner.
Troubleshoot and quickly resolve process or machinery issues that are impacting productivity or quality.
Support and amplify communication between the stillyard and the rest of the plant.
Develop, communicate, and evaluate departmental and individual objectives. Set standards to advance initiatives and growth opportunities for the team. Provide effective employee feedback to employees using the performance evaluation process.
Monitor and address performance issues including poor attendance in a timely manner.
Maintain accurate timekeeping for stillyard employees and ensure timecards are approved on time.
Comply with and enforce established quality policies and procedures.
40% - Develop, implement and execute process improvement projects and plant capital projects.
Support strategic projects and plant initiatives.
Implement company and industry best practices.
Communicate effectively with the management team regarding resources needed to ensure the timely and accurate execution of process improvement projects.
Work with the Asphalt Operations Manager and Plant Engineering Manager to prepare and submit requests for capital expenditures.
Identify critical equipment and ensure effective PM strategy and schedule.
Collaborate with Maintenance, Capital Delivery Engineers, and Reliability Engineers to effectively and economically improve equipment and process designs.
Support all plant product qualifications, process capability studies, raw materials trials /qualifications and product development /improvement projects.
Support all R&D and Plant trial requests (PTR’s). Ensure that trials are accurately conducted employing the latest PTR protocol (w/potential problem analysis) and reported per required standards, timelines and accounting cycles.
Identify production or process problems and prepare /implement solutions as needed, using standard PI tools such as QualPro, MVT/DOE and Kepner-Tregoe problem solving techniques.
Performs PPA /FMEA on all major process and raw material changes including documentation for the changes on updated P&IDs.
Manage the application and interpretation of SPC charting and teach all machine operators the benefits of the tool and how to input data.
Comply with and enforce established quality policies and procedures.
Conduct compliance audits of raw material asphalt testing, process specifications, plant change notices (PCN’s) and other in-plant processes.
Coordinate required inspections of tanks, pressure vessels, fired heaters and other critical equipment.
Participate in plant technical support activities as required to achieve plant goals.
Lead the integration of Braincube into the stillyard operation to analyze inputs/outputs to optimize processes, reduce abnormalities, and drive down variability.
Perform other duties as assigned.
JOB REQUIREMENTS
A BS degree in Engineering, ChE or ME preferred.
A minimum of three years process engineering experience in a manufacturing environment. Experience in refining or chemical manufacturing is preferred.
The ideal candidate will possess a strong commitment to safety and have experience with manufacturing controls (preferably PLC and HMI). Demonstrated knowledge of engineering fundamentals is required.
TECHNICAL KNOWLEDGE / SKILLS
Ability to quickly identify safety hazards and make clear recommendations to resolve.
Ability to perform advanced troubleshooting and solve complicated production challenges.
Familiar with standard manufacturing concepts, practices and procedures.
Advanced communication skills and the ability to work well with employees at all levels of the organization, as well as outside contractors and vendors.
Advanced computer skills, including G Suite, WinSPC, AutoCAD, Braincube as well as the ability to quickly learn and master plant specific programs.
Strong data analysis skills. Advanced spreadsheet design and data manipulation/analysis a plus.
Strong problem solving skills and techniques, with an emphasis on the use of techniques such as PPA, MVT/DOE and Kepner-Tregoe.
GENERAL KNOWLEDGE / SKILLS
Ability to respond to requests in a professional and timely manner.
Strong planning, prioritization, organizational and reporting skills.
Independent problem-solving skills.
Positive attitude, ability to adapt and contribute to a team environment is critical.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Frequent sitting, walking and standing; occasional climbing, stooping, kneeling, crouching, crawling and balancing.
Oral and auditory capacity enabling interpersonal communication as well as communication through automated devices such as the telephone.
Required to sit, stand, walk and use hands to grasp, handle or feel objects, tools and product samples.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus.
Must have the ability to differentiate colors precisely.
Required to reach with hands and arms and stoop, kneel or crouch.
Ability to perform detailed testing processes in various process conditions.
Frequent use of eye, hand and finger coordination enabling the use of manufacturing equipment and machinery.
Ability to read and concentrate via computer data entry typing and proofreading.
Ability to lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally up to 50 pounds.
No of direct reports: 4 - 12
No of indirect reports: n/a
Travel Requirements: 5-10%
We believe our employees are our greatest resource. We offer competitive salary, benefits, 401k, and vacation packages for all full time permanent positions. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and GAF, SGI, and Siplast are proud to be affirmative action employers. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. If applying for positions in the U.S., must be eligible to work in the U.S. without need for employer sponsored visa (work permit).",263.0
195,chemical+engineer,"At Freese and Nichols, everyone on our team gets to make a meaningful difference in our communities. For more than 125 years, we have been planning and designing the infrastructure our society needs: developing water supplies, designing roadways and bridges, preparing for natural disasters, and much more. We’ve built our business on long-term relationships with clients and employees alike, resulting in financial stability, career opportunities, and a nationally recognized workplace culture.
 We offer a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, paid time off, 401(k) matching, paid overtime for salaried employees, tuition reimbursement, and much more. Our unique culture creates an environment for professional growth where we focus on caring for our clients, coworkers, and the communities where we work. Join our team of 1,000 employees as we continue to expand our services throughout the United States. Learn more about working here at freese.com/careers
Objective: To manage projects designing biogas facilities and to assist the Practice Leader (sales director) gathering more business in this space. This position requires an extroverted and meticulous individual to be able to manage the details of managing one or more projects in the $250K to $2MM range and to develop relationships within this new industry to garner sales.
This position requires a self-starter who can take charge of a project and manage it through to completion plus they must have the confidence and people skills to make “cold calls” and establish relationships with new clients and vendors.
The intent is for this position to be largely dedicated to biogas plant design, however, this engineer could also be assigned projects in oil and gas, as well. This would include work in both pipelines and facilities.
The successful candidate will possess an engineering degree(s) in one of the following disciplines:
Biological and Agricultural Engineering
Chemical Engineering
Civil Engineering with experience in waste water design
Environmental Engineering with experience in waste water design
Functional Responsibilities:
 In general, this position requires an engineer who can apply sound diversified knowledge of engineering principles and practices in broad areas of assignments and related fields. They must be able to make independent decisions using advanced techniques and by modifying and extending engineering theories, precepts, and practices.
 Direct drafting personnel and/or technicians, and coordinate and schedule work of other project engineers.
 Design and check calculations of others and seal drawings and reports. Select equipment and material for projects and/or approve manufacturer’s shop drawings of these specific items. When authorized by the Project Manager, consult and advise clients on methods, equipment, and other project items.
 Perform and direct complex studies and investigations. Prepare reports of findings. Assignments are generally non-routine studies that may require extensive experience in a given field or judgment in evaluating and coming to conclusion on information prepared by others. Define and direct the efforts of others to achieve the desired results.
 Extensive technical involvement and decision-making. Responsibilities include coordinating phases of the work to ensure completion within the established time and budgetary constraints; making critical criteria decisions; checking work for accuracy and thoroughness; and advising Project Manager of questions or problems which arise during construction.
 Assist Project Manager in estimating engineering project costs, checking staff’s cost charges, monitoring financial status of projects, planning, assembling, and guiding project staff, and making specific work task assignments.
 Maintain and expend technical capabilities to ensure that projects utilize state-of-the-art technology. This effort will also enhance both the firm’s and the engineer’s professional capabilities.
 Serve as Project Manager for projects requiring interdepartmental skills, outside consultants, and close client coordination.
Helpful Industry-Specific Training: Biogas Industry, CAD, CADWorx, BlueBeam, Process Simulation, e.g., BR&E ProMax
Construction Experience: Biogas/digester/manure handling/Agricultural, Pipeline, O&G Midstream/Downstream Facilities, and/or Food Processing Facilities
Managerial Scope: Supervision of Others:
Technical supervision of the following types of positions: Engineers, technicians, designers, drafting personnel and/or field representatives.
Make project assignments and direct the individuals listed above on group projects. Review progress to provide continuity, conformity, and quality.
Frequent contact with client personnel, regulatory agency personnel, vendors, contractors and other firms and/or individuals whose work or services are related to the project; and information, community, or technical groups with interests related to the project as authorized by the Project Manager.
Direct contact with client when assigned as Project Manager. Has responsibility to advise and inform the client regarding project status and schedule.
 Required Qualifications:
Minimum Experience - Six (6) years, including work requiring independent judgment in modification and adaptation of standard techniques and in creating new approaches/solutions to problems.
A minimum of six (6) years of experience managing projects and/or technical sales are required. Candidate must be a registered professional engineer or on a path to obtain registration.
Experience in biogas processing, dairy, municipal or industrial waste water, or similar industries are a plus.
Education (Minimum) - B.S. degree in Engineering
Registration - Professional Engineer.
 Professional Activities:
Present technical papers.
Participate in continuing education.
Participate in professional and civic activities and societies.
Freese and Nichols is firmly committed to Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and prohibits employment discrimination for employees and applicants based on his or her age, race, color, pregnancy, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, religion, marital status, citizenship, or because he or she is an individual with a disability, protected veteran or other status protected by federal, state, and local laws.
We recognize that our workforce reflects the increasingly diverse nature of our society, and we strive to take advantage of that diversity with both our external and internal customers. As a Federal Contractor, Freese and Nichols is an equal employment, affirmative action employer.",264.0
196,chemical+engineer,"This job requires that an individual come into contact with raw materials, products, equipment / machines, software or technology controlled by the Export Administration Regulations or the International Traffic in Arms Regulations. The job must be filled by a U.S. person, or a person for whom a valid export control license, or exception, has been obtained or is not required from the U.S. Government.
Basic Function of the Job:
Execute projects and continuously improve manufacturing operations. Assess and prevent quality risk while minimizing negative impact on revenue and deliveries. Standardize and improve equipment, processes and process documentation. Support and lead department projects towards cost saving, quality improvement and capacity/capability expansion. Provide technical assistance to department, company, off shore operations, as well as Manufacturing. Provide cost analysis of department parameters to determine target projects for further cost reduction. Provide technical expertise in the field of ceramics, material science, and manufacturing engineering for technical problem solving, process trouble shoot-ing and new part or vendor qualification projects. Play a role in customer issues including failure analysis, statistical data review and interpretation utilizing real world practical experiments to isolate root cause and corrective actions.
Education:
BS degree in Engineering. (Mechanical, Chemical, Materials Science or Ceramics Engineering preferred)
Experience:
3-5+ years' experience in manufacturing utilizing process control methodology

3-5 years' experience direct manufacturing process engineering

3-5 years off-shore operations support experience in Asia
Special Abilities:
As a part of a team or independently set up and coordinate technical meetings on the subject matter of expertise, follow up current literature on the subject critical to manufacturing operations and future development and innovation
Proficient computer skills, experience with Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, SQL Data base, Minitab, Email, internet access
Test expertise to achieve manufacturing excellence
Note to recruiters and employments agencies: We will not pay for unsolicited resumes from recruiters and employment agencies unless we have a signed agreement and have required assistance, in writing, for a specific opening.
II-VI is an equal opportunity employer.",266.0
197,chemical+engineer,"The PositionTronics MEMS, A TDK Group Company, is currently seeking candidates who have experience designing and developing a variety of processes for MEMS or semiconductor devices. This is a key individual-contributor position that supports various unique MEMS sensor and device programs. You will be responsible for developing, maintaining, and optimizing processes used to create various MEMS devices. You will be expected to provide the team with expertise in a variety of process areas such as photolithography, reaction ion etching, wet processing, wafer bonding, chemical vapor deposition, and metallization.In this role you will work with customers to help develop process flows for fabricating novel MEMS devices, optimize processes to enhance product yield, validate processes to ensure product specifications are met, and design and execute experiments to address customer and product needs.This position is located in our MEMS R&D and Production facility located in Addison, Texas.The PersonWhen it comes to hiring, Tronics MEMS believes in finding the candidate that is the right fit both technically and culturally. It is essential for this role that you are self-motivated with a strong dedication to achieving desired results. Due to the large variety of projects you will be working on, you must be able to successfully multitask and balance a significant number of priorities.You must be comfortable solving problems and making technical decisions utilizing a variety of experimental approaches. You should have strong familiarity utilizing statistical process control to control product, processes, and equipment. Your ability to communicate and present ideas to internal team members and external customers is crucial for this position.It is also important that you enjoy working hands on in a fab environment. The expectation is a significant portion of your day will be spent in the cleanroom helping to execute key experiments and process development work. You should be comfortable running a variety of semiconductor processing equipment and handling and inspecting wafers.Experience and SkillsBS/MS/PhD in Physics, Electrical Engineering, Chemistry, Materials Science, or other relevant technical degreesTechnical expertise in several semiconductor and MEMS processing areas such as photolithography, dry etching, wet processing, wafer bonding, CVD, diffusion, metallization, CMP, dicing, and backgrinding.A proven track record of MEMS or semiconductor process and product development including a minimum of three years of industry experienceDemonstrated experience in statistical process control (SPC) concepts and practices, statistical analysis techniques, and design of experimentsCandidates must be a US citizen, permanent resident (Green Card), or have an EAD. Applicants requiring sponsorship are not eligible.Preferred SkillsExperience working in both process development and process or product integration roles in a volume manufacturing environmentExperience working on biological and chemical based sensors (BioMEMS)EEO StatementTronics MEMS, A TDK Group Company provides equal employment opportunity to all individuals regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal, or local law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $76,771.00 - $124,344.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offRelocation assistanceRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:Day shiftMonday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payExperience:semiconductor/MEMS industrial (non-academic): 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",268.0
198,chemical+engineer,"The PositionTronics MEMS, A TDK Group Company, is currently seeking candidates who have experience designing and developing a variety of processes for MEMS or semiconductor devices. This is a key individual-contributor position that supports various unique MEMS sensor and device programs. You will be responsible for developing, maintaining, and optimizing processes used to create various MEMS devices. You will be expected to provide the team with expertise in a variety of process areas such as photolithography, reaction ion etching, wet processing, wafer bonding, chemical vapor deposition, and metallization.In this role you will work with customers to help develop process flows for fabricating novel MEMS devices, optimize processes to enhance product yield, validate processes to ensure product specifications are met, and design and execute experiments to address customer and product needs.This position is located in our MEMS R&D and Production facility located in Addison, Texas.The PersonWhen it comes to hiring, Tronics MEMS believes in finding the candidate that is the right fit both technically and culturally. It is essential for this role that you are self-motivated with a strong dedication to achieving desired results. Due to the large variety of projects you will be working on, you must be able to successfully multitask and balance a significant number of priorities.You must be comfortable solving problems and making technical decisions utilizing a variety of experimental approaches. You should have strong familiarity utilizing statistical process control to control product, processes, and equipment. Your ability to communicate and present ideas to internal team members and external customers is crucial for this position.It is also important that you enjoy working hands on in a fab environment. The expectation is a significant portion of your day will be spent in the cleanroom helping to execute key experiments and process development work. You should be comfortable running a variety of semiconductor processing equipment and handling and inspecting wafers.Experience and SkillsBS/MS/PhD in Physics, Electrical Engineering, Chemistry, Materials Science, or other relevant technical degreesTechnical expertise in several semiconductor and MEMS processing areas such as photolithography, dry etching, wet processing, wafer bonding, CVD, diffusion, metallization, CMP, dicing, and backgrinding.A proven track record of MEMS or semiconductor process and product development including a minimum of three years of industry experienceDemonstrated experience in statistical process control (SPC) concepts and practices, statistical analysis techniques, and design of experimentsCandidates must be a US citizen, permanent resident (Green Card), or have an EAD. Applicants requiring sponsorship are not eligible.Preferred SkillsExperience working in both process development and process or product integration roles in a volume manufacturing environmentExperience working on biological and chemical based sensors (BioMEMS)EEO StatementTronics MEMS, A TDK Group Company provides equal employment opportunity to all individuals regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal, or local law.Job Type: Full-timePay: $76,771.00 - $124,344.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offRelocation assistanceRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:Day shiftMonday to FridaySupplemental Pay:Bonus payExperience:semiconductor/MEMS industrial (non-academic): 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",269.0
199,chemical+engineer,"JOB DESCRIPTION
This position is responsible for evaluating existing and future oil, SWD and plant processes and pipeline hydraulics, optimizing systems to reduce cost, improve sustainability and develop best practices within the transportation and production processes.
JOB BENEFITS
Compensation includes industry competitive salary commensurate with experience, performance incentives, plus medical and dental benefits, 401(k), etc. Details are available upon application.
JOB REQUIREMENTS
Responsibilities
Ensure successful execution of oil, gas, and water projects including facilities, pipelines, and plant modifications.
Stay abreast and understand the Regulatory Process in Texas and New Mexico.
Responsible for pipeline design (oil/gas/water) for sizes between 4” – 20” including stress calculations and testing procedures.
Prepare and/or review deliverables such as PFDs, P&IDs, Line Lists, datasheets, design calculations, and apply professional engineering stamp as required.
Work with multiple vendors to maintain project timeline and budget within AFE.
Work with Land Management and field personnel to select pipeline routes as required.
Work with field personnel to trouble-shoot and optimize operations and plan system maintenance.
Education and Experience
Must have recent gas processing experience with small to mid-sized cryogenic processing plant projects and thorough knowledge of pipeline design and hydraulics or other relevant Midstream experience.
Minimum of 5 years’ experience, 10 years’ experience preferred.
Bachelor and/or Master’s degree in Chemical Engineering or Mechanical Engineering preferred.
Process experience to include: compression & dehydration, refrigeration & turbo-expander liquids recovery, sour gas treating-amine, acid gas injection, and salt-water disposal.
Thorough understanding of corrosion mitigation on steel pipelines, including coatings and cathodic protection.
Experience in project planning & program management.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work with a multi-disciplinary team.
Experience executing several small to medium sized projects running concurrently.
Ability to handle stress and work well in a demanding and fast-paced environment.
Demonstrated ability to work independently with minimum supervision. Self-starter and proactive with strong organizational skills.
Must be able to handle multiple assignments simultaneously, set realistic goals, and complete commitment on schedule.",270.0
200,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job
Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments EPI Engineer (GaN and Silicon), you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.

Responsibilities include:
Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company productsHelping to develop a manufacturable process for new technologiesOverseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipmentKeeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issuesStudying equipment performance and reliabilityEstablishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing processProviding technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizationsDefining and writing preventative maintenance schedulesDeveloping new processes and procedures for new technologiesManage install and qualifications schedulesCollaborate with technology and development teams on aggressive schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree02 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMAT Centura, Aixtron or ASM EPI chambersPrior semiconductor development experienceEquipment Installation experienceProcess Optimization experienceStartup experience preferredExperience working on cross functional teams with development engineers (ATD, TTG)Equipment experience on other semiconductor equipment (e.g., TF tools, EPI or GaN metrology tools)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.TIMS and APC experience strongly preferredStrong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",273.0
201,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary
CRB is a looking for an energetic, self-motivated, and innovative individual for a position as a Mid-Level Process Utilities Engineer. In addition to the qualifications listed below, a successful candidate shall possess the skills required to successfully develop and execute project tasks and deliverables, be a collaborative team player, and have a strong drive to deliver to customers. This person will work under the direction of a Lead Process Utility Engineer to develop and implement process utility concepts and designs on technically complex projects, coordinating with process engineers, architects, mechanical engineers, I&C and electrical engineers, as well as client personnel. Project sizes will vary and will consist primarily of biotechnology process projects, including both existing renovations/retrofits and new construction. The successful candidate will be expected to represent CRB in a professional manner.
Qualifications Degree in Chemical, Bio, Mechanical or Process Engineering 7+ years of experience in the Biotech and/or Pharmaceutical industry, preferably at a design firm General knowledge of cGMPs and specifically GMP regulated clean process and plant systems is required General knowledge with Process Utility Systems (WFI, high-purity water, clean gases, etc.) is required Experience with PFD, P&ID software tools such as ASPEN, COMOS, SmartPlant or AutoCAD, and AutoDesk Revit preferred Experience with MS Office products, especially Word, Visio, and Excel required
Responsibilities Gathering on-project process utility data and developing process utility requirements Working under the Process Utility Lead in the development of conceptual process utility scopes Developing process utility description narratives, PFDs, and P&IDs Performing process utility calculations and balances for high-purity water systems and gases Working with industry vendors and manufacturers to stay current with industry trends and technologies Coordinating directly with multi-discipline team for equipment, spatial and utility needs Developing construction drawings and specifications that incorporate client, regulatory, and industry standards Traveling as required for client development and project execution Performing field work as required for project execution (e.g. taking field dimensions, field visits during construction, etc.
Position Type
This is a full-time position
Benefits
CRB offers a complete and competitive benefit package designed for individuals and families.
CRB is an Equal Opportunity Employer",274.0
202,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",275.0
203,chemical+engineer,"This position will provide technical support to the Medium Mill including troubleshooting and day-to-day technical support of the operations group, capital project management, leadership of continuous improvement projects, training of operations group personnel, and support of safety improvement projects.
Primary Duties
May be assigned to other projects and duties
Learn relevant local and company requirements, rules and procedures. Strictly follows rules and guidelines and always uses the right procedure for the job. Promptly reports incidents, near-misses, and unsafe conditions or processes. SKNA employees regardless of level, position or tenure are responsible for upholding the safety standards regulations and policies.
Troubleshoot technical issues, collect and analyze log sheet data, collect and analyze samples of various process streams.
Plan, conduct, and report on machine trials aimed at optimizing operational performance
Capital projects: manage capital projects ranging from $5k to as much as several million dollars in scope using competent and professional project management methods, as directed by mill manager.
Continuous improvement: lead and manage continuous improvement projects. Identify and quantify opportunities, collect and analyze data, propose, win support for, and implement solutions, monitor and evaluate results.
Improve operations through crew training and development. Act as liaison between suppliers and crews
Actively support operations in safety improvement efforts.
Rotate weekend call duty for production department

Job Qualifications

Bachelor of Science in Chemical Engineering, Paper Science, or related field
Training and certification in Six Sigma or similar curriculum, and proven work experience.
2-5 years' experience in a paper making or similar operation, with some supervisory experience
High energy, with the ability to work in fast-paced environment
Computer proficiency required

About Smurfit Kappa

Smurfit Kappa is a FTSE 100 company and one of the leading providers of paper-based packaging in the world, with operations in 23 European countries and 12 countries in the Americas.

EEO Statement

Smurfit Kappa is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, pregnancy, religion, national origin, ethnicity, citizenship, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability, genetic information, status as a Vietnam Era, disabled veteran, special disabled veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal Veteran, recently separated or other protected veteran. Smurfit Kappa also complies with all applicable state, federal and local laws, regulations and ordinances prohibiting discrimination in places where Smurfit Kappa operates.

Our vision is to be a globally admired business, dynamically delivering secure and superior returns for all stakeholders.",276.0
204,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

EnLink Midstream is a leading provider of midstream energy services, providing transportation, gathering, processing, and storage of crude, natural gas, and natural gas liquids (NGLs). Strategic and forward-looking, EnLink cultivates a high level of employee values while we plan for future growth. We believe in helping one another. By serving one another, we make EnLink stronger and enable our businesses to grow in an environment of trust, cooperation and collaboration. EnLink promotes a diverse workplace, as well as opportunities for learning and career development. Join a company where employees are the strongest link!
Responsibilities:

The primary role of this position is to provide integrity risk assessment engineering support to all Pipeline and PSM facilities owned and operated by EnLink Midstream. This position will support data analytics, report risk metrics and act as subject matter expert for pipeline integrity, process safety and risk-based inspections.
Perform threat assessment and risk analysis and report on integrity risk assessments of pipelines and PSM facilities using RAGAGEP tools and techniques to support department objectives and stakeholder's requests
Identify High Consequence Areas and manage risk assessment models using EnLink’s Risk tools utilizing good engineering judgement, reliability knowledge, and other areas of technical expertise
Understand the consequence and overall risk posed by degradation on pipeline and process equipment and be able to perform remaining strength and Fitness for Service analyses
Design, plan, initiate and monitor inspection programs with both internal and 3rd party NDT/NDE personnel, and interpret and assess information generated during the inspection programs.
Assess a variety of historical inspection, operational conditions, process, and corrosion control data to adequately assess and give direction on the further inspection and operation of pipeline and process equipment
Provide oversight, guidance and support to the Engineering, Operations, Pipeline Integrity and PSM Teams
Facilitate/ validate consequence analysis such as BLEVE, dispersion modeling
Support the oversight and implementation of the Corporate Risk Management Program, OSHA PSM Program, EPA RMP and DOT IMP
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mechanical or Chemical Engineering REQUIRED
Minimum 5 years of engineering experience in the oil and gas industry in two or more of the following areas: Risk Management, Process safety management, Corrosion Engineering, Pipeline integrity related projects and programs
Strong knowledge of PHMSA CFR 192 & CFR195, OSHA PSM, EPA RMP standards
Strong knowledge of risk assessment methodologies and Degradation Mechanisms
Strong knowledge of dispersion modeling software packages
Strong knowledge of facility siting methodologies and approaches
Strong working knowledge of relevant API/ASME/CCPS/NACE standards
EOE
No agencies
No sponsorship",278.0
205,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree5 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMAT, Varian, and/or Axcelis ImplantersEquipment experience on other equipment (e.g., Veeco, TEL, Novellus, and/or ASM)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",279.0
206,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

TI’s manufacturing engineers are technical leaders who get to work in the world’s most advanced manufacturing facilities. We bring the company’s breakthrough innovations to life by manufacturing technologies that are literally changing the world. Can you imagine making this type of impact?

TI Process/Equipment Engineers are responsible for all aspects of a wafer fabrication process including tool selection and process definition. They assist with the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of the manufacturing equipment. This includes process setup and technician and operator training. This position will use data to make intelligent improvements to overall fabrication process and will be responsible for understanding all aspects of the process performed. This includes the interaction of the process to other fab processing, enabling accurate product dispositions of non-conforming product. Interaction normally requires the ability to gain cooperation of others and conducting presentations of technical information concerning specific projects/schedules.

In this semiconductor fab engineer role with Texas Instruments’ worldwide manufacturing organization, you will be responsible for engineering process optimization efforts to achieve fab cycle time goals. You will interface with various modules, in addition to yield, product and integration teams, to resolve issues that limit yield performance.

Responsibilities include:

Support teams in addressing fab module projects
Provide progress reports on tools, processes and goals
Identify and manage priorities
Plan across various groups and building collaborative relationships
Understand customer demands and the impact of actions
Project management that results in the timely execution of actions that resolve issues
Compile and evaluate test data to determine appropriate limits and variables for process or material specifications
Work with equipment vendors to sustain and enhance equipment performance from both a process and tool standpoint
Provide supervision to technicians and technical support to the operations team through definition of operation specifications and training aids

Minimum requirements:

BS in Electrical Engineering, Electrical & Computer Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science or Physics3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor environment

Preferred qualifications:

Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",280.0
207,chemical+engineer,"Regional Engineer - Central
Lewisville, TX, USA Req #865
 Monday, June 28, 2021

HOYA VISION CARE, North America



Job Description
Job Title: Regional Engineer – Central Region
Department: Engineering
Location: Dallas Lab (Lewisville, TX)
Reports To: Director of Production Control & Lab Support
FLSA Status: Exempt
Summary
Plans utilization of facilities, equipment, materials, and personnel to improve efficiencies of operations, improve quality yields and reduce operating costs. Applies Engineering and Lean Six Sigma concepts to achieve continuous improvement in operation
ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:
Lead assigned engineering projects to include planning, coordination and implementation of projects. This includes working within time constraints to meet operation goals.
Uses DOE techniques to test processes and consumables. Uses statistical tools to present results and support recommendations.
Work continuously to reduce spoilage in the manufacturing process.
Prepares detailed procedures for the different processes and maintenance of equipment and verify procedures are followed.
Monitors operations in labs assigned to region.
Studies functional statements, organization charts, and project information to determine functions and responsibilities of workers and work units and to identify areas of duplication.
Uses accurate time studies to determine labor requirements, establishes work measurement programs, and analyzes work samples to develop standards for labor utilization.
Analyzes work force utilization, facility layout, and operational data such as production costs, process flow charts, and production schedules, to determine efficient utilization of workers and equipment.
Recommends methods for improving worker efficiency and reducing waste of materials and utilities such as restructuring job duties, reorganizing work flow, relocating work stations and equipment, and purchase of equipment.
Confers with management and engineering staff to implement plans and recommendations.
Develops management systems for cost analysis, financial planning, wage and salary administration, and job evaluation.
Coordinates and oversees equipment installation and lab redesign. Prepares layout, coordinates with management schedules for installation of equipment and utilities, and verifies installation is executed successfully and on time.
COMPETENCIES
To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:

Analytical - Synthesizes complex or diverse information; Collects and researches data; Uses intuition and experience to complement data; Designs work flows and procedures.
Project Management - Develops project plans; Coordinates projects; Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and budget; Manages project team activities.
Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
Judgment - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.
Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently; Plans for additional resources; Sets goals and objectives; Organizes or schedules other people and their tasks; Develops realistic action plans.
Safety and Security - Observes safety and security procedures; Determines appropriate action beyond guidelines; Reports potentially unsafe conditions; Uses equipment and materials properly.
Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.
Interpersonal Skills - Focuses on solving conflict, not blaming; Maintains confidentiality; Listens to others without interrupting; Keeps emotions under control; Remains open to others' ideas and tries new things.
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; Listens and gets clarification; Responds well to questions; Participates in meetings.
Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives; Supports everyone's efforts to succeed.
Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
Business Acumen - Understands business implications of decisions; Displays orientation to profitability; Demonstrates knowledge of market and competition; Aligns work with strategic goals.
Diversity - Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.
Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.
Organizational Support - Follows policies and procedures; Completes administrative tasks correctly and on time; Supports organization's goals and values; Benefits organization through outside activities; Supports and respects diversity.
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time. Must be available to work extended hours including weekends. Weekends include Friday nights, anytime on Saturday or anytime on Sunday based on business needs.
Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.
Flexibility – Must be flexible to adjust the work schedule so as to accommodate permanent or temporary changes in work hours, including late hours, weekends, or holidays to meet business needs.
Travel Requirements – Must be able to travel at least 25% of time domestically. This may include weekend travel. Weekends include Friday nights, anytime on Saturday or anytime on Sunday based on business needs.
Travel may be planned in advance or with short notice depending on business needs.
EDUCATION AND QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor Degree in Industrial, Manufacturing, Mechanical, Electrical or Chemical Engineering or related field is required
A total of three to five years of previous work experience within a manufacturing environment, preferably within an optical manufacturing environment.
Course work or experience performing process control utilizing statistical analysis and DOE.
Course work or experience working with PLCs, electronic controllers, or automated equipment in a manufacturing environment.
Arena Simulation software programming
Knowledge and Understanding of the Following Areas:
Raw materials, hazardous chemicals, production processes, quality control, costs, and other techniques for maximizing the effective manufacture and distribution of goods.
Business and management principles involved in strategic planning, resource allocation, human resources, leadership techniques, production methods and coordination of people and resources.
Machines and tools, including their designs, uses, repair and maintenance.
Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Monitoring performance of self and others to make improvements or take corrective actions
Considering the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to choose the most appropriate one.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS OF WORKING ENVIRONMENT
Environmental: Laboratory and office environment, working with water, caustic and acidic chemicals and exposed to hazardous chemicals. Regularly exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Occasional dusty air with flying particulates.
Physical: Sufficient Physical ability necessary for sitting and standing for extended periods of time. The ability to occasionally Climb, Kneel, Lift, Pull, Reach, Push, Carry and Twist. Must be able to use hands to Grasp and manipulate small objects. Must be able to lift and/or carry up to 20 LBS and on occasion up to 100 LBS.
Vision: Must be able to see in the normal vision range with or without correction; Vision sufficient to read computer screens, printed documents, job tickets, faxes, cosmetic defects, procedural and policy documents.
Hearing: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
Other details
Pay Type Salary",281.0
208,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job
Texas Instruments is looking for experienced Manufacturing Process Engineers to join our team as our factories continue to grow and expand in 300mm technologies.
This posting is for multiple openings in various locations (Dallas, Richardson and Sherman, Texas)
Modules we're hiring in: CMP, Thermal, EPI, Implant, Photo, Plasma, Thin Film, Wet, Parametric Test, Metrology/YE

Responsibilities include:

Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related field
Strong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functions
Strong time management skills that enable on-time project delivery
Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environment
Ability to take the initiative and drive for results

To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",282.0
209,chemical+engineer,"Coating Engineer
Lewisville, TX, USA Req #810
 Friday, May 28, 2021
HOYA VISION CARE, North America
Job Description
Job Title: Coating Engineer
Department: Engineering
Location: Lewisville, TX
Reports To: Director of Engineering
FLSA Status: Exempt

Summary
Supports Hard Coat and AR Coating process and equipment at coating facilities to improve processes focused on reducing down time and improving yields. This is a hands-on job, so Engineer must be able to work on manufacturing floor
ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develops understanding of Hoya hard coating, and backside spin coating processes and equipment
Develops understanding of Hoya AR coatings, processes and equipment
Tests, validates, and develops processes for new products
Develops a well-rounded knowledge and understanding of equipment operation. To include but not limited to electronic or computer controls, electrical wiring, mechanical operations, hydraulics, and pneumatics
Provides remote technical support to labs to troubleshoot equipment or process issues
Travels to HOYA Hi-vision Centers in USA to trouble shoot, repair, upgrade, or install equipment or processes
Follows established procedures regarding hazardous chemicals handling, transportation, and disposal
Trains lab staff on equipment operation, maintenance and troubleshooting
Works towards reducing downtime due to equipment failure in Coating facilities and reducing occurrences of failures
Implements and monitors yields and KPIs for hard coating operation
Works continuously to reduce spoilage in the manufacturing process
Installs new processes in labs and provides appropriate training
Prepares detailed procedures for the different processes, troubleshooting steps, and maintenance of equipment and verify procedures are followed
Makes sure that processes and products meet HOYA or FDA requirements
Confers with management and engineering staff to implement plans and recommendations
Coordinates and oversees equipment installation and lab redesign. Supports layout redesign, installation of equipment and utilities, and verifies installation is executed successfully and on time
Develops understanding of Hoya AR coating process
Troubleshoots and repairs equipment either remotely or at the site
Provides written detailed troubleshooting guides including step by step descriptions and pictures
Provides trip reports describing machine failures and steps taken to repair
Follows HOYA’s or stablished safety regulations when working on equipment
COMPETENCIES
To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:

Analytical - Synthesizes complex or diverse information; Collects and researches data; Uses intuition and experience to complement data; Designs work flows and procedures.
Trouble Shooting – Ability to test equipment to identify failure point and develop plan to repair equipment in a short period of time. Ability to use tools to assemble and disable equipment following all safety regulations
Project Management - Develops project plans; Coordinates projects; Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and budget; Manages project team activities.
Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
Judgment - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.
Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently; Plans for additional resources; Sets goals and objectives; Organizes or schedules other people and their tasks; Develops realistic action plans.
Safety and Security - Observes safety and security procedures; Determines appropriate action beyond guidelines; Reports potentially unsafe conditions; Uses equipment and materials properly.
Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.
Interpersonal Skills - Focuses on solving conflict, not blaming; Maintains confidentiality; Listens to others without interrupting; Keeps emotions under control; Remains open to others' ideas and tries new things.
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; Listens and gets clarification; Responds well to questions; Participates in meetings.
Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives; Supports everyone's efforts to succeed.
Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
Business Acumen - Understands business implications of decisions; Displays orientation to profitability; Demonstrates knowledge of market and competition; Aligns work with strategic goals.
Diversity - Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce.
Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.
Organizational Support - Follows policies and procedures; Completes administrative tasks correctly and on time; Supports organization's goals and values; Benefits organization through outside activities; Supports and respects diversity.
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time. Must be available to work extended hours including weekends. Weekends include Friday nights, anytime on Saturday or anytime on Sunday based on business needs.
Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.
Flexibility – Must be flexible to adjust the work schedule so as to accommodate permanent or temporary changes in work hours, including late hours, weekends, or holidays to meet business needs.
Travel Requirements – Must be able to travel at least 50% of time domestically. This may include weekend travel. Weekends include Friday nights, anytime on Saturday or anytime on Sunday based on business needs.
Travel may be planned in advance or with short notice depending on business needs.
EDUCATION AND QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor Degree in Chemical Engineering is preferred
A total of three to five years of previous work experience within a manufacturing environment, preferably within an optical manufacturing environment supporting and maintaining processes or equipment
Course work or experience troubleshooting and supporting coating processes
Course work or experience troubleshooting equipment electrical, mechanical, hydraulic, or pneumatic operations
Knowledge and Understanding of the Following Areas:
Raw materials, hazardous chemicals, production processes, quality control, costs, and other techniques for maximizing the effective manufacture and distribution of goods.
Business and management principles involved in strategic planning, resource allocation, human resources, leadership techniques, production methods and coordination of people and resources.
Machines and tools, including their designs, uses, repair and maintenance.
Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Monitoring performance of self and others to make improvements or take corrective actions
Considering the relative costs and benefits of potential actions to choose the most appropriate one.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS OF WORKING ENVIRONMENT
Environmental: Laboratory and office environment, working with water, caustic and acidic chemicals and exposed to hazardous chemicals. Regularly exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually loud. Occasional dusty air with flying particulates.
Physical: Sufficient Physical ability necessary for sitting and standing for extended periods of time. The ability to Climb, Kneel, Lift, Pull, Reach, Push, Carry and Twist. Must be able to use hands to Grasp and manipulate small objects. Must be able to lift and/or carry up to 20 LBS and on occasion up to 100 LBS.
Vision: Must be able to see in the normal vision range with or with out correction; Vision sufficient to read computer screens, printed documents, job tickets, faxes, cosmetic defects, procedural and policy documents.
Hearing: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
NON EXCLUSIVE
The duties outlined in this document are not limited to what is presented and are not exclusive. You may be asked from time to time to perform additional duties by your supervisor.
Other details
Pay Type Salary",283.0
210,chemical+engineer,"Office
Light Manufacturing environment
Class 100 clean room
",284.0
211,chemical+engineer,"Project Engineer
Fort Worth, TX, USA Req #73
 Monday, April 12, 2021
The role of Project Engineer works collaboratively with various departments (operations, maintenance, environmental, etc.) to ensure design, operation, control and production optimization are achieved throughout the carbon black manufacturing process. The Project Engineer will manage the entire life cycle of a various projects deemed organizationally necessary for the manufacturing plants.

JOB DESCRIPTION:

• Perform engineering assessment and design of plant structures, utility and piping systems, and equipment/applications
• Manage Plant Projects as directed and in accordance with TCCB Project Procedures and Standard designs, from conception and design through Construction and Commissioning.
• Coordinate supplemental maintenance contractor activity
• Participate in plant objective setting, employee development, and plant performance reviews and action plan development and implementation.
• Assist all areas of plant in developing and executing engineered solutions for eliminating operational issues.
• Monitor performance of plant equipment and systems and make recommendations to ensure high levels of reliability are achieved. Assist as required with Root Cause Failure Analysis Teams to eliminate failures.
• Participate in developing plant maintenance program and project needs and 5 year Capital and Plant Expense Project Plans.
• Develop all engineering, drawings and equipment specs required to accurately support project development including RFQ’s, cost estimates, justifications / benefits and AFE preparation.
• Manage all Project Phases after approval including Construction / Contractor Management, Commissioning and Operations Handover.
• Ensure all projects are executed safely and meet Safety Compliance requirements resulting in Zero Accidents or Serious Incidents.
• Ensure all Operating and Maintenance Procedures are prepared prior to handover to the plant.
• Control and keep projects under budget and on time; prepare forecasts and reports on spending and physical completion to plan
• Project performance will be judged by the effectiveness of each project including compliance to project cost and schedules as well as achieving project benefits
• Ensure city, county, state, and federal regulations relating to projects are met at all times
• Manage Engineering and Project records and Documentation of the plant including storage and retrieval
• Develops project objectives by reviewing project proposals and plans; conferring with management
• Determines project responsibilities by identifying project phases and elements; assigning personnel to phases and elements; reviewing bids from contractors
• Develops, analyzes, decides on the full spectrum contract negotiation process from request for proposal (RFP); contract bid collection and conditioning; proposal review; bid awarding and selection and contract finalization.
• Determines project specifications by studying product design, customer requirements, and performance standards; completing technical studies; preparing cost estimates
• Confirms product performance by designing and conducting tests
• Determines project schedule by studying project plan and specifications; calculating time requirements; sequencing project elements
• Maintains project schedule by monitoring project progress; coordinating activities; resolving problems
• Controls project plan by reviewing design, specifications, and plan and schedule changes; recommending actions
• Controls project costs by approving expenditures; administering contractor contracts
• Frequently monitors project construction in the field to ensure project timelines and quality assurance
• Prepares project status reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends; recommending actions
• Maintains safe and clean working environment by enforcing procedures, rules, and regulations
•Maintains project data base by writing computer programs, entering and backing up data
• Maintains product and company reputation by complying with federal and state regulations
• Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed


QUALIFICATIONS:


• Bachelor of Science in civil, mechanical or chemical engineering preferred with 5-7 years applicable experience

• Non-Degreed accepted with 8-10 year applicable experience
• 5-10 years of experience in any of the following areas of activity in an engineering capacity
• Carbon black manufacturing or granular plant operations
• Bulk materials handling including packaging, loading, unloading and storage
• Pneumatic conveying
• High temperature refractory lined equipment
• Major manufacturing equipment including but not limited to boilers, steam turbines, air condensers, cooling towers, pumps, heat exchangers, fired dryers, bag filters, conveyors, bucket elevators, air blowers, etc.
• Superior verbal and written communication skills
• Solid project management experience with an emphasis on requirements analysis, timely deployment, budgetary consciousness and post implementation success sustainability
• Strong documentation, process improvement, safety management skills
• Expert level experience using computer-aided design (CAD)/computer-aided manufacturing (CAM) software
• Intermediate experience using Microsoft Office products suite (Word, Excel PowerPoint, Project, etc.)

It is the policy of Tokai Carbon CB Ltd to utilize its best faith efforts to promote equal employment opportunity in employment through a continuing program of practices designed to attain the realization of equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, sexual orientation, genetic information, veteran status or any other status protected by applicable law.
Other details
Pay Type Salary Travel Required Yes Travel % 60",285.0
212,chemical+engineer,"A Manufacturing Process Engineer position in Dallas, TX is currently available through Belcan with one of our manufacturing clients. In this position, you will be responsible for analyzing processes and proposing/implementing improvements that will ensure production lines run with optimum quality and reliability, following a lean manufacturing approach. To be considered for this position you must be a team player and have 2+ years' experience in bottling/packaging line environment.

Process Engineer Responsibilities

Continuous improvement of production processes, with a heavy focus on Production Reliability improvements
Training and support of operators in machine operation including creation of documents for centerline monitoring/adjustment and cleaning inspections and lubrication.
Implementation of new process and changes on the current process as well as other tasks pertinent to the department
Analyze the production times and the man/plant saturation using the Methods-Time Measurement method
Define and validate through technically supportive production run and identifying the appropriate processes with the relative standard cycles and the maximum achievable performance data
Define the operative instructions for the internal processes connected to the product to be produced including SOP, Cleaning, Inspection and Lubrication and Centerline instructions
Create and update line/plant layouts in AutoCAD 2D, and the ability to support new equipment

Process Engineer Requirements:

Bachelors Degree in Industrial, Mechanical, Electrical. Chemical or Controls Engineering
2 + years experience working as an engineer in a high-speed bottle packaging line environment
Lean Manufacturing Principles
Project Management Principles
AutoCAD
SAP (preferred)

If you are interested in this Process Engineer job in Dallas, TX, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a leading provider of qualified personnel to many of the world's most respected enterprises. We offer excellent opportunities for contract/temporary, temp-to-hire, and direct assignments in the engineering, IT, and professional fields. We are the employer of choice for thousands worldwide. Our overriding goal is to provide quality staffing solutions that help people, organizations, and communities succeed. Belcan is a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity. For more information, please visit our website at http://www.belcan.com.",287.0
213,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronics is an ongoing journey of discovery: our 58,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in Healthcare, Life Science and Electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronics is a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


Everything we do in EMD Electronics is to help us deliver on our purpose of being the company behind the companies, advancing digital living. We are dedicated to being the trusted supplier of high-tech materials, services and specialty chemicals for the electronics, automotive and cosmetics industries. We foster a global collaborative organization made up of individuals who have the passion to win, obsess about the customer, are relentlessly curious and act with urgency. Together, we push the boundaries of science to make more possible for our customers.


Your role: Supervise the Engineering & Maintenanceof a ultra-high purity chemical purification and packaging facility.This role includes directsupervision ofthe Maintenance Department, contractors and engineering co-ops/interns.The Maintenance Manager ensures that the facility and all operating functions (equipment, utilities, instruments, buildings and grounds) are maintained in a manner that meets regulatory/safety/quality requirements while supporting production demands.You will also execute on capital projects to support operational needs and business growth.


Responsibilities include implementing/maintaining Maintenance Excellence programs such as:

Maintenance Planning Systems (plan, schedule, organize, report)
Maintenance Reliability Systems (preventive/predictive systems)
Maintenance Efficiency Systems (cost control, crew efficiency and effectiveness studies, equipment downtime, % emergency work)
CapEx spending and tracking


Who You are


Minimum qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or other related scientific or engineering discipline
8+ years relevant experience
Manufacturing and supervisory experience in the maintenance of chemical plant equipment, including experience in supervising contractors.
Experienceinproject management


Preferred qualifications:

Strong leadership, organizational and communication skills
Ability to read/develop electrical line drawings and piping & instrumentation drawings
Computer skills, including a working knowledge of Microsoft Windows/Word/ Excel, Auto CAD, and Computerized Maintenance Management Systems.
Professional Engineer certification
Working knowledge of OSHA's Standards for Construction Safety, Process Safety Management, Lockout/Tagout, Hot Work and Confined Space Entry.
Should be familiar with ASME, API and CGA codes and good industry practices.
Knowledge of quality systems, including ISO 9000 and Lean Six Sigma
Prior experience with the developing and sustaining strong preventative and predictive maintenance programs
SAP experience


What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 225634


Location: Dallas


Career Level: D - Professional (4-9 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.

Job Segment: ERP, Manager, Lean Six Sigma, SAP, Technology, Management, Quality",290.0
214,chemical+engineer,"A career with EMD Electronics is an ongoing journey of discovery: our 58,000 people are shaping how the world lives, works and plays through next generation advancements in Healthcare, Life Science and Electronics. For more than 350 years and across the world we have passionately pursued our curiosity to find novel and vibrant ways of enhancing the lives of others. EMD Electronics is a business of Merck KGaA, Darmstadt, Germany.


Everything we do in EMD Electronics is to help us deliver on our purpose of being the company behind the companies, advancing digital living. We are dedicated to being the trusted supplier of high-tech materials, services and specialty chemicals for the electronics, automotive and cosmetics industries. We foster a global collaborative organization made up of individuals who have the passion to win, obsess about the customer, are relentlessly curious and act with urgency. Together, we push the boundaries of science to make more possible for our customers.


This role does not offer sponsorship for work authorization. External applicants must be eligible to work in the US.


Your Role:


The Planarization Technical Operations Team is looking to add a Automation Engineer in our team who will support the Dallas manufacturing site. The role offers both an opportunity to drive the adoption of improved data collection and review tools as well as a strong focus on process improvement and efficiency gains for the Dallas site.


Design control systems to improve automation and data acquisition capabilities.
Develop advanced process control models to establish feedback loops and ensure product quality.
Integrate data from multiple sources (process, quality, supply chain, etc.) to feed downstream analytics and visualization.
Analyze data output to identify opportunities to reduce cost, improve performance, and optimize capacity.
Update and maintain system documentation, engineering drawings, P&IDs and automation functional specifications.
Special focus on the intersection of process controls and data analytics to enable industry 4.0 capabilities.


Who You Are:


Minimum Qualifications:

B.S. Degree in a Technical discipline
3+ years of experience supporting manufacturing operations in a process controls, chemical engineering, manufacturing engineering, industrial engineering, or similar industry.
3+ years of experience in industrial controls automation
3+ years of experience with industrial controls, instrumentation, and PLC programming, such as Allen Bradley, Rockwell FactoryTalk, RSLogix/Studio 5000
3+ years of experience with AutoCAD software and reading/generating engineering drawings/P&IDs


Preferred Qualifications:

Experience using applied statistics to control and improve manufacturing operations.
Proficient in use of Structured Query Language (SQL) to query data from relational databases.
Experience with Siemens SIMATIC PCS 7 control systems
Experience in the design of ISA-88 batch control systems
Proficient in use of Python to perform data cleansing, statistical modeling, machine learning, and data visualization (i.e., pandas, numpy, scikit-learn, matplotlib, seaborn, plotly).
Data visualization and dashboard design in Tableau
ETL and data integration using Alteryx
Statistical analysis using JMP/Minitab
Desire to learn and continuously adapt to new software and methods.
Proven ability to internalize ownership and responsibility for idea generation.
Capable of driving decision-making using data and visualization.


What we offer: With us, there are always opportunities to break new ground. We empower you to fulfil your ambitions, and our diverse businesses offer various career moves to seek new horizons. We trust you with responsibility early on and support you to draw your own career map that is responsive to your aspirations and priorities in life. Join us and bring your curiosity to life!


Curious? Apply and find more information at https://jobs.vibrantm.com


The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.


Job Requisition ID: 219977


Location: Dallas


Career Level: C - Professional (1-3 years)


Working time model: full-time


Careers during Covid-19
Thank you for visiting our careers website, we are always looking for curious minds to join our teams. We understand how much the world is being impacted by the Covid-19 crisis and we want to assure you that your safety is very important to us. To ensure that everyone's health is protected, instead of a standard face-to-face interview, it is likely that you will be offered alternative digital interview options.

US Disclosure
The Company is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, disability, military or veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, transgender status, marital status, or any other classification protected by applicable federal, state, or local law. This policy of Equal Employment Opportunity applies to all policies and programs relating to recruitment and hiring, promotion, compensation, benefits, discipline, termination, and all other terms and conditions of employment. Any applicant or employee who believes they have been discriminated against by the Company or anyone acting on behalf of the Company must report any concerns to their Human Resources Business Partner, Legal, or Compliance immediately. The Company will not retaliate against any individual because they made a good faith report of discrimination.

North America Disclosure
The Company is committed to accessibility in its workplaces, including during the job application process. Applicants who may require accommodation during the application process should speak with our HR Services team at 855 444 5678 from 8:00am to 5:30pm ET Monday through Friday.

Job Segment: SQL, Database, Business Process, Technology, Management",291.0
215,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

TI’s manufacturing engineers are technical leaders who get to work in the world’s most advanced manufacturing facilities. We bring the company’s breakthrough innovations to life by manufacturing technologies that are literally changing the world. Can you imagine making this type of impact?

TI Process/Equipment Engineers are responsible for all aspects of a wafer fabrication process including tool selection and process definition. They assist with the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of the manufacturing equipment. This includes process setup and technician and operator training. This position will use data to make intelligent improvements to overall fabrication process and will be responsible for understanding all aspects of the process performed. This includes the interaction of the process to other fab processing, enabling accurate product dispositions of non-conforming product. Interaction normally requires the ability to gain cooperation of others and conducting presentations of technical information concerning specific projects/schedules.

In this semiconductor fab engineer role with Texas Instruments’ worldwide manufacturing organization, you will be responsible for engineering process optimization efforts to achieve fab cycle time goals. You will interface with various modules, in addition to yield, product and integration teams, to resolve issues that limit yield performance.

Responsibilities include:

Support teams in addressing fab module projects
Provide progress reports on tools, processes and goals
Identify and manage priorities
Plan across various groups and building collaborative relationships
Understand customer demands and the impact of actions
Project management that results in the timely execution of actions that resolve issues
Compile and evaluate test data to determine appropriate limits and variables for process or material specifications
Work with equipment vendors to sustain and enhance equipment performance from both a process and tool standpoint
Provide supervision to technicians and technical support to the operations team through definition of operation specifications and training aids

Minimum requirements:

BS in Electrical Engineering, Electrical & Computer Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science or Physics3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor environment

Preferred qualifications:

Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",292.0
216,chemical+engineer,"Sr Validation Engineer
Burlington, MA 6 months + 2 Openings On-site preferred. ( 2 -3 days onsite is also acceptable) Sr. Validation Engineer
Exciting opportunity with a growing global contract research and manufacturing services to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.
The Sr. Validation Engineer is responsible for developing and executing validation and revalidation protocols for processes, equipment, utility, and test systems. This person will work with Engineering and Facilities personnel to assure proper installation and operation of systems prior to and post validation. This individual will provide technical support to users of validated systems as required. Will provide assistance to Senior Engineers in support of on-going projects, as well as perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required. The Sr. Validation Engineer works under the direction of the Director or a designate; interacts with all other departments for Engineering and Validation-related issues as required.
Responsibilities

Develop and execute required protocols and complete reports for equipment, process utility, test, and software validations and revalidations as assigned
Develop and write Standard Operating Procedures, protocols, incidents, and final reports for new processes and equipment, in conjunction with the system owners
Support department projects by assisting senior engineers on ongoing projects
Perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required following existing procedures
Support internal and external audits by providing data appropriate to the investigation as required
Keep Department Management and personnel aware of Engineering related issues that may have a regulatory compliance or financial impact

Requirements

Bachelor's Degree required; Chemical Engineering Degree preferred
3+ years of experience in validation in Pharmaceutical industry
Familiarity with validation tools and processes, including temperature mapping and use of Kaye Validator
Familiarity with FDA and EU regulations for pharmaceuticals and medical devices
Strong technical writing skills are required to author validation documentation
Ability to work semi-independently; demonstrated ability to interact well with other technical departments
Excellent communication skills

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, and ability to adjust focus.
Join I3 Infotek. Make a winning team even better.
Do you share our passion for supporting life sciences industries? Careers at I3 Infotek are always on the rise. We never stop looking for medical device and pharmaceutical experts like you! Our team members are the foundation for our current and future success. Excellence is our most valued asset. We make it our priority to support you as a valued team member. We offer a work experience that’s challenging and rewarding, with lots of room for innovation, creativity, independent thinking and growth. If you’re looking for career-growth along with a work-platform that will further your skill set, expertise, and experience, then check our current job openings and apply, or send your resume to jobs@i3infotek.com.",294.0
217,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking to add a Senior Engineer - Process to join our team in either Salt Lake City, UT, Frisco, TX, and Madison, WI!
The Senior Engineer - Process will be responsible for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for process projects in the manufacturing sector, with an emphasis on the food and beverage industry. The individual will participate as a Haskell team member to deliver integrated process/systems as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Application of Knowledge of Process Systems:
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and complies with all applicable codes, ordinances, standards, and regulations.
Develops all engineering calculations for process throughput, mass/energy balance, equipment sizing, relief devices, heat transfer, and fluid transfer.
Selects proper equipment for the unit operations that define the process.
Design:
Participates in project strategy meetings, develops design concepts, and recommends system solutions.
Responsible for the development of Block Flow Diagrams (BFDs), Process Flow Diagrams (PFDs), and Piping & Instrumentation Diagrams (P&IDs) for all assigned process projects. In-depth understanding of PIP Industry standards.
Develops or verifies utility requirements, equipment lists, equipment specifications, and controls as well as instrumentation requirements for each assigned process project.
Works closely with engineers and designers for proper arrangement of equipment and piping to support the process and incorporate sound ergonomic principles.
Works closely with the client and vendors to determine required waste disposal paths, maintenance access requirements, and other ancillary process needs to ensure they are accounted for.
Responsible to produce well-organized, finished construction drawings of good appearance, accuracy, and clarity, in accordance with company or client CAD standards.
Responsible for producing process discipline construction material specifications and installation scope of work documents for assigned projects.
Construction Support:
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Inspections may occur at the client’s site or at a vendor for specialty equipment. Prepares inspection reports.
Performs equipment submittal reviews and responds to the contractor and/or vendor Requests for Information (RFIs).
Perform detailed bid analysis for vendor services or equipment quotes.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Effectively manages project startup, commissioning, verification, and closeout tasks related to the process design.
Project Management:
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Monitors client requests against the proposal and known scope of work. Develops engineering change notices under the direction of the Project Manager.
Assigns and monitors the tasks of junior engineers and designers.
Planning, Scheduling, and Profitability:
Creates a discipline work plan for assigned projects. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Plans production and prepares man-hour estimates for project effort for all work in process discipline. Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, developing proposals including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Professional Development:
Participates in the professional community organizations and trade organizations within the discipline.
Prepares and presents technical subjects through Lunch & Learns to enhance Process team knowledge and understanding.
Leadership:
Adheres to established company standards and policies.
Directs technical efforts of discipline subordinates assigned to the project.
Mentors junior engineers and designers in process design and project execution.
Education/Experience:
Minimum of 4-year engineering degree.
Typical minimum of 10 years of process design and application engineering experience.
Specific Knowledge, Skills, License, Certifications, Etc.:
Strong knowledge in food and/or beverage processing equipment/systems with a working knowledge of controls and instruments commonly used.
Practical experience in the design and implementation of processing and transfer of dry products including pneumatic transfer, mechanical conveying, and dust collection systems. Explosion mitigation techniques and requirements preferred.
Practical experience in the following areas: Blending & mixing, sheeting, baking, thermal processing, bulk liquids, and slurry systems, commercial heat exchangers, fluid transfer (fittings, valves, pumps), evaporation, sterilization, CIP, SIP, and systems automation/integration in both consumer and bulk food processing.
Practical experience with the production processes used in the manufacture of cookies, crackers, salty snacks such as tortilla chips, potato chips, pretzels, etc., cereals, cold form bars, and other food products.
In-depth knowledge and experience with proper sanitary design and hygienic requirements for food manufacturing facilities
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices including detailed specification development for equipment and installation services.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution on a large scale including full turn-key projects.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Proficiency in MS Office programs (Outlook, Word, Excel, etc) required
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: AIB, SQF, FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Familiarity with Autodesk programs (AutoCAD, Revit, Plant 3D) preferred
Ability and desire to mentor the next generation of process engineers
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Professional Engineering license a plus.
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",295.0
218,chemical+engineer,"Chemicals Production Project Technical ManagerChemicals ManufacturingLocation: Dallas, TXSalary: $140-$150kRelo: YesBonus: YesNO VISA SPONSORSHIPDescription: This position has both production and project responsibilities breaking down to production support, day to day optimization, and project work. Reports to the Plant Manager.Supervising and mentoring technicians.Requirements: · B.S. Chemical Engineering· 10+ years’ experience out of ideally a PSM regulated Chemical Plant but not necessary, will consider coatings/adhesives· Must have production support, process optimization, and project engineering at ideally 100k plus.· Supervisory experience is needed which could be Production Supervision, supervising other engineers, or supervising other technicians.· Batch and mixing knowledgeJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):Do you have a stable career path with limited job changes?What Chemical products are being manufactured with your current or recent employer?Do you have experience in a PSM regulated Chemical Plant?Do you have a completed Chemical Engineering Degree?Do you have current day-to-day process optimization hands-on experience?Do you have hands-on project engineering accomplishments at ideally 100k or above?Do you have Batch and/or mixing chemicals experience?Are you PMP certified?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",296.0
219,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",297.0
220,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operations
Develop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and quality
Implement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvements
Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog Technologies
Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous manner
Support the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)
Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

2 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Experience in Wet or CMP process modules preferredDemonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",298.0
221,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job
We're expanding and growing in 300mm technologies. We're looking for experienced equipment engineers to join our team. This posting is for multiple positions availabe in the Dallas / Richardson, TX area.
Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.
Responsibilities include:
Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company productsOverseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipmentKeeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issuesStudying equipment performance and reliabilityEstablishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing processProviding technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizationsDefining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degreeAt least 1 year of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Semiconductor Equipment Engineering Experience – Any ModuleExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",299.0
222,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job
Texas Instruments is looking for experienced Manufacturing Process Engineers to join our team as our factories continue to grow and expand in 300mm technologies.
This posting is for multiple openings in various locations (Dallas, Richardson and Sherman, Texas)
Modules we're hiring in: CMP, Thermal, EPI, Implant, Photo, Plasma, Thin Film, Wet, Parametric Test, Metrology/YE

Responsibilities include:

Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related field
Strong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functions
Strong time management skills that enable on-time project delivery
Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environment
Ability to take the initiative and drive for results

To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",300.0
223,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the job
This role will be a joint technician supervisor as well as a process engineer in the Wet/CMP module. The selected individual will be a people manager for process technicians and will create developemtn plans, conduct performance reviews, set daily priorities, and ensure proper training for their technician team. He or she will also be a process engineer in the Wet/CMP module. Responsibilities include support manufacturing, own process performance and improvement projects, disposition lots, and support ramp activities.
Minimum requirements
2 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies
Preferred qualifications:
Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryWorking well in a team environment is imperative in this role.Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsGood listener and excellent verbal and written communication skills
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",301.0
224,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support teams in addressing fab module projectsSupport manufacturing operationsPlan across various groups and building collaborative relationshipsDevelop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and qualityImplement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvementsPerform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)Participate in data analysis and problem resolution
Compile and evaluate test data to determine appropriate limits and variables for process or material specificationsWork with equipment vendors to sustain and enhance equipment performance from both a process and tool standpoint
Minimum requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies3 years relevant experience

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",302.0
225,chemical+engineer,"A Manufacturing Process Engineer position in Dallas, TX is currently available through Belcan with one of our manufacturing clients. In this position, you will be responsible for analyzing processes and proposing/implementing improvements that will ensure production lines run with optimum quality and reliability, following a lean manufacturing approach. To be considered for this position you must be a team player and have 2+ years' experience in bottling/packaging line environment.

Process Engineer Responsibilities

Continuous improvement of production processes, with a heavy focus on Production Reliability improvements
Training and support of operators in machine operation including creation of documents for centerline monitoring/adjustment and cleaning inspections and lubrication.
Implementation of new process and changes on the current process as well as other tasks pertinent to the department
Analyze the production times and the man/plant saturation using the Methods-Time Measurement method
Define and validate through technically supportive production run and identifying the appropriate processes with the relative standard cycles and the maximum achievable performance data
Define the operative instructions for the internal processes connected to the product to be produced including SOP, Cleaning, Inspection and Lubrication and Centerline instructions
Create and update line/plant layouts in AutoCAD 2D, and the ability to support new equipment

Process Engineer Requirements:

Bachelors Degree in Industrial, Mechanical, Electrical. Chemical or Controls Engineering
2 + years experience working as an engineer in a high-speed bottle packaging line environment
Lean Manufacturing Principles
Project Management Principles
AutoCAD
SAP (preferred)

If you are interested in this Process Engineer job in Dallas, TX, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a leading provider of qualified personnel to many of the world's most respected enterprises. We offer excellent opportunities for contract/temporary, temp-to-hire, and direct assignments in the engineering, IT, and professional fields. We are the employer of choice for thousands worldwide. Our overriding goal is to provide quality staffing solutions that help people, organizations, and communities succeed. Belcan is a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity. For more information, please visit our website at http://www.belcan.com.",303.0
226,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree2 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with ASM A412, TEL 303i/Indy, Kokusai furnace platformsPrior experience with Poly, Nitride, Metal AnnealEquipment experience on other Diffusion equipment platformsExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",304.0
227,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is an environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Senior Engineer to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Design of water and wastewater treatment facilities
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of various sizes
Oversees budget, schedule and quality standards
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Acts independently on technical matters pertaining to civil/environmental engineering field
Carries out complex assignments requiring the development of new or improved techniques or procedures to create new or refined equipment, material, processes or methods
Assists in proposal preparation and interviews
May be included in contract negotiations with clients after selection
Develops relationships with existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance at staff level on existing projects
Works closely with subconsultants on projects
Active in professional associations, including attendance and participation in local, regional, and national conventions
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Minimum of 6 years of wastewater design experience in the field of environmental consulting engineering with an emphasis in hydraulics, physical, chemical, and biological treatment processes and treatment plant design
Experience in development of conceptual/preliminary designs and detailed design document preparation
Demonstrated experience with managing and designing medium sized projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Experience working with wastewater collection systems and water and reclaimed water transmission/distribution projects
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Proficient in MS Word and Excel
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering",305.0
228,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job
Describe responsibilities
Exciting opportunity to make an impact by leading a team of EE / PE shift technicians at DMOS6. The ideal candidate for this will lead the EE / PE techs on B or D shift and strive for synergy between shifts for execution and productivity on night shifts.
Manage a team of equipment & process technicians from multiple modules
Provide leadership and guidance to the EE & PE technicians.
Set EE & PE tech priorities to support operational needs and engineering priorities.
Set EE & PE tech goals and align them with Engineering team goals.
Provide continuous feedback and mentorship to the EE & PE technicians
Define EE & PE technician IDPs and support them to achieve the IDP goals.
Help drive standardization in disposition practices across the shifts.
Help onboard new EE & PE technicians and ramp plans.
Drive compliance to all safety and non-safety training for EE & PE technicians.
Build and maintain relationships between the engineering, manufacturing and technician teams.
Participate in audits (customer, internal, FAB, 5S, etc)
Support engineering module with certain process ownership.
Minimum requirements:
B.S. Degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Engineering Physics, Materials Science, Mechanical Engineering, Metallurgic Engineering, Physics or relevant Technical degree. May consider AS degreed candidates with relevant work experience and demonstrated leadership skills.
Minimum of 3 years of experience
Must have 3 years of experience working in Fab environment.
Preferred qualifications:
Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryWorking well in a team environment is imperative in this role.Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsGood listener and excellent verbal and written communication skills
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",306.0
229,chemical+engineer,":
The Sr. Project Engineer / Project Manager evaluates, assembles, and designs packaging equipment to create and modify automated solutions for Design Group clients. This position will act as a project lead/SME on packaging and equipment activities in a variety of industries (pharmaceutical, consumer, beverage, food, industrial). In addition, this role will be responsible for identification and troubleshooting of potential or current packaging problems and support of maintenance mechanics to identify and resolve problems to maintain and potentially increase productivity.
Responsibilities:
Will complete packaging line design and development to include estimation, justification, budget, schedule, design, implementation, acquisition, installation, start-up, troubleshooting, and documentation facilities and equipment compliant with local, state, federal, and international regulations.
Develop equipment design and specifications, design of equipment support systems, and bid analyses.
Lead communications with vendors (OEM’s) and contractors to implement “cutting edge” automation solutions.
Provide engineering solutions for continuous improvement objectives using industry standard tools and procedures (Change Control, ROI, etc.)
Ability to evaluate existing packaging operations and suggest and drive projects to provide immediate ROI and improve productivity.
Identify and specify required tooling and/or packaging equipment for projects within designated timelines.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in packaging solutions, mechanical design, and project engineering.
Experience in at least one of the following industries: Beverage, Food, Consumer Products, Pharmaceutical, Industrial.
Must showcase a deep understanding of all types of packaging equipment (filling, secondary packaging, palletizing) in a range of industries and applications. Ideally including fully “integrated” lines.
Demonstrate daily problem-solving capabilities including strategic and critical thinking.
Must have strong interpersonal/communication skill: verbal and written.
Excellent project management skills including communication, financial management, and team leadership
Cross-functional networking and influencing ability.
Ability to handle multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.
Strong desire and aptitude to interact and build relationships with clients.
Understanding of FDA regulations and requirements surrounding documentation required is a plus.
Ability to close out projects successfully and building for the next opportunity
Have a strong history of critical problem solving “wins”
Experience in writing scope of work documentation and managing contractors on site
Strong working knowledge of applicable ACAD, SOPs and cGMPs.
Knowledge of packaging components & equipment types correlating to those components
General understanding of automation control systems (PLC, HMI, VFD’s, etc)
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
B.S. Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
Minimum 5-7 years of industrial project engineering or project management experience involving packaging systems and manufacturing automation applications. Experience in the food, dairy or high speed beverage/brewery industries is applicable and preferred.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",307.0
230,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",308.0
231,chemical+engineer,"With general direction, performs basic to high complexity calculations, modeling, data analysis, designs, on site evaluations and/or other similar evaluations for water resources projects (Ex: climate change adaptation; coastal analysis and engineering; collection systems; CSOs; dams; drainage; economics and planning; ecosystem restoration; flood management; green infrastructure; groundwater; hydroelectric power; hydrology and hydraulics; integrated resource planning; irrigation; open channels; outfalls; planning; pressure conduits; probability and risk analysis; reservoirs; sedimentation; spillways, gates, and outlet works; stream, rivers and wetlands; stormwater management; urban watersheds; water law and regulations; watershed management; water supply planning and systems; and water quality, etc.).

Signs and seals designs and other work as necessary. Provides technical guidance and training to more junior staff.

Reviews the work of more junior staff. Collaborates with sales staff to create proposals in response to current and potential client requests for proposal (RFPs).

Reviews draft proposals for adherence to firm, industry, state, local and federal regulations and best practices. Meets with current and potential future clients to review their current and future design needs.

Contributes to firm's TKM by developing white papers and technical design documentation of new or special case designs, studies, etc.. Submits technical papers and designs for publishing to technical journals.

Performs other duties as required. Attends conferences, symposia, etc. to improve the visibility of the firm's products and services in collaboration with applicable sales staff.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Environmental, Civil, Coastal or Chemical Engineering or related discipline.

Professional engineering (PE) license.

7 years of related experience.

Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Skills and Abilities
Expert knowledge of GIS software and practices. Expert knowledge of computer assisted design and drafting (CADD) 3D and 4D software and practices. Expert Knowledge of engineering principles of design.
Certification/License Requirements
Professional Engineer
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",309.0
232,chemical+engineer,"Chemicals Production Project Technical ManagerChemicals ManufacturingLocation: Dallas, TXSalary: $140-$150kRelo: YesBonus: YesNO VISA SPONSORSHIPDescription: This position has both production and project responsibilities breaking down to production support, day to day optimization, and project work. Reports to the Plant Manager.Supervising and mentoring technicians.Requirements: · B.S. Chemical Engineering· 10+ years’ experience out of ideally a PSM regulated Chemical Plant but not necessary, will consider coatings/adhesives· Must have production support, process optimization, and project engineering at ideally 100k plus.· Supervisory experience is needed which could be Production Supervision, supervising other engineers, or supervising other technicians.· Batch and mixing knowledgeJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):Do you have a stable career path with limited job changes?What Chemical products are being manufactured with your current or recent employer?Do you have experience in a PSM regulated Chemical Plant?Do you have a completed Chemical Engineering Degree?Do you have current day-to-day process optimization hands-on experience?Do you have hands-on project engineering accomplishments at ideally 100k or above?Do you have Batch and/or mixing chemicals experience?Are you PMP certified?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",310.0
233,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree2 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience in a semiconductor environmentExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",311.0
234,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking for a Project Engineering Manager - Process to join our team in Frisco, TX.
The Project Engineering Manager - Process will be responsible, as a design professional, for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for industrial process projects in the food and beverage and consumer products industries. The individual will participate as the Haskell team lead to deliver effective and elegant process design solutions as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture, and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge, and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for reviewing new project RFP documents and preparing man-hour estimates and proposal verbiage for the process discipline portion of the project effort.
Responsible for the generation of well-organized, finished construction documents of good appearance and high accuracy, clarity, and correctness. Reviews discipline specifications for assigned projects.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Creates discipline work plans for assigned projects including budget and schedule. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors, and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Advises and assists Construction Project Managers, Superintendents, and Subcontractors in the interpretation and clarification of construction documents.
Review applicable shop drawings and submittal data for compliance with construction documents.
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Prepares inspection reports.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Participates in project strategy meetings, leads design concept development and recommends systems, produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and level of detail
Responsible for developing or verifying process equipment layouts, equipment specifications, and identifying all required support utilities for assigned projects.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Performs analysis or calculations as required.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Effectively manages project closeout tasks and warranty work.
Education/Experience:
Four-year engineering degree in either Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
A minimum of 10 years of process design-related experience and 3 years of design project management.
Professional engineering registration preferred.
Strong knowledge of processing lines and concepts for the food and beverage industry.
Knowledge and firsthand experience with developing PFD's, P&ID's, equipment arrangements, and mass-balance calculations.
Knowledge and experience in controlling project scope, schedules, budgets, and resource planning.
Experience running multi-disciplined teams of engineers and designers on a project basis.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
#LI-KD1
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical and Biological Engineering
Bachelors or better in Electrical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",313.0
235,chemical+engineer,"Sr Validation Engineer
Burlington, MA 6 months + 2 Openings On-site preferred. ( 2 -3 days onsite is also acceptable) Sr. Validation Engineer
Exciting opportunity with a growing global contract research and manufacturing services to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.
The Sr. Validation Engineer is responsible for developing and executing validation and revalidation protocols for processes, equipment, utility, and test systems. This person will work with Engineering and Facilities personnel to assure proper installation and operation of systems prior to and post validation. This individual will provide technical support to users of validated systems as required. Will provide assistance to Senior Engineers in support of on-going projects, as well as perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required. The Sr. Validation Engineer works under the direction of the Director or a designate; interacts with all other departments for Engineering and Validation-related issues as required.
Responsibilities

Develop and execute required protocols and complete reports for equipment, process utility, test, and software validations and revalidations as assigned
Develop and write Standard Operating Procedures, protocols, incidents, and final reports for new processes and equipment, in conjunction with the system owners
Support department projects by assisting senior engineers on ongoing projects
Perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required following existing procedures
Support internal and external audits by providing data appropriate to the investigation as required
Keep Department Management and personnel aware of Engineering related issues that may have a regulatory compliance or financial impact

Requirements

Bachelor's Degree required; Chemical Engineering Degree preferred
3+ years of experience in validation in Pharmaceutical industry
Familiarity with validation tools and processes, including temperature mapping and use of Kaye Validator
Familiarity with FDA and EU regulations for pharmaceuticals and medical devices
Strong technical writing skills are required to author validation documentation
Ability to work semi-independently; demonstrated ability to interact well with other technical departments
Excellent communication skills

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, and ability to adjust focus.
Join I3 Infotek. Make a winning team even better.
Do you share our passion for supporting life sciences industries? Careers at I3 Infotek are always on the rise. We never stop looking for medical device and pharmaceutical experts like you! Our team members are the foundation for our current and future success. Excellence is our most valued asset. We make it our priority to support you as a valued team member. We offer a work experience that’s challenging and rewarding, with lots of room for innovation, creativity, independent thinking and growth. If you’re looking for career-growth along with a work-platform that will further your skill set, expertise, and experience, then check our current job openings and apply, or send your resume to jobs@i3infotek.com.",318.0
236,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job
Describe responsibilities
Exciting opportunity to make an impact by leading a team of EE / PE shift technicians at DMOS6. The ideal candidate for this will lead the EE / PE techs on B or D shift and strive for synergy between shifts for execution and productivity on night shifts.
Manage a team of equipment & process technicians from multiple modules
Provide leadership and guidance to the EE & PE technicians.
Set EE & PE tech priorities to support operational needs and engineering priorities.
Set EE & PE tech goals and align them with Engineering team goals.
Provide continuous feedback and mentorship to the EE & PE technicians
Define EE & PE technician IDPs and support them to achieve the IDP goals.
Help drive standardization in disposition practices across the shifts.
Help onboard new EE & PE technicians and ramp plans.
Drive compliance to all safety and non-safety training for EE & PE technicians.
Build and maintain relationships between the engineering, manufacturing and technician teams.
Participate in audits (customer, internal, FAB, 5S, etc)
Support engineering module with certain process ownership.
Minimum requirements:
B.S. Degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Engineering Physics, Materials Science, Mechanical Engineering, Metallurgic Engineering, Physics or relevant Technical degree. May consider AS degreed candidates with relevant work experience and demonstrated leadership skills.
Minimum of 3 years of experience
Must have 3 years of experience working in Fab environment.
Preferred qualifications:
Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryWorking well in a team environment is imperative in this role.Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsGood listener and excellent verbal and written communication skills
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",319.0
237,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is an environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Senior Engineer to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Design of water and wastewater treatment facilities
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of various sizes
Oversees budget, schedule and quality standards
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Acts independently on technical matters pertaining to civil/environmental engineering field
Carries out complex assignments requiring the development of new or improved techniques or procedures to create new or refined equipment, material, processes or methods
Assists in proposal preparation and interviews
May be included in contract negotiations with clients after selection
Develops relationships with existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance at staff level on existing projects
Works closely with subconsultants on projects
Active in professional associations, including attendance and participation in local, regional, and national conventions
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Minimum of 6 years of wastewater design experience in the field of environmental consulting engineering with an emphasis in hydraulics, physical, chemical, and biological treatment processes and treatment plant design
Experience in development of conceptual/preliminary designs and detailed design document preparation
Demonstrated experience with managing and designing medium sized projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Experience working with wastewater collection systems and water and reclaimed water transmission/distribution projects
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Proficient in MS Word and Excel
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering",320.0
238,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is a nationally recognized environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Project Manager to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of medium to large sizes of moderately complex nature
Responsible for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Directs several subordinate supervisors or team leaders
Responsible for training and monitoring internal staff
Initiates and maintains extensive contacts with key engineers and officials of other organizations and companies
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Plans and develops projects concerned with unique or controversial problems that have an important effect on major organization programs
Develop standards and guides for diverse engineering activities
Determine program objectives and requirements and organize programs and projects
Involved in exploration of subject area, definition of scope and selection of problems for investigation, and development of novel concepts and approaches
Responsible for acting independently and making authoritative decisions on technical matters
Involved on team that prepares proposals, conducts interviews and negotiates contracts with clients after selection
Develops significant relationships with new and existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance
Supports firm's relationships with client management personnel
Responsible for identifying and directs sub consultants performing services on projects
Active in professional associations, including presentation of technical papers, member of technical committee, officer of local or national organization
Identify needs for recruitment of new employees and participates in selection process
Minimal travel when requested
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Greater than 15 years professional experience (exclusive of any advanced degree)
Experience includes water and/or wastewater treatment facilities, wastewater collection systems, water transmission/distribution projects, pipeline rehabilitation projects, and pump stations
Ability to deliver high quality services within budget and schedule constraints
Experience in the design and construction phase of small, medium, and large sized water and/or wastewater infrastructure projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Ability to evaluate progress of staff and results obtained, and recommends major changes to achieve overall objectives
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering
Design and construction phase experience",321.0
239,chemical+engineer,"This position is responsible for conducting the evaluation of process, equipment and engineering issues related to supporting the installation and the running of a pulp manufacturing capability in Texas. This will involve the evaluation of and recommendations for pulp manufacturing processes, materials, equipment and additives the geographic location of the facility. The individual will support and provide direction and oversight of all activities associated with equipment and materials, as well as engineering and process improvements for the pulp manufacturing operation.


Essential Duties:

Process Improvement - Equipment, Materials & Technology
Ensure all material deliveries, pulp and additives, meet the required specs. and that standardized process parameters are in place and complied to.
Continuously Evaluate or develop equipment which can increase throughput, reduce scrap and improve yield. while eliminating non-value-added manufacturing costs
Continuously evaluate materials for efficiency in the pulp manufacturing process
Design and execute tests to simulate production floor processing to enhance the operation
Develop creative manufacturing solutions to enhance the pulp operation
Install or Oversee the sourcing and installation of equipment upgrades designed to optimize the pulp manufacturing process
Ensure all supervisors and operators are properly trained.
Lead trials on prototype machine to evaluate new materials and additives.
Technical Support
Provide technical support with customers and suppliers as needed
Participate in development of annual capital budget to support the business plan (that is a given and not a big part of the job)
Prepare Capital Authorization Requests (CAR) when required with effective project explanation, justification, project timeline and ROI calculation; prepare detailed presentation of CAR to management for approval
Handle other projects or duties as assigned and recommend engineering solutions to improve productivity.
Evaluate options for pulp manufacturing processes, including options regarding raw materials Investigate and evaluate options for pulp manufacturing equipment (same as above ""oversee the sourcing.....)""
Provide recommendations relative to all technical and engineering aspects of pulp manufacturing

Required Knowledge and Skills:

Strong knowledge of pulp and paper manufacturing processes, materials, additives and equipment
Strong project management skills; excellent and organizational skills with ability to focus on details
Ability to organize and lead teams
Logical and creative thinker; excellent problem solving skills
Strong analytical thinking
Capable of effective communication and team building to enhance project coordination
Ability and willingness to travel, including extended trips as needed

Required Education and Experience:

BS Degree or greater in Pulp Engineering or a related Engineering field (Paper or Chemical Engineering preferred)
Minimum 5 years' experience in manufacturing or engineering roles, in the pulp/paper industry
Prior project management experience; Project Management Professional (PMP) certification preferred
Prior experience working on a start-up or significant plant expansion

Deliverable:

Sustainable and reliable Process
Establish SOC and process parameters and ensure all involved are properly trained.
Continuous Improvement to reduce cost through
Raw Material and additive sourcing
Efficiency Improvements (conversion costs)

Summary

Pay, benefits and more.


Sabert is eager to attract the best, so we offer competitive compensation and a generous benefits package, including full health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k), life insurance, disability and more.


About Sabert:


We are a leading global manufacturer of innovative food packaging products and solutions. Our company was founded in 1983 on a single mission: to enhance and advance the way people enjoy food . Today we design, manufacture and distribute a wide spectrum of packaging solutions for food distributors, restaurants & caterers, grocery stores, national food chains and consumer entertaining.",322.0
240,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking for a Project Engineering Manager - Process to join our team in Frisco, TX.
The Project Engineering Manager - Process will be responsible, as a design professional, for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for industrial process projects in the food and beverage and consumer products industries. The individual will participate as the Haskell team lead to deliver effective and elegant process design solutions as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture, and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge, and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for reviewing new project RFP documents and preparing man-hour estimates and proposal verbiage for the process discipline portion of the project effort.
Responsible for the generation of well-organized, finished construction documents of good appearance and high accuracy, clarity, and correctness. Reviews discipline specifications for assigned projects.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Creates discipline work plans for assigned projects including budget and schedule. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors, and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Advises and assists Construction Project Managers, Superintendents, and Subcontractors in the interpretation and clarification of construction documents.
Review applicable shop drawings and submittal data for compliance with construction documents.
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Prepares inspection reports.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Participates in project strategy meetings, leads design concept development and recommends systems, produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and level of detail
Responsible for developing or verifying process equipment layouts, equipment specifications, and identifying all required support utilities for assigned projects.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Performs analysis or calculations as required.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Effectively manages project closeout tasks and warranty work.
Education/Experience:
Four-year engineering degree in either Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
A minimum of 10 years of process design-related experience and 3 years of design project management.
Professional engineering registration preferred.
Strong knowledge of processing lines and concepts for the food and beverage industry.
Knowledge and firsthand experience with developing PFD's, P&ID's, equipment arrangements, and mass-balance calculations.
Knowledge and experience in controlling project scope, schedules, budgets, and resource planning.
Experience running multi-disciplined teams of engineers and designers on a project basis.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
#LI-KD1
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical and Biological Engineering
Bachelors or better in Electrical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",323.0
241,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",325.0
242,chemical+engineer,":
The Sr. Project Engineer / Project Manager evaluates, assembles, and designs packaging equipment to create and modify automated solutions for Design Group clients. This position will act as a project lead/SME on packaging and equipment activities in a variety of industries (pharmaceutical, consumer, beverage, food, industrial). In addition, this role will be responsible for identification and troubleshooting of potential or current packaging problems and support of maintenance mechanics to identify and resolve problems to maintain and potentially increase productivity.
Responsibilities:
Will complete packaging line design and development to include estimation, justification, budget, schedule, design, implementation, acquisition, installation, start-up, troubleshooting, and documentation facilities and equipment compliant with local, state, federal, and international regulations.
Develop equipment design and specifications, design of equipment support systems, and bid analyses.
Lead communications with vendors (OEM’s) and contractors to implement “cutting edge” automation solutions.
Provide engineering solutions for continuous improvement objectives using industry standard tools and procedures (Change Control, ROI, etc.)
Ability to evaluate existing packaging operations and suggest and drive projects to provide immediate ROI and improve productivity.
Identify and specify required tooling and/or packaging equipment for projects within designated timelines.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in packaging solutions, mechanical design, and project engineering.
Experience in at least one of the following industries: Beverage, Food, Consumer Products, Pharmaceutical, Industrial.
Must showcase a deep understanding of all types of packaging equipment (filling, secondary packaging, palletizing) in a range of industries and applications. Ideally including fully “integrated” lines.
Demonstrate daily problem-solving capabilities including strategic and critical thinking.
Must have strong interpersonal/communication skill: verbal and written.
Excellent project management skills including communication, financial management, and team leadership
Cross-functional networking and influencing ability.
Ability to handle multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.
Strong desire and aptitude to interact and build relationships with clients.
Understanding of FDA regulations and requirements surrounding documentation required is a plus.
Ability to close out projects successfully and building for the next opportunity
Have a strong history of critical problem solving “wins”
Experience in writing scope of work documentation and managing contractors on site
Strong working knowledge of applicable ACAD, SOPs and cGMPs.
Knowledge of packaging components & equipment types correlating to those components
General understanding of automation control systems (PLC, HMI, VFD’s, etc)
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
B.S. Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
Minimum 5-7 years of industrial project engineering or project management experience involving packaging systems and manufacturing automation applications. Experience in the food, dairy or high speed beverage/brewery industries is applicable and preferred.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",326.0
243,chemical+engineer,"CDM Smith currently has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Project Manager with previous experience managing water and wastewater projects to join our West Central group. In this position, you will be the main point of contact for planning and design of municipal drinking water, wastewater treatment, and pump station projects in the greater Fort Worth/Dallas (north Texas) area and assist with business development activities. CDM Smith has been providing services to the Fort Worth/Dallas market for over 20 years. Our services have spanned the areas of design and construction administration of drinking water, wastewater, water resources, and storm water facilities.

As a member of this team, you would contribute to CDM Smith's mission by:
Managing and serving as the lead Project Manager on major Fort Worth/Dallas area municipal Water & Wastewater projects.Providing technical guidance, senior leadership, and mentoring engineering staff to enhance our water services design capabilities.Being responsible for scope, schedule, budget development, monitoring and for projects managed.Completing Quality Assurance/Quality Control of key deliverables.Assisting Client Service Leaders with technical marketing including proposals and meeting clients in the north Texas region.Participation in professional societies relevant to the industry.Building and maintaining positive working relationships with key decision makers in our clients’ organizations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree.
10 years of related experience.
PMP (PMI), CCM or DBIA certification is required (within 12 months of hire or promotion onto the Approved Project Manager list).
Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in civil, environmental, or chemical engineering or related discipline.Professional engineering (PE) license.Previous experience working on and managing design projects for municipal drinking water, wastewater, and/or pump stations.Previous experience managing multi-discipline project teams.Excellent communication, networking and team building skills.Previous experience working directly with clients.Master’s degree.Previous experience working and managing projects for municipal clients in the greater north Texas market.Previous business development experience including preparation of proposals and scopes of work and cost estimates for municipal clients.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
NAU
Group
WCG
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",327.0
244,chemical+engineer,":
The Sr. Project Engineer / Project Manager evaluates, assembles, and designs packaging equipment to create and modify automated solutions for Design Group clients. This position will act as a project lead/SME on packaging and equipment activities in a variety of industries (pharmaceutical, consumer, beverage, food, industrial). In addition, this role will be responsible for identification and troubleshooting of potential or current packaging problems and support of maintenance mechanics to identify and resolve problems to maintain and potentially increase productivity.
Responsibilities:
Will complete packaging line design and development to include estimation, justification, budget, schedule, design, implementation, acquisition, installation, start-up, troubleshooting, and documentation facilities and equipment compliant with local, state, federal, and international regulations.
Develop equipment design and specifications, design of equipment support systems, and bid analyses.
Lead communications with vendors (OEM’s) and contractors to implement “cutting edge” automation solutions.
Provide engineering solutions for continuous improvement objectives using industry standard tools and procedures (Change Control, ROI, etc.)
Ability to evaluate existing packaging operations and suggest and drive projects to provide immediate ROI and improve productivity.
Identify and specify required tooling and/or packaging equipment for projects within designated timelines.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in packaging solutions, mechanical design, and project engineering.
Experience in at least one of the following industries: Beverage, Food, Consumer Products, Pharmaceutical, Industrial.
Must showcase a deep understanding of all types of packaging equipment (filling, secondary packaging, palletizing) in a range of industries and applications. Ideally including fully “integrated” lines.
Demonstrate daily problem-solving capabilities including strategic and critical thinking.
Must have strong interpersonal/communication skill: verbal and written.
Excellent project management skills including communication, financial management, and team leadership
Cross-functional networking and influencing ability.
Ability to handle multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.
Strong desire and aptitude to interact and build relationships with clients.
Understanding of FDA regulations and requirements surrounding documentation required is a plus.
Ability to close out projects successfully and building for the next opportunity
Have a strong history of critical problem solving “wins”
Experience in writing scope of work documentation and managing contractors on site
Strong working knowledge of applicable ACAD, SOPs and cGMPs.
Knowledge of packaging components & equipment types correlating to those components
General understanding of automation control systems (PLC, HMI, VFD’s, etc)
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
B.S. Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
Minimum 5-7 years of industrial project engineering or project management experience involving packaging systems and manufacturing automation applications. Experience in the food, dairy or high speed beverage/brewery industries is applicable and preferred.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",328.0
245,chemical+engineer,"Chemicals Production Project Technical ManagerChemicals ManufacturingLocation: Dallas, TXSalary: $140-$150kRelo: YesBonus: YesNO VISA SPONSORSHIPDescription: This position has both production and project responsibilities breaking down to production support, day to day optimization, and project work. Reports to the Plant Manager.Supervising and mentoring technicians.Requirements: · B.S. Chemical Engineering· 10+ years’ experience out of ideally a PSM regulated Chemical Plant but not necessary, will consider coatings/adhesives· Must have production support, process optimization, and project engineering at ideally 100k plus.· Supervisory experience is needed which could be Production Supervision, supervising other engineers, or supervising other technicians.· Batch and mixing knowledgeJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):Do you have a stable career path with limited job changes?What Chemical products are being manufactured with your current or recent employer?Do you have experience in a PSM regulated Chemical Plant?Do you have a completed Chemical Engineering Degree?Do you have current day-to-day process optimization hands-on experience?Do you have hands-on project engineering accomplishments at ideally 100k or above?Do you have Batch and/or mixing chemicals experience?Are you PMP certified?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",329.0
246,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",330.0
247,chemical+engineer,"With general direction, performs basic to high complexity calculations, modeling, data analysis, designs, on site evaluations and/or other similar evaluations for water resources projects (Ex: climate change adaptation; coastal analysis and engineering; collection systems; CSOs; dams; drainage; economics and planning; ecosystem restoration; flood management; green infrastructure; groundwater; hydroelectric power; hydrology and hydraulics; integrated resource planning; irrigation; open channels; outfalls; planning; pressure conduits; probability and risk analysis; reservoirs; sedimentation; spillways, gates, and outlet works; stream, rivers and wetlands; stormwater management; urban watersheds; water law and regulations; watershed management; water supply planning and systems; and water quality, etc.).

Signs and seals designs and other work as necessary. Provides technical guidance and training to more junior staff.

Reviews the work of more junior staff. Collaborates with sales staff to create proposals in response to current and potential client requests for proposal (RFPs).

Reviews draft proposals for adherence to firm, industry, state, local and federal regulations and best practices. Meets with current and potential future clients to review their current and future design needs.

Contributes to firm's TKM by developing white papers and technical design documentation of new or special case designs, studies, etc.. Submits technical papers and designs for publishing to technical journals.

Performs other duties as required. Attends conferences, symposia, etc. to improve the visibility of the firm's products and services in collaboration with applicable sales staff.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Environmental, Civil, Coastal or Chemical Engineering or related discipline.

Professional engineering (PE) license.

7 years of related experience.

Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Skills and Abilities
Expert knowledge of GIS software and practices. Expert knowledge of computer assisted design and drafting (CADD) 3D and 4D software and practices. Expert Knowledge of engineering principles of design.
Certification/License Requirements
Professional Engineer
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",331.0
248,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree2 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience in a semiconductor environmentExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",332.0
249,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking for a Project Engineering Manager - Process to join our team in Frisco, TX.
The Project Engineering Manager - Process will be responsible, as a design professional, for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for industrial process projects in the food and beverage and consumer products industries. The individual will participate as the Haskell team lead to deliver effective and elegant process design solutions as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture, and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge, and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for reviewing new project RFP documents and preparing man-hour estimates and proposal verbiage for the process discipline portion of the project effort.
Responsible for the generation of well-organized, finished construction documents of good appearance and high accuracy, clarity, and correctness. Reviews discipline specifications for assigned projects.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Creates discipline work plans for assigned projects including budget and schedule. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors, and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Advises and assists Construction Project Managers, Superintendents, and Subcontractors in the interpretation and clarification of construction documents.
Review applicable shop drawings and submittal data for compliance with construction documents.
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Prepares inspection reports.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Participates in project strategy meetings, leads design concept development and recommends systems, produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and level of detail
Responsible for developing or verifying process equipment layouts, equipment specifications, and identifying all required support utilities for assigned projects.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Performs analysis or calculations as required.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Effectively manages project closeout tasks and warranty work.
Education/Experience:
Four-year engineering degree in either Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
A minimum of 10 years of process design-related experience and 3 years of design project management.
Professional engineering registration preferred.
Strong knowledge of processing lines and concepts for the food and beverage industry.
Knowledge and firsthand experience with developing PFD's, P&ID's, equipment arrangements, and mass-balance calculations.
Knowledge and experience in controlling project scope, schedules, budgets, and resource planning.
Experience running multi-disciplined teams of engineers and designers on a project basis.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
#LI-KD1
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical and Biological Engineering
Bachelors or better in Electrical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",334.0
250,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with implant equipment such as AMAT Varian and/or Axcelis HE, XE, Purion, etc.Prior experience with vacuum, robotics, electrical, and mechanical design/maintenanceEquipment experience on other semicondcutor equipment (e.g., AMAT, Axcelis, etc.)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",335.0
251,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:
Perform lot/equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicate findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerTroubleshoot process/equipment issues; define experiments that lead to improvements in yield, cycle time and world class costDevelop efficient low cost solutions to drive world class quality given aggressive ramp timelineSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment install and startupUse SPC, statistics, and DOE to analyze data.

Minimum requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Materials Science Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Physics or a related field
3 years job related experience working in semiconductor manufacturing Fabs

Preferred Skills & Qualifications:

Previous wafer Fab and/or startup experience.
Prior experience with PECVD/SACVD/PVD processes
Prior experience with 300mm wafer size is a plus.Knowledge of AMAT Producers/Centura/Endura tools is a plus.
Ability / willingness to work in a team environment to the Fab goals
The ability to analyze electrical parameters and yield is a plus.
Ability to quickly gather and analyze data to resolve issues.
Ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks/projects.
Ability to effectively deal with a dynamically changing environment.
Must be able to communicate and effectively work with others on cross functional teams.
Must be able to work with aggressive timelines and drive for timely results that meet or exceed Fab goals.
Strong communication skills both written and oral
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",336.0
252,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operations
Develop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and quality
Implement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvements
Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog Technologies
Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous manner
Support the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)
Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

5 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",337.0
253,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree5 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with TEL, ASM, or Kokusai furnaces and/or AMAT RTPEquipment experience on other equipment (e.g., Veeco, Novellus, and/or Screen)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",338.0
254,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree in Electrical, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer
Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMHS systems ( Brooks PRI, Murata, Daifuku)Prior experience with AMHS systemsEquipment experience on other equipment in a semiconductor environment.Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",339.0
255,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job
Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.

Responsibilities include:
Evaluating and selecting equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacturing of company productsOverseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipmentStaying current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issuesAnalyzing and improving equipment performance and stabilityEstablishing robust solutions for equipment fails that affect the manufacturing processDefining and writing preventative maintenance schedules and specifications

Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMAT and/or KLA metrology equipmentPrior experience with optical or laser based metrology equipmentExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques
Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.
Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",340.0
256,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is a nationally recognized environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Project Manager to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of medium to large sizes of moderately complex nature
Responsible for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Directs several subordinate supervisors or team leaders
Responsible for training and monitoring internal staff
Initiates and maintains extensive contacts with key engineers and officials of other organizations and companies
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Plans and develops projects concerned with unique or controversial problems that have an important effect on major organization programs
Develop standards and guides for diverse engineering activities
Determine program objectives and requirements and organize programs and projects
Involved in exploration of subject area, definition of scope and selection of problems for investigation, and development of novel concepts and approaches
Responsible for acting independently and making authoritative decisions on technical matters
Involved on team that prepares proposals, conducts interviews and negotiates contracts with clients after selection
Develops significant relationships with new and existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance
Supports firm's relationships with client management personnel
Responsible for identifying and directs sub consultants performing services on projects
Active in professional associations, including presentation of technical papers, member of technical committee, officer of local or national organization
Identify needs for recruitment of new employees and participates in selection process
Minimal travel when requested
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Greater than 15 years professional experience (exclusive of any advanced degree)
Experience includes water and/or wastewater treatment facilities, wastewater collection systems, water transmission/distribution projects, pipeline rehabilitation projects, and pump stations
Ability to deliver high quality services within budget and schedule constraints
Experience in the design and construction phase of small, medium, and large sized water and/or wastewater infrastructure projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Ability to evaluate progress of staff and results obtained, and recommends major changes to achieve overall objectives
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering
Design and construction phase experience",341.0
257,chemical+engineer,"CDM Smith currently has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Project Manager with previous experience managing water and wastewater projects to join our West Central group. In this position, you will be the main point of contact for planning and design of municipal drinking water, wastewater treatment, and pump station projects in the greater Fort Worth/Dallas (north Texas) area and assist with business development activities. CDM Smith has been providing services to the Fort Worth/Dallas market for over 20 years. Our services have spanned the areas of design and construction administration of drinking water, wastewater, water resources, and storm water facilities.

As a member of this team, you would contribute to CDM Smith's mission by:
Managing and serving as the lead Project Manager on major Fort Worth/Dallas area municipal Water & Wastewater projects.Providing technical guidance, senior leadership, and mentoring engineering staff to enhance our water services design capabilities.Being responsible for scope, schedule, budget development, monitoring and for projects managed.Completing Quality Assurance/Quality Control of key deliverables.Assisting Client Service Leaders with technical marketing including proposals and meeting clients in the north Texas region.Participation in professional societies relevant to the industry.Building and maintaining positive working relationships with key decision makers in our clients’ organizations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree.
10 years of related experience.
PMP (PMI), CCM or DBIA certification is required (within 12 months of hire or promotion onto the Approved Project Manager list).
Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in civil, environmental, or chemical engineering or related discipline.Professional engineering (PE) license.Previous experience working on and managing design projects for municipal drinking water, wastewater, and/or pump stations.Previous experience managing multi-discipline project teams.Excellent communication, networking and team building skills.Previous experience working directly with clients.Master’s degree.Previous experience working and managing projects for municipal clients in the greater north Texas market.Previous business development experience including preparation of proposals and scopes of work and cost estimates for municipal clients.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
NAU
Group
WCG
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",342.0
258,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is an environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Senior Engineer to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Design of water and wastewater treatment facilities
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of various sizes
Oversees budget, schedule and quality standards
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Acts independently on technical matters pertaining to civil/environmental engineering field
Carries out complex assignments requiring the development of new or improved techniques or procedures to create new or refined equipment, material, processes or methods
Assists in proposal preparation and interviews
May be included in contract negotiations with clients after selection
Develops relationships with existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance at staff level on existing projects
Works closely with subconsultants on projects
Active in professional associations, including attendance and participation in local, regional, and national conventions
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Minimum of 6 years of wastewater design experience in the field of environmental consulting engineering with an emphasis in hydraulics, physical, chemical, and biological treatment processes and treatment plant design
Experience in development of conceptual/preliminary designs and detailed design document preparation
Demonstrated experience with managing and designing medium sized projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Experience working with wastewater collection systems and water and reclaimed water transmission/distribution projects
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Proficient in MS Word and Excel
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering",343.0
259,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree2 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience in a semiconductor environmentExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",344.0
260,chemical+engineer,"Chemicals Production Project Technical ManagerChemicals ManufacturingLocation: Dallas, TXSalary: $140-$150kRelo: YesBonus: YesNO VISA SPONSORSHIPDescription: This position has both production and project responsibilities breaking down to production support, day to day optimization, and project work. Reports to the Plant Manager.Supervising and mentoring technicians.Requirements: · B.S. Chemical Engineering· 10+ years’ experience out of ideally a PSM regulated Chemical Plant but not necessary, will consider coatings/adhesives· Must have production support, process optimization, and project engineering at ideally 100k plus.· Supervisory experience is needed which could be Production Supervision, supervising other engineers, or supervising other technicians.· Batch and mixing knowledgeJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):Do you have a stable career path with limited job changes?What Chemical products are being manufactured with your current or recent employer?Do you have experience in a PSM regulated Chemical Plant?Do you have a completed Chemical Engineering Degree?Do you have current day-to-day process optimization hands-on experience?Do you have hands-on project engineering accomplishments at ideally 100k or above?Do you have Batch and/or mixing chemicals experience?Are you PMP certified?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",345.0
261,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is a nationally recognized environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Project Manager to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of medium to large sizes of moderately complex nature
Responsible for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Directs several subordinate supervisors or team leaders
Responsible for training and monitoring internal staff
Initiates and maintains extensive contacts with key engineers and officials of other organizations and companies
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Plans and develops projects concerned with unique or controversial problems that have an important effect on major organization programs
Develop standards and guides for diverse engineering activities
Determine program objectives and requirements and organize programs and projects
Involved in exploration of subject area, definition of scope and selection of problems for investigation, and development of novel concepts and approaches
Responsible for acting independently and making authoritative decisions on technical matters
Involved on team that prepares proposals, conducts interviews and negotiates contracts with clients after selection
Develops significant relationships with new and existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance
Supports firm's relationships with client management personnel
Responsible for identifying and directs sub consultants performing services on projects
Active in professional associations, including presentation of technical papers, member of technical committee, officer of local or national organization
Identify needs for recruitment of new employees and participates in selection process
Minimal travel when requested
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Greater than 15 years professional experience (exclusive of any advanced degree)
Experience includes water and/or wastewater treatment facilities, wastewater collection systems, water transmission/distribution projects, pipeline rehabilitation projects, and pump stations
Ability to deliver high quality services within budget and schedule constraints
Experience in the design and construction phase of small, medium, and large sized water and/or wastewater infrastructure projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Ability to evaluate progress of staff and results obtained, and recommends major changes to achieve overall objectives
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering
Design and construction phase experience",346.0
262,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:

Support manufacturing operations
Develop and implement improved methods of manufacturing, procedures, and processes that result in improved efficiencies, yields, machine operations, and quality
Implement project or improvement plans for areas of responsibility including but not limited to: efficiency improvements, cost reduction or quality improvement programs, new product support and other process improvements
Perform lot and equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production and to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog Technologies
Identify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicating findings to the engineering staff in a continuous manner
Support the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment/process startup, process experiments (SWRs)
Participate in data analysis and problem resolution

Minimum requirements:

5 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies

Preferred qualifications:

Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skillsStrong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsAbility to work effectively in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentAbility to take the initiative and drive for results
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",347.0
263,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree in Electrical, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer
Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMHS systems ( Brooks PRI, Murata, Daifuku)Prior experience with AMHS systemsEquipment experience on other equipment in a semiconductor environment.Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",348.0
264,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking for a Project Engineering Manager - Process to join our team in Frisco, TX.
The Project Engineering Manager - Process will be responsible, as a design professional, for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for industrial process projects in the food and beverage and consumer products industries. The individual will participate as the Haskell team lead to deliver effective and elegant process design solutions as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture, and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge, and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for reviewing new project RFP documents and preparing man-hour estimates and proposal verbiage for the process discipline portion of the project effort.
Responsible for the generation of well-organized, finished construction documents of good appearance and high accuracy, clarity, and correctness. Reviews discipline specifications for assigned projects.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Creates discipline work plans for assigned projects including budget and schedule. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors, and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Advises and assists Construction Project Managers, Superintendents, and Subcontractors in the interpretation and clarification of construction documents.
Review applicable shop drawings and submittal data for compliance with construction documents.
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Prepares inspection reports.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Participates in project strategy meetings, leads design concept development and recommends systems, produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and level of detail
Responsible for developing or verifying process equipment layouts, equipment specifications, and identifying all required support utilities for assigned projects.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Performs analysis or calculations as required.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Effectively manages project closeout tasks and warranty work.
Education/Experience:
Four-year engineering degree in either Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
A minimum of 10 years of process design-related experience and 3 years of design project management.
Professional engineering registration preferred.
Strong knowledge of processing lines and concepts for the food and beverage industry.
Knowledge and firsthand experience with developing PFD's, P&ID's, equipment arrangements, and mass-balance calculations.
Knowledge and experience in controlling project scope, schedules, budgets, and resource planning.
Experience running multi-disciplined teams of engineers and designers on a project basis.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
#LI-KD1
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical and Biological Engineering
Bachelors or better in Electrical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",349.0
265,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree5 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with TEL, ASM, or Kokusai furnaces and/or AMAT RTPEquipment experience on other equipment (e.g., Veeco, Novellus, and/or Screen)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",350.0
266,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job

Texas Instruments is looking for an energetic engineer with a passion for process. This position provides the opportunity to drive continual improvement at all levels. Our team is primarily focused on driving improved procedures and processes. We are searching for a self-directed, highly motivated engineer to join our team.

The responsibilities of a Manufacturing Process Engineer in this role include:
Perform lot/equipment dispositions to support the continuous flow of production to minimize cycle time in a high volume manufacturing 300mm wafer Fab running Analog TechnologiesIdentify systematic problems in either process or equipment related sources and communicate findings to the engineering staff in a continuous mannerTroubleshoot process/equipment issues; define experiments that lead to improvements in yield, cycle time and world class costDevelop efficient low cost solutions to drive world class quality given aggressive ramp timelineSupport the manufacturing ramp with execution of equipment install and startupUse SPC, statistics, and DOE to analyze data.

Minimum requirements:

Bachelor's degree in Materials Science Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Physics or a related field
3 years job related experience working in semiconductor manufacturing Fabs

Preferred Skills & Qualifications:

Previous wafer Fab and/or startup experience.
Prior experience with PECVD/SACVD/PVD processes
Prior experience with 300mm wafer size is a plus.Knowledge of AMAT Producers/Centura/Endura tools is a plus.
Ability / willingness to work in a team environment to the Fab goals
The ability to analyze electrical parameters and yield is a plus.
Ability to quickly gather and analyze data to resolve issues.
Ability to manage and prioritize multiple tasks/projects.
Ability to effectively deal with a dynamically changing environment.
Must be able to communicate and effectively work with others on cross functional teams.
Must be able to work with aggressive timelines and drive for timely results that meet or exceed Fab goals.
Strong communication skills both written and oral
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",351.0
267,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",353.0
268,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job

Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.


Responsibilities include:

Evaluating, selecting, and ordering equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacture of company products
Overseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipment
Keeping current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issues
Studying equipment performance and reliability
Establishing programs and solutions for increasing uptime and for equipment problems that affect the manufacturing process
Providing technical support to the manufacturing equipment repair and process engineering organizations
Defining and writing preventative maintenance schedules
Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with implant equipment such as AMAT Varian and/or Axcelis HE, XE, Purion, etc.Prior experience with vacuum, robotics, electrical, and mechanical design/maintenanceEquipment experience on other semicondcutor equipment (e.g., AMAT, Axcelis, etc.)Experience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques. Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",354.0
269,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the Job
Do you want to work for an organization that values your opinion? Do you want to work for an organization where you can play a pivotal role in several different areas? Look no further. As a Texas Instruments Equipment Engineer, you will have the opportunity to work in a vibrant and dynamic team oriented environment.

Responsibilities include:
Evaluating and selecting equipment that is most appropriate and cost effective for the manufacturing of company productsOverseeing the installation, modification, upgrade and maintenance of manufacturing equipmentStaying current on equipment manufacturers' technical notices, upgrades and safety issuesAnalyzing and improving equipment performance and stabilityEstablishing robust solutions for equipment fails that affect the manufacturing processDefining and writing preventative maintenance schedules and specifications

Minimum Requirements:
BS degree EE/ECE, Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Physics or related engineering degree3 years of relevant experience working in a semiconductor manufacturing environment as an Equipment Engineer

Preferred Qualifications:
Equipment experience with AMAT and/or KLA metrology equipmentPrior experience with optical or laser based metrology equipmentExperience on tool monitoring and interdiction software, and equipment maintenance and documentationWorking knowledge of semiconductor manufacturing, and SPC techniques
Experienced with semiconductor cleanroom protocol and behaviors.
Strong verbal and written communication skillsDemonstrated strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryAbility to work effectively in an interrupt-driven, fast-paced and rapidly changing environmentDemonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationships
To be considered for this position, please apply.
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",355.0
270,chemical+engineer,":
The Sr. Project Engineer / Project Manager evaluates, assembles, and designs packaging equipment to create and modify automated solutions for Design Group clients. This position will act as a project lead/SME on packaging and equipment activities in a variety of industries (pharmaceutical, consumer, beverage, food, industrial). In addition, this role will be responsible for identification and troubleshooting of potential or current packaging problems and support of maintenance mechanics to identify and resolve problems to maintain and potentially increase productivity.
Responsibilities:
Will complete packaging line design and development to include estimation, justification, budget, schedule, design, implementation, acquisition, installation, start-up, troubleshooting, and documentation facilities and equipment compliant with local, state, federal, and international regulations.
Develop equipment design and specifications, design of equipment support systems, and bid analyses.
Lead communications with vendors (OEM’s) and contractors to implement “cutting edge” automation solutions.
Provide engineering solutions for continuous improvement objectives using industry standard tools and procedures (Change Control, ROI, etc.)
Ability to evaluate existing packaging operations and suggest and drive projects to provide immediate ROI and improve productivity.
Identify and specify required tooling and/or packaging equipment for projects within designated timelines.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in packaging solutions, mechanical design, and project engineering.
Experience in at least one of the following industries: Beverage, Food, Consumer Products, Pharmaceutical, Industrial.
Must showcase a deep understanding of all types of packaging equipment (filling, secondary packaging, palletizing) in a range of industries and applications. Ideally including fully “integrated” lines.
Demonstrate daily problem-solving capabilities including strategic and critical thinking.
Must have strong interpersonal/communication skill: verbal and written.
Excellent project management skills including communication, financial management, and team leadership
Cross-functional networking and influencing ability.
Ability to handle multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.
Strong desire and aptitude to interact and build relationships with clients.
Understanding of FDA regulations and requirements surrounding documentation required is a plus.
Ability to close out projects successfully and building for the next opportunity
Have a strong history of critical problem solving “wins”
Experience in writing scope of work documentation and managing contractors on site
Strong working knowledge of applicable ACAD, SOPs and cGMPs.
Knowledge of packaging components & equipment types correlating to those components
General understanding of automation control systems (PLC, HMI, VFD’s, etc)
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
B.S. Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
Minimum 5-7 years of industrial project engineering or project management experience involving packaging systems and manufacturing automation applications. Experience in the food, dairy or high speed beverage/brewery industries is applicable and preferred.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",356.0
271,chemical+engineer,"CDM Smith currently has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Project Manager with previous experience managing water and wastewater projects to join our West Central group. In this position, you will be the main point of contact for planning and design of municipal drinking water, wastewater treatment, and pump station projects in the greater Fort Worth/Dallas (north Texas) area and assist with business development activities. CDM Smith has been providing services to the Fort Worth/Dallas market for over 20 years. Our services have spanned the areas of design and construction administration of drinking water, wastewater, water resources, and storm water facilities.

As a member of this team, you would contribute to CDM Smith's mission by:
Managing and serving as the lead Project Manager on major Fort Worth/Dallas area municipal Water & Wastewater projects.Providing technical guidance, senior leadership, and mentoring engineering staff to enhance our water services design capabilities.Being responsible for scope, schedule, budget development, monitoring and for projects managed.Completing Quality Assurance/Quality Control of key deliverables.Assisting Client Service Leaders with technical marketing including proposals and meeting clients in the north Texas region.Participation in professional societies relevant to the industry.Building and maintaining positive working relationships with key decision makers in our clients’ organizations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree.
10 years of related experience.
PMP (PMI), CCM or DBIA certification is required (within 12 months of hire or promotion onto the Approved Project Manager list).
Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in civil, environmental, or chemical engineering or related discipline.Professional engineering (PE) license.Previous experience working on and managing design projects for municipal drinking water, wastewater, and/or pump stations.Previous experience managing multi-discipline project teams.Excellent communication, networking and team building skills.Previous experience working directly with clients.Master’s degree.Previous experience working and managing projects for municipal clients in the greater north Texas market.Previous business development experience including preparation of proposals and scopes of work and cost estimates for municipal clients.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
NAU
Group
WCG
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",357.0
272,chemical+engineer,"Sr Validation Engineer
Burlington, MA 6 months + 2 Openings On-site preferred. ( 2 -3 days onsite is also acceptable) Sr. Validation Engineer
Exciting opportunity with a growing global contract research and manufacturing services to the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries.
The Sr. Validation Engineer is responsible for developing and executing validation and revalidation protocols for processes, equipment, utility, and test systems. This person will work with Engineering and Facilities personnel to assure proper installation and operation of systems prior to and post validation. This individual will provide technical support to users of validated systems as required. Will provide assistance to Senior Engineers in support of on-going projects, as well as perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required. The Sr. Validation Engineer works under the direction of the Director or a designate; interacts with all other departments for Engineering and Validation-related issues as required.
Responsibilities

Develop and execute required protocols and complete reports for equipment, process utility, test, and software validations and revalidations as assigned
Develop and write Standard Operating Procedures, protocols, incidents, and final reports for new processes and equipment, in conjunction with the system owners
Support department projects by assisting senior engineers on ongoing projects
Perform Preventive Maintenance and Calibration tasks as required following existing procedures
Support internal and external audits by providing data appropriate to the investigation as required
Keep Department Management and personnel aware of Engineering related issues that may have a regulatory compliance or financial impact

Requirements

Bachelor's Degree required; Chemical Engineering Degree preferred
3+ years of experience in validation in Pharmaceutical industry
Familiarity with validation tools and processes, including temperature mapping and use of Kaye Validator
Familiarity with FDA and EU regulations for pharmaceuticals and medical devices
Strong technical writing skills are required to author validation documentation
Ability to work semi-independently; demonstrated ability to interact well with other technical departments
Excellent communication skills

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, and ability to adjust focus.
Join I3 Infotek. Make a winning team even better.
Do you share our passion for supporting life sciences industries? Careers at I3 Infotek are always on the rise. We never stop looking for medical device and pharmaceutical experts like you! Our team members are the foundation for our current and future success. Excellence is our most valued asset. We make it our priority to support you as a valued team member. We offer a work experience that’s challenging and rewarding, with lots of room for innovation, creativity, independent thinking and growth. If you’re looking for career-growth along with a work-platform that will further your skill set, expertise, and experience, then check our current job openings and apply, or send your resume to jobs@i3infotek.com.",359.0
273,chemical+engineer,"A Manufacturing Process Engineer position in Dallas, TX is currently available through Belcan with one of our manufacturing clients. In this position, you will be responsible for analyzing processes and proposing/implementing improvements that will ensure production lines run with optimum quality and reliability, following a lean manufacturing approach. To be considered for this position you must be a team player and have 2+ years' experience in bottling/packaging line environment.

Process Engineer Responsibilities

Continuous improvement of production processes, with a heavy focus on Production Reliability improvements
Training and support of operators in machine operation including creation of documents for centerline monitoring/adjustment and cleaning inspections and lubrication.
Implementation of new process and changes on the current process as well as other tasks pertinent to the department
Analyze the production times and the man/plant saturation using the Methods-Time Measurement method
Define and validate through technically supportive production run and identifying the appropriate processes with the relative standard cycles and the maximum achievable performance data
Define the operative instructions for the internal processes connected to the product to be produced including SOP, Cleaning, Inspection and Lubrication and Centerline instructions
Create and update line/plant layouts in AutoCAD 2D, and the ability to support new equipment

Process Engineer Requirements:

Bachelors Degree in Industrial, Mechanical, Electrical. Chemical or Controls Engineering
2 + years experience working as an engineer in a high-speed bottle packaging line environment
Lean Manufacturing Principles
Project Management Principles
AutoCAD
SAP (preferred)

If you are interested in this Process Engineer job in Dallas, TX, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a leading provider of qualified personnel to many of the world's most respected enterprises. We offer excellent opportunities for contract/temporary, temp-to-hire, and direct assignments in the engineering, IT, and professional fields. We are the employer of choice for thousands worldwide. Our overriding goal is to provide quality staffing solutions that help people, organizations, and communities succeed. Belcan is a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity. For more information, please visit our website at http://www.belcan.com.",360.0
274,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking to add a Senior Engineer - Process to join our team in either Salt Lake City, UT, Frisco, TX, and Madison, WI!
The Senior Engineer - Process will be responsible for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for process projects in the manufacturing sector, with an emphasis on the food and beverage industry. The individual will participate as a Haskell team member to deliver integrated process/systems as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Application of Knowledge of Process Systems:
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and complies with all applicable codes, ordinances, standards, and regulations.
Develops all engineering calculations for process throughput, mass/energy balance, equipment sizing, relief devices, heat transfer, and fluid transfer.
Selects proper equipment for the unit operations that define the process.
Design:
Participates in project strategy meetings, develops design concepts, and recommends system solutions.
Responsible for the development of Block Flow Diagrams (BFDs), Process Flow Diagrams (PFDs), and Piping & Instrumentation Diagrams (P&IDs) for all assigned process projects. In-depth understanding of PIP Industry standards.
Develops or verifies utility requirements, equipment lists, equipment specifications, and controls as well as instrumentation requirements for each assigned process project.
Works closely with engineers and designers for proper arrangement of equipment and piping to support the process and incorporate sound ergonomic principles.
Works closely with the client and vendors to determine required waste disposal paths, maintenance access requirements, and other ancillary process needs to ensure they are accounted for.
Responsible to produce well-organized, finished construction drawings of good appearance, accuracy, and clarity, in accordance with company or client CAD standards.
Responsible for producing process discipline construction material specifications and installation scope of work documents for assigned projects.
Construction Support:
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Inspections may occur at the client’s site or at a vendor for specialty equipment. Prepares inspection reports.
Performs equipment submittal reviews and responds to the contractor and/or vendor Requests for Information (RFIs).
Perform detailed bid analysis for vendor services or equipment quotes.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Effectively manages project startup, commissioning, verification, and closeout tasks related to the process design.
Project Management:
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Monitors client requests against the proposal and known scope of work. Develops engineering change notices under the direction of the Project Manager.
Assigns and monitors the tasks of junior engineers and designers.
Planning, Scheduling, and Profitability:
Creates a discipline work plan for assigned projects. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Plans production and prepares man-hour estimates for project effort for all work in process discipline. Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, developing proposals including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Professional Development:
Participates in the professional community organizations and trade organizations within the discipline.
Prepares and presents technical subjects through Lunch & Learns to enhance Process team knowledge and understanding.
Leadership:
Adheres to established company standards and policies.
Directs technical efforts of discipline subordinates assigned to the project.
Mentors junior engineers and designers in process design and project execution.
Education/Experience:
Minimum of 4-year engineering degree.
Typical minimum of 10 years of process design and application engineering experience.
Specific Knowledge, Skills, License, Certifications, Etc.:
Strong knowledge in food and/or beverage processing equipment/systems with a working knowledge of controls and instruments commonly used.
Practical experience in the design and implementation of processing and transfer of dry products including pneumatic transfer, mechanical conveying, and dust collection systems. Explosion mitigation techniques and requirements preferred.
Practical experience in the following areas: Blending & mixing, sheeting, baking, thermal processing, bulk liquids, and slurry systems, commercial heat exchangers, fluid transfer (fittings, valves, pumps), evaporation, sterilization, CIP, SIP, and systems automation/integration in both consumer and bulk food processing.
Practical experience with the production processes used in the manufacture of cookies, crackers, salty snacks such as tortilla chips, potato chips, pretzels, etc., cereals, cold form bars, and other food products.
In-depth knowledge and experience with proper sanitary design and hygienic requirements for food manufacturing facilities
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices including detailed specification development for equipment and installation services.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution on a large scale including full turn-key projects.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Proficiency in MS Office programs (Outlook, Word, Excel, etc) required
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: AIB, SQF, FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Familiarity with Autodesk programs (AutoCAD, Revit, Plant 3D) preferred
Ability and desire to mentor the next generation of process engineers
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Professional Engineering license a plus.
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",361.0
275,chemical+engineer,"Description
Burns & McDonnell is looking for a Senior Biogas Engineer to add to our Environmental Services Engineering team. Burns & McDonnell is a 100% employee-owned firm providing the opportunity to exercise your entrepreneurial spirit and develop professionally within a growing and industry leading engineering firm.
As part of the Environmental Services Practice, this position will support the development and growth of our waste-to-energy market services. The successful candidate will be highly self-motivated and have the following experience:
Execution of biogas feasibility studies, process design development, mass and energy balances, equipment procurement packages, construction design documents, and construction support.
Understanding of the waste to energy industry including existing / emerging markets and demonstrated ability to monitor and communicate new market drivers and regulatory changes.
Supporting civil and environmental projects which may include earthwork, stormwater, wastewater, remediation, solid waste, and restoration.
Developing and maintaining client relationships.
Mentorship to staff and project engineers.
Duties may include:
Biogas generation estimates.
Materials handling design.
Gas collection and process design.
Anaerobic digestion byproduct management.
Biogas cleanup and preparation of designs for end use.
Preparation of permit applications (water, air, solid waste).
Capital planning and cost estimating.
Written reports.
Internal and External Oral Presentations.
Training/Mentoring staff.
Business Development.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or other related engineering program from an accredited university.
PE license preferred.
Minimum 7 years related experience, 3 years experience in biogas engineering preferred.
Available for travel and field work (approximately 15% travel)
EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
Job Civil Engineering
Primary Location US-MO-Kansas City
Other Locations US-KS-Wichita, US-ME-Portland, US-AZ-Tucson, US-WA-Seattle, US-MA-Newton, US-PA-Philadelphia, US-TX-Fort Worth, US-CT-Wallingford, US-VA-Norfolk, US-NC-Charlotte, US-MN-Minneapolis/St Paul, US-AR-Springdale, US-IL-Downers Grove, US-CA-San Francisco, US-TX-Amarillo, US-UT-Salt Lake City, US-MI-Detroit, US-OH-Columbus, US-SC-Greenville, US-MO-Saint Louis, US-NJ-Morristown, US-TX-Houston, US-VA-Arlington, US-TX-Dallas, US-OK-Oklahoma City, US-FL-Orlando, US-MD-Baltimore, US-TX-Austin, US-NE-Omaha, US-GA-Atlanta, US-MN-Duluth, US-AZ-Phoenix, US-CA-Los Angeles, US-TN-Chattanooga, US-CA-Brea, US-WI-Madison, US-CA-San Diego, US-WA-Vancouver, US-VA-Richmond, US-OR-OR FIELD EMP - Portland, US-DC-Washington, US-NC-Raleigh, US-FL-Miami, US-SC-Aiken, US-VA-Roanoke, US-KY-Lexington, US-NY-Manhattan, US-IL-Chicago, US-SD-Sioux Falls
Schedule: Full-time
Travel: Yes, 15 % of the Time
Req ID: 211161
\#LI-JJ \#ENS",362.0
276,chemical+engineer,"Chemicals Production Project Technical ManagerChemicals ManufacturingLocation: Dallas, TXSalary: $140-$150kRelo: YesBonus: YesNO VISA SPONSORSHIPDescription: This position has both production and project responsibilities breaking down to production support, day to day optimization, and project work. Reports to the Plant Manager.Supervising and mentoring technicians.Requirements: · B.S. Chemical Engineering· 10+ years’ experience out of ideally a PSM regulated Chemical Plant but not necessary, will consider coatings/adhesives· Must have production support, process optimization, and project engineering at ideally 100k plus.· Supervisory experience is needed which could be Production Supervision, supervising other engineers, or supervising other technicians.· Batch and mixing knowledgeJob Type: Full-timePay: $140,000.00 - $150,000.00 per yearApplication Question(s):Do you have a stable career path with limited job changes?What Chemical products are being manufactured with your current or recent employer?Do you have experience in a PSM regulated Chemical Plant?Do you have a completed Chemical Engineering Degree?Do you have current day-to-day process optimization hands-on experience?Do you have hands-on project engineering accomplishments at ideally 100k or above?Do you have Batch and/or mixing chemicals experience?Are you PMP certified?Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",363.0
277,chemical+engineer,"About TI
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!
About the job
This role will be a joint technician supervisor as well as a process engineer in the Wet/CMP module. The selected individual will be a people manager for process technicians and will create developemtn plans, conduct performance reviews, set daily priorities, and ensure proper training for their technician team. He or she will also be a process engineer in the Wet/CMP module. Responsibilities include support manufacturing, own process performance and improvement projects, disposition lots, and support ramp activities.
Minimum requirements
2 years relevant experienceBachelor's degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Materials Science Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or a related fieldStrong foundation in statistical process control, engineering change control and process release strategies
Preferred qualifications:
Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take the initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryWorking well in a team environment is imperative in this role.Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsGood listener and excellent verbal and written communication skills
To be considered for this position, please apply.

If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",364.0
278,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is an environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Senior Engineer to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Design of water and wastewater treatment facilities
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of various sizes
Oversees budget, schedule and quality standards
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Acts independently on technical matters pertaining to civil/environmental engineering field
Carries out complex assignments requiring the development of new or improved techniques or procedures to create new or refined equipment, material, processes or methods
Assists in proposal preparation and interviews
May be included in contract negotiations with clients after selection
Develops relationships with existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance at staff level on existing projects
Works closely with subconsultants on projects
Active in professional associations, including attendance and participation in local, regional, and national conventions
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Minimum of 6 years of wastewater design experience in the field of environmental consulting engineering with an emphasis in hydraulics, physical, chemical, and biological treatment processes and treatment plant design
Experience in development of conceptual/preliminary designs and detailed design document preparation
Demonstrated experience with managing and designing medium sized projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Experience working with wastewater collection systems and water and reclaimed water transmission/distribution projects
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Proficient in MS Word and Excel
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering",365.0
279,chemical+engineer,"About TI

Texas Instruments Incorporated (TI) is a global semiconductor design and manufacturing company that develops analog ICs and embedded processors. By employing the world’s brightest minds, TI creates innovations that shape the future of technology. TI is helping about 100,000 customers transform the future, today. We’re committed to building a better future – from the responsible manufacturing of our semiconductors, to caring for our employees, to giving back inside our communities and developing great minds. Put your talent to work with us – change the world, love your job!

About the job
Describe responsibilities
Exciting opportunity to make an impact by leading a team of EE / PE shift technicians at DMOS6. The ideal candidate for this will lead the EE / PE techs on B or D shift and strive for synergy between shifts for execution and productivity on night shifts.
Manage a team of equipment & process technicians from multiple modules
Provide leadership and guidance to the EE & PE technicians.
Set EE & PE tech priorities to support operational needs and engineering priorities.
Set EE & PE tech goals and align them with Engineering team goals.
Provide continuous feedback and mentorship to the EE & PE technicians
Define EE & PE technician IDPs and support them to achieve the IDP goals.
Help drive standardization in disposition practices across the shifts.
Help onboard new EE & PE technicians and ramp plans.
Drive compliance to all safety and non-safety training for EE & PE technicians.
Build and maintain relationships between the engineering, manufacturing and technician teams.
Participate in audits (customer, internal, FAB, 5S, etc)
Support engineering module with certain process ownership.
Minimum requirements:
B.S. Degree in Chemical Engineering, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering, Engineering Physics, Materials Science, Mechanical Engineering, Metallurgic Engineering, Physics or relevant Technical degree. May consider AS degreed candidates with relevant work experience and demonstrated leadership skills.
Minimum of 3 years of experience
Must have 3 years of experience working in Fab environment.
Preferred qualifications:
Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in teams and collaborate effectively with people in different functionsAbility to take initiative and drive for resultsStrong time management skills that enable on-time project deliveryWorking well in a team environment is imperative in this role.Demonstrated ability to build strong, influential relationshipsGood listener and excellent verbal and written communication skills
If you are interested in this position, please apply to this requisition.

Texas Instruments is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse, inclusive work environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to protected characteristics, including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or age.",366.0
280,chemical+engineer,":
The Sr. Project Engineer / Project Manager evaluates, assembles, and designs packaging equipment to create and modify automated solutions for Design Group clients. This position will act as a project lead/SME on packaging and equipment activities in a variety of industries (pharmaceutical, consumer, beverage, food, industrial). In addition, this role will be responsible for identification and troubleshooting of potential or current packaging problems and support of maintenance mechanics to identify and resolve problems to maintain and potentially increase productivity.
Responsibilities:
Will complete packaging line design and development to include estimation, justification, budget, schedule, design, implementation, acquisition, installation, start-up, troubleshooting, and documentation facilities and equipment compliant with local, state, federal, and international regulations.
Develop equipment design and specifications, design of equipment support systems, and bid analyses.
Lead communications with vendors (OEM’s) and contractors to implement “cutting edge” automation solutions.
Provide engineering solutions for continuous improvement objectives using industry standard tools and procedures (Change Control, ROI, etc.)
Ability to evaluate existing packaging operations and suggest and drive projects to provide immediate ROI and improve productivity.
Identify and specify required tooling and/or packaging equipment for projects within designated timelines.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in packaging solutions, mechanical design, and project engineering.
Experience in at least one of the following industries: Beverage, Food, Consumer Products, Pharmaceutical, Industrial.
Must showcase a deep understanding of all types of packaging equipment (filling, secondary packaging, palletizing) in a range of industries and applications. Ideally including fully “integrated” lines.
Demonstrate daily problem-solving capabilities including strategic and critical thinking.
Must have strong interpersonal/communication skill: verbal and written.
Excellent project management skills including communication, financial management, and team leadership
Cross-functional networking and influencing ability.
Ability to handle multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.
Strong desire and aptitude to interact and build relationships with clients.
Understanding of FDA regulations and requirements surrounding documentation required is a plus.
Ability to close out projects successfully and building for the next opportunity
Have a strong history of critical problem solving “wins”
Experience in writing scope of work documentation and managing contractors on site
Strong working knowledge of applicable ACAD, SOPs and cGMPs.
Knowledge of packaging components & equipment types correlating to those components
General understanding of automation control systems (PLC, HMI, VFD’s, etc)
Willing and able to travel as necessary for project requirements to include but not be limited to: project installation and start-up activities, client meetings, company sponsored meetings, trainings, industry related seminars, forums, or conventions, etc.
Education:
B.S. Mechanical Engineering, Chemical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
Minimum 5-7 years of industrial project engineering or project management experience involving packaging systems and manufacturing automation applications. Experience in the food, dairy or high speed beverage/brewery industries is applicable and preferred.

At Barry-Wehmiller we recognize that people come with a wealth of experience and talent beyond just the technical requirements of a job. If your experience is close to what you see listed here, please still consider applying. We know that our differences often can bring about innovation, excellence and meaningful work—therefore, people from all backgrounds are encouraged to apply to our positions. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodations during the interview process.
Barry-Wehmiller is an equal opportunity employer. M/F/D/V This organization uses E-Verify.

Applicants may be subject to pre-employment screening which may include drug screening, reference checks, employment verifications, background screening and/or skills assessments.

Company:
Design Group",367.0
281,chemical+engineer,"With general direction, performs basic to high complexity calculations, modeling, data analysis, designs, on site evaluations and/or other similar evaluations for water resources projects (Ex: climate change adaptation; coastal analysis and engineering; collection systems; CSOs; dams; drainage; economics and planning; ecosystem restoration; flood management; green infrastructure; groundwater; hydroelectric power; hydrology and hydraulics; integrated resource planning; irrigation; open channels; outfalls; planning; pressure conduits; probability and risk analysis; reservoirs; sedimentation; spillways, gates, and outlet works; stream, rivers and wetlands; stormwater management; urban watersheds; water law and regulations; watershed management; water supply planning and systems; and water quality, etc.).

Signs and seals designs and other work as necessary. Provides technical guidance and training to more junior staff.

Reviews the work of more junior staff. Collaborates with sales staff to create proposals in response to current and potential client requests for proposal (RFPs).

Reviews draft proposals for adherence to firm, industry, state, local and federal regulations and best practices. Meets with current and potential future clients to review their current and future design needs.

Contributes to firm's TKM by developing white papers and technical design documentation of new or special case designs, studies, etc.. Submits technical papers and designs for publishing to technical journals.

Performs other duties as required. Attends conferences, symposia, etc. to improve the visibility of the firm's products and services in collaboration with applicable sales staff.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Environmental, Civil, Coastal or Chemical Engineering or related discipline.

Professional engineering (PE) license.

7 years of related experience.

Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Skills and Abilities
Expert knowledge of GIS software and practices. Expert knowledge of computer assisted design and drafting (CADD) 3D and 4D software and practices. Expert Knowledge of engineering principles of design.
Certification/License Requirements
Professional Engineer
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",368.0
282,chemical+engineer,"Haskell is looking for a Project Engineering Manager - Process to join our team in Frisco, TX.
The Project Engineering Manager - Process will be responsible, as a design professional, for the production of innovative, appropriate, cost-effective, designs, drawings, and specifications for industrial process projects in the food and beverage and consumer products industries. The individual will participate as the Haskell team lead to deliver effective and elegant process design solutions as specified and contracted.
The Consumer Packaged Goods (CPG) Group at Haskell supports core markets throughout the United States, as well as Mexico and the Asia Pacific Region. Providing construction, architecture, and engineering for over 55 years in the food and beverage, consumer products and beer, wine and spirits markets, we work closely with many Fortune 500 companies providing our industry knowledge and expertise. Our CPG team is a melting pot of industry-leading experts and knowledgeable team members that work together, providing the best solutions to our clients with diverse backgrounds, knowledge, and experience. By joining the CPG team, you will become a part of a close-knit family that is ready to help support each other and our clients and a unique opportunity to build your skills, provide knowledge and create things that matter.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for reviewing new project RFP documents and preparing man-hour estimates and proposal verbiage for the process discipline portion of the project effort.
Responsible for the generation of well-organized, finished construction documents of good appearance and high accuracy, clarity, and correctness. Reviews discipline specifications for assigned projects.
Assists in coordinating information with and monitoring efforts/costs of discipline-related outside consultants.
Creates discipline work plans for assigned projects including budget and schedule. Monitors workload status, advising supervisor of difficulties in accomplishing schedules.
Coordinates work with other disciplines. Performs interdisciplinary coordination checks to minimize deficiencies, errors, and omissions in drawings and specifications.
Advises and assists Construction Project Managers, Superintendents, and Subcontractors in the interpretation and clarification of construction documents.
Review applicable shop drawings and submittal data for compliance with construction documents.
Participates as requested in construction inspection to monitor compliance with design intent, construction drawings, and specifications. Prepares inspection reports.
Provides timely solutions to field problems and prepares field orders, addenda, and record drawings.
Participates in project strategy meetings, leads design concept development and recommends systems, produces pricing and proposal presentation documents and outline specifications.
Ensures execution of the process scope of services that meets customer’s project requirements and level of detail
Responsible for developing or verifying process equipment layouts, equipment specifications, and identifying all required support utilities for assigned projects.
Assists the project team with the identification of process partners (equipment & automation) and pre-qualifies them for appropriate services.
Develops process-related budgets under the direction of the Project Manager.
Performs analysis or calculations as required.
Assists the project team in RFP responses, including the preparation of conceptual estimates, schedules, and other proposal documents. May participate in client presentations.
Effectively manages project closeout tasks and warranty work.
Education/Experience:
Four-year engineering degree in either Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
A minimum of 10 years of process design-related experience and 3 years of design project management.
Professional engineering registration preferred.
Strong knowledge of processing lines and concepts for the food and beverage industry.
Knowledge and firsthand experience with developing PFD's, P&ID's, equipment arrangements, and mass-balance calculations.
Knowledge and experience in controlling project scope, schedules, budgets, and resource planning.
Experience running multi-disciplined teams of engineers and designers on a project basis.
Knowledge of vendor qualification, procurement, and administrative practices.
General knowledge of AE&C practices, coordination, and execution.
Negotiation and relationship development skills with clients.
Working knowledge of related regulatory, oversight, and advisory agencies: FDA, USDA, EPA, PMO, 3A, GMP’s, SPS, SSOP, and HACCP.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
#LI-KD1
Haskell is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities). All persons shall have the opportunity to be considered for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, alienage or citizenship status, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran’s status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.
Haskell is a drug-free workplace, all applicants who receive conditional offers of employment will be subjected to pre-employment drug testing.
Education
Preferred
Bachelors or better in Mechanical Engineering
Bachelors or better in Chemical and Biological Engineering
Bachelors or better in Electrical Engineering
Licenses & Certifications
Preferred
Professional Engineer
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",370.0
283,chemical+engineer,"Overview:

Carollo Engineers is a nationally recognized environmental engineering firm that specializes in the planning, design, and construction of water and wastewater facilities. We are seeking a Project Manager to join our team.
Responsibilities:
Plans, schedules, and conducts engineering work on projects of medium to large sizes of moderately complex nature
Responsible for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Directs several subordinate supervisors or team leaders
Responsible for training and monitoring internal staff
Initiates and maintains extensive contacts with key engineers and officials of other organizations and companies
Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing, and coordinating assignments
Plans and develops projects concerned with unique or controversial problems that have an important effect on major organization programs
Develop standards and guides for diverse engineering activities
Determine program objectives and requirements and organize programs and projects
Involved in exploration of subject area, definition of scope and selection of problems for investigation, and development of novel concepts and approaches
Responsible for acting independently and making authoritative decisions on technical matters
Involved on team that prepares proposals, conducts interviews and negotiates contracts with clients after selection
Develops significant relationships with new and existing clients and has responsibility for client maintenance
Supports firm's relationships with client management personnel
Responsible for identifying and directs sub consultants performing services on projects
Active in professional associations, including presentation of technical papers, member of technical committee, officer of local or national organization
Identify needs for recruitment of new employees and participates in selection process
Minimal travel when requested
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental, or Chemical Engineering
Registration as a Professional Engineer
Greater than 15 years professional experience (exclusive of any advanced degree)
Experience includes water and/or wastewater treatment facilities, wastewater collection systems, water transmission/distribution projects, pipeline rehabilitation projects, and pump stations
Ability to deliver high quality services within budget and schedule constraints
Experience in the design and construction phase of small, medium, and large sized water and/or wastewater infrastructure projects with full responsibility for budget, schedule, contractual obligations and quality standards
Ability to evaluate progress of staff and results obtained, and recommends major changes to achieve overall objectives
Ability to communicate effectively with clients and project team
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Civil or Environmental Engineering
Design and construction phase experience",371.0
284,chemical+engineer,"CDM Smith currently has an exciting opportunity for a Senior Project Manager with previous experience managing water and wastewater projects to join our West Central group. In this position, you will be the main point of contact for planning and design of municipal drinking water, wastewater treatment, and pump station projects in the greater Fort Worth/Dallas (north Texas) area and assist with business development activities. CDM Smith has been providing services to the Fort Worth/Dallas market for over 20 years. Our services have spanned the areas of design and construction administration of drinking water, wastewater, water resources, and storm water facilities.

As a member of this team, you would contribute to CDM Smith's mission by:
Managing and serving as the lead Project Manager on major Fort Worth/Dallas area municipal Water & Wastewater projects.Providing technical guidance, senior leadership, and mentoring engineering staff to enhance our water services design capabilities.Being responsible for scope, schedule, budget development, monitoring and for projects managed.Completing Quality Assurance/Quality Control of key deliverables.Assisting Client Service Leaders with technical marketing including proposals and meeting clients in the north Texas region.Participation in professional societies relevant to the industry.Building and maintaining positive working relationships with key decision makers in our clients’ organizations.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree.
10 years of related experience.
PMP (PMI), CCM or DBIA certification is required (within 12 months of hire or promotion onto the Approved Project Manager list).
Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in civil, environmental, or chemical engineering or related discipline.Professional engineering (PE) license.Previous experience working on and managing design projects for municipal drinking water, wastewater, and/or pump stations.Previous experience managing multi-discipline project teams.Excellent communication, networking and team building skills.Previous experience working directly with clients.Master’s degree.Previous experience working and managing projects for municipal clients in the greater north Texas market.Previous business development experience including preparation of proposals and scopes of work and cost estimates for municipal clients.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
NAU
Group
WCG
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",372.0
285,chemical+engineer,"Company DescriptionVibrant Sciences and Vibrant America are leading science and technology companies delivering life-transforming laboratory services. Vibrant’s vision is to enable symptom-based diagnostics and prognostics for Autoimmune disease and other chronic diseases using an integrated micro-array platform that would enable multiplex testing at an affordable cost.Founded by technologists-scientists, our science-driven approach has resulted in numerous products and services in a range of diseases, including allergy, autoimmune like Celiac, connective tissue, rheumatoid arthritis and infectious diseases. In addition to our technology and world-class manufacturing operations, we are a CLIA and CAP accredited laboratory headquartered in San Carlos, California.Essential Functions and SkillsDesign and develop LC/MS, ICP/MS, GC/MS projects.Work in a lab environment and assist in lab operationsLeading studies to support optimization of manufacturing processes.Leading development and validation of both physical and analytical test methodsBe an active member of the team, seeking and accepting laboratory responsibilities to maintain and improve the workplace.Independently design and execute experiments, complete data analysis, associated documentation, and reports.Independently make data-driven decisions regarding project objectives and progress.Utilize prior knowledge and experience to troubleshoot and resolve issues for self or others.Document procedures, write Manufacturing Batch Records, and assist in Technology Transfer of new products to the Operations TeamEducation RequirementsBS/MS in Chemical Engineering, Material Science or equivalent0-3+ years industrial experience, preferably in the area of mass spectrometryJob Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timePay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Health insurancePaid time offSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Manufacturing: 1 year (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",373.0
286,chemical+engineer,"We are looking for an innovative, forward thinking Chemical Process Engineer to design MTR’s customized membrane solutions for the energy industry, specifically for new product introductions. Responsibilities include simulating processes on commercial process simulators, sizing equipment, estimating prices, and preparing proposals. Additionally, the candidate will also be involved in developing leads and qualifying inquiries, developing PFDs, P&IDs and process optimization. The candidate will have the opportunity to interface with MTR’s potential customers and vendors, make technical calls as a team with other MTR employees and make presentations to customers. This position is particularly exciting as the candidate will be working on new product development and introductions which will break new ground at MTR.This position requires a BS in chemical engineering or a related science and some prior work experience (one to two years) is preferred. In addition, knowledge of the petrochemical, natural gas and refining industries is a plus.WE ARE AN AA/EEO/VETERAN/DISABLED EMPLOYERJob Type: Full-timePay: $88,000.00 - $92,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible scheduleFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offReferral programTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayAbility to commute/relocate:Newark, CA 94560 (Required)Education:Bachelor's (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",374.0
287,chemical+engineer,"YES (Yield Engineering Systems, Inc.) is a leading manufacturer of high-tech, cost-effective equipment for transforming surfaces, materials, and interfaces at the nanoscale. From startups to the Fortune 50, our customers rely on YES solutions to unleash products that change lives -- from cellphones and IoT devices, to AI and virtual reality, to diagnostic tests for COVID.Our industry-leading vacuum cure ovens, chemical vapor deposition (CVD) systems, and plasma etching tools are driving innovation in a wide range of exciting and growing markets. We look forward to talking with smart, energetic, team-oriented people who can grow with us. We provide competitive salary and benefits (including employee stock ownership), a beautiful light-filled new facility in a central location, and some of the best co-workers you’ll find anywhere. If this appeals to you, please read on!Process Development EngineerYES currently has an excellent opportunity for a career-minded Process Engineer with relevant experience and a bachelor’s degree (or higher) in chemistry, material Science, and/or engineering. In addition, the successful candidate will be trained on equipment that is custom-designed, serviced, and operated by YES.Responsibilities· Contribute and run process development of new processes, hardware, and controls to develop new process, achieve improved film and productivity performance-specifically for cure, coat and PR strip/descum.· Optimize current processes for polymer cure, monolayer coat and PR strip/descum.· Create, plan and meet process project schedules· Manage process development equipment and metrology systems in Apps Lab· Characterize and document processes and films· Evaluate and report system performance (software/hardware)· Start up new processes at customer sites and transfer new technology to field process engineers· Work with customers and field personnel to define specific projects and execute CIP projects to improve process· Perform customer demos of new processes and report performance· Interface with customers to understand and solve their problems· Provide sales and marketing with technical support· Present and publish papers about your results· Apply statistical methods to the design of experiments. Create test plans for DOEs and process developments.· Define, write, and update process specifications, process instructions, BOMs etc.· Write test protocols, perform tests to fully characterize new equipment or processes utilizing DOE methodology or other statistically sound methods, then write completion reports.· Train, develop, and/or provide work direction to operators, technicians and junior level engineers.Qualifications: · BS/MS/Ph.D. in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, Physics, Material Science or Engineering, Electrical Engineering etc.· 3+ years in semiconductor or Life Sciences related process engineering experience· In depth experience in CVD/PECVD/monolayer CVD· Previous Project management skills· Strong oral and written communication skills· Ability to interact and communicate effectively with a variety of personnel such as Manufacturing, Systems Engineering, Marketing, Sales, and Customer Support. Strong teamwork skills· Ability to work independently and on own initiative to deal with customers and to analyze and solve process issues· Working understanding of quality statistical models and metrics (confidence/reliability intervals, DOE, regression/trending, SPC, acceptance plans).· Must be willing to travel internationally and domestically up to 20% of the time for system training and process installation and qualification.CompensationYES offers a stimulating and fun working environment, competitive salaries, healthcare benefits & company stock options.Additional Information· Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.· YES is an equal opportunity employer and values diversity. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit and business need.Come find out why YES is such a great place to work. Apply today!Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Semiconductor or Life Sciences: 3 years (Preferred)Work Location:One locationThis Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in directionAutonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little directionHigh stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environmentCompany's website:www.yieldengineering.comBenefit Conditions:Only full-time employees eligibleWork Remotely:NoCOVID-19 Precaution(s):Personal protective equipment provided or requiredSocial distancing guidelines in placeSanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place",375.0
288,chemical+engineer,"JSR is a global leader in material sciences and chemical engineering committed to contributing to social good by supplying materials to serve future generations and providing new value today for our customers and society in areas of digital solutions, life sciences, elastomers, and next generation solutions.We value Innovation, Quality, Customers, and People! JSR combines a deep Japanese heritage of materials innovation, with speed propelled by our strong customer partnerships with premier tech & life sciences companies. Are you interested in taking JSR and your career to the next stage?EDUCATIONBS or MS in chemical or materials engineering or applicable technical fieldSKILLS & EXPERIENCE5 years minimum experience with chemical processing equipment, including pumps, vessels, and filtersAnalytical skills related to chemical process data, preferably with semiconductorsStatistical process control and design of experiments software experienceDetail-oriented, good time management, and strong organizational skillsKnowledge of SAP is a plusDUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESCreate and issue batch recipes with available technical documentation.Independently design and coordinate experiments to optimize production process parameters or understand batch process conditions.Monitor, collect, and analyze process batch performance data.Participate in the plant quality improvement program.Serve as batch process technical liaison between Materials, Production, QC, Engineering, and Technical departments.Develop or improve, and maintain written Production operation procedures as required.Ensure implementation of proper operation procedures by Production personnel.Create or improve, and update process control standards and other Production engineering documents.Participate in Design Review and Technology Transfer activities.Independently troubleshoot production issues and customer quality problems related to our products.Collaborate with Materials and QC department to ensure effective usage of raw materials and batch retains.Provide technical backup for other production engineers.Make suggestions to management for improving this position, or improving work processes.Work safely by observing safety rules, policies and procedures. Identify unsafe conditions or actions to my supervisor.Create effective reports and group presentations using Excel, Access, JMP and PowerPoint, to communicate data to other company divisions—Production, Engineering, Sales, and Management. Other duties as assigned.JSR Micro, Inc. is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.**Recruitment agencies/Headhunter do not submit resumes/CVs through our Web site or directly to managers. JSR will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with JSR. JSR does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resume.**Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",376.0
289,chemical+engineer,"Summary
Posted: Apr 20, 2021
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:200240647
Apple is looking for a Materials Engineer to join Panel Process and Optics (PPO) Engineering team. Materials Engineer is responsible for developing new materials and supporting processes that enable innovative manufacturing technologies to solve complex design challenges that have direct impact to future product, quality and delivery of Apple Displays & Touch. The individual in this role will serve as a focal point in the material development/selection/process development of advanced key process modules from the concept/architecture stage through product engineering validation builds. We work at a fast pace and require everyone to be highly self motivated. A successful candidate needs to be a flexible thinker and be able to problem-solve outside of their respective technical area.
Key Qualifications
Sound knowledge and understanding of polymer chemistry, adhesives and polymer physics to able to interact seamlessly with material vendors.
Hands-on experience in the development of new materials and demonstrated ability to create new material specifications.
Ability to work backwards from product requirements to property specifications to material formulation, process optimization and material selection based on sound understanding of structure - property - processing - performance relations.
Self-starter with proven ability to lead a project from lab scale development to high volume production without major last minute surprises
Demonstrated ability to perform DOE, data analysis, SPC control.
Demonstrated failure mode analysis, root cause investigation, and problem solving for product yield and quality issue.
Excellent written & verbal communication skills and demonstrated leadership ability.
Project Management- Excellent data handling, documentation, critical milestone creation, and organization skill.
Ability for International business travel to support project implementation and collaborate with external vendors for product manufacturing.
Description
New material development with vendors - Lead material suppliers to develop new display materials for specific programs within a given timeline. Developing fundamental understanding of structure-property relationships.
Material search and selection - Select commercially available or existing materials that meet material success criteria.
Data analysis – Develop new material characterization methods, conduct tests, data analysis, and troubleshooting.
Process Development - Leads design and development of technically complex manufacturing processes including material selection, parameter optimization, equipment, metrology and system design to enable new product designs and functional requirements.
Process FMEA - Lead PFMEA for new process technology.
Failure Analysis - Lead root cause analysis and metrology development for issues related to new process technology.
Cross-functional interaction with Product Design, Display Engineering, Display Operations and international vendors.
Keep abreast of relevant industrial material and process manufacturing technical trends.
Education & Experience
Ph.D. M.S. or B.S. degree in Chemistry, Material science, or Chemical Engineer with experience in Material/Chemical industries",377.0
290,chemical+engineer,"POSITION SUMMARY: The Process Engineer (Entry Level) is responsible for learning, understanding and monitoring all processes in the assigned areas as well as training operators within these departments. She/He will assist with implementation of new processes as needed along with providing technical engineering support for processes as required.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Perform routine process audits &continually monitor processes for quality, effectiveness and efficiency.
Assist with processing/overseeing critical jobs as needed.
Provide engineering support for assigned areas and back up support for any other process as needed.
Optimize production processing efficiencies for improvement as needed.
Train Operators &Inform manager of any potential problems.
Comply and enforce all company safety requirements.
Perform other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required.
BS in Industrial, Chemical or Electrical Engineering is preferred.
Experience in PCB industry and/or knowledge of PCB manufacturing processes a plus.
Knowledge and familiarity with ISO, Six Sigma DMAIC/Lean preferred but not required.
Ability to read and understand technical drawings and work instructions.
Ability to train operators and document in a timely manner.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and good computer skills such as Microsoft Office.
Ability to wear Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) such as gloves, protective glasses, face-shields, aprons, rubber boots, etc. & Ability to work within the confines of a room where chemicals are used.
Must be flexible to work extended hours based on company needs and be available to after hour emergency calls.
Ability to occasionally lift up to 25 pounds maximum and stand/walk throughout the day.
Ability to perform at the highest level in a fast-paced environment.

dxCKLYxQ2l",379.0
291,chemical+engineer,"If you are motivated to succeed and can see yourself in this role, please complete our application. We will follow up with you on the next steps in the interview process.
Our associates are a strategic advantage for us who are making a difference at Littelfuse. Join our team and make a difference every day!
Material Engineer
The Material Development Engineer is responsible to develop new and optimize existing fuse related material and high voltage polymeric composite materials with global multiple function teams under guidance of Sr. Material Development Engineer.
About the Job:
Discuss new material specification with new product designer
Propose new material concept to meet specification
Work with cross-functional teams and outside resources for prototyping
Perform experiments and test new materials formulation
Analyze testing data, evaluate material performance, and recommend solution
Report study progress regularly and present project update to cross-functional management
Apply project management fundamentals, including scheduling and managing resources to meet task target
Other duties as assigned
About You:
Education: MS in Material Science & Engineering emphasis in metallurgy or/and polymer, Chemical Engineering, Chemistry or similar
Must be a result-oriented and self-initiated professional
Ability to work in fast-paced and project focused environment
Strong leadership, teamwork effectiveness, and communication skills required
Littelfuse strives to empower associate growth and development in a culture of ongoing collaboration and respect for diverse global perspectives and expertise. Our Core Values – Customer Focus, Integrity, Innovation, Teamwork and Results Driven – supports us on our mission to improve the safety, reliability, efficiency, and performance of our customers’ products and systems.
We are an equal opportunity employer that takes pride in giving every associate the means and courage to make a difference – everywhere, every day.
We offer a competitive salary package and a variety of benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, Life, AD&D, Disability and Retirement benefits as well as development opportunities like internal Lean Six Sigma Certification.",380.0
292,chemical+engineer,"The Role:
Tesla’s Paint Quality team’s goal is to challenge industry norms by accelerating the implementation of improved process, equipment and materials for new paint assembly lines. This team is exploring the future of paint shop design with a sharp focus on delivering best in class aesthetics and quality to customers globally. The Paint Manufacturing Quality Engineer role is dedicated to exploring and optimizing paint technologies for Texas with a global scope implication.
As a Paint Manufacturing Quality Engineer, you will use first principles thinking to develop end to end engineering projects that deliver paint quality improvements across new processes, equipment, and materials. The ideal candidate is a self-starter who collaborates with cross-functional teams and external vendors. Experience developing Design of Experiments (DOE) and taking it to full production scale is preferred.


Responsibilities:
Collaborate with Data Engineers, Materials scientists and operations quality teams to understand field and internal quality data.
Define and justify the need for new processes, equipment and materials through developing trials and conducting data driven examination.
Develop equipment specifications, equipment feasibility, and manufacturing feasibility of key design parameters
Lead manufacturing line design and launch – develop bid packages, vendor selection, define front end engineering design, engineering reviews, factory/site acceptance testing, construction, installation, and commissioning & handover to operations.
Identify key findings and critical requirements of painting process via design of experiments in lab and production scale.
Interface with factory operations to commission new processes, equipment and materials into production
Develop validation documentation of implemented quality projects
Communicate results and findings to management and executives
Create and track project schedules and budget
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical, Manufacturing/Industrial, or Chemical Engineering or other Engineering discipline, or equivalent in experience.
3+ years experience in automotive or industrial manufacturing equipment/process design
Ability to apply fundamental engineering principles to identify and drive non-standard solutions to improve paint quality.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills when working with internal groups and outside vendors.
Ability to operate as an independent leader and collaborative team member.
Experience developing schedules, managing workloads, and driving timelines.
Experience in data analytics
Proficiency in AutoCad, Catia, or Solid Works is a plus.
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite of programs.
Experience in the following manufacturing engineering roles is preferred, but not required:
Equipment:
Experience with design for manufacturability (DFM)
Knowledge of industrial equipment ranging from pumps, motors, fans, robots, etc.
Experience with line layout, development and optimization.
Experience developing standard operating procedures, maintenance procedure, and operational control plans.
Process:
Experience creating process documentation
Proficiency in writing PFMEAs
Knowledgeable about production quality metrics is advantageous
Experience with line layout, development and optimization.
Experience communicating to cross-functional teams with technical & non-technical backgrounds
Quality:
Establish and maintain quality performance metrics
Develop and improve quality standards based on customer and managerial feedback.
Experienced developing fishbones diagrams, FMEA, process capability analysis, hypothesis testing, DOE, SPC, etc
Manufacturing:
Building a project from end to end. Defining project scope, design, source, install, commission, train operations.
Drive aggressive timelines and communicate results regularly.
Proven management ability
Ability to develop manufacturing feasibility studies for changing product and process parameters.
Manufacturing:
Building a project from end to end. Defining project scope, design, source, install, commission, train operations.
Drive aggressive timelines and communicate results regularly.
Proven management ability
Ability to develop manufacturing feasibility studies for changing product and process parameters.",381.0
293,chemical+engineer,"At Corbion, we exist to champion preservation in all its forms, preserving food and food production, health, and our planet.
Corbion’s Algae Ingredients business, based in South San Francisco, leads the industry in developing new applications and markets for algae-based products. We have a range of sustainably produced algae products that deliver breakthrough innovations for human and animal nutrition.
An opportunity is available in our Pilot Plant group to support process development and technology transfer efforts. The successful candidate will be an integral member of a multi-disciplinary team focused on the development of new products and processes utilizing Corbion’s unique fermentation and downstream recovery technologies.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Aids in the setup, monitoring, and cleaning of bench and pilot scale experiments, with attention to both fermentation and downstream product recovery. Supports troubleshooting of equipment and processes.
Provides detailed observations of experiments. Records data and assists with the analysis of results. Identifies deviations with experiments and seeks appropriate advice to resolve.
Operates lab and pilot plant equipment independently, including operational support for fermentation over weekends, with ensured time compensation over the work week.
Prepares media, buffers, and solutions for fermentations at 1000L pilot scale.
Performs routine procedures of moderate complexity, such as Kit Assays and gravimetric analysis of solids and washed solids.
Works within a team framework, with both individual responsibility and support of other staff.
Maintains process area and equipment in good working order.
Other duties as assigned.
REQUIREMENTS:
Qualified applicants will possess a B.S or equivalent in Chemical Engineering, Biochemical Engineering, Chemistry, Biology or a related field, with 0-3 years industrial experience.
Familiar with bioprocessing equipment operations in lab or pilot laboratory setting.
Knowledge analyzing biological materials using common analytical chemistry and wet chemistry methods.
Hands-on mechanical skills with operation and maintenance of food production, bioprocessing, and/or utility system equipment preferred
Motivated individual, willing to learn and develop in a pilot plant process development environment.
Excellent written and verbal communication; and the ability to work both independently and as a teammate within an interdisciplinary team.
Ability to work in a fast paced environment without sacrificing accuracy, quality of work, and safety.
Good organizational and time management skills.
Proficiency with Microsoft Excel and Word
About Corbion
Corbion is the global market leader in lactic acid and its derivatives, and a leading supplier of emulsifiers, functional enzyme blends, minerals, vitamins, and algae ingredients. We use our unique expertise in fermentation and other processes to deliver sustainable solutions for the preservation of food and food production, health, and our planet. For over 100 years, we have been uncompromising in our commitment to safety, quality, innovation and performance. Drawing on our deep application and product knowledge, we work side-by-side with customers to make our cutting-edge technologies work for them. Our solutions help differentiate products in markets such as food, home & personal care, animal nutrition, pharmaceuticals, medical devices, and bioplastics. In 2020, Corbion generated annual sales of € 986.5 million and has a workforce of over 2250 employees. Corbion is listed on Euronext Amsterdam. For more information: www.corbion.com
Corbion is an equal opportunity employer and committed to a diverse workplace. All applicants will be considered equally without regard to race, color, ethnicity, veteran status, religion, national origin, marital status, political affiliation, age, sex, sexual orientation, handicapping condition, membership in an organization or any other non-merit factors.
Corbion provides reasonable accommodation to applicants
EOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled
Corbion does not accept unsolicited resumes from individual recruiters or third party recruiting agencies in response to job postings. No fee will be paid to third parties who submit unsolicited candidates directly to our hiring managers. All candidates must be submitted by approved Corbion vendors who have been expressly requested to make a submission by our Talent Acquisition team for a specific job opening. No placement fees will be paid to any firm unless such a request has been made by the Corbion Talent Acquisition team and such candidate was submitted to the Corbion Talent Acquisition Team.",382.0
294,chemical+engineer,"Our Client, a leading manufacturer of high-technology automotive glass, has a direct-hire opportunity for a Process Improvement Production Engineer at their new facility in Tracy, CA.Your focus will be on the OEE components, and the activities to reduce waste, reduce variation, and increase throughput to ensure the increase in process productivity, as well as the efficient use of labor, machinery, technology, through the application of standard work tools for process control and continuous improvement.Responsibilities: Follow the performance KPI’s as Yield, Uptime and Flowrate.Identify the causes of the issues impacting negatively on the KPI’sUse engineering tools and techniques such as DMAIC, 8D and DOE.Execute actions to address the pain points and troubleshoot.Update quality system and job instructions/Standard Operating Procedures (SOP’s).Collaborate in specific projects related to increase of capacity.Responsible for the equipment, system and methods used at the Tracy facility.Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in a technical field (industrial, chemical, or mechanical engineering)Minimum 2 years of experience in similar positionExperience in process of plastic injectionExperience with Maintenance (Mechanic or automation)Knowledge of FMEA, MSA, SPC, 8DSkilled in process efficiency tools such as Lean Six Sigma (Green Belt), Lean Manufacturing (SMED, 5S, 8 wastes, standard work, time and motion)Proficient in MS OfficeStrategic thinking and problem solving skillsTime managementAdaptable, reliable, flexible“Founder’s mentality”Ability to instruct other employeesAbility to work in a busy environmentApply Today For Immediate ConsiderationJob Type: Full-timePay: $87,000.00 - $92,000.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftDay shiftOvertimeEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:applicable: 2 years (Preferred)Lean manufacturing: 2 years (Preferred)Plastics injection molding: 1 year (Preferred)Language:Spanish? (Preferred)License/Certification:Lean Six Sigma Certification (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",383.0
295,chemical+engineer,"OVERVIEWGator Bio is a venture backed biotech company located in Palo Alto, CA. We develop, manufacture and market instruments, biosensors, reagents, and consumables for in-vitro diagnostics and biotherapeutic development. Our mission is to simplify and accelerate biological analysis for biotherapeutic research and development.Gator Bio is looking for a Process Chemist/Engineer for product transfer, trouble-shooting, and process improvementRESPONSIBILITIESIn this role, you will be responsible for:Act as NPI member (Represent manufacturing) and transfer products from R&D to manufacturingWrite all the SOP, MRB, and other doucmrnts and train production personnelImprove manufacturing processes and reduce production costs  Implement instruments IQ,OQ, and PQWork with management to upgrade and optimize manufacturing techniques, equipment and processes.Interact and communicate with China R&D and manufacturing team to improve both upstream and downstream processesREQUIREMENTSIn order to be successful in this role, you will meet the following requirements:BS or MS in chemistry, biochemistry, chemical engineering, biomedical engineering or other related scienceAt least 5 years experience in process improvement, process development, and product transferHigh level of integrity, flexibility, and teamworkHigh attention to detail; excellent organizational skills; ability to work on multiple projectsAbility for problem-solving and decision-makingKnowledge of protein conjugation is preferredMandarin bilingual language fluency is a plusExcellent interpersonal and verbal communications skills.  Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite - Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayWork Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",384.0
296,chemical+engineer,"Position Summary: The Process Controls Engineer is responsible for ensuring the safety, reliability, and compliance of Bessemer City site manufacturing process controls systems.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develop and design programs for PLC’s and DCS’s.
Day-to-day upkeep of the process controls network.
Support the production areas with programming and controls needs.
Identify maintenance and upgrade needs for plant process controls and data historian systems.
Execute projects to enhance and maintain process control network and data historian where needed.
Support projects around the plant site to ensure consistency in process controls materials and programming are implemented.
Maintain the most up-to-date versions of the process controls programs including all software and firmware updates.
Identifies and implements best practices for maintenance of control and distribution equipment.
Reviews electrical design drawings, equipment/instrument specifications, etc., to ensure quality of design, conformance to standards and compatibility with existing installations.
Prepares detailed design packages in support of project needs.
Assists in capital budgeting process in support of operational area control needs.
Participates in commissioning and start up activities involving new electrical components or systems, process controls or instrumentation.
Support the maintenance and E&I technicians with troubleshooting.
Develops preventive maintenance (PM) strategies to ensure reliable operation of process instrumentation and control systems.
Supports site SIS systems.
Supervisory Responsibility:
No
Education and Experience:
B.S. degree required (Engineering preferred).
Minimum of 5 years process controls experience working within a manufacturing environment.
Knowledge and Skill Requirements:
In-depth experience in the following areas is required:
PLC’s
Distributed control systems
Process control electrical and instrumentation best practices
Experience in the following areas is a plus:
Allen Bradley PLC Systems
ABB DCS – 800xA
Safety Interlock Systems (SIS)
OSHA PSM environment
Project Management
MCC’s
Variable speed drives
Motion controls
PI data historian
Competencies:
Customer Focus
Functional/Technical Skills
Problem Solving
Written and Verbal Communications
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and taste or smell. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and color vision.
Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is frequently exposed to toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to wet and/or humid conditions; moving mechanical parts; fumes or airborne particles and outside weather conditions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.
Safety Requirements: All employees are expected to carry out their work functions in a healthy and safe manner, to encourage and support safe work practices at all times, and to report and/or rectify any unsafe conditions that may come to their attention immediately.
Personal Protective Equipment – Must wear PPE as required based on job duties.
Travel Required: Limited
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
LIVENT employs people across a broad range of occupations in locations across the world. We are looking for people to join us in creating, developing, and improving our products, our processes, and our markets. Employees enjoy competitive compensation, a menu of work/life benefits and opportunities to continue developing their skills and building their career.
LIVENT is an Equal Opportunity Employer, EEO, AAE, MFDV and supports a drug free workplace.",525.0
297,chemical+engineer,"With general direction, creates water and waste water treatment facilities, water and sewer systems, pipelines, pump stations, remediation sites, solid waste facilities, etc. engineering designs to meet client project requirements. Reviews draft designs and reports for compliance with federal, state and local regulations and signs off on completed designs. Ensures that firm policies and practices are followed on all designs. Performs site reviews and studies, as needed, to ensure designs are aligned with location specifications. Updates design requirements as necessary. Performs water quality analyses and modeling. Contributes to firm's TKM by developing white papers and technical design documentation of new or special case designs, studies, etc. Submits technical papers and designs for publishing to technical journals. Collaborates with sales staff to create proposals in response to current and potential client requests for proposal (RFPs). Reviews draft proposals for adherence to firm, industry, state, local and federal regulations and best practices. Meets with current and potential future clients to review their current and future design needs. Attends conferences, symposia, etc. to improve the visibility of the firm's products and services in collaboration with applicable sales staff. Performs other duties as required. Provides technical guidance and training to more junior staff. Mentors more junior staff and develops them for future growth within the discipline and firm. May supervise the work of junior engineers on project work.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Civil, Environmental or Chemical Engineering or related discipline. Professional engineering (PE) license. 7 years of related experience. Domestic and/or international travel may be required. The frequency of travel is contingent on specific duties, responsibilities, and the essential functions of the position, which may vary depending on workload and project demands.
Assignment Category
Fulltime-Regular
Amount of Travel Required
10%
EEO Statement
We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy and pregnancy-related conditions, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, disability, citizenship status, genetics, protected veteran status or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.
Background Check and Drug Testing Information
CDM Smith reserves the right to require background checks including criminal, employment, education, licensure, etc. as well as credit and motor vehicle when applicable for certain positions. In addition, CDM Smith may conduct drug testing for designated positions. Background checks are conducted after an offer of employment has been made in the United States. The timing of when background checks will be conducted on candidates for positions outside the United States will vary based on country statutory law but in no case, will the background check precede an interview. CDM Smith will conduct interviews of qualified individuals prior to requesting a criminal background check, and no job application submitted prior to such interview shall inquire into an applicant's criminal history. If this position is subject to a background check for any convictions related to its responsibilities and requirements, employment will be contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history. Criminal history will not automatically disqualify a candidate. In addition, during employment individuals may be required by CDM Smith or a CDM Smith client to successfully complete additional background checks, including motor vehicle record as well as drug testing.
Agency Disclaimer
All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.
Business Unit
TSU
Group
WSO
CDM Smith Employment Type
Regular
Visa Sponsorship Available
No - We will not support sponsorship, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas for this position",526.0
